Is this a new photo?
I’ll call them tomorrow when I return home.
Unfortunately, that is true.
Are you certain?
When I grow up, I want to be a king.
I've always wondered what it'd be like to have siblings.
Back in high school, I got up at 6 a.m. every morning.
This is interesting.
That's not important.
I hate it when there are a lot of people.
After that, I left, but then I realized that I forgot my backpack at their house.
The police will get you to find the bullets.
You wanted to tell me about freedom?
You're really not stupid.
I don't know how to demonstrate it, since it's too obvious!
I found a solution, but I found it so fast that it can't be the right solution.
It seems interesting to me.
You never have class or what?!
What options do I have left?
Everyone has strengths and weaknesses.
What keeps you up so late?
Please don't cry.
Not wanting is the same as having.
Where there's a will, there's a way.
Take a book and read it.
Life is wonderful.
Winter is the season I like best.
Never mind.
Please give me a glass of water.
Look at that smoke.
I found this restaurant by chance.
He solved the problem with ease.
Do you know the capital of Belgium?
It was very nice seeing you again.
She quit smoking.
Don't forget us!
The rain changed into snow.
Welcome to Japan.
I like music and English.
You're quite welcome.
At last we meet! I've waited so long for this day!
The woman who is sitting on the sofa is my grandmother.
The problem exacted a great effort to solve it.
I called my friend after arriving at the station.
Do you like science-fiction movies?
He promised to marry her.
Please excuse me.
I know her address.
My father will return at the beginning of next month.
French is spoken in France.
Will he be able to catch the train?
We could have our tea in the garden, were it a little warmer.
This doesn't concern me.
I've quit smoking.
Goodnight, Mother.
What's the name of this street?
The cat drinks milk.
I can't hold it anymore.
If he comes, tell him to wait for me.
My name is Yamada.
My name's Cyril. Nice to meet you.
There is no cure for lovesickness.
Not all people are evil devils.
It'll be spring soon.
Spring will be here soon.
I met your friend.
Look at me when I'm talking to you!
But she wasn't thinking of anything and just wept.
Whose turn is it?
Are you busy right now?
I am content with my job.
He is sure that he will come.
He hit me on the head.
Fish, please.
Did you meet him recently?
I will learn.
The weather was magnificent.
I want to talk to your uncle.
I'm in pain.
It was his own fault.
We don't study for life, but for school.
I'm looking for my key.
As long as there is life, there is hope.
I'll call you in an hour.
I think that he will succeed.
She was then more beautiful than she is now.
He must have been named after his grandfather.
Turn left at the next corner.
I am accustomed to working hard.
Tom can ski as well as his brother.
Translate the following sentences into Japanese.
She has gone to America.
I usually got up at five in those days.
Yesterday he came back late.
He has transferred all his knowledge to his son.
The glacier moves but by inches.
I remember reading this novel before.
Allen is a poet.
Is her father a teacher?
It being Sunday, the supermarket was very crowded.
I will make you happy.
True happiness consists of desiring little.
They were waiting for the gate to open.
I have to oppose this idea.
Be sure to mail this letter.
Are you sure you've never met him?
You'd better not drink too much coffee so late at night.
I met her in a coffee shop near the station.
I am the fastest runner.
Mike goes to school by bus.
I want you to return the book I lent you the other day.
Before I could protest, I was handcuffed and was on my way to prison.
She smokes 20 cigarettes a day.
This song is familiar to me.
He did not understand her joke.
I was walking in the park, when I heard my name called.
I caught her by the hand.
You look so pale.
I'm afraid the line is busy.
I'm very pleased to meet you.
I met an American girl.
We watch TV every day.
There is little water left in the glass.
I hope to build a new house next year.
Please sit down!
He is sure to come.
Ignorance is bliss.
I am a completely happy human being!
I see tears in your eyes.
As always, I could only hope the police wouldn't stop me.
What are you crying about, sweetheart?
Every evening, a nightingale would sing us songs.
He got an important position in the company.
She got up late.
They say he was very rich.
There is a strange man in front of the house.
I hope we don't have to wait for too long.
We all took it for granted that the professor could speak English.
It was not long before we met again by chance.
I am going to stay with my aunt in Hawaii.
We had few sunny days this summer.
Prices are high these days.
My left foot is asleep.
Today is a national holiday.
No one knows how to think, but everyone's got an opinion ready.
Do your best, and you will succeed.
I have already finished this book.
Give me the key to this castle!
But he was lucky.
He took up his pen and began to write.
She is wearing a white dress today.
I managed to finish the work.
Please give us some examples.
The dragon is an imaginary creature.
Please address the chair!
My stomach has been hurting.
There's no hot water on the fourth floor, but there is on the ground floor.
As far as I am concerned, I have no objection.
He went to the store.
He's not an idiot.
She tried hard and she failed.
We watched the game while holding our breath.
Can you walk with your eyes closed?
Call me at six tomorrow morning.
I am very interested in these stories.
I rejected the offer.
Did you like the movie?
Is she so foolish as to believe that?
She cried as she read the letter.
This is a story about a cat.
She was appointed chairperson.
This book is much more useful than that one.
The building on the right side is a school.
Where is the tea with milk?
She did nothing but cry all the while.
Beijing is the capital of China.
People love freedom.
When do you get up? "At 8 in the morning."
My language is not on the list!
In any case, it's none of your business.
Put your hands up in the air!
I've already finished my work.
Call me at four; I must take the first train.
If God did not exist, we'd have to invent him.
If you smile, I'll be happy.
He drank a glass of red wine.
I've lost my key.
I was invited to dinner.
Will you study after dinner? "Yes, I will."
Tom showed her the letter from Santa Claus.
I finished the homework, and want to go to bed, but now it's time to go to school again...
He'll wait for you.
How was the French class?
Victory is unlikely but not impossible.
These are my trousers.
You will never be too old to learn.
Please, show me these photos.
Be quiet at the table.
I can't stand this cold anymore.
I'll give you a piece of good advice.
My grandfather likes to walk.
It is believed that whales have their own language.
I have already finished the job.
Thank God.
Do you know your size?
I didn't mean to!
The boat is lost.
Show me an example.
Do you happen to know where she lives?
Cheap meat doesn't make good soup.
Are you a college student?
This region has completely changed.
I can't stand that silly woman.
Look carefully. I'm going to show you how it's done.
That was the source of his troubles.
I am very dangerous.
This is my idea.
Sorry that I forgot. I'm completely out of it today.
Where did all the bread go?
This is a sentence.
I'm used to it.
The students are back.
Oh, how late it is!
There are 40 pupils in this class.
Do you like to sing?
She attained her success through hard work.
I'm an engineer.
That's not a knife. THIS is a knife.
I have no clue.
Do you have a pen? "Yes, I have one."
Where there is grass, there is no water. Where there is water, there is no grass.
I'm not happy with this situation.
The early bird catches the worm.
I had a chance to travel abroad.
I'm not happy with this situation.
I'm not a smoker.
John spoke in such a loud voice that I could hear him upstairs.
I'm sure.
Wait for your turn, please.
Will you go by train?
She has a good figure.
Wait for me. I'll be there in a minute or ten.
He fell into the river.
I like to walk in the rain.
Either way, it's not important.
He spoke with a pipe in his mouth.
If you came, that would be great.
Concerning this matter... I really don’t know.
Are you freaking kidding me?!
Since I started wearing glasses myself, I started liking the anime where the protagonists wear glasses.
He doesn't want you to lose a whole week.
My apartment is on the fourth floor.
You have to wait in line.
My brother is an idiot.
I bought a pen like yours yesterday.
I sent her home.
What are you doing at school this afternoon?
I bought a pen like yours yesterday.
What I told you about him also applies to his brother.
If it's at all possible, I'd like you to take part in the next meeting.
Her story can't be true. She often tells lies.
He is a famous artist.
What a pity!
You can't prove it.
But your function isn't Lipschitz continuous!
It makes no difference to me whether you are rich or poor.
Where there's smoke there's fire.
There is no doubt.
I've known Jim since we were children.
I'm sorry, I love you.
I'm sorry, I love you.
Oh boy...
I'm sorry, I love you.
Rynok Square is the historic centre of the city.
On Saturday we went to the movies, then to the restaurant.
He has knowledge and experience as well.
The death of the king brought about a war.
Have you read any interesting books lately?
The new machine will take a lot of room.
He doesn't watch any television.
She has already finished the work.
What a big ship that is!
I feel like crying now.
I wonder what happened to Paul.
When did your sister leave Tokyo for London?
Your sister enjoys watching sumo wrestling on TV.
Your sister's as beautiful as ever.
Is this your glass or your sister's?
If you go to the movies, take your sister with you.
The eldest sister acted for the mother.
France was at war with Russia.
Russia had emerged as a second superpower.
Nancy looks like my sister.
Which was to be proven.
It's best to wear a cap on your head during the cold Moscow winters.
Spring arrived.
I couldn't believe my eyes.
What beautiful flowers!
I'm very sorry I came home so late.
Please get me hotel security.
There is a knife missing.
What's the name of this street, please?
How many people do you think have an ear for music?
That doesn't concern you.
The decision was still in the air.
She is poor, but she is happy.
He sometimes wished to go to extremes.
This is the very book that I want to read.
These trees were planted by them.
This old table is still in use.
Jim tends to go too far.
Her skin is as white as snow.
Man is part of nature.
Bill came all the way from Florida.
If I knew her address, I would write her a letter.
The picture reminds me of my family.
She's pleased at his success.
The wind died down by the evening.
He promised me to come here.
Will you take me to the gate?
May I be excused?
She was pale with fear.
This is a very interesting book.
He's really changed a lot since last time.
Sometimes my grandfather talks to himself when left alone.
I built a new house.
I want to be an engineer.
She looks young, but she's actually over forty.
Quality, not quantity.
I would like to give you a piece of advice.
I'd rather be a bird than a fish.
People with bad vision cannot see far.
I feel bad about having made you wait so long.
Do you like music?
I can't decide which dress I should buy.
Economic development is important for Africa.
I don't know the origin of the rumor.
It is impossible to live without water.
Please write with a pen.
I will find out how the medicine works.
The victory made him a hero.
He hurt his left foot when he fell.
I wake up early.
I wish she'd stop smoking.
The woman to whom you were talking is my sister.
He lives on the floor above me.
I'd like to call the 'rents.
This is a really sharp knife.
All students were against war.
Is she coming, too? "I hope so."
I can't turn my neck, because it hurts a lot.
I may have met her somewhere.
Have you done with the book?
Jim awoke and found himself alone in the room.
I'm not sure about who to give the present to - the boy, or the girl?
I found a note on the table, but I don't know who it's from.
Why do people go to the cinema?
He glanced at the clock.
I hope that none of them got into an accident.
In the palace live the king and the queen.
A mist hung over the river.
It took all evening.
Time goes by quickly.
I'm going to the bank.
One of the students didn’t come today.
She's got a cat. The cat's white.
He told his son an interesting story.
I'd like a map of the city.
No sooner had I hung up than the phone started ringing again.
Let's sing a song.
Smoking is banned in the train.
Do you want to know my secret? It's very simple...
My father was lost in thought.
They are looking to you for help.
I am fed up with talking to her.
All three of us are students.
I feel sorry for her.
I have a stupid question.
The knife isn't sharp.
He'll be done soon.
I looked up, and did not recognize the same man: before, I had seen death in his face; but now he was alive, and I recognized in him the presence of God.
I go to school on a bus.
I am very happy.
The key, he added, "is in the lock".
We used to go to the movies on Saturday evening.
He likes most beautiful flowers.
Could you show me this bag?
What time does it start?
They heard a noise behind them.
The discovery of a new type of meal contributes more to humankind than the discovery of a new star.
This is a very rare case.
I have faith in your ability to do the right thing.
Remember that we are all in the same boat.
We're in the same boat.
That's what I expected of my daughter.
If you turn right, you will see a big building.
I'm sorry it worked out this way.
Subways run under the ground.
I would have gone to the mountains had I had the money.
This summer we'll go to the mountains and to the sea.
He's a famous artist.
You should act more calmly.
She wore glasses.
They don't use the table and chairs.
He left early; otherwise he could not have caught the train.
She always gets up early.
He turned over the business to his son.
Even I can't believe that.
We can see a church over there.
I'm too busy to help her.
Kyoto is visited by many people every year.
Do you remember the day when we met each other for the first time?
You never listen, no matter how many times I tell you.
There are many modern buildings around here.
He thinks of everything in terms of profit.
A girl called me.
At last, she solved the problem.
The man you met at the station is my father.
The increase in population has become a serious problem in the country.
The phone kept ringing.
She does not want to be dependent on her parents.
He never loses hope.
The line is busy.
I was asked for my personal opinion about the matter.
I have drunk all my milk.
The sun always rises in the east.
It is certain that he will come here.
A new bridge is being built over the river.
This song is No. 1 on the hit chart.
Any doctor will tell you to quit smoking.
I am able to drive a car.
I cannot but object to his proposal.
The students stood waiting for a bus.
Sight is one of the five senses.
The teacher said to me, "Get out!"
They have seen better days.
He will have done his homework by tomorrow.
Sleep is no less necessary to health than food.
They went on talking all night.
Not more than 40 percent of students go on university.
When he is in trouble, he always turns to his sister for help.
She went by cab to the museum.
He's possessed by a strange idea.
What a beautiful flower!
Do you think he was only making believe that he was sick?
All right. I'll translate another fifteen sentences in German, and then leave.
John is as old as my brother.
I'd like a glass of water, please.
She is great at skiing.
When I first met him, I was taken aback by his unexpected question.
Those photos are hers.
You have good taste in music.
Please telephone me when you have made up your mind what you want to do.
I am not sure when he will be back.
I was sure I had never seen her before.
They decided to shut down the factory.
He is studying at Kyoto University.
He took a photograph of the family.
I cannot put up with his idleness any longer.
Please use this wooden box in place of a chair.
The alarm sent everyone rushing out of the room.
I can't bear that fellow.
She brought his lunch today.
Get up.
She is accustomed to doing her homework before dinner.
Father is now busy writing a letter.
Not all the students were present.
He was so busy that he sent his son instead of going himself.
I've nothing to do today.
Your name is first on the list.
Better late than never.
He is a member of the committee.
I bought a watch and I lost it the next day.
He is entirely ignorant of the world.
He asked me about my new job.
I picked out a new hat at the store.
Public opinion was strongly in favor of the project.
I put the bag on or beside the chair.
She was absent on the ground of illness.
They had a culture of their own.
How many cars do you have?
Could you please repeat that?
Work is not the object of life any more than play is.
He is busy doing something.
The girl went to school in spite of her illness.
No more of your jokes, please.
This law will benefit the poor.
He was afraid of the dark.
Your ideas are different from mine.
We live in the neighborhood of the school.
He asked me my age, my name, my address, and so forth.
I spent the summer vacation at my aunt's house.
Ask if he wants another drink.
He stayed in Nagano throughout the summer.
No sooner had I come into contact with him than I determined to get to know him well.
I remember seeing the movie before.
Our boss turned down our proposal.
Don't forget to let me know when it's time.
He has a fear of the knife.
Kensuke and Touji went out of their way to come to the station.
The movie starts.
Having worked with you was a real treat for me.
I hit him in the belly.
I didn't answer your letter, because I was busy.
I sometimes hear my father singing in the bathroom.
There are forty-one teachers and about eight hundred students in this school.
Everybody wants to live a happy life.
They're all dead.
I write articles regularly.
Don't pay any attention to what he says.
I think your answer is correct.
He has a sweet voice.
A guest should not try to make himself superior to the host.
I like to give gifts to my family and friends.
They drive on the left in England.
John said he'd like to marry me, and I'm as happy as can be.
They turned him over to the police.
The man extricated Ellie from a dangerous situation.
The pupils loved that joke.
Here is a present for your birthday.
Don't touch the grass.
The reception isn't good.
I'll check your vision.
A few minutes after he finished his work, he went to bed.
Welcome to Tatoeba!
We hoped to have done with the work before the holidays.
My new address is as follows.
Make haste slowly.
We want your advice.
Hiromi is wearing a new dress.
He found five mistakes in as many lines.
I hope it will clear up soon.
I wonder what she means by those words.
I put on my trousers.
He said he was sure to succeed; he failed, however.
It has been ten years since I left Japan.
I like this scene in particular.
He is an early riser.
She was the last person I expected to see in such a place.
Few students knew his name.
I have hardly any money with me.
I remember you. We met three years ago.
When spring comes, it gets warm.
This shirt is a little bit loose.
Close the book.
If John should call me, tell him I'll be back at seven.
Dr. Miller wants you to wait for a while.
He will reconcile their dispute.
After winter comes spring.
Come on, I didn't mean to hurt you.
I think that rumor is true.
I believe that everyone will like this picture.
Have you made up your mind to become a teacher?
Each person was given enough food and clothing.
Too long a holiday makes one reluctant to start work again.
We're not sure we can come tonight.
The sun is rising.
She likes to listen to music.
You're an adult now.
He did his best to rescue her.
It was Jack that I met yesterday.
What is the title of the book?
People tomorrow will have different ideas.
I am thinking of going abroad.
She can't be over thirty.
She cannot do without her car.
Why don't we go to the mountains this weekend?
Would you mind helping me carry this suitcase?
You may leave your seat at will.
How could you make such a mistake?
My camera is waterproof.
I prefer that dress to this one.
We could see the lights of the town in the distance.
He is at home in American literature.
Can you guess how happy I am?
How often do you go abroad?
Yes, the milk is very good.
This book is even more interesting than that.
The club members assembled in the meeting room.
He will set out for China tomorrow.
I almost forgot that it was his birthday.
Have you finished it?
It was Sunday and I wasn't about to get up early.
He promised me that he would come at four.
I can't understand this sign's meaning.
He sat there and smoked a pipe.
However hard I tried, I could not solve the problem.
If you try your best now, happiness will come to you.
I have given him permission to do what he wants to do.
Father decided to stop smoking.
Please say hello to your wife.
They appointed him chairman.
He was in a hurry to begin the new job.
I enjoy eating hot soup.
Will you let me try once more?
It is a fact that I don't know her name.
We hope that you will succeed.
You are strong-minded.
They stood up for the rights of their nation.
Since neither one of us could afford to take the other to the movies, we went Dutch.
My brother sometimes helps me with my homework.
My uncle lived abroad for many years.
You can invite any person you like.
The artist, whose paintings you liked, is a friend of mine.
Really? It took me an hour by train.
I think he is the greatest artist of the time.
There was a strong likelihood of his succeeding.
Shall I check the oil?
Please show me another example.
They drove to the station by car.
There are a lot of people and cars in this city. It is a busy city.
This book is interesting except for a few mistakes.
I wonder why nobody told me.
Jimmy is to some extent capable of performing this operation.
I hear the grass is green even in the winter in England.
Show your photograph.
Lake Biwa could be seen from where we were standing.
I study.
The first step is as good as half over.
Father has recently come back to Japan.
This task is too much for me.
His parents told him to get into a university.
Under no circumstances must you leave the room.
You are always watching TV.
We did it!
I really enjoyed myself.
This coffee is too hot for me to drink.
You should give a good example to your children.
I enrolled in an art school when I was eight.
He was very kind to invite me to his birthday party.
Didn't it occur to you to shut the windows?
I was made to cry for help.
My father likes strong coffee.
My father likes strong coffee.
We would like to buy a sofa.
If only I could sing well.
When I met my former teacher, he inquired after my parents.
Kings have long arms.
Has he failed again?
He is busy with job hunting.
He felt an acute pain in his chest.
Believe me, this is the right way.
The committee consists of seven scholars.
How fast he runs!
Instead of going myself, I sent a gift.
Please give me something hot to drink.
The soldier saved his friend at the cost of his own life.
Not all of us are against her idea.
I inquired about the book in many stores.
I don't know French at all.
You must avoid making such mistakes.
He has done many things for poor people.
Where is the nearest police station?
My father would not permit me to go on to college.
Tastes in music vary from person to person.
I don't know her name, but I do know her by sight.
Leave my camera alone.
He is independent of his parents.
That way of speaking is peculiar to people in this part of the country.
I don't think she is happy.
I read a newspaper every day so that I may keep up with the time.
Always come by the time promised.
I'll leave my daughter's education to you, after I'm gone.
Would you mind waiting a moment?
It is an exciting time of the year.
You look very delighted.
Better a small fish than an empty dish.
So many men, so many minds.
This is a common error.
Neither fish nor fowl.
Leave well enough alone.
It turned out that my memory was largely correct.
I love art and quiet evenings at home.
Have you read the book already?
Her story brought back our happy childhood.
Alice has a flower on her head.
You'll soon get accustomed to this cold weather.
We shall never forget helping each other like this.
You had better get up early.
I first met him three years ago.
We had a long spell of fine weather.
This problem is not so difficult that you can't solve it.
Please call me at eight tomorrow morning.
A majority of students dislike history.
You don't marry someone you can live with — you marry the person whom you cannot live without.
It's a gradual thing.
As many as a thousand people were there.
People in every walk of life go to church.
John went away without so much as saying good-by.
She looked behind.
If you have time, let's go shopping.
She is evidently sick.
You can tell what a person is like by looking at his friends.
If God doesn't exist in our world, then I will create God with my own hands.
That blue dress suits you very well.
That sounds like a fairly good proposal.
I will be able to marry her.
I'm what the world calls an idiot.
Schools were built.
His hair got thinner and thinner.
I unexpectedly met an old friend of mine on the bus yesterday.
She owns a very big house.
At last, they met face to face.
There are some shops near my house.
The Oxford crew appeared secure of victory.
The professor was unable to comprehend what I meant.
I finished the work yesterday.
What were the chief events of 1990?
You should read the newspapers in order to keep up with the times.
That's only because you don't have to do it.
Ten to one, he will succeed.
Judging from her appearance, I think that she's rich.
You'll have to wait.
There's a map on the wall.
Can I get a glass of water?
She helped the old man cross the road.
She admitted that she was wrong.
Please hold on.
Children go to school to learn things.
Their eyes met.
Smog is the enemy of healthy lungs.
He's two years older than me, but he's shorter.
He was not allowed to enroll in the college.
He seems to be happy.
Good-bye, take it easy.
You will study.
Last time I couldn't carry my baby to full term.
In English class, sometimes we sit in a circle to talk about a book we are reading.
My mother doesn't like watching TV.
The paper wasn't important.
I made her acquaintance through his introduction.
Just step right over there.
Mother goes to market every day.
Let me give you a piece of advice.
I took his name and address.
Do you believe in the existence of God?
We put up at a lakeside hotel for the night.
Please keep me informed of the matter.
You can hear the sound of the sea in this hotel room.
It'll take a week or so to read through this book.
I've lost my watch.
Man is different from animals in that he has the faculty of speech.
He lacks experience.
I feel like drinking a beer.
I am engaged in a new business.
As far as the teacher was concerned, she was a joy to teach.
I'm at my wit's end with this difficult problem.
Winter is gone.
I don't feel safe walking in that neighborhood at night.
The bus was so crowded that I was kept standing all the way to the station.
He drank too much strong green tea.
Now that I have children, I will hold out, the woman said.
Please go up to the third floor.
This flower is yellow, but all the others are blue.
This food does not agree with me.
She looks odd in those clothes.
Prices will continue as they are.
Was the baby crying then?
You understand best how to use the machine.
Just as if it were my tail, wherever I go, it goes too.
The three brothers must help one another.
I thought you were raised in L.A.
Would you lend me your pen?
It would be good to call us on Saturday.
For man, there is no beast more scary than man.
This sofa takes too much room.
Have you chosen what to do next Sunday yet?
All the students attended the party.
He couldn't understand the sentence.
As a matter of course you must go there yourself.
Could you please put me up for the night?
I didn't know that song.
I want to go over to France.
I like running.
I can't stand being laughed at in front of others.
By the year 2020, the population of our city will have doubled.
Do you go shopping every day?
I was able to answer the question correctly.
Twist that knob to the right and the box will open.
Are you going to the movies?
Why are you so happy?
Good luck with your work!
We go to school to learn.
Your O's look like A's.
He appealed to us for help.
Can't you hear the sound?
Did the car look old?
I went to Kyushu by airplane.
Please read page ninety-four.
The express train does not stop between Shibuya and Naka-Meguro.
I bought some cheese and milk.
Nice to meet you.
Nice to meet you.
He built his son a new house.
What's in front of you?
He lost color.
There are a lot of ways of doing it.
My grandmother speaks slowly.
He discovered how to open the box.
My friends invited me to dinner.
He is a good doctor, as doctors go these days.
She thought of a good plan.
I held my breath and waited.
This store doesn't stay open as late as I'd like.
I'm sure that he's happy.
Can you help me to translate these sentences into Chinese?
He usually gets up at six.
I can't find the knife.
My software never has bugs. It just has random features.
I will judge whether it is superior or not.
When will you get through with work?
You must quit smoking.
You'll find the house empty.
The man decided to wait at the station until his wife came.
There is a cat on the chair.
It was snowing thick and fast.
What's that flower?
Let's finish this work as soon as possible.
I wonder if life exists on other planets.
There is no simple road to success.
Do you have any grounds for thinking so?
We do not always take his advice.
He is beneath her in rank.
He will be in time for the train.
The engineer told us how to use the machine.
Pardon me for being in this dress.
He traveled to Hawaii with the family.
It is our obligation to help.
It's on the sofa.
It is not always easy to make a good joke.
Never forget that you owe what you are to your parents.
We should love our neighbors.
Make sure to drink the medicine before you go to bed.
She looked up at the ceiling.
I have never been abroad.
I've told you again and again to be more careful.
Thus passes the glory of the world.
How much time will this take?
This does not apply to students.
Life is more interesting than any book.
I nearly made a mistake.
She is a wealthy woman.
Go back home.
George married my sister.
He abandoned the idea.
Now that you have made your decision, you must act.
You must pay attention to him.
I'm very happy to see you.
Your problems don't concern me.
I was a teacher.
A sound mind in a sound body.
Could you please get me a taxi?
Take care lest you should fall.
I found the work easy, for I had done that kind of work before.
Has he finished his homework yet?
I've been friends with him since we were children.
I really wasn't expecting that from you.
This bag is mine.
A punch is just a punch. A kick is just a kick.
Cheers!
I am a Roman citizen.
He drinks like a fish.
She had a little round object in her hand.
The absent are always in the wrong.
She may well refuse to speak to you because she's in a very bad mood.
I forced her to do my homework.
The students pay keen attention.
Then you will be happy.
Sandra has grown up to be a beautiful woman.
This isn't the last train, is it?
There was quiet in the room.
I'm writing the fellow.
Is his father a teacher?
Air is for people what water is for fish.
I wish you would tell me what I ought to do in this difficult situation.
The river rose by degrees.
I have met him before.
Kelly has an eye for good English.
There are many such birds in the park.
I bought them each a present.
Do you want a car?
Thank you for remembering my birthday.
We met in the American history class.
Far from being pleased, my father is very angry.
Anybody can read it.
Celebrate in style!
Almaty is my favorite city!
I wasn't expecting this.
We finally reached the top of the mountain.
She will carry out her plan, regardless of expense.
He was at a loss which way to take.
Strange to say, she knows the fact very well.
Would you please let go of my arm?
On his birthday, I took a train to the town in which he lived.
Ottawa is the capital of Canada.
Mountains are not necessarily green.
The boy observed the birds all day.
He bought his son a camera.
The beginning of the story was interesting.
I was driving at 120 kilometers per hour when the police stopped me.
His opinions carry weight.
Sam is serious about his work.
Nowadays his father goes to work by car.
I observed that his hands were unsteady.
How did you come to know each other?
You must not smoke while working.
There's no food right now.
How about adding a little bit more salt?
It's time for you to get up.
I couldn't think of anything to say.
We took turns in washing the car.
The important thing is to call the police at once.
This isn't my bag.
His book became an object of criticism.
She was full of joy.
I was ushered to my seat.
English is taught in most countries.
That's a photo of my sister.
She is very busy.
He has three daughters.
The blue dress suits her.
The second sentence was just as long.
I forgot his address.
Check back next week.
She has a special way of making bread.
He thinks of everything in terms of money.
My father often goes to Paris on business.
I got my left arm bruised.
I spent Saturday afternoon watching entirely too much TV.
I didn't take part in the conversation.
Leave me alone, please.
How far is it from here to Ueno?
He pays no attention to the teacher.
Hang on till I get to you.
He doesn't know French at all.
Water is to fish what air is to man.
My brother is very important. At least he thinks he is.
I managed to acquire the book after a long search.
Which way will you take?
I like to keep my clothes for as long as possible.
Cleanse me! Release me! Set me free!
He never made a display of his learning.
The party set out for Kobe.
The old television set went for 10 dollars.
Excuse me, but could you get me a glass of water?
You remind me of your father.
She is not beautiful, to be sure, but she is good-natured.
He would be the last one to believe that.
Who bought a book at the shop?
He is an utter stranger to me.
He has got a good camera.
She went to Ibaraki.
To all appearances, she is healthy.
How long have you been dating?
The weather has settled at last.
The whole house was ill in bed.
My uncle went to Mexico in 1983, never to come back.
We often make mistakes.
You're certainly looking fit as a fiddle today.
I live in a rooming house.
I accept the proposal with reservations.
The islanders are asking us for help.
May I speak to Mike, please?
So, we finally meet! I've waited so long for this moment.
The two men shook hands.
The city lies east of London.
I applied for a position in the office.
I won't be busy tomorrow.
Is he breathing?
This car was cheap enough for him to buy.
Don't stop here.
She refused to go with me.
The leaves look fresh in the rain.
He just barely succeeded.
Try to do things for yourself.
I read through the novel.
I was watching the scene holding my breath.
He is sure of winning.
There is no doubt.
I spent two hours watching television last night.
Little pitchers have long ears.
If he told me the truth, I would have forgiven him.
The fact is, I think, very important.
I meant to call you.
She is as poor as ever.
The garden was filled with flowers.
You have no sense of direction.
Such a strange thing is not likely to happen.
I have appealed to him to visit but he didn't come.
My father, who is very busy, has no time to read books.
I invited Ken, Bill and Yumi.
She looked as if she had been ill.
She gave us a present.
Please don't open the window.
I said so by way of a joke.
She gave us a present.
We have large, medium, and small. What size do you want?
Do come and visit us.
Please write to me when you get there.
I found listening to him very interesting.
What you have said doesn't apply to you.
Each time I went to see him, I found him at work.
I am in favor of the proposition.
We finally decided to give him over to the police.
If anyone calls me up while I'm away, tell them I'll be back by five.
This task took three hours.
The problem was where to set up the tent.
You have two flowers.
I have lost face completely.
One man was seen digging with his bare hands.
I'm going to check out at eight.
Ah, when will they meet again?
Let's call it a day today.
We were only just in time for the last train.
They did not know it was impossible, so they did it.
Jim acted very strangely all day.
I don't feel like watching TV tonight.
I get up at six.
With most things there's both what you see and what's behind it.
How do you find his new novel?
If I had bought the painting then, I would be rich now.
The proposal went through.
The store is just across from the theater.
I went to the scene of the crime.
She cried.
I don't know how to set about the work.
He looked down at the floor.
You must keep in mind that she's much younger than you.
Tears came to my eyes.
Next period I take an exam in German.
Will you please explain to me the exact meaning of the word?
Where is the closest subway station?
Mr Hirayama teaches very well.
I have not yet learned whether he reached there or not.
I want some coffee badly.
He said that their principal would go there the next day.
You don't have to eat.
It is warmer over the mountains.
He made a point of reading ten pages every day.
You should not have gone to such a dangerous place.
I wanted to make some telephone calls.
I will go and take a look at the house.
Will you help me with my homework?
Her doctor wants to refer her to a specialist.
He has made little progress in his English.
There is a station in the center of the city.
A lot of houses were on fire.
He won eminence as a scientist.
She went on working till he called her.
She went on working till he called her.
From Kate's point of view, he works too much.
I think that it was his mistake.
Since he started at eight, he ought to be there by now.
The dog was running toward him.
The road is too narrow for cars.
After I said such a thing to my boss, I am certain to lose my job.
I lost the watch my father had given me.
I awoke from a long dream.
I bought a cat at that shop.
Like other changes, this change in attitude has occurred in other countries, too.
You wouldn't happen to know where she lives, would you?
Let me have a look at those photos.
I am really in the dark on this case.
One can drink too much, but one never drinks enough.
Do you have that in blue?
We arrived home late.
It may sound strange, but what she said is true.
Where can one make a phone call?
The clock is striking four.
The curve extends from point A to point B.
Who's to blame?
I get along well with all the staff.
George hit him in the stomach.
Of course, I will go there with you.
My work at school was well above average.
I tried to get up at six this morning.
I little hoped to meet you here.
It must have rained during the night; the road is wet.
We gathered around the teacher.
Come and see me tomorrow, won't you?
How did you enjoy the party?
John, being tired, went to bed early.
I should have never married.
Visit my webpage and find out more about me.
He professes ignorance of the fact.
Your help is necessary to our success.
Who cares?
Great was her surprise when she knew the fact.
The government got their majority at the last election.
My son is subject to ill health.
The situation in now getting unfavorable.
He has lost faith in the doctor.
The woman speaks as if she were a teacher.
With a little more effort.
This book belongs to Tony.
This book consists of five chapters.
I finished my lunch quickly.
We'll visit you tomorrow.
She solved the problem with ease.
He played a major part in the movement.
It was hard as rock.
It was the first time I'd walked along the Mogami River.
It looks as if it is going to rain.
He promoted the idea of world government.
He translated the book from French into English.
He would not speak to her again.
It appears that he's a student.
Do you think fish can hear?
She wrote to her parents at least once a week.
He met the girl on his way home yesterday.
He came home late in the evening.
One out of three persons in this city has his own car.
Some of the students were from Asia and the others were from Europe.
As far as I am concerned, I am not against your opinion.
No dirty jokes!
I have to give back the book before Saturday.
There has been an alteration in our plans.
Sometimes those photos are not very good.
My grandfather tells us about old things.
The political situation has changed.
John is having a good time.
It was I who met him.
He is distantly related to her.
Are you through with the phone?
I heard her sing a song.
He turned down our proposal.
Certainly he is independent of him.
Japan is a beautiful country.
Who is the greatest poet in England?
May I direct your attention to this?
The Ariake Sea is one of the biggest tidelands in Japan.
He called out for help.
Their dresses are too big.
She always reminds me of her mother.
I like dogs better than cats, because the former are more faithful than the latter.
I am going to make him a serious offer.
The school is across from our house.
These photographs remind me of our holiday.
I'll bring the book back to you tomorrow.
What is important is not how many books you read, but what books you read.
We aided him in his business.
I cannot agree to your proposal.
The horse would not move.
It is up to us to be men.
Today we can go to distant countries easily by plane.
You should stay in the hospital for treatment.
There are as good fish in the sea now as ever.
He is pleased with his work.
This book is for students whose native language is not Japanese.
I may as well stay alone as keep him company.
If I were you, I would wait and see.
This novel bores me.
She would not admit him into her apartment.
She's fond of taking pictures.
I hope that I'll see her.
She walked very carefully.
I can't smoke.
There are forty students in our class.
Now, before I say any more, listen to this;
He never fails to write to his parents once a month.
No, I don't think that I am to blame.
Did you have a nice summer?
The child talks as if he were a man.
He gave a blow with the flat of his hand.
How does this soup taste?
Rise to the occasion.
Her son called from New York.
The pain shoots into my right leg.
During the war, he served in the army.
I've been busy.
I don't want to propose to you!
You must get up at six.
There is a cat in the kitchen.
I am uncertain when he will come next.
This is the same watch that I've lost.
I met him on my way to school.
Rumi is the first daughter.
What does this mark mean?
She looked very beautiful in her new dress.
Jim seized Julie by the arm.
How many days does it usually take to get there?
He doesn't know how to write a letter in English.
He doesn't know how to write a letter in English.
She always keeps the garden.
My Chinese teacher is a man.
Aunt, this is Tom.
My mother never gets up early.
Our teacher told us what to read.
He left his books all around the house.
He caught her hand.
A form appeared from over there.
Two men met face to face.
This is true of students.
This article is high quality.
Please come to pick me up.
That building is our school.
It depends what you mean by "believe" in God.
This sword has a strange history.
Only after leaving school I realized how important it is to study.
The operation cannot wait.
She goes to the movies once a week.
Study!
The rights of the individual are important in a free society.
I have no idea what he has in mind, rejecting such a favorable proposal.
What if I fail?
Work is a very important part of life in the United States.
The store is just across from my house.
Money and I are strangers; in other words, I am poor.
All was still.
Who is she speaking to?
He who helps others, in turn shall be helped by them.
Though he is wealthy he is not happy.
Hope we can work together soon.
The company is hemorrhaging money.
Now that you are grown up, you must not behave like a child.
I don't know what to buy him for his birthday.
I knew it was plastic but it tasted like wood.
I'm sorry I couldn't write to you sooner.
Tom finally gave up smoking.
Naomi has just finished her work.
His answer was to strike me on the head.
Can you meet him?
How blue the sky is!
What's that noise?
There was a short silence on the other end.
I got this job with my teacher's help.
I asked many persons about the store, but no one had heard of it.
The scientist is famous not only in Japan but also in foreign countries.
I said to her, "You look pale. Are you all right?"
It was yesterday that I met her.
It was after a meeting in America that he decided to write a book for non-scientists.
The train has already gone.
You are prohibited from smoking here.
You can't go naked in this hotel.
I decided not to do such a foolish thing.
I have a daughter.
It was after four years that the war came to an end.
This is what is called a 'present' in some countries and 'bribery' in others.
Her new novel will be out next month.
We eat butter on bread.
He was foolish enough to believe it.
I saw a red car and a white one; the red one was nicer looking than the other.
She likes music very much.
I am the same age.
No one in the class runs as fast as he does.
Professor Hudson is my father's friend.
Burn with desire.
I want to leave this difficult job to her.
I had him do my homework.
Will you please explain the meaning of this sentence to me?
I've made a mistake.
Please remember to mail this letter on your way to school tomorrow morning.
Now I'm wide awake.
I listened to the music of birds.
The followings are the chief events of 1993.
Because novels, just like paintings, need you to practice.
This car is used by my father.
Alfred was made captain of the team.
Which student went out?
I often hear her refer to her childhood.
Tomorrow we will encounter the enemy.
It was not until I entered this university that I got acquainted with her.
I couldn't recognize him, not having met him before.
She would go out in the heavy rain, though I tried to stop her.
The couple led a happy life.
There are a good many reasons why you shouldn't do it.
You may as well talk to a stone wall as to him.
She had never spoken to him before that time.
The important thing is to listen carefully.
I went to Kobe, where I first met her.
This store is operated on a cash basis.
He is a man of wide experience.
His camera is three times as expensive as mine.
You must not eat too much food at one time.
Casualties are said to total up to 1,000.
The children were sitting in a line, watching television.
They don't decide important matters.
The grass looks nice.
How about that!
Show me what you have in your left hand.
This tradition is followed in most households.
He was able to build a small house.
He does not get up early.
We enjoyed talking with each other.
I made him tell the truth.
This picture reminds me of our happy days in England.
Seen from the plane, the island looks very beautiful.
I can not hear that song without thinking of my high school days.
We talked far into the night over the phone.
Mail this letter.
She must be stupid to say such a thing.
This homework is difficult for me.
Mother gets up earlier than anybody else in my family.
Did you go abroad for pleasure or on business?
I walked through the cars of the train to find a seat.
I hope that she will help me.
The strong must help the weak.
My mother asked me to keep her company during the weekend.
She thinks of everything in terms of money.
He has red spots all over his body.
This color becomes you.
He adopted her idea.
She lost what little money she had.
But she gets it while she can.
I was roused by the sound of a bell.
I lost my points.
This chair is too low for me.
He is very fond of music.
Strange as it is, the story is true.
I am indebted to him.
English is an international language.
You will get the better of him in the next election.
I don't remember my grandmother's face accurately.
My father has never been abroad.
I have done the best I could to help you. The rest is up to you.
However busy you may be, you must do your homework.
There is little milk in the glass.
May I lie on the sofa?
The boy is totally dependent on his parents.
I can hardly stand his behavior.
My father exercises every day for his health.
This class is composed of 35 pupils.
Brussels is the capital of Belgium.
We'll soon be able to send you to jail.
We'll soon be able to send you to jail.
I'm using Twitter.
Do you like movies?
Linux is a free operating system; you should try it.
She called me up from Tokyo.
She began to sing.
Where does this train go?
Most people only want to hear their own truth.
You are the last person that I expected to see here.
All horses are animals, but not all animals are horses.
Wait five minutes, please.
Don't take it to heart.
I'm very pleased to meet you today.
This table is wooden.
This bus will take you to the museum.
This camera is less expensive than that one.
We have six lessons a day.
I got up at about six.
To my surprise, she was alive.
When and where did you receive the gift?
You may leave your bag here.
You must do the work, even if you do not like it.
This book counts among the best of his work.
Come home before dark.
You will live longer if you don't smoke.
This word has a double meaning.
He is not a teacher but a doctor.
Let's speak about Paola.
She got a present from her boyfriend.
We learn much from experience.
He bowed to me as he passed by.
Fish live in water.
The classroom was full of pupils.
It's about 133 kilometers from London.
I can't breath through my nose.
Can his story be true?
We chose John to be captain.
Good night.
I'll be your teacher.
Don't say such a thing in her absence.
He paid no attention to my advice.
He ordered me to stand up.
I'd like to talk to John.
What I'm about to say is strictly between you and me.
What have you got in your bag?
I have nothing to say against it.
Everyone was happy.
There were no visible dangers.
What's in your bag?
Who owns this land?
He was a general in the Second World War.
If I had known her address, I would have written to her.
You have to get on that bus to go to the museum.
There are many flowers in the garden.
I'm thirsty. Can I have a glass of water?
My throat burns.
Don't come into my room without knocking.
I'll phone you later.
Jim's father always comes home late.
Anyone with an opinion please raise their hand.
Students have a holiday on Foundation Day.
Choose either one or the other.
Your brother got married, didn't he?
I will smoke and I don't give a fuck about what you say.
Do you want to talk about it?
Give me any books you have on the subject.
It's an interesting book.
The word has several meanings.
Please give me a glass of water.
John doesn't care a shit about his clothes.
The spring will show who shat where.
The boy caught the dog by the tail.
Don't judge a man by the clothes he wears.
What is the exchange rate for dollars now?
I have a car.
Art for art's sake.
Leave me in peace!
I recognized the teacher at once, because I had met him before.
He lost his job.
The doctor told me to give up smoking.
Had he worked harder, he could have succeeded.
Bern is the capital of Switzerland.
How many times did you see the movie?
This book has a number of mistakes, but it's interesting.
A promise doesn't mean a marriage.
Everyone is smiling in the picture.
We listen to music.
I would like to give you a piece of advice.
I need a new pen. I'll buy one.
This book has a number of mistakes, but it's interesting.
He had to work hard day and night.
Glory to Ukraine!
I graduated from high school last year.
If it rains, please call me.
Coffee and cigarettes.
The boy is wearing glasses.
He is almost six feet tall.
They sang one after another.
The company is in the red.
Place the ladder against the wall.
This result leaves much to be desired.
Our team is five points ahead.
You may come at any time tomorrow afternoon.
I'd like to send these to Japan.
Where shall we meet?
John doesn't care a shit about his clothes.
What's that building?
He is rich, but his older brother is poor.
I have one older brother and one younger sister.
She fed milk to the cat.
He came back home three days later.
The train has already left.
I would like to give you a piece of advice.
If it rains, please call me.
They meet once a week.
He drank a bottle of wine.
That house belongs to me.
Do you know the meaning of this word?
That movie was extremely interesting.
He listened to music in his room.
This isn't fun.
They say that the movie is an interesting one.
You should have seen the movie.
Look at that smoke. That building must be on fire.
That chimney is very high.
You should not laugh at his mistake.
That movie stinks!
How did you like that movie?
This movie is worth seeing again.
That movie is worth seeing.
Humans are the only animals that can use fire.
I walked until my legs felt tired.
I know that there was a big church here.
Her eyes are blue.
I feel chilled to the bone today.
Being very tired, I went to bed early.
I've had a lot of calls today.
I was tired today so I went to bed early.
The waves are high today.
It being Sunday today, we have no school.
I'm really busy today, otherwise I would accept.
I can't go with you because I'm very busy.
I am busy today.
He always borrows money from me.
The conversation switched to politics.
When I got up today my throat felt a little sore.
How about meeting today?
There was only a little milk left in the bottle.
Music is a language understood by all humans.
I passed out.
Don't cry over spilt milk.
Time flies.
I wait here until she comes.
Which do you like better, summer or winter?
I've seen a couple of Kurosawa's films.
What's waiting on us?
Try once again.
Why are you crying?
Is he busy?
I have an older brother and a younger sister.
Miracles are called miracles because they don't happen!
It's late.
Your eyes remind me of stars.
Our shirts are all the same color but are all different sizes.
Those are gifts.
You may invite whoever wants to come.
He threw himself down on the ground in pain.
He acknowledged his fault.
That's my younger sister's photograph.
They decided to meet there again after twenty years.
Drop me a line when you are in trouble.
The mountain is more than 3,000 meters above sea level.
These sunglasses are too big.
I want to help you with your homework.
I would read this book, but I don't have the time.
The mother fell into deep thought.
You'll soon get used to the noise.
What color is your hair?
I have no time to watch TV.
He cried with joy.
I'm sorry, but I don't understand English well.
I can't believe it!
Is your school far from here?
I've seen that play. "So have I."
She is opening the window.
Keep out.
If you do such a foolish thing, people will laugh at you.
In 1900 he left England, never to return.
I got acquainted with him in France.
I got acquainted with him in France.
Fish are cold-blooded animals.
Where is the entrance to the museum?
Did you catch the first train?
This is a wooden table.
Could you give this data a final check for me?
Between you and me, he is rather stupid.
Has the movie started yet?
The rich are not always happy.
He never says thanks in spite of all that I've done for him.
Oh yeah, that's right. I was supposed to meet some friends in Shibuya at eight.
This was why he entered the university.
I am afraid that I shall not be free till the examination is over.
What's the capital city of Finland?
We hope you will understand the difficult circumstances we're working under.
I've already read this book.
I could not decide which way to choose.
You can't ride a horse.
Where can I buy that magazine?
Takuya told me to start at once.
At last, she hit on a good idea.
This water tastes good.
I had been reading a magazine for some time when she came.
Please wait here for a while.
The sky was bright and clear.
We're happy.
You can add sentences you don't know how to translate.
This is the most beautiful flower in the garden.
She appears well today.
I finished writing the report.
Are you a teacher or a student?
What takes you only three days, takes me as many weeks.
It is getting warmer and warmer.
I want a lot more.
Did you buy it on the black market?
Just seeing his house lets you know that he is poor.
He often goes to the cinema with her.
He's drunk.
I saw you working and I didn't bother you.
I heard a shot just now.
If you invite him, he'll probably come.
This size is too large for me.
The fact is apparent to everybody.
I am sorry to have made you wait.
Whoever calls now, tell him I'm not in.
She needs to help him.
How far is it from here to your school?
There is a little hope that he will succeed.
I met him yesterday for the first time.
She is not as tall as he.
He has every reason to quit his job.
What's the height of the Empire State Building?
A few people were killed in the car accident.
Experience talks in these cases.
Do you have this shirt in black?
She refused to take the money.
Write your name in capitals.
He was not at all surprised at her ability.
May I have this bread and butter?
Bring the book to me, not to Tom.
Telephone me if it rains.
Do you know how to use this machine?
That black bag is yours?
That will never disappear.
Please show me the green shirt.
The old woman lends money at the rate of three percent.
You won't make mistakes.
The job of a driver is not as easy as it looks.
You have changed so much that I can hardly recognize you.
This music reminds me of that girl.
I am sorry to have kept you waiting so long.
My mistake.
How do you use this camera?
Tom gave me a pen.
Please let me take a look at the menu.
Left alone, the little girl began to cry.
Lucy should be in the kitchen now.
How shall we deal with this matter?
I owe my life to him.
I want to leave this city and never come back.
A man's happiness depends on what he is rather than on what he has.
What's the matter with you? You look pale.
Take heart and do it again.
They were watching television.
How long will it take to get there?
He lives in the western part of town.
He was elected president.
We laid the injured man on the grass.
Look at that building.
When is the store open till?
Who runs faster, Judy or Tony?
It begins at six-thirty.
I have a persistent pain here.
She refused to answer my questions.
At the next station, nearly everyone got off the train.
You should've begun an hour and a half ago.
This class is made up of thirty-five pupils.
This castle is beautiful.
He has lots of new ideas.
We reached the top of the mountain.
My uncle drives a Ford.
Her dress is above the knee.
He is successful in everything.
The children soon became attached to their new teacher.
As you go up higher, the air becomes thinner.
When I see this picture, I'm reminded of our holiday.
I'm sure I'll be able to find it.
I use Twitter.
He took the wrong bus by mistake.
He caught me by the hand.
My grandmother is the oldest in this town.
Whatever you say, I'll marry her.
Take another good look at the city map.
Did you show it to your parents?
It's still too early to talk about this now.
I always get up at 6.
School begins at 8:30 a.m.
Sumatra is an island.
I usually get up at eight o'clock.
I met her late in the evening.
Your plan seems better than mine.
Do you know a good place to have lunch?
Use the Force, Saeb!
Betty turned down Muriel’s offer.
Coming to work at 4 p.m. is not late.
In Soviet Russia, sentence writes you!
Yumi Ishiyama is the oldest member of Team Lyoko.
People under 18 cannot get married.
Please wait thirty minutes.
I usually get up at eight o'clock.
Put the gun on the table.
Stop, or I'll shoot.
I'd like to be a teacher.
My grandfather died shortly after my birth.
Who am I talking to?
Let's make our own language so no one will know what we're talking about!
I think he won't accept the proposal.
Many people came to the meeting yesterday.
The bus stops in front of my house.
Please have a seat.
Use the Force, Saeb!
Not a star was to be seen that night.
Mathematics is a good subject.
Please don't run in the classroom.
Please don't run in the classroom.
The lake is very deep.
I got on the wrong train.
I can write programs in Visual Basic.
Here is my key.
I've lost my key.
Ladies first.
School starts at nine.
Quickly he got down the stairs.
Seen from a plane, that island is very beautiful.
He showed kindness by giving me a piece of advice.
She asserted that she was right.
This lake is the deepest in Japan.
The cat is sleeping on the chair.
Yesterday was my birthday.
The baby cried all night.
Please tell me the correct time.
The hardest was the end of the month...Especially the last thirty days...
Many people work in this field now.
This is how I solved the difficult problem.
It's a pleasant day, isn't it?
It is a beautiful car, but it is not worth the price that I paid for it.
She asked me if I knew her address.
Though it was raining, she went out.
Good night and sleep well.
He is the brightest in the class.
He's rich, but he lives like a beggar.
She goes to the market once a week.
I am close to the bridge.
I am pleased with the result.
You look nice with your hair short.
That is a high building, is it not?
It's evident to everybody that he's in love.
Translate this sentence into English.
Can you see that mountain with the snow-covered peak?
I've already seen that movie.
He is not a good driver.
Numerous stars were visible in the sky.
I love American movies.
Be quiet. Don't talk in the theater.
We are going to the cinema.
You must on no condition open the box.
You must on no condition open the box.
Kyoto has many universities.
Would you show me a less expensive camera than this one?
I'm very happy now.
That's an idea.
He treats me as an adult.
These pens are his.
What is it that makes you think that way?
He is always at the top of the class.
There are more people than we expected.
He heard his name called from behind.
I will pick him up at the station.
I found the story interesting.
My little sister sometimes wished she was a boy.
You can get energy from the sunshine.
Kate is smarter than any other student in our class is.
I want many books to read.
He is foolish.
I have a lot of flowers. Some are red and others are yellow.
He wears glasses.
You need not have hurried so much.
You can't expect more than that.
How much is the tour?
If you don't have anything to do, look at the ceiling of your room.
It was obvious to everybody that he was tired.
The Nozomi is the fastest of all the trains in Japan.
I go to Tokyo every day.
Be sure to come to me by five o'clock.
She stared at a UFO in silence.
I can't think of everything.
You'd better go. It's getting late.
They eat with a knife and fork.
You have changed.
It so happens that today is my birthday.
The noise grew fainter, till it was heard no more.
Who helps your mother?
I read a book as I walked.
The color of her eyes is blue.
On the other hand, he had a different opinion.
He arrived too early.
He is a man of his word, so if he said he'd help, he will.
If he doesn't want to learn, we can't make him.
I didn't have time to watch TV yesterday.
Tea and coffee helps to start the day.
He solved all those problems with ease.
Hi, Paul. Busy as usual?
You'll feel better if you drink this medicine.
To my surprise, there were no people in the village.
Don't judge a man by what he has.
Even the brightest student couldn't solve the problem.
I found the work very interesting.
She is different from her sister in every way.
Cross the street.
Please don't run about the room.
He admitted himself defeated.
I traveled to Italy last summer.
They let me go.
I'm surprised that she did such a thing.
He doesn't watch TV at all.
Mind your own business!
Careful!
Don't ever give up hope.
This is why he didn't go to study abroad.
This gift is for you.
I'm surprised to see you.
Tom has lost his job.
They paid little attention to my words.
Regardless what he does, he does it well.
Not all teachers behave like that.
It’s not a bug, it’s an undocumented feature.
This is the most interesting book of all.
I think his life is in danger.
I'm sorry to have kept you waiting so long.
Please call me at seven tomorrow morning.
Never did I dream of such a thing.
This movie is very interesting to me.
This is the very best way to do it.
The room key, please.
Have you ever been abroad?
Those are not your chairs.
I bought her a new car.
The lights were out.
I hope you'll get his support.
Don't pay it any heed.
Gather the papers and bring them here.
He looks like his grandfather.
Tom was so loaded with work that he would forget to eat.
I can hardly hear you.
These are completely different opinions.
Yumi will become a teacher.
The lion is the king of beasts.
How many books did you read?
I'll give you a call.
Bring the key.
Which train will you arrive on?
Please, let me go through!
Go to hell!
I saw a star today.
In Soviet Russia, lesson teaches teacher!
Do you have work experience?
She was afraid to cross the road.
I'll wait another five minutes.
Where is the bank?
I've had it up to here with you!
Please look at that red-roofed house.
Let's try!
I can't find my glasses. I may have left them behind in the train.
A real friend is like a rare bird.
It's good if you can sing.
This dog eats almost anything.
I've read hundreds of books.
Want to drink something?
And who was it that you were talking with?
What to do is up to you.
I quit smoking a year ago.
Did the baby wake up?
Where's the bank?
He has a nice build.
I hope the wine is to your taste.
Do you think that fish can hear?
My father is in the hospital now.
German classes are held twice a week - on Mondays and Wednesdays.
I have a cat and a dog. The cat's black and the dog's white.
All in all, after ten years of searching, my friend got married to a girl from the Slantsy region.
I was a student at that time.
That's unfair.
He was born an artist.
Who teaches you French?
What does this pen cost?
Who invented karaoke?
I'll be back in a minute, he added.
Please, don't kill me.
We went to see a movie with my friend yesterday.
May I call you tomorrow?
There were a number of students in the room.
I forgot to telephone him today.
He came back, and it rained soon.
She comes to school in her car.
God created the world in six days.
He speaks Russian perfectly.
Which animal is small?
Who is the author of this story?
Coffee with cream is not a very expensive pleasure.
We'll meet on Sunday.
You don't have to use such a harsh tone with me.
He used all available means.
I don't know his address.
He helped me to carry the bag.
She is seeking my advice.
Pray forgive me!
Long live the Persian language!
This is a picture I took last week.
He is the man you met the other day.
My mother sent me a birthday present.
The snow was falling quickly.
Stop talking when the teacher comes in.
Everyone knew the song.
Would you please wait for a few minutes?
English has become an international language.
We need a knife for the butter.
She is able to speak ten languages.
Cool down.
He abandoned all hope.
He abandoned all hope.
Judging from his expression, he is not telling the truth.
A cat is not a human being!
My son is a journalist.
I met an old student of mine in London.
Tokyo is the capital of Japan.
My father is fifty years old.
Julien wears round glasses, like John Lennon.
Summer this year is cold.
I quit smoking two years ago.
We have eaten no meat for several days.
Do you like French literature?
The museum is open from 9 a.m.
Tufts is the most dangerous university in the world.
Let me introduce you to my wife.
When he said "water," she gave him water.
Please pick up the pen from the floor.
Is there a museum in this town?
Success depends on your efforts.
It's very close.
Yesterday I read an interesting story.
He's good by nature.
You're a new student?
I think I lost my keys.
Is the bank far from here?
I've been very lucky today.
Now you are an adult.
I would like to call.
Where is my book?
Take off your wet clothes.
I found the problem was easy.
This is a book about stars.
When her neighbors were sick, she asked doctors to give them medical supplies.
I jog every day.
The northern wind blew all day.
Turn right.
He's not stupid.
I'm a French citizen.
Repeat each sentence after me.
They nodded to each other.
I've been busy this week.
They now have three children.
Thank God, they finally arrived.
I'm a French citizen.
Leaves were dropping silently to the ground.
He is so gay.
I heard the gay voices of children.
Are you sure of it?
Queer rumors about them were in the air.
Queer rumors are in the air.
The baby cried for milk.
She did so for her own sake, not for your sake.
The church is on the other side of the street.
What a wonderful family!
China is much bigger than Japan.
My mother is in the kitchen.
Please forgive me.
I like singing.
While all horses are animals, not all animals are horses.
I've shut all six windows.
The keys are on the table.
She's a very good teacher.
This is an historic city.
The world is full of fools.
By the way, what's your address?
Why do you like coffee strong?
They were busy.
Lucy is certain to come.
She had changed so much that I couldn't recognize her.
I laughed at his joke.
When we go to bed, we say "good night".
If I were you, I would accept his offer.
He's in the hospital.
He's watching TV.
The machine takes a lot of room.
He has more books than he can read.
I like children. That's why I became a teacher.
Are you busy?
Please explain how to get there.
I want her to do the difficult work.
My uncle has been dead for three years.
He said he was hungry, and then he added that he was also thirsty.
He discovered a new star.
They built a bridge across the river.
Listen to what the teacher says.
He helps her.
It doesn't have any significance.
Please call me at this number.
We wasted a lot of time.
Does he go to work by bus?
I've lost all my money.
When are you busy?
We are anxious about her health.
He likes to sing in the bathtub.
My belief is that he will succeed.
He will arrive within an hour.
I have a pen.
Green suits Alice.
What is the name of this bird?
The problem isn't so much the money as it is the time.
China and Japan differ in many points.
I knew that I was being watched.
I bet ten dollars on that horse.
You need Bus Number Five.
The author of this article is a famous critic.
I sometimes meet up with him at the club.
My friends invited me for dinner.
Sometimes, I think about the future, and I forget to breathe.
He told me an interesting story.
This is the core of the problem.
You're old enough to know better.
I find this difficult to believe.
Doctor, my stomach hurts.
He doesn't know what it is to be poor.
Are you healthy?
Don't undo your bootlaces until you have seen the river.
Did you study yesterday?
She began to talk to the dog.
In towns, speed is limited to 50 km/h.
This novel is too difficult for me to read.
Each child has his own room.
She lost her memory in a traffic accident.
Meat, please.
No one believed me at first.
We can go there with the help of a car.
Someone stepped on my foot on the train.
The grass in the park is green and beautiful.
No one knows when the Earth came into being.
He made up his mind not to return to his native country.
This book was very interesting.
Have you finished your work?
I can't stand this noise anymore.
Poets cannot live without love.
I recall feeling so good at that time.
She was all smiles.
She said so with a smile.
She couldn't accustom herself to New England winters.
Her cheeks were red.
I can do without his help.
If you promise something, keep your word.
Did you hear the noise?
You need to find another way out of this situation.
We're forced to look for another way out of this situation.
In the end, we got the information.
In the end, we got to the lake.
This thin book is mine.
Did you watch TV last night?
Tom talked all night.
The escalator quickly stopped.
I am sure that you will be satisfied.
He has stopped smoking.
When did you get married?
You're busy now, aren't you?
My grandfather gets up early.
Do you like to sing?
You want to see a French movie, right?
How high is Mont Blanc?
He looked into her eyes and suddenly went away.
I'm glad to have been invited to dinner.
We're meeting on Sunday.
I called him.
I hope so.
He lives and works there all the year round.
I'd like to talk to one of your guests.
Tom married an older girl.
Tom married an older woman.
Kyoko went away, humming a song.
It's too late, anyhow.
Japan is to the east of China.
Don't get up.
Don't interfere with my studying.
Flowers and trees need clean air and fresh water.
Stop frowning your forehead!
You've got dark circles under your eyes.
We can lift curses by a photograph.
Japan is a rich country.
What's going on down there?
She's a very interesting person.
Whose turn is it next?
The teacher allotted the longest chapter to me.
My sister goes to the Carpathians every year.
I'm not a teacher.
My parents met each other in the mountains.
Misery loves company.
You've given me good advice.
We were very busy last week.
I don't want to help you.
The train has left, Lusya!
Klava is abroad and sends her regards to you.
When was the first time you met her?
There are 1000 movies that one must watch before dying.
Listening to Mahler, Lyusya would always think of death and life eternal.
I like waking up to music.
Everyone knows and loves this holiday.
Daddy, I'll stop doing theater and won't sing anymore.
The fire burns.
He's a realist, and doesn't believe that miracles are possible.
There are no classes in August.
I need to find my pen.
Cookie is the cutest of all the dogs.
The church is surrounded by woods and lakes.
Could you repeat that, please?
You look sick.
He decided to quit smoking.
He could not breathe deeply.
I work for a bank.
Birds sing.
Even worse! Al-Sayib exclaimed. "They don't know what to do with you, Dima!"
In any case, I'll call you tomorrow.
Don't speak to him while he is driving.
Daniela called me at home.
Even though she was very busy, she came to see me off all the same.
He says he will come.
What do you mean? Dima asked, but burped, for if he remained silent, this sentence would be too simple.
I am a teacher.
Do you go to school by bus?
Carlos turned around.
Can we have a talk?
Cooking is interesting.
Shut the window.
I haven't read either of his novels.
Cover your eyes.
My room faces east.
My father bought some CDs for my birthday.
Spring is around the corner.
I had the luck to find a good job.
Look at the blackboard.
I've got nothing to say.
This is the palace the king and queen live in.
I found this film very interesting.
You've finished your work.
He is no ordinary student.
You're my type.
I want to go abroad.
He looks like a good boy.
Did he come by bus or by train?
I'm sorry that I can't meet you tonight.
I can wait four days at the longest.
How many English words do you know?
Can you tell me how to get to Lincoln Center?
Can you tell me how to get to the station?
Would you please repeat what you just said?
That book had a lot of pages.
Let me go in place of him.
These are birds.
My daughter is a tomboy.
This smells like cheese.
I cannot put up with this pain any more.
Are you busy now?
We lost sight of Jim in the crowd.
The girl let the bird go.
I was happy yesterday.
What time did you get up?
I don't eat meat.
That is your victory.
Don't take it to heart.
It's obvious.
We cannot do without water even for a day.
I never turn my back on a friend in need.
The police got an important piece of information from him.
He has become another man since getting married.
She was born in the United States and grew up in Japan.
Jack was born on August tenth.
Both of them were not present at the meeting.
In ten years our town will change a lot.
I'm sorry I've kept you waiting so long.
There is a flower on the table.
The government should do away with these regulations.
Whose book is it?
I live with my mother, brother and my grandparents.
I will have finished the work by seven this evening.
What does this word mean?
How did you come by this money?
There were some boats on the lake.
He vowed to give up smoking.
The school needed a new teacher.
He renounced smoking and drinking.
Bobby may watch TV until 7:00.
The whole village came out to welcome him.
I'm listening to music.
Don't call me when I'm at the office.
I've enjoyed talking to you.
A true scientist would not think like that.
She has no one to speak to.
I'm scared of heights.
I saw him for the first time in 10 years.
I thought she was 30 at most.
He received a good education in England.
He was seen to enter the building.
He gave up his life for his country.
His opinion adds a new light to the question.
He should be put in prison.
You'd better not have drunk all the milk.
Any book will be okay as long as it is interesting.
He grew up in Australia.
It's fifty kilometers to Paris.
Last night, we watched the stars from the rooftop.
Last night, we watched the stars from the rooftop.
We got an early start.
She said that she had been happy.
Mother suggested that I write her at once.
We watched the sun setting behind the mountains.
Words cannot convey my feelings.
How about going to the movies?
That shows the depth of his love for his family.
What do you say to taking a rest?
My father carried on singing.
I am adding an example sentence.
She was named after her grandmother.
He stopped smoking for his health.
The square was illuminated by bright lights.
Nikita Khrushchev was at the height of his powers.
Life is not all fun.
Sorry I didn't e-mail you sooner.
She has no one to turn to.
They have been on good terms with their neighbours.
Underneath we wrote the names of the students in our class.
Are you in earnest in saying so?
Don't hesitate to take the opportunity to propose to her.
None of us is so foolish as to believe that he was telling the truth.
Do you support or oppose this idea?
London is no longer a city of fog.
At least they should have a map.
How soon can I get to Tokyo?
You haven't changed at all.
I have no idea where she lives.
I'm already accustomed to the heat of summer.
There is no happiness in the world, but there is peace and freedom.
Where is the nearest church?
He doesn't have the time to play cards.
My wife telephones me often when I am abroad.
That's Tom's house with the red roof.
God created the earth in six days.
Don't come near me.
I met him in the crowd.
My friends invited me to dinner.
Bring me a glass of water.
My boyfriend looks like your girlfriend.
The situation is growing serious.
Children depend on their parents for food and clothing.
Did you come here by train or by bus?
Enjoy the weekend.
I can ride a horse.
That isn't a good idea in my opinion.
Do you smoke?
The train is made up of seven cars.
I hope not.
I like trains.
I have no time to do my homework.
She's loved by her friends.
Did you lose anything here?
A plane is flying above the city.
He has a lot more money than I have.
Tokyo is the capital of Japan.
I hope that you will like it.
I saw a star today.
I hope that she will help me.
Don't forget to send this letter.
The new medicine saved his life.
He was asleep during the lesson.
I don't have anything to declare.
The child tumbled down the stairs.
I am reading a book.
I wish I were a bird.
On Saturdays, we usually visit in this park.
Keep off the grass.
I don't know. It depends on the price.
Come back! he shouted.
We went through the woods and came to a lake.
When I phone them nobody answers.
What are you doing now?
I bought a new television.
This is not a sentence.
It doesn't matter anymore.
We're not so young that we don't understand what love is.
I can't understand his ideas at all.
I love French movies.
How many pens does she have?
In my free time, I write poetry.
I usually get up at six.
We have to abandon the plan.
It was you that suggested seeing that movie.
Ever since we've been wearing clothes, we haven't known one another.
We know this song.
I will speak with you tomorrow.
Will you help me? "I'll be glad to."
The king has reigned over the country for many years.
I have to help my mother.
We have no expectations of victory.
She is concerned about her son's health.
I neither drink nor smoke.
This room is too hot to study in. I can't stand it any more.
It seems a long way from here to the town.
He said that he was very happy.
I'm sorry, could you repeat that please?
I forgot to call up Mr Ford.
It's obvious that she's sick.
She's happy.
He looks pale.
Do you go to school by bus?
This is my kitchen.
My skin is dry.
I'll answer you when you've calmed down.
Where are the knives?
Five times seven is thirty-five.
The sky is blue.
How fast he can run!
Don't waste time.
I don't know how such a rumor got about.
Can I please have something hot to drink?
These flowers grow in warm countries.
The Queen lives in Buckingham Palace.
Most people in the village objected to the plan.
Thank you for your gift.
I'll give it a go.
I have been busy today.
I went to the station to see my friend off.
Had I known his address, I would have written to him.
Oh, really? When did he leave?
You are suitable for the job.
I'm out of ideas.
You are watching TV all the time.
This milk tastes odd.
The sooner we start, the sooner we'll finish.
He gave us clothes, and money as well.
This artist died young.
He is not such a fool but he knows it.
I will show you some pictures.
ׁWe're measuring the depth of the river.
They do nothing but cry.
She turned around and smiled.
How does this camera work?
He is a very important person.
His present is a bottle of wine.
God created the world.
The rain shows no sign of stopping.
I repeated the word several times for her.
That's a beautiful dress.
Do you like spring or autumn?
The girl listened to music, the boy was reading a book.
They went to America last month.
She always looks pale.
He told me that he'd like to become a scientist.
She says that she loves flowers.
I don't remember when I met him before.
This is where I was born and brought up.
Please attend my birthday party.
Now be a good boy or I'm going to send you to Oberon.
We can derive great pleasure from books.
I'm not rich, nor do I wish to be.
Look! The book is burning.
He tried to solve the problem, but had no luck.
Where does your grandfather live?
The history of Rome is very interesting.
Tom finally gave up smoking.
Turn up the music!
Can I make a phone call?
You must not go up the stairs.
It's not higher math.
This is very interesting.
He has a pleasant voice.
I don't know French, much less Greek.
Prices rise.
It is clear that he knows the answer.
I've seen this movie before.
Look at the house with the red roof.
I'm sure he will come tomorrow.
I'm a teacher.
Thus passes the glory of the world.
I like cats.
They have two sons and one daughter.
That is not possible.
Have a nice trip!
She pondered the question for a while.
I wonder what became of him.
Not even death can save you from me.
Fear cannot be without hope nor hope without fear.
Don't be foolish.
I regret having said that to him.
I know that you're a teacher.
She banged the table with her fist.
She tried to look much younger than she really was.
I looked for the key.
The sky is clear almost every day.
Their traces can still be found.
I drank milk.
Tom got married to an older woman.
Can these stars be seen in Australia?
Elizabeth II is the Queen of England.
It depends on the weather.
English is just one of over 2,700 languages in the world today.
I'm going to watch a scary movie.
What do you do in the afternoon?
He went through a very hard time.
I'm sure he will come tomorrow.
Cats can see even in dark places.
He left home for Spain.
You must read this book.
She must be very happy.
He promised not to tell.
I make it a rule to get up early.
She's my type.
This is your key.
Here's your key.
You may choose what you like.
You may choose any of them.
I was very busy yesterday.
He lived in France for some time, then went to Italy.
The key was left in the room.
Her father made her tell him everything.
Would you be so kind as to give me a glass of water?
It was a beautiful sunny day.
What should they do in this situation?
There was no life on the island.
I heard a Japanese nightingale.
The hospital is near here.
He was listening to music.
Bring the frozen fish here.
Get away!
She was dressed in red.
What has brought you here so early?
What a beautiful garden!
You have changed a lot.
You wanted to tell me about freedom?
I read it to my family.
To tell the truth, I didn't notice it.
Don't watch television.
She's in a bad mood.
I'm being serious!
The success resulted from your efforts.
Do you have a car?
I hope that he will succeed.
I know that he is watching me.
I'll wait here until he comes back.
I want to drink something cold.
Who do you want to talk to?
This decision is final.
It's very important.
Tomorrow is her birthday.
We accepted his offer.
This sentence doesn't make sense.
We had a pleasant evening.
We had a secret meeting.
Are you having a good time?
I want to make her happy.
I want to see a movie.
They arrived in Osaka at the beginning of May.
This is how I met your mother.
How do you account for your absence?
I felt my hands tremble.
I stopped to smoke.
Modern music is familiar to him.
Either he is to blame, or I am.
I often go to London.
Everything he says is correct.
Are they able to read these words?
I found the problem easier than I had expected.
I've known Jim ever since we were children.
The eyes are windows to the soul.
Live and learn.
I'm not busy today.
Why doesn't he come back?
The butter is made from cows' milk.
Knowing is power.
He said he would come, and what is more, he said he was glad to.
I met your girlfriend.
Eric has begun to sing.
Make haste slowly.
The desk drawer is open.
What is your daughter's name?
What were the chief events of last year?
Look out for yourself.
I do not like music.
Whose bag is this?
We get the materials from Malaysia.
The capital of Ukraine is Kiev.
The dog wants meat.
The house is burning.
It is an interesting information.
She is a very poor driver.
Adults only.
I've got an idea.
An idea came to me.
I want to be an engineer.
Don't lie!
He isn't a smoker.
Please breathe through your nose.
I am used to living alone.
Bill got up so early that he caught the first train.
Don't talk while you have food in your mouth.
It's already late.
Can you show me on the map?
How deep this lake is!
It is the sound you hear when everything is silent.
I wish the rain would stop.
I want to call him. Do you have his number?
The number of looks equals the number of people.
How tall are you?
Let's begin with the fifth line on page 10.
They couldn't think where to go.
It's strange that nobody knows us.
The professor calmly washed his hands.
What's on fire?
Why are you crying?
It is my cat.
A cat was on the table.
The cat eats.
I'm really bad with names, but I never forget a face.
I underwent major surgery last year.
I felt like crying.
In winter it gets dark early.
Thanks for the advice. I'll give it a try.
You are absolutely correct.
I'm talking to myself.
Because he invited me.
I met an old friend of mine the other day.
There'll be a problem.
Sooner or later we all are going to die.
This is my bag.
I'm pleased.
I'm accustomed to this.
Suddenly, she stopped and looked around.
They constructed a bridge.
Walk along the river and you will find the school.
He's in a bad mood.
There are many more beautiful ladies in Shanghai than in Tokyo.
How horrible!
The policeman gave me a sign stop.
I'm nearly finished.
He likes walking in the park.
That depends on you.
It's fall now.
Where shall we go now? To the theatre or cinema?
Twenty years is a long time.
The big fish loves the deep.
It's spring.
Each time I see this picture, I remember my father.
He is not a teacher but a student.
He is tired of watching television.
She sent her children off to school.
The grass is always greener on the other side of the fence.
Which club do you belong to?
A ‘chek-chek’ festival took place in Latvia.
The TV doesn't work.
Do not forget about us.
The airplane soon went out of sight.
He is still full of energy.
To your health!
He is writing a novel.
Great boast and small roast.
His answer depends on his mood.
Do you know how to get there?
When I'm with you, I'm happy.
Where are my keys?
I use Firefox.
I have three brothers. One lives in Japan and the other two live abroad.
Live and learn.
Happy is the child who has such a mother.
I called her, but the line was busy.
I think it's worth a try.
There is a TV in this room.
It saved me.
Money cannot buy freedom.
You continue making the same mistakes time after time.
The sun was setting.
She made a serious mistake.
There is a threat of a storm.
I have a cat and a dog.
It's in the kitchen.
It is in a kitchen.
Tell him to wait.
Tell him to wait.
We sat in complete silence.
You are her daughters.
No matter what happens, I won't be surprised.
She was waiting in front of the building.
He accepted my present.
You are young. I, on the other hand, am very old.
I use Firefox.
Look up the town on the map.
She stood before the mirror.
She was different from most women in the neighborhood, for she was able to read and write.
I've been very busy lately.
My wife often rings me up, while she travels abroad.
He treats me like a child.
I am pleased to help you if I can.
Augustus is my most beloved son.
Do you know when the event took place?
It's far from here.
I saw a fly on the ceiling.
Nothing in the room matches with anything else.
Though he was poor, he was nonetheless happy.
That's interesting, but beside the point.
His opinion is quite different from ours.
The game was very interesting.
If you have any doubts, let me know without any hesitation.
If you want to be happy, then be happy.
He telephoned me again and again.
I lost him in the crowd.
Her husband is usually drunk.
I felt like talking to someone.
That dog has a short tail.
He still writes novels from time to time, but not as often as he used to.
Butter is made from milk.
My grandfather passed away three years ago.
This bridge was built two years ago.
Can't you wait just ten more minutes?
He works in a big city hospital.
Of course I can drive a car very well.
His brother is always watching TV.
Bridges are burning and chances are few.
I don't feel like joking.
I was born and raised in Tokyo.
There's no light without a shadow.
Someday, you'll wake up and find yourself dead.
Taro, dinner's ready!
His debt reached a hundred dollars.
I don't watch television.
I'm loved.
I have been loved.
I would be loved.
Get out of here!
Guess what! I'm going to New Zealand to study.
He intended to marry her.
One day I met him.
He often eats fish for dinner.
The dog followed its master, wagging its tail.
I'm coming from the garden.
I know the name of this animal.
She seems happy.
Look! There's a cat in the kitchen.
He is a teacher.
My hand is in warm water.
I cried all night.
I cried all night.
She's unconscious.
My roommates have already explained to me who Björk is.
Oleg is happy that someone loves him.
My neighbours have already explained to me who Björk is.
Didn't you hear a scream?
By the way, have you done your homework?
They are earnest about their children's education.
We gladly accept your offer.
I have read many modern authors.
Joking aside, what are you trying to say?
Do you know why the sky is blue?
A healthy man does not know the value of health.
John listened carefully.
I've never climbed Mt. Fuji.
What kind of bird is this?
There has to be a first time for everything.
My eyesight isn't very good.
By the way, have you done your homework?
That flower smells sweet.
I have bad eyesight.
I don't care about what they say.
His life is in danger.
Be loved.
He is French by birth, but he is now a citizen of the USA.
The widow was dressed in black.
The free market system is endangered.
The building may crash at any time.
You can stay here as long as you like.
Dozens of students gathered there.
Do you watch TV?
Why sentences? …you may ask. Well, because sentences are more interesting.
Get out of here! All of you!
I'm waiting for the train.
Are you happy?
Are you happy?
Are you happy?
Are you content?
I like watching movies.
He is always laughing.
There is a church near my house.
He says he has always been true to his wife.
That's impossible!
My grandfather died in the same room in which he was born.
I feel happy when I'm with you.
I feel happy when I'm with you.
This will take time.
Let me alone.
You must not give up hope.
I don't understand music.
Please give my regards to your family.
I'm looking for my pen.
Would you care for a cup of tea?
I have always wanted to go to Australia with my family.
He's a citizen of China.
Did I say something stupid?
Have we met before?
Have we met before?
This book is about stars.
In Asia men usually precede women when walking.
They were sitting on the sofa in our living room.
Shit!
There are a lot of fish in the lake.
You have three cats.
This is the same watch that I lost a week ago.
This is the very best way to do it.
Don't hang up.
If you want peace, prepare for war.
I was happy yesterday.
The mountains look nicer from a distance.
My throat hurts.
Many kinds of birds live in Japan.
She lost her money, her family and her friends.
I forgot to telephone him today.
I like winter.
I'm as busy as ever.
How's your little sister?
Could you tell me the exact time, please?
I hope that he will come.
Nobody has solved the problem.
This flower is beautiful, isn't it?
He's my age.
She is careless about her attire.
I am waiting.
He made up his mind to be a teacher.
Would you like to drink anything?
He lost his all.
If he were happy, he would play much better.
I want you to read this book.
I want you to read this book.
I want you to read this book.
I want you to read this book.
He always takes his coffee strong.
He is a painter.
I'm in a hurry today.
I am glad that everything has finished this way.
He wrote a letter, listening to music.
I've never met him.
The girl's voice became weaker and weaker.
I ran to my mother.
Every time I look at this picture, I think of my father.
He left Japan never to come back.
The majority of the committee were against the plan.
He has gone to Italy to study music.
I feel a lot better.
Have you finished your lunch yet?
Bill, did you take Spot for a walk yet?
Give me your opinion, please.
She has a rich vocabulary of English words.
All was silent throughout the castle.
It's odd.
I love listening to music.
I didn't meet anyone there.
What year did you finish from school?
Settle down!
The child is afraid of the dark.
The boy is afraid of the dark.
I'd like to have a glass of wine.
I often study while listening to music.
Look at the house with the red roof.
I absolutely will not speak to that fellow again!
It is impossible for him to become a doctor.
The boy is sick, though he doesn't appear so.
He never speaks English without making mistakes.
Show me another camera.
He took part in the meeting.
The days are getting warmer and warmer.
The sun is coming up.
I am going to watch TV this evening.
He wasn't watching TV then.
I visited New York for the first time.
I'll meet him tomorrow.
That'd be fine.
Please listen carefully.
When they got to the station, the train had already left.
He achieved great success in life.
This fish smells bad.
I work in a hospital.
Is lunch ready?
A fish out of water.
I translate sentences on Tatoeba in my spare time.
I know that you are rich.
I had no idea who she was.
I make it a rule to get up at six.
The boy caught the cat by the tail.
He addressed himself to the chairman.
I like walking by myself.
He had one daughter.
The earth is a planet.
How about a beer?
My pen is new.
Misfortunes always come in threes.
Do you like black cats?
Who's your teacher?
That is a strange sentence.
That's true as well.
I'm very busy so probably I won't be able to come tomorrow.
Don't open the window.
It's clear that he's at home.
The root of the problem is a lack of communication between departments.
You took the wrong key.
How blue the sky is!
Please have a seat and wait until your name is called.
I am afraid it's too late.
I solved the problem in this way.
It all depends how you handle it.
You are seriously ill.
What is the usual cause for the pain?
Judge him by what he does, not by his appearance.
Is your clock keeping accurate time?
Where is the vodka?
Are you certain?
I often get up very early.
Bangkok is the capital of Thailand.
Queen Elizabeth died in 1603.
How tall are you?
I don't like spring.
Who says sentences have to be serious?
These pens are his.
She was shivering with cold.
I'm a journalist.
He is a student.
Give my regards to her.
My son is now as tall as I am.
This man is dead.
I'm sure she's right.
Please, don't kill me.
He's a teacher and so am I.
I like walking at night.
He's behaving oddly.
The teacher explained the meaning of the word to us.
I want a knife.
The story left him unmoved.
I'll try again, thank you.
He often laughs at his own jokes.
I will gladly help you.
You look pale. You'd better take a day off.
How many times a day do you look at yourself in the mirror?
The whole class laughed at his joke.
She is very beautiful.
Summer is over.
He threw a piece of meat to a dog.
We have to wait for him.
This is the last train, sir.
The dog didn't eat the meat.
I love you too much.
I got up early.
Not everyone can be a poet.
He is sure of success.
When did you graduate from high school?
I'm having trouble breathing.
He repeated his question.
I do not know what to write in this sentence.
These are pens.
He likes to play cards.
There were no railroads in Japan at that time.
New Russians, you say? Wonderful! That's just what we need!
Why don't we ask his advice?
Read chapter four by Friday.
The boss ordered us to work from morning till night.
That's my car.
Please do not open the windows.
Man cannot live by bread alone.
Ah, thank you, my dear.
Sweden's population is growing.
I do not feel guilty.
To be honest, we came to capture you.
To be honest, we came to capture you.
I bought fresh bread.
He played an important role on the committee.
How do they prepare this fish in France?
We use a lot of water every day.
I was very busy this week.
My brother didn't like her from the start.
She screamed that I was to blame.
I guess that she is over thirty.
What do you want to have for lunch?
She woke up.
Who found the book I lost?
He sang a song.
Don't cry.
He was quite weak in his childhood.
He didn't come back to the base yesterday.
He's famous around the world.
I am meeting him next Friday.
I want to speak to him.
It smells good!
Will you be participating in the celebration?
You can't smoke here.
I can't find my purse.
This evening we will go to church.
There are many birds in this park.
This is the deepest lake in Japan.
This lake is among the deepest in the country.
Some believe Nessie lives in this lake.
Everyone knows that there is something new in this old capital.
I'm afraid this key does not fit.
From this point of view, you are right.
He is an English teacher.
100 years is called a century.
He was crying.
This is the cheapest shop in town.
She will help me choose myself a new car.
She took a deep breath.
We have too many classes.
We went to church every Sunday when we were in America.
We have given Edgar Degas a voice that we hope suits him.
We were chatting over tea.
We are the students of this school.
There are rare animals in Australia.
There are many interesting animals in Australia.
He is poor, but happy.
Rome has a lot of ancient buildings.
Let me know your new address.
We don't meet very often recently.
Tony can run fast.
Her story can't be true.
I can’t stand panties.
I do not like to make mistakes.
I am busy.
I am busy.
Better late than never.
Buenos Aires is the capital of Argentina.
I talk in my sleep very often.
She took my words as a joke.
What is this letter?
I don't like this type of house.
I can wait for you.
Ellen was so tired that she went to bed early.
It is time to shut the gate.
The night was far advanced.
When I woke up, I was in the car.
Life in prison is worse than the life of an animal.
At this rate, we're not likely to be done before the end of the week.
They died in battle.
In the beginning God created the heaven and the earth.
Try to calm down.
He said it as a joke.
I have nothing to do with the crime.
Summon up your courage and tell the truth.
Here are your keys.
He became famous.
Tom suggested another plan to the committee.
Waiting for a bus, I met my friend.
Father was sent to the hospital yesterday.
His work is below average.
This wasn't what I expected.
While I breathe, I hope.
I didn't know he had a weak heart.
How come the sky is blue?
Our topic of the week is: _____.
Since you say so, I think I must believe it.
I like city life very much.
I want to see what there is inside.
She may not be aware of the danger.
She's pleased with her new dress.
A new dress was bought for her.
He composes beautiful poems.
They attempted to assassinate the president.
All were invited but me.
Answer the phone, please.
This is an error.
You look pale today.
You look pale today.
Show me where it hurts.
She is thirty-one.
She can speak three foreign languages.
Can you explain to me why you refused their offer?
I've got a suggestion.
Do it right away.
She tried a third time.
I don't know whether to turn left or right.
I was asked to wait here.
I will wait for my sister here.
This room is used as a kitchen.
I'll manage it.
Yesterday I met Marie.
I can't accept this gift.
He disappeared in the crowd.
If only I knew his address.
If only I knew his address.
We saw a strange object in the sky.
Who are you to talk to me like that?
I have no one to turn to for advice.
You are on the wrong train.
I can't find my pen.
What have you done with my pen?
How my poor heart aches!
My opinion differs from yours.
Leave my car alone.
His clothes always smell bad.
This is a little weird.
I solved the problem in this way.
This law applies to everybody.
Today is a sunny day.
Not everybody is poor.
The Golden Gate Bridge is in San Francisco.
They like to wear bright colors.
I collect stamps as a hobby.
He crossed the street.
I have no energy today.
What's that building behind the hospital?
She'd been very busy.
The garden is behind the house.
Children cry because they want to eat.
Watch what you're doing!
This problem is not so difficult as it seems.
Can you ride a horse?
His birthday is May 5th.
He fell to the floor.
Why don't you take off your coat?
I can't believe that she is older than my mother.
Mathematics are the foundation of all sciences.
I'm watching television.
He fell off the horse.
His secretary seems to know the truth.
The horse is mine.
You can study here.
You ought to love your neighbors.
There is a cat in the kitchen.
This is a book worth reading.
I usually get up at 8.
Choose the one you like.
He loved her very much.
I sometimes cook dinner.
I asked my teacher what to do next.
I was all ears.
I listened but could not hear any sound.
I'm used to cooking for myself.
She was dressed all in black.
Where's the nearest bank?
Is there anything wrong with that television?
He climbed up the ladder.
He has a round face.
I'm a college student.
I have been studying German since I met that girl in Darmstadt.
I've run for three hours.
Listen carefully.
Summer is my favorite season.
How happy I am!
I go to school by subway.
I'd like to buy a map.
The man next door said he goes for a jog every morning.
Please close the window.
Cheese is made from milk.
What have you done with my pen? It was here a minute ago.
Well, I have a suggestion to make.
Do you know who wrote this novel?
We had a casual meeting on the crowded street.
We really hope another war will not break out.
We were able to catch the last train.
Solar energy is a new source of energy.
Engineers are crazy about solar energy.
Let's talk about solar energy.
The problem is that solar energy is too expensive.
The car turned abruptly.
The car made a right turn over there.
Smoking is prohibited here.
When have I told a lie?
I owe what I am to my father.
He played "Hamlet" on the stage.
He acted on the stage.
It's up to you to decide.
Good advice is expensive there.
He translated a Japanese novel into French.
Are you certain?
How much does a cinema ticket cost?
How much does the wooden chair cost?
I don't have anything more to say.
The proof is in the pudding.
I will be busy tomorrow.
To tell the truth, she is my sister.
He shook hands with her and smiled.
He made up his mind to marry her.
He was unable to completely give up on his hopes of marrying her.
He was not able to marry her.
He asked her to call him later.
I have nothing better to do.
Everybody is busy except me.
He handed me the letter and left.
Did that uncle of his often visit America?
Not knowing what to do, I asked him for advice.
Did you do your homework?
Get out of bed.
Get out of bed.
Get up!
Sicily's summers are hot.
Don't study.
He is aware that the work is difficult.
The air is thin at the top of a high mountain.
Any time will suit me.
Do you often have fish for dinner?
Joking aside, how are things going?
Joking aside, how are things going?
Is it true that you are going to study in London?
You remind me of my mother.
Wait for me.
Wait for me.
He stretched out his arm to take the book.
We men are used to waiting for the women.
I like her younger sister very much.
Linda came into the building.
Where can I obtain a map of Europe?
She is terrified of the dark.
He was admitted to college.
Weren’t they satisfied?
Please say hello to your family.
You need to face the facts.
I have no idea where I left my keys.
Where did you meet her?
Where do you think I met her?
Where did you get the idea?
I play an important part.
A shot rang out.
They have left here, perhaps for good.
They should not talk here.
You never listen. I might as well talk to the wall.
Your efforts resulted in the success.
I'm willing to accept your offer.
I'll accept your offer.
If it had not been for your help, he would have been ruined.
I got through with my work just now.
Please wait in front of Room 213.
Lynn runs fast.
The eyes are the mirrors of the soul.
This is a nice restaurant. Thanks for bringing me here.
She finished the job with ease.
A long time ago, there was a bridge here.
That's of no concern.
We sometimes meet them.
Not everybody can be a poet.
This is my daughter.
My father is busy.
He is content with the simple life.
He went to bed early.
He gets up early.
He promised me to come early.
He is accustomed to getting up early.
He tried to open the window.
He kept the window closed.
He runs.
He heard a noise.
He is breathing hard.
I started crying.
Water is important for people.
I don't have much money on me.
The patient is unconscious.
The bread really smells good.
She did it carefully.
A bird can glide through the air without moving its wings.
All at once it began to rain heavily.
Naoko is a fast runner.
He could no longer stand the pain.
You can stay as long as you like.
You can call me any time.
Who's your favorite actor?
Unfortunately, I cannot help them.
I could not understand what prevented me from moving.
They consider him their best employee.
Cats dislike being wet.
We lost sight of him.
She has gone abroad.
Put the money in the bank.
The money belongs to the company.
That bridge has been out of use for a long time.
The professor spoke too fast for anyone to understand him.
Call me once you've arrived.
English has become my favorite subject.
Lend your money and lose your friend.
What time does she get up?
You are killing me slowly.
Allen was given a problem that was impossible to solve.
Whose books are those?
They're able students.
These people were very lucky.
The train stopped in Baltimore.
When Dad came home, I was watching TV.
He came home earlier than I expected.
He told us an interesting story.
This road is closed to cars.
I don't have the address with me.
Jim could hear whom she was phoning.
He discovered that he had made a mistake.
I'm sorry, but I'm busy right now.
Ken cried for help.
I go shopping every morning.
He bought six cakes of soap yesterday.
He held her tightly.
The surgery is quite difficult.
You can go home after you have finished this work.
Let me out!
Would you like to be rich?
How much are these pants?
If we begin early, we can finish by lunch.
I suggested that we should start early.
You've arrived too early.
To my horror, the man took a gun out of his pocket.
She was unconscious for three days.
We hear music with our ears.
We went to the museum last week.
I met him while going back home.
That's all the information we need right now.
My grandfather loves to read.
My uncle lives in Madrid, the capital of Spain.
Our uncle bought us movie tickets.
She smokes a lot.
The Cold War began after the Second World War.
She is currently in danger.
While he was talking, there was the sound of a shot being fired.
Run fast, and you will catch the train.
That movie is for children.
She wouldn't be happy with him.
Take any books that you want to read.
She was trembling with fear.
I'm sorry to have kept you waiting for so long.
Never have I been so happy.
I like foreign languages.
Needless to say, health is above wealth.
Judging from his expression, he's in a bad mood.
I have nothing to tell you for the moment.
Welcome to Cyberspace!
He suddenly noticed his wallet was missing.
This coffee is too strong for me.
Is that the way you talk to me?
Light travels faster than sound.
Mt Fuji can be seen from here.
I can't eat meat.
Do not put child into bag!
She was on the scene of the crime.
This girl is the flower of the school.
In other words, you're a fool.
Please let go of my arm.
He gave the dog a bone.
This does not concern you at all.
When you talk to others, you're doing it with your arms crossed.
How did you come by these rare books?
There is no reason for you to feel inferior to anyone.
You don't smoke, do you?
You had better not smoke so much.
The more books you read, the more you'll know.
You must refuse to drink this drug.
You ought to have read the book.
She is kindhearted by nature.
He did better than last time.
Go away from here!
When did you finish it?
Does he watch television every day?
A fly can walk on the ceiling.
What is that building with the green roof?
You had better ask the doctor for advice.
You're safe.
You must study much harder.
Which train is going to the city center?
Which train are you going to take?
You should have been more careful with your health.
She gave me a present.
They did it at great expense.
They elected Taro captain of their team.
They are talking in the kitchen.
They study in order that they may enter the university.
This suit's too thin for me.
This train runs between Tokyo and Hakata.
I told her once and for all that I would not go shopping with her.
I like the blue one. How much does it cost?
Every day we use many things which Edison invented.
The town where I was born is beautiful.
She has the same bag as you have.
She's about the same height as you.
She is making use of you.
How long does it take you to go home from my house?
Her dress is not to my taste.
There's no fool like an old fool.
He still remembers the day his mother found out he was smoking.
I'm older than any other student in my class.
You did what you had to do.
I'd like to get information regarding a number of questions.
Did you buy any meat in the supermarket?
Please, sit down, he said.
I made him carry the briefcase.
I'm the oldest of the students in my class.
Do you need keys?
How do you like my new suit?
I have my supper at a quarter past seven.
He deemed it wise to accept the offer.
All the students began talking at once.
Please pay attention.
We have no hot water because the pipes broke.
My neighbor is planting new grass in his yard.
The doctor was pleased with the baby's good health.
How long have you been abroad?
My father's in the garden.
Do you have a Japanese journal?
No, sit down.
They made a list of the names.
They refused to join the army.
They liked what Jefferson said.
They died trying to save others.
They sent him to prison in 1925.
They did not expect an easy life.
They had built roads and bridges.
I just felt like hearing the sound of your voice.
He gave his children a good education.
He always pays attention to his children's behavior.
I went to drink a beer with friends.
I've been lucky.
I am contented with my lot.
It was very lucky for me that I saw him.
I am fond of the cinema.
I stayed home all day long instead of going to the movies.
I suggested that we should go to the movies.
I feel like going to the movies.
What did they hit you with?
My mother made me take some medicine.
Is he a doctor?
Goodnight!
I love the great outdoors.
You arrived at the moment I left.
I got this dress for pretty cheap.
The price turned out to be lower than I thought.
I bet that I can finish this task in an hour's time.
That's MY line!
He doesn't look well. Probably drank too much last night.
A woman is capable of failing to notice the hundred things that you've done her, and to address only the one that you haven't.
How many cats are there in this house?
When you walk sturdily along the path on which you have started, you are, in my opinion, happy.
Take the top and you will have the middle.
Think more and make decisions after.
I decided to go abroad to study.
He was unconscious for three days.
Love comes from love. When I want others to love me, I myself love first.
She shed tears while listening to the story.
She tried not to shed tears.
She was crying.
He is not the sharpest tool in the shed.
Stop pretending to not understand.
I don't belong to any club.
He did his best never to think of her.
My father is so old that he can't work.
The anticipation is always worse than the calamity.
I'm sorry, but it's just not possible.
He likes watching TV.
He could not believe his eyes.
Work absorbs most of his time.
We look up to him as our leader.
She is living abroad.
Whose pen is that?
I don't care as long as you are happy.
Install Linux!
If I were you, I would also do the same.
You're in my way!
The section chief accepted the offer.
When I got back, I found my car missing.
Where is the closest subway station?
Has Lucy called yet?
Where's the nearest museum at?
We might meet again in the near future.
He sometimes says nice things.
No matter how drunk you were, Goethe was a poet!
Are you studying or are you working?
It's too late.
Playing cards is interesting.
You may choose whichever you want.
I'm drunk.
Some came by bus, and the others - by train.
After my childhood, I was never sick again.
The cat was on the table.
The heavens do not err.
How many students are there in your university?
I'd like to meet with her.
Let me introduce my wife.
Who's your favorite writer?
I'm being sincere when I say that I love you.
He was blue from the cold.
He gave me a sign to keep quiet.
He didn't go for the idea.
The idea grew on him.
The idea grew on him.
He is the principal of the high school.
It makes little difference to me whether you believe it or not.
Martial arts have their limits. You just have to look at Bruce Lee. He was the strongest but he couldn't help dying.
My friend seems serious to me.
I sent it out yesterday, and so you should get it tomorrow.
It's very difficult to translate this word.
Is this fish still alive?
He didn't pay attention to what she said.
How many hats do you own?
The gentleman was standing in front of the bank.
They talked during the movie.
I'm sure that he is clever.
I'm sure that he is clever.
Who's singing with him now?
Three million people were out of work.
That's not my favorite topic.
That's not my favorite topic.
He is a wise fool, so to speak.
He is my neighbour.
She likes to go for walks alone.
In any case, it's too late.
I opened an account in my daughter's name.
That's interesting.
Don't talk to me!
It's way too hot inside...
I wish him a good night.
I wish him a good night.
He often accepted bad advice.
We spent the whole evening talking to them.
Have you seen our museums? What do you think about them?
He promised to write every day.
There is little hope of his success.
They shook hands with each other.
Are you satisfied now?
She is crying.
Read it once more, please.
Graham Greene is a favorite author of mine.
His picture was in the newspaper.
The country is famous for the rapid growth of its economy.
He went all the way to see her, only to find she was away.
Follow the stars.
This is a horse.
There is no factory in this village.
To me, it's important.
Does Tony run every day?
That belongs to my brother.
Today is my birthday.
It's too early to get up.
Thanks for the info.
An artist must have an eye for color.
She is poor, but she looks happy.
I'm happy.
Can you help me to translate these sentences into Chinese?
Make a few good friends and stick to them.
My uncle is rich.
He is the boss of our department.
I chose to study stenography.
People thought him to be a great scholar.
She turned around quickly.
He often goes with her to watch movies.
Please give me this pen.
There are many islands in Greece.
You look like your father looked thirty years ago.
Seen from the sky, the river looked like a huge snake.
Since the bridge looks like a pair of glasses, they call it Meganebashi.
East is a wispy matter.
We shouldn't let the problem rest here.
Don't expect too much of him.
I wonder whose car this is.
My grandfather has never consulted a doctor in his life.
Homicide is punishable by death.
What the hell are you doing here?
It is a great pleasure being with you.
She took the case into court.
His knowledge of English is poor.
I'm a little drunk.
He cried in an angry voice.
She wrote a book about the bird.
There's no one here who can deal with the problem.
My aunt has three children.
I am looking forward to hearing from you soon.
She retorted against him.
She made him do it.
We were flying about six hours.
The bridge is very long and very tall.
Few people can realize their faults.
Please refer to page ten.
He is the captain of the team.
We can see thousands of stars in the sky.
To all appearances, they are a happy couple.
She didn't read the book.
Can I speak with Bill?
She put the key in her bag.
Education begins at home.
Do you like this garden?
What's that animal's name?
You need the keys?
Yes, I have a daughter.
Who sings this song?
Why does the dog smell bad?
Why is dad in the kitchen?
Where does your grandmother live?
This country is called Russia.
Welcome to our restaurant!
We hope to return next year.
Can you close the window, please?
They weren't listening to music.
The conclusion is crystal clear.
My sister isn't studying now.
My teeth are totally healthy and free of problems.
I heard the telephone ringing.
He went to Tokyo on business.
I'm a Japanese language teacher.
He asked her to stay, but she didn't want to.
Father is cooking dinner in the kitchen now.
They go to church on Sunday.
Most people will refuse to admit they've made a mistake.
I am afraid he will make a mistake.
I heard him go down the stairs.
It is evident that he did it.
I found my father neither in his room nor in the garden.
These dresses are too large.
I beg of you to listen carefully.
He told me that I must finish the work by six.
The speed of light is much greater than that of sound.
She likes blue dresses.
Do not open your book.
Please bring me a glass of water.
Don't open the window.
He died at the age of seventy.
Whom did you meet?
Whom did you meet?
Whom did you meet?
Whom did you meet?
The glass is full of milk.
Bless you.
Tracy lost her glasses.
If I were healthy, I would be happy.
I passed out.
It was believed that evil spirits would return to earth on the last day of the year.
I'm out of money.
She has lost all hope.
What's important to you?
I was doing my homework.
I like the color green.
Please don't mind me.
I don't mind if you smoke.
Is that a cat?
A horse can run faster than a man can.
Don't read this sentence.
Don't read this sentence.
The tree stopped growing.
Cats are social animals.
She has a white cat.
He has a white cat.
Welcome to our home!
Welcome to San Francisco.
I often help my sister do her homework.
Wait a moment.
You always sing.
I am sure I saw her two years ago.
I have lost my wallet.
Do you remember the day when we met first?
I'm looking for my keys.
She takes a walk with her dog every day.
I am fully satisfied with my new house.
He started laughing.
Ten years is a long time.
The world is a dangerous place.
He likes singing.
You are pale.
I am busy now and can't play with you.
Year after year, production continued to increase.
I am satisfied with the result of my math test.
Did God really create the earth in a single day?
I sold my books cheaply.
They're happy.
I think food is expensive in Japan.
The dog is a faithful animal.
Money doesn't grow on trees.
Why do you use Tatoeba?
Turn around.
Turn around.
There is the neighbor Patočka.
It's the fastest train in the world.
We will start tomorrow, weather permitting.
I can't live without TV.
If looks could kill, I'd be dead by now.
Please remember to mail the letter.
Show me how to do it, please.
Arriving at the station, she called up her brother.
We'll meet at 3:00 p.m.
I love the girl I met yesterday.
I met your father yesterday.
Yesterday I met an old friend of mine whom I had not seen for a long time.
I met your parents yesterday.
I met my friend.
She put the key in her pocket.
Tom said that he feels much better today.
Do you have any idea what time Tom will come home?
Catch me if you can.
He caught three fish.
Don't approach the dog.
The last train has already gone.
Do you know by chance his name?
I like movies.
He began to play an old song.
Where do you have pain?
It hurts here.
I've got a pain in my side.
The book costs fifteen dollars.
I want you to sing.
Please show me on the map.
His plan is dangerous!
All of them agreed to the proposal.
You look pale. Shall I call the doctor?
I'm in good health.
When do you usually get up?
Wild animals live in the forest.
A dead leaf fell to the ground.
How many operations has Dr. Jackson performed this month?
We have to find a new market for these products.
London is the capital of the United Kingdom.
Please say that again!
He ordered that everybody get up at six.
I was watching TV at this time yesterday.
I lost the watch I had bought the day before.
Where do you spend your weekends?
I met him quite unexpectedly.
I need a glass of water.
You came too late.
You came too late.
He is about thirty.
If I knew his address, I would write to him.
What does your aunt do?
What does your aunt do?
Tomorrow is my birthday.
Never tell a lie!
My daughter has grown out of all her old clothes.
Health is the most important thing.
The capital of Japan is Tokyo.
This song is called "Only You".
Two opinions are better than one.
This is an important letter.
How many people does this ship's crew consist of?
When I woke up, it was snowing.
I went in the direction my friend indicated.
My father is 48, but he looks young for his age.
Here's your bag.
There is no point in giving him advice.
Whose is this bag?
I could not stop laughing.
Such a wonderful music!
His father will not come, he is very busy.
I asked him to wait here.
Milk makes us strong.
Milk is made into butter and cheese.
The water of the lake is very cold.
Eat not only fish, but also meat.
I don't drink or smoke.
This sentence will be translated.
Look at what she brought for my birthday party!
Tom couldn't believe his eyes.
Tom couldn't believe his ears.
Tom couldn't be happier.
Do you have a lot of pens?
Do you have a lot of pens?
Ouch! My foot!
He became the company president when he was thirty.
Can you get the work finished in time?
Go away.
He was watching the scene with breathless interest.
Mathematics is her weak point.
The soup is too hot.
I'm not as stupid as you think I am.
Have you already met her?
He gripped my hand.
My father wants me to be an engineer.
My son believes in Father Christmas.
My older brother is a teacher.
The one who has everything can lose everything.
I wore a hat yesterday because it was very cold.
I am not stupid.
He seems ill.
I want to see her very much.
We will talk about this later.
I left for London.
I heard her singing in her room.
Man must work.
He is screaming a lot.
Please don't forget to see him tomorrow.
A good idea came into my mind.
Isn't that the Golden Gate Bridge?
Turn on your back.
Brian looks blue.
Don't smoke.
Do you know who wrote this novel?
Teaching is learning.
The king reigned over his people for forty years.
Let's put up our tent here.
Loud music is bad for your health.
Keep to the right.
I am of the opinion that he will succeed.
He is a good scholar, and what is better, a good teacher.
He is too drunk to drive home.
She went either to London or to Paris.
He had a little operation on his left leg.
She's in the hospital now.
There are a few books in the bag.
The world did not recognize him.
I want to travel by airplane.
Is the museum open today?
I'm sure we'll find a solution.
Please wait for me at the entrance of the building.
I was leaving home when Tom telephoned me.
I am not studying now.
I have never heard her sing.
Picasso is a famous artist.
I'll give him a call.
They say that he is the richest person in the world.
Don't cry. I love you.
Do tell!
I wanted to catch the bird, but I found it too difficult.
Yes. That's right.
I wonder who invented it.
They are about the same age.
Is the bank open?
Our train stopped suddenly.
Please take off your shirt.
My mother was in tears.
You should make sure of the facts before you write something.
Her father won't come, he is very busy.
The brain is just a complicated machine.
We tried it again, but couldn't do it.
Be quiet during the lesson.
I'm not as stupid as you think I am.
What is your favorite sentence?
Tom doesn't know how to treat his employees properly.
They are artists.
I want you to help me with my homework.
She's in a good mood today.
The tongue wounds more than a lance.
I wouldn't like to meet him in a dark place.
The committee has ten members.
Can I speak to the doctor?
Tom couldn't make himself understood.
Please come downstairs.
The more careful you are, the fewer mistakes you make.
You may choose any book you like.
He may be on the next train.
I'm scared of the dark.
I was not drunk.
A green light is on.
What a beautiful city!
This doesn't fit.
We'll do it with pleasure.
It rained for the first time in ten days.
There's dust on the table.
The bus will arrive within ten minutes.
Are you saying my life is in danger?
You know I'd do anything for your beautiful eyes.
I wish I wouldn't have to meet you again.
He told me that his father's a teacher.
There are fifty stars.
I'll wait.
Are you quite sure about that?
I'm not sure how to answer this.
Are you sure that you know me?
This is difficult to believe.
We went to Russia.
It was a mistake on their part.
What a beautiful day!
It's serious.
This is a horse.
I can't understand why people are frightened of new ideas. I'm frightened of the old ones.
Whose is this car?
There is the Seine and here is the bridge.
Their efforts were not for nothing.
There is usually an organ in a church.
She has a round face.
He gave me not just advice, but money as well.
I'm an artist.
She sang pretty well.
That kind of remark does not befit you.
She always cries when he is drunk.
Raise your left arm.
Why did you buy a flower?
We wish to invite Peter to Japan in the near future.
His house is very modern.
The table doesn't take much room.
I can't run as fast as he can.
Father built me a new house.
The train was ready to depart.
She has a flower in her hand.
Everything has its limits.
He works in a factory.
Say hello to your mum for me.
Perhaps you would like me to give you the key to my apartment where I keep my money, too?
I read the book.
She wouldn't go for a walk with him.
Choose any dress you like.
A crowd soon gathered around him.
I'm very pleased to meet you.
I'm very pleased to meet you.
Don't forget that good jobs are very hard to come by these days.
There are rumors that she found a new job.
That child was happy to get the gift.
I'll finish the work in a week or less.
Each of their opinions has both good points and bad points.
I'll quit my job for the sake of my health.
Are you busy these days?
It mightn't have been my youngest brother's fault, but it wasn't mine either.
Come to my house whenever you like.
To be honest, said Dima. "I really can't remember who they were..."
The baby cried all night.
She went out for a walk.
All of a sudden, three dogs appeared in front of us.
They're inside.
I've had a coffee.
London is the capital of England.
It is absolutely impossible.
The phone is ringing. "I'll get it."
She likes music. "So do I."
Tom wanted to stop and think.
Millions of wild animals live in Alaska.
Millions of wild animals live in Alaska.
I want to buy a new car.
Your ideas are different from mine.
The tea is too strong. Add some water.
I'm very happy now.
He has good eyesight.
Chicago is the principal city of the Middle West.
I am remembering the word.
Once there lived a great king.
This bird lives neither in Japan nor in China.
He waited for his son with anxiety.
She found it very important.
There is a hospital nearby.
I'm serious.
Tom had nothing to eat yesterday.
He motioned for me to follow him.
He went to America last week.
I'll meet you at the usual time.
I turned right.
Birds abound in the woods.
I know he is busy.
He stopped reading a book.
Who allowed him in?
Calm down.
No joy without alloy.
The more languages you know the more of a person you are.
I'm in the middle of something.
Life is interesting.
She became happy.
The girl was trembling with fear.
I managed to finish the work.
Are you able to read the book attentively?
She reminds me very much of her mother.
Call me tonight.
I hope it pans out.
Obviously.
Danger ahead.
She really likes to write poems.
How foolish I am to believe him!
The situation changed the following year.
Your bag looks heavy.
She lost no time in starting to work on new project.
This is a map.
Children are the flowers of life.
My mother doesn't like the summer heat.
She wondered where Sam was and what he was doing.
I'll always love you, no matter what happens.
I'm not familiar with French poets.
I tell ya, you're in deep trouble, my lad.
All gods are better than their conduct.
I have a few pens.
Learning a foreign language is interesting.
Do you have a pen on you?
I didn't want to get up early.
It's my horse.
Please wait until I come back.
Please send me your photo.
One book is thin. The other is thick. The thick one has about 200 pages.
That's my favorite chair.
We're neighbours.
Everybody makes mistakes.
Russia has woken up.
Dick was involved in a traffic accident.
Not for school, but for life do we learn.
He drinks tea and listens to music.
She is very kind to us.
I don't think that's a good idea.
He is acting on his own behalf.
Don't give me a call.
Rain is forecast for this evening.
He came home very late.
Listen!
Do you have a dress in white?
There must be something wrong with the pen he is using.
Watch carefully.
He did not understand her joke.
We love beauty.
Don't forget your stuff.
I love watching birds.
The doctor saved me from certain death.
Green is my favourite colour.
After reading all of his stories, Christopher Columbus became one of my favorite heroes.
I hope he comes tomorrow.
I have but one wish.
Where did you find the key?
Did you call?
Did you call?
Did you call?
I often receive letters from him.
I often receive letters from her.
I say this from my own experience.
Carol often watches horror movies.
My grandmother went peacefully in the night.
A boy and a girl came in. I spoke to the boy, who seemed to be older than the girl.
Koko continued to learn fast.
The little boy was lost in the forest.
Sorry, but it looks like I'm booked up on that day.
He shook my hand.
She writes with her left hand.
She sang better than usual.
Show me another bag.
They are, as it were, victims of the war.
It's a nice idea.
It wasn't me who translated this text.
I want a sword!
You're only saving face!
I do not like science.
We named him Thomas after his grandfather.
I have no younger sister.
This is a flower?
It is said that prices are going to rise again.
I don't want to be used.
The Rhine is the boundary between France and Germany.
Trolling is an art.
I waited for fifteen minutes.
I waited for fifteen minutes.
Don't forget to pick me up at 6 o'clock tomorrow.
You don't want to go there.
This sentence doesn't exist.
Helen is playing in the garden.
The house had a stone wall around it.
I want a sword like this!
Let me give you some advice.
I succeeded in the work.
We are a family of five.
Don't leave me alone.
This is my business address.
Your new dress really looks good on you.
It's too late to turn back now.
This was a triumph!
You are not a good person. You know that, right?
They say that eating more slowly is one way to eat less.
I'm very busy today.
She pulled him out of the mud.
The river is deep here.
I was wearing my best clothes.
He kept singing.
His story was interesting.
I really like French cooking.
Please tell me what you think about this article.
He's got two cats, one white and one black.
Success in life calls for constant efforts.
Let me go with you.
Let me go with you.
We wanted the best, you know the rest.
I will help as much as I can.
I didn't go anywhere during the holiday.
The weather is forecast scientifically.
The dress is green.
The girl I went to the movies with is a friend of mine.
The noise kept me from sleeping last night.
Please sit.
I saw her home.
Are you free tomorrow afternoon?
I hope to marry her.
I want to marry her.
She suddenly became famous.
Don't treat me like a dog.
I think it's time for me to buy a new camera.
I can't walk fast, but I can walk for a long time.
I like blue.
I have recently given up smoking.
A king lived in an old castle.
My dog sometimes eats grass.
He lost his beloved son.
Santa Claus was standing in the garden.
What time does the first train leave?
She is the happiest in her class.
I've finished reading the book.
Scientists interpret it differently.
What does catachresis mean?
The work can wait.
It's true!
It is true that the earth is round.
She doesn't speak to me.
Did you read the whole book?
He has no hope of getting ahead.
We study music.
You should phone your mother as soon as you can.
The history of Rome is very interesting.
You may choose whichever you like.
I was looking at the dog, but, with another look, it had turned into a cat.
I hope you're having fun.
I like summer, but I can't stand the heat.
Trust me!
He repeated it again.
Prices rose higher and higher.
You are very early this morning.
I went to Kobe by train.
We don't like our neighbors, and they don't like us, either.
I have a lot of homework.
Sleep well, Timmy.
I'm almost done. Just give me a minute.
The flowers perished from the frost.
Guns don't kill people. People kill people.
Twenty people perished in the blaze.
Automobiles are made in factories.
At last, I completed my work.
It rained yesterday after it had been dry for a long time.
Ken is busy now, isn't he?
They say that he's very rich.
I planned to become a teacher, but I never did.
Where did you buy that dress?
My grandfather goes for a walk every day.
The car is blue.
This is impossible for me.
What seems simple to you seems complex to me.
He lives in the next town.
Do I have to study?
Please call me up between seven and eight.
The only thing that matters is whether or not you can do the job.
You're not busy, are you?
The things he says are not the least bit important.
The things he says are not the least bit important.
We go to the movies together once in a while.
Choose any one from among these.
Although he is rich, he is not happy.
Whoever calls, tell him I'm out.
I have nothing to say about that.
He always wears blue shirts.
Grandmother mows the grass in the garden.
Many fish died.
I noticed I was being observed.
There are many rivers on that island.
I have to go to the bank.
He is good at riding a horse.
How about your father?
I am deeply in debt to him.
Can you read phonetic signs?
I have no friends to whom I could speak about such matters.
She must have been rich.
Mike and Tom are in the same class.
I'm looking for a present for my mother.
I'm at the Libre Software Meeting to present the Tatoeba project.
You can easily find the bank.
Tom was the last person I expected to see there.
John grew up to be a great artist.
Don't rush into marriage.
This is the most interesting story that I have ever read.
It seems that I met you somewhere.
The tree fell down.
How old is your grandfather?
The car didn't move.
They are leaving Cairo today heading for Tel Aviv.
We can forgive, but forgetting is impossible.
Which team will win?
Don't smoke in this room.
I found it impossible to cross the road.
Did you see a bag here?
We all live on planet Earth.
At dinner time, don't speak with your mouth full.
What's your favorite season?
Could you tackle this?
In which language do you want to see names of animals?
In which language do you want to see names of animals?
Is there a thing of which it is said, ‘See, this is new’? It has already been, in the ages before us.
When did you hear the sound?
The population of China is 8 times that of Japan.
A woman whose husband is dead is called a widow.
They laughed at my idea.
Give it back!
Give it back!
There is a glass on the table.
There were no railroads at that time in Japan.
I wouldn't like to meet him in a dark place.
Why don't you want to come to the cinema with me?
Why don't you want to come to the cinema with me?
Queen Elizabeth died in 1603.
Believe it or not, she has three children.
I'll finish it in one hour.
Who is this lady?
He looked into the boy's eyes.
Don't leave the TV on.
Come into the room.
You shouldn't let people make use of you like that.
The king ruled over the island.
I gave the beggar what money I had.
This room does not get much sun.
Schools are closed.
They forced him to tell the truth.
We all want to be happy.
I can't tell you exactly how long it will take.
You can get to her house in a variety of different ways.
A great number of citizens went into the army.
You always called me from her house.
What's the price?
It's difficult to help people who don't want your help.
They elected John captain of their team.
I met a dog on my way home.
I don't know how he can speak without taking the cigarette out of his mouth.
He has a large number of books.
He doesn't need to get up so early.
It was already very late.
You have to see it to believe it.
He looks strong.
He said, 'May God help us!'
I must repay my debts.
I neither smoke nor drink.
Kyiv is the capital of Ukraine.
They were to meet here at seven.
He soon accustomed himself to cold weather.
I am against this project.
How did you meet her?
I am happy to have so many good friends.
I decided to try again.
I'll write or phone you next week.
Wait for me. I'll be back in no time.
What's the name of this river?
Would you like to go abroad?
Is he a teacher?
Welcome home!
Let's wait here.
I'll come when I have done my homework.
I hope it rains tomorrow.
Keep off the grass.
Stand aside, mortals.
Leaves are falling.
I’m falling.
You are watching.
He is falling.
Watch the forest!
Your sister has a sense of beauty.
It is truly said that time is money.
Small children are afraid of being left alone in the dark.
He was hanged for murder.
One should be considerate about things and considerate of people.
Tom has to go to court tomorrow.
My father smokes.
She left France for America.
It is impossible for me to finish this work in a day.
My grandfather was a soldier during the war.
At any rate, we have to finish this chapter before we can start on the next.
I'm sorry I've lost my watch.
I did the work against my will.
My attitude towards him changed.
Why is the sky blue?
She always gets up at six.
I've given you everything I had.
Thank you for the pleasant evening.
Phoenix is the capital of Arizona.
I promise that I'll be here tomorrow.
It's been raining all the time recently.
Please add my name to the list.
She likes to walk with me.
She couldn't come because she was busy.
What do you usually do after dinner?
What do you usually do after dinner?
Do you have a pen?
There are beautiful flowers in the garden.
It's nice to see you again.
Check it out!
There's no point telling me "Hi, how are you?" if you have nothing else to say.
She could feel her knees shaking.
You have to study harder.
I like how you sing.
You ought to ask him for advice.
I wrote to my teacher in English.
Tom doesn't get up early.
My father neither drinks nor smokes.
My father caught three fish yesterday.
Don't forget to call me.
There is a castle in the background of the picture.
My aunt lives in New York.
Welcome to Tatoeba!
Another step, and you would have fallen down the stairs.
How did you arrive at this conclusion?
There's more ways than one to kill a cat.
The man smells the milk.
It was fun playing in the park.
Many kinds of birds live in Japan.
Prices keep going up.
My watch is more accurate than yours.
I'm sure she loves me.
My house is close to the sea.
The population of Japan is larger than that of Canada.
My sister often cries.
Let me try it.
I meant to call her, but I forgot to.
He is trying to quit smoking.
Horses are animals.
Look behind you!
The price of coffee has come down.
I have just finished eating.
I translated the poem the best I could.
I wasn't able to go to his birthday party.
Tom is very capable.
Do you often travel abroad?
I made a serious mistake on the test.
She is poor, but happy.
You have three cats.
Take off your cap.
What would you like to drink?
She wrote a lot of poems.
What would you like to be when you grow up?
He banged on the table with his fist.
Tom was elated.
I can't stand the cold.
I am very happy in Georgia.
I am very happy in Georgia.
She's in a fairly bad mood now.
The teacher let the boy go home.
The girl was afraid of her own shadow.
The boy was afraid of the dark.
If you have nothing to say, keep your lips sealed.
Please wake up.
If only her husband helped her, most of her problems at home would disappear.
As he was tired, he was lying on the sofa with his eyes closed.
The price of meat dropped.
This is way better.
Add a little milk.
He has a heart of stone.
The teacher said that we are the future of the fatherland.
What happened to my bag?
She resembles her aunt.
The boy was lying on his stomach watching TV.
Ulaanbaatar is the capital of Mongolia.
As for me, I have nothing to say.
Whose room is this?
I woke up too late.
I don't study after school.
He drives very fast.
Our fate depends on your decisions.
This is good for me.
I don't go to school by bus.
Victory is ours.
He was a good king.
She went to the market to buy fresh vegetables.
What did she buy at the shop?
We rented an apartment when we lived in New York.
The king is dead, long live the king!
Is this the train for New York?
You'll soon get accustomed to your new college life.
This tire needs some air.
Choose a spokesperson for every group.
After 125 years of development it's clear: Esperanto is more than just a language.
You must gather further information.
Will you please call me this evening?
We've arrived pretty quickly, haven't we?
He has two cats.
I am making too many mistakes.
The medicine saved her life.
No matter how much you hurry your effort is just a drop in the bucket.
He wrote this book at the age of twenty.
Whose books are these? "They are Alice's."
He sat on the sofa with his arms folded.
He doesn't appear to be wise, does he?
A girl approached the king from among the crowd.
Yes, I'm coming immediately.
I'll be back within an hour.
He often travels to foreign countries.
He was invited to be the chairman of the club.
I did so for the sake of my health.
The driver asked me which way to go.
He's unconscious.
It happened completely by accident.
Many soldiers were killed in World War II.
I was a teacher.
He makes it a rule to get up at six every day.
She felt herself being lifted up.
The north wind blew all day.
I'm going to the theater on the corner.
You need not have got up so early.
I've heard the French version of this song.
I'm not sure when he'll come.
I never expected to meet her in a place like that.
Please bring me a clean knife.
This coffee is too strong for me.
Tom struck the wall with his fist.
I can not understand his ideas.
Eat your soup while it is hot.
These are simple sentences.
There are twenty four hours in a day.
Please give us some examples.
He tried to make his wife happy, but he couldn't.
He did the opposite.
He worked very hard.
She died in a plane crash.
After dinner, he usually sleeps.
Don't leave the windows open.
Don't leave the windows open.
He was regarded as a hero.
He is regarded as the best doctor in the village.
Have you called him yet?
It's summer all year round when I'm with you.
The old man caught a big fish.
Get ready! Tomorrow is the last day.
My mother permitted me to go to the movies.
He is a taxi driver.
The baby was sleeping soundly in his mother's arms.
It is clear that he is a great artist.
It is clear that he is a great artist.
She was crying with pain.
John is an American boy.
Prices will continue to rise.
Your idea cannot be brand new. I heard about it from another source last year.
Since she's been gone, I want no one to talk to me.
We talked seriously to one another.
Who do you want to talk to?
Who is he talking to?
At five I was already able to ski.
Math is her favorite subject in school.
Whose pens are these?
He resigned his post on account of illness.
We finally reached the top of Mt. Fuji.
Why don't we sit down and talk about it?
May I have something hot to drink?
This is my favourite project.
How much blood has the injured lost?
He came back two days later.
I must have lost it.
The disease began all of a sudden.
My father neither smokes nor drinks.
A stop sign in Japan has 3 sides, whereas a stop sign in the U.S. has 8 sides.
Regardless of the bad weather, I decided to go out.
I want to go abroad, for instance, to Italy and Spain.
I read about it in the paper.
She suddenly lost consciousness.
He regained consciousness and was able to talk.
His plan leaves much to be desired.
He has gone to the United States.
I hope that she listens to me.
How does your opinion differ from his?
I saw him a short time ago.
Our school begins at eight-thirty.
I'm sorry, I don't have a watch and I can't tell you the time.
He lay down on the grass.
I met one of my friends on my way home.
The little girl just kept crying.
I found no money left in my pocket.
The baby stopped crying.
Bear in mind that that school is an integrated junior high and high school.
Let's get together tomorrow.
What's your favorite flower?
Even though she is 38, she still depends on her parents.
I've kept you waiting for a long time. Please forgive me.
My house is near the church.
They named their daughter Helen.
It's impossible not to be fascinated by her beauty.
Strangely enough, I didn't feel any pain at all.
Strangely enough, I didn't feel any pain at all.
I must help her at any cost.
Tom is a student.
I need a crew.
This is a matter of taste.
What's the most important in life?
The music is too loud.
Tom became John's roommate.
Grandfather speaks very slowly.
Tom has proved that it works.
Tom fell and hurt his leg.
Tom doesn't look much like his father.
Birds have wings.
Can I telephone London from here?
I live on the fifth floor.
I'm scared of wild animals.
You were talking in your sleep last night.
Despite all his fame, he is not happy.
She didn't even try to help.
Could you call me tonight, please?
War concerns us all.
She set out for Thailand.
My grandmother is afraid to fall.
Tom had a little too much.
To speak frankly, I don't like your idea.
Tom wants everyone to get out of here.
It's all over.
He instantly denied it.
I'm too short.
Mother looked at me with tears in her eyes.
The wind blew too hard for them to play in the park.
A lot of boys are running in the park.
This story is worth reading.
I have ten pens.
I don't know whether to cry or to laugh.
Have a nice Thanksgiving!
It doesn't matter whether he comes late or not.
I cannot agree with you on this point.
I met your father just now.
After an absence of seven years, I went home.
My aunt is older than my mother.
Tom didn't know that song.
No matter what you say, I will never believe you.
Where is the police station?
She believed him when he said he loved her.
I have confidence in his abilities.
I don't believe the rumours. Do you believe them?
That's a stupid idea.
Give up that idea.
The bridge is being repainted.
Kids go to school to study.
Kids go to school to study.
I categorically refused.
The answers are all right.
It is difficult to convey the meaning exactly.
This word has a double meaning.
Most of the policemen lost their jobs.
I was born and grew up in Matsuyama.
How can I get to the station?
I intend to stay in Kyoto with my aunt.
Sit down, the place isn't taken.
Why did you buy flowers?
I am going shopping.
I can't sleep with all that noise.
I love you very much.
The lake is large and beautiful.
He's poor, but he has a good soul.
I am not busy.
Bill is a complete idiot.
I said that as a joke.
We like to learn foreign languages.
He answered me with a smile.
Please calm down.
My hobby is shopping.
Tom doesn't know which colour to choose.
My doctor told me to give up smoking.
I'm still busy.
He does not have any relatives at all.
We are going to the shop.
We are going to the market.
He lost his new watch.
She was now out of danger.
I wonder if she'll recognize me after so many years.
What's the teacher explaining?
Tom fell.
Each year many children are kidnapped by members of their own families.
He studied abroad.
Where can you get the best fresh bread?
Don't judge a man from the way he looks.
No matter which road you follow, the drive to town won't take you more than twenty minutes.
I'm afraid he will never admit his guilt.
My younger brother watches TV.
Call me tomorrow.
There is a large lake near our town.
Practically every family has a TV.
This rule does not apply.
It's unlikely that Tom will attend the meeting.
A man is as old as he feels and a woman as old as she looks.
May I look at the menu?
Cats have the ability to see in the dark.
The older we get, the weaker our memory becomes.
Do you have any ideas about it?
Tom applied for the job.
I can't stop thinking about that.
I'm quite sure.
I will return to the house before dark.
He is as healthy as ever.
Is his story true?
He will be back in a few days.
You need not do it at once.
Tom doesn't like eating fish.
I'm used to the noise.
He is always busy.
He reads novels every day.
The period is missing at the end of the sentence.
Listen to me carefully.
He has this large room to himself.
What wonderful weather!
I would lay down my life for you.
I hope everything's OK.
He told me how to get to the museum.
When's your birthday?
This novel is difficult to understand.
In which direction did he go?
My grandmother is sick.
This is a wooden house.
Tom saw himself in the mirror.
Where are your keys?
Will you go by train?
The girl resembles her mother very much.
I'm to the east of the west.
Will you give me her address?
Tom is full of hope.
She always looked happy.
The teacher sits on the chair.
This is longer than any other bridge in the world.
The Tsubasa is a very fast train.
Poets like Milton are rare.
I'm not all that drunk.
You're too drunk to drive.
That kind of thing can happen when you're in a hurry.
Only peace can save the world.
These women are my aunts.
My father is in good health.
The book is the best present.
He's getting married soon.
I got up today with a pain in my neck.
Isn't that an English book?
What's your favorite home-cooked food?
There is a tall tree in front of my house.
I'd like to see them again.
She asked him why he was crying.
We were to have met there at seven.
I'll support you as long as I live.
As a rule, she is an early riser.
Tatoeba has reached eight hundred thousand sentences!
Do you object to my idea?
This matter is of great importance.
The leaves fell from the trees.
You must pay attention to the teacher.
Man up!
He was in pain.
Does every boy have to learn cooking in your school?
You smiled and, just like that, I was happy.
I have lost my camera.
Her words have a deeper meaning.
The leaves fell to the earth.
I like fresh air.
I met him when I was a student.
Please call me.
She's about the same age as me.
I am well acquainted with the subject.
These books are worth reading at least once.
I am relieved that you are safe.
Unfortunately, that rumor is true.
I found the key I had been looking for.
She forced him to sit down.
She invited her friends to dinner.
Where do you think any problems might occur?
Tomorrow is her birthday.
He said that he had met her on the previous day.
It is said that she is rich.
That looks close.
Call me tomorrow.
Which do you like better, meat or fish?
My daughter has grown out of this suit.
I love summer rain.
Every problem has a solution.
I talk to myself all the time.
What train you are going to take?
I'm the same height as he is.
Tom was horrified.
You can call me at whatever time you want.
At that time nobody lived on the island.
Answer the telephone, will you?
My best friend always gives me good advice.
My joke went over very well.
How many people are there in this household?
He's about to finish reading the book.
What the newspaper said about the weather has certainly come true.
The price of books is getting higher these days.
She's better at it than I am.
The movie was good.
I ran all over town trying to borrow some money.
Ken kept on singing that song.
I want to sing a song.
Please send an ambulance.
That flower tried to attack me.
Twenty railroads were closed down.
I was very poor in those days.
Won't you have another glass of milk?
He wanted to be rich.
I am not busy now.
I am going to watch TV this evening.
I'm standing in the shade.
You look beautiful.
Our first lesson today is English.
How many classes do you have on Mondays?
Tom said that he didn't want to drive.
Why did you leave the class yesterday?
We hope for peace.
Tom is the captain of this baseball team.
I am not a bird, but I'd like to be.
How did you get in? Do you have a key?
She asked me to pick her up at the station.
The 9:35 train stops at Bambury.
The child began to cry as she woke to find herself left alone in the room.
But unfortunately, this will not happen very soon.
I listened but couldn't make out what they were saying.
He told me about the change in the plan.
Peter has decided to leave tomorrow.
We have got used to that noise.
She bought a book at the shop.
This is a beautiful flower.
We had a secret meeting.
I don't mind waiting.
This boy has a strong and healthy body.
I like horses.
He was very poor.
Thousands of people lost their jobs.
I'm confident that you'll succeed.
I asked her to call me at five o'clock.
My father is a teacher of English.
I could not catch as many fish as I had expected.
I can repeat it again and again.
France is in Western Europe.
Pass me the pen.
He doesn't want to talk to me now, and I don't know why.
Don't you think I know what people say about me?
Would you like to go see a movie with me?
Tom is a close relative of mine.
What are the lyrics to that song?
Spring arrived.
There is no scientific basis for these claims.
My sister jogs every day.
Do you know the name of this flower?
The red dress looked good on her.
He is the chief of a police station.
He is the chief of a police station.
Blue looks good on you.
Blue looks good on you.
Blue looks good on you.
There are people whose only purpose is to be as annoying as possible.
I've already finished reading this book.
He doesn't like to eat fish.
Gotta catch 'em all.
Without a doubt!
Tom certainly thinks he's clever.
Tom is a good neighbour.
It's about time you got married.
I believe it to be he.
It rests with you to decide whom to choose for the job.
The idea is still in my mind.
Tom is calm.
Live and learn.
He is second to none when it comes to finding fault with others.
He refused to take the bribe.
He refused to take the bribe.
The student came from London.
The dog is dead.
I can't believe you actually did something like that.
Come in.
I think you're the most beautiful girl I've ever seen.
It's not possible to study with so much noise!
On my way home from school I met her.
I had a sharp pain in my chest yesterday.
We had to wait a little while for a bus.
Keep to the left when driving.
I wonder what will happen.
I suddenly missed my watch.
I had hoped to meet her there.
It is true that the earth is round.
I woke up with a sore throat.
Stand up when I'm talking to you!
Some kinds of food make us thirsty.
The danger was not apparent.
Where do you want to sell this?
She’s accustomed to rising early.
Kumi is the girl whose father likes dogs.
Our summer is short, but warm.
Thank you for inviting me.
The king is dead, long live the king!
I read in the paper that he was murdered.
I’m too tired to run.
Do you have a pen?
She is beautiful like her mother.
We're getting nowhere with these problems.
Good morning, ladies and gentlemen!
Ladies and gentlemen, please sit down.
She said: "I'm very happy."
He was more than a king.
The child stopped crying and calmed down.
He has two adult sons.
He was made to do so.
We guarantee the lowest price for a French language school in Quebec, Canada.
My mother allowed me to go abroad.
I had a sharp pain in my chest yesterday.
The girl lifted her face, still wet with tears.
Hello. I'm Jarmila Kučerová. I'm glad to meet you.
Call me anytime.
How large is the population of New York City?
I think we should try again.
I called the police as soon as I saw his dead body on the floor.
This is a strange sentence.
I will get him to come and help me.
Kate was surprised when she saw that big dog.
He was killed in the war.
I know him by sight, but I have never actually spoken to him.
Houses were lined up alongside the highway.
What a good idea!
They believed they were in the majority.
Where is the bridge?
He suggested going out to watch a movie.
She was to drink the milk at school but drunk it at home.
Do you live in this area?
I am an English student.
She is strong enough to carry the suitcase.
I like the bright colours.
That is going too far.
Tom has been in prison for three years.
He has seen better days.
I gave the books to this student.
I like summer better than winter.
I met a friend there.
He is on the team.
She might have met him yesterday.
You can use my car if you drive carefully.
He's in a bad mood.
Tom will move out of his parents' house.
I met Fred on the street.
It's an extreme case.
She is always smoking.
I made some mistakes in the test.
Does this medicine work quickly?
I lent her my camera.
How was your stay?
It's difficult to have great ideas.
They carried out the project.
The kids are picking flowers in the garden.
I don't like spicy food.
Would you like meat or fish?
Even these words will someday disappear.
A river is a stream of water.
What does "Tatoeba" mean?
This is a hospital.
She made it plain that she wanted to go to college.
We'll leave without him.
We'll leave without him.
I won't talk with him anymore.
This didn't fit me very well.
One book is thin and the other is thick; the thick one has about 200 pages.
She was pleased to be treated as a guest.
You should learn from your mistakes.
It's a serious problem.
That is rather unexpected.
He kept a seat for me.
Have you been shot?
Sam owes what he is today to his father.
He succeeded in solving the problem.
You don't have to come here every day.
Tom stood on a chair so he could reach the top shelf.
I owe what I am today to Dr. Brown, who saved my life.
I dream to go and live in Lithuania.
I remember that I gave him the key.
I don't want to lie any more.
I may have seen that film before, but I can hardly remember it.
They clearly have something different in mind.
My brother is watching TV.
There are interesting examples in the Hopi language concerning onomatopoetic expressions.
I was raised in Yokohama.
Okay, okay, said the doctor. "I'll definitely take a look at her."
The bank isn't open on Sundays.
Kyoto is Japan's former capital.
What are you doing here? he asked me in surprise.
Tom can speak French almost as well as Mary can.
Don't tell him. He's got a loose tongue.
Most people think so.
He found it impossible to work any longer.
How it ended up here is impossible to know for sure.
I was the happiest man on earth.
The snow is falling fast.
You say I should know him quite well, but as a matter of fact, I was introduced to him only last week.
Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do.
You've been spotted.
I am happy.
How long does it take to get from here to the station?
He always leaves his work half done.
I refuse to be treated like a child.
The teacher cannot have said such a thing.
I'll buy a pen for him.
The wood is alive with birds.
My grandfather comes from Osaka.
Do you smoke?
Where is the nearest store?
Let's begin with Lesson 3.
That's all going to change.
I am not guilty!
Tom spent the night in jail.
I want to have a talk with him about my future.
If you have a minute, I'd like to talk to you about some problems.
There are lots of things I want to talk about.
Who is on the train?
When I visited my hometown this summer, I found the city different from what it had been ten years ago.
I'm a citizen of the world.
She wore a red dress.
The child was named Sophia after her grandmother.
We ran after the cat.
Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou lovest, and get thee into the land of Moriah; and offer him there for a burnt offering upon one of the mountains.
She was the last person I had expected to see there.
Welcome to the real world!
Having walked for some time, we came to the lake.
She didn't try to translate the letter.
I can't stand the noise.
Beer consists of 90% water.
He was silly enough to believe her.
He lives in a poor district of London.
Where did you get this beautiful dress?
Who would you like to speak to?
Whose is it?
The children were all ears when I was telling them the story.
Everything is upside down.
I gave him my address.
He is the best for this project.
The youngest daughter was particularly beautiful.
He doesn't smoke and he doesn't drink vodka.
She thinks about him all the time.
He has a black shirt.
I'm happy when I'm with you.
Put down your weapons!
She stood by him whenever he was in trouble.
There were a lot of murders last year.
I must save her at all costs.
You shouldn't depend on others too much.
I've wanted to meet him for a long time.
I had a bad headache. That's why I went to bed early.
Don't keep me in suspense!
Do you know how to get to our place?
I am constantly forgetting names.
Nobody noticed my absence?
My grandmother is still vigorous at 82 years old.
Tom plans to call you right after lunch.
When was the last time we met?
Would you tell the head chef that it was very delicious?
His ideas are up to date.
She resembles her father in character.
He kept us waiting for a long time.
I'm under the impression that it's been raining all day.
Ask him if he will attend the meeting.
He hasn't forgotten these rules.
His proposal is not worth talking about.
I hope to see you again next year.
War began five years later.
No one can turn the clock back.
He stayed at his aunt's house.
You need to disappear before they find you.
The communication recently has been lost with the team.
Faint footprints in the dust lead off to the east.
Communications are down.
The girl talked to trees.
I met him on my way home.
What is this thing called?
When angry, count to ten.
He is full of energy.
What's your favorite horror movie?
He should have finished his work by now.
Tom may do whatever he likes with what I gave him.
Driving along the coast is wonderful.
He left me with his favorite book and moved to Osaka.
She came in with tears in her eyes.
Tom fell down the stairs.
She asked him why he was crying, but he didn't answer.
I wish I could give up smoking.
Stars can be seen at night.
Why do you want to study abroad?
His proposal is not worth talking about.
My mother is reading a magazine.
What a fool he is to leave school.
She works for a hospital.
I get up at six in the morning.
As we go up higher, the air becomes cooler.
I graduated from university last year.
The only thing that matters is that you are safe.
He seems to be a kind person.
He seems to be afraid of being laughed at if he makes a mistake.
Unless you make a decision quickly, the opportunity will be lost.
The car is blue.
The lion eats the meat.
His story was published in a magazine.
He isn't a history major.
What is the relationship between politics and war?
We had to show our papers at the security desk.
He returned home after being away for ten months.
My uncle comes back from America next Monday.
We made a huge mistake.
I want to see you again.
I'd like some more butter.
Just wait for me there.
Everyone in the city appears to be constantly on the go.
If I were a brain in a vat, I wouldn't write this.
Man is the only animal that talks.
Tom can't think of a better plan.
He lost all of his money.
We'll die sooner or later.
You never listen to our advice.
Your brother said you'd gone to Paris.
Sit down, please, he said.
Both of the brothers are dead.
I'm not sure right now.
It looks like winter is here to stay.
Where's my car?
So which way is it to the People's Park?
There was no one in the shop to wait on me.
At last, he realized his error.
Is there any way to an unperturbed mind?
My impression of America is very good.
We go abroad every summer.
She failed every time she tried.
Tom didn't think you would like the idea.
We are walking in the park.
Tom couldn't see the lake from where he was standing.
I flew from London to New York.
Hard work is the price of success.
He decided to have the operation.
I would like to marry somebody like her.
Tom felt guilty.
She asked him for some money to buy a new dress.
We have to call the police.
Don't believe her because she always lies.
They love that song.
Let's get to the point.
They have been in my employ for five years.
He took a look at the newspaper before going to bed.
I suggest we go out for a drink.
My father has been in good shape since his operation.
All right. I'll accept your offer.
Can you forgive me?
This magazine is widely read.
It's impossible to study in such noise.
He has an interesting book.
Please repeat after me.
I bet he arrives late - he always does.
This church dates from the 12th century.
I will finish my homework by nine.
The work will come easy with a little practice.
They'd like to be healthy.
He doesn't look very healthy.
My parents are healthy.
Is this a good place to plant a tree?
It's hard.
I have known her since she was a child.
Why is the baby crying?
This book is surprisingly easy to read, isn't it?
Put your hands down.
Few people were killed in the car accident.
When I grow up, I want to be king.
You need not have come here so early.
See if my answer is correct.
The telephone is ringing, but nobody is answering.
What do you want to drink?
I'm bleeding badly.
He doesn't like the heat of the summer.
I was very busy last week.
I'd like to watch TV.
I intend seeing the queen.
A wood floor is beautiful.
I was moved to tears.
There is no hope of success.
We walked for two hours.
He still has no experience for this job.
There is no hope of success.
Let me introduce you to my parents.
The company accepted his application.
I was cool as a cucumber.
The level of water in the river has risen.
I suggest you put that weapon down.
I don't want to watch television this evening.
She accepted his gift.
My behaviour was very strange.
There was nobody in the garden.
I can not stand that kind of silly music.
The mammal is dead.
How do you make a box?
He could always tell which direction the wind was blowing.
Nobody believed what I said.
They failed to get any definite information.
Have you lost weight?
The wind gradually died down.
I love him despite his faults.
I was accustomed to heat.
I'm so tired that I'm going to bed as soon as I get home.
You don't have to answer these questions.
Spring comes after winter.
My grandmother has become old.
You girls look amazing!
How much is this dress?
There was nobody in the garden.
He did not get up early.
Scientists haven't found a cure for cancer yet.
Why did her father go to Japan?
Take as many peaches as you want.
Dry wood burns quickly.
Dry wood burns well.
You have made the same mistake.
The sky is clear.
Tom didn't want to go, but his father made him go.
It doesn't matter where you go, we still won't be able to find you.
I have two English books.
He probably won't come.
I admit my mistake.
We're going to the cinema. Come with us.
They all objected to his proposal.
They sent my suitcase to London by mistake.
Tom has been teaching us French.
Maybe they're happy.
She decided on a blue dress.
I am happy with my girlfriend.
I speak from experience.
They all objected to his proposal.
Why do you want such an old car?
Butter is soft.
Bread and milk are good foods.
Don't disturb me.
She is amusing to be with.
Is this bag yours or his?
You don't have to stay in the hospital.
He was sharpening a knife.
He looks very worried.
The teacher stood before the class.
I want to go abroad, for instance, to Italy and Spain.
We are all accustomed to working late at night.
He promised he would tell us.
He promised he would tell us.
We often hear you sing.
I'm a big fan of American cooking.
If you permit me to speak, I can explain everything.
There are many endangered species.
The most important feature of all games is that they are governed by rules.
I decided not to go to Europe.
Everybody laughed at his error.
It's fall now.
How about me stopping by?
This sentence is going to be translated.
I can't forgive him for what he did.
Is this the key you're looking for?
Thanks for the information.
I'd like to speak to John Warner.
He appeared unexpectedly after three years of absence.
What is the meaning of this phrase?
Look! That shop's just opened! Why not take a look?
He has a camera.
I am certain that he will quit his job.
Once upon a time lived a king who had three daughters.
Laughter is the best medicine.
A cat has two ears.
That all you've got?
Over my dead body!
Is this some sort of joke?
I have quit smoking and drinking.
Is this information correct?
Birds have sharp vision.
How many times do I have to repeat that she isn't my friend?
Your role here is so important.
This is a dangerous thing.
Okay. Sorry.
I don't want to talk to you.
We'll use energy sources such as the sun and wind.
What a beautiful garden!
The itching appeared several hours after a meal.
I don't have any more ideas.
You're hurting him.
The old man stopped suddenly and looked back.
Tom is the captain of the football team.
It'll take two hours to get there by bus.
The old man sat in the chair with his eyes closed.
What do you think of the new teacher?
His son disappeared seven years ago.
There is no room for doubt.
Which subject do you like best?
What's your favorite subject?
And we know the government can't solve every problem.
My sides ache, doctor.
I met Ken yesterday.
I was to have finished the work yesterday.
He accepted our offer.
Our cat is in the kitchen.
Truth prevails.
Smoking is strictly forbidden here.
Tom only eats lean meats and vegetables.
My father is coming home tomorrow.
I would like to get a camera like this.
He likes the most beautiful flower.
Words cannot express it.
Where is my red pen?
I hope he will come up with a new and good idea.
I can't drink any more.
He got us nice seats.
She refused to accept the money.
She is appearing on TV tonight.
I want you to meet my parents.
He is an army officer.
It was a great victory for Jackson.
Something you should know about me is that I sleep late in the morning.
How did you come to know one another?
He was put in a cell.
I can do without this.
She walked in the woods.
It is possible that he may know the fact.
His words moved her to tears.
This fish is big.
This fish is big.
Who is calling, please?
I'm going to Hawaii by ship.
I'm going to Hawaii by ship.
I like her novel.
Suddenly, it started to rain.
I don't care for flowers very much.
I will go to Australia by train.
Could you hand me the newspaper on the table?
I promised not to tell him.
I had hoped to finish it yesterday.
Listen, I think that you are barking up the wrong tree here.
Many pupils bought the book.
Pass me the wine, please.
Don't leave me behind!
I believe that you will succeed.
You must pay off your debts.
We detected a great fault in the system.
You had better wait until the police come.
When his daughter was born, he had already been living in Nagano for seven years.
Please come in.
A hot bath and then bed.
Choose the right word!
He set out on his historic voyage.
This was Rodica's fifth book.
We're all happy.
Do you have a larger size?
The politician attempted a difficult task.
This pen belongs to me.
He wore red pants.
The dog has various facial expressions.
Not every horse can run fast.
Would you like to travel abroad?
The snow was several meters deep.
Her voice is pleasant to listen to.
She was born and brought up on the backstreets.
I like spring the best of the seasons.
In spring everything looks bright.
She is getting better by slow degrees.
The students could not answer.
She translated the letter from Japanese into French.
You arrived too early.
She should be there now because she left early.
You look very good.
My friend and I often go to the movies.
If you cannot work out the problem, you had better try a different method.
How do you figure out this problem?
They have both failed to find the most serious problem that has ever faced our planet.
That child stared at me, his mouth agape.
New York is accessible by train from Washington.
He could not believe his ears.
Look! There's a bird in that tree.
I have recently seen James.
If there are two in a room and three go out, one must go in, so that none is in the room.
She took the pen and wrote the address.
Every time I went to his house, he was not at home.
The police will put you behind bars for twenty years.
The ground rocked.
Then, she lost consciousness.
He often sits by me and listens to music.
He talks as if he were an old man.
Poets write poems.
Politics is the art of making possible that which is necessary.
I could feel nothing but the knife as it plunged into my back.
My old friend dropped in at my house.
I think it's the best way.
Tom can't always get what he wants.
She always forgets my telephone number.
She gave him something to drink.
She's not confident about the future.
You don't have to do that.
The small dog crossed the road.
I can't find my glasses. I may have left them behind on the train.
Her life is in danger.
Whatever you say, she is the one I'm going to marry.
Why would you marry a woman if you like men?
Mike always remains calm.
I'll come to pick it up later.
I hope Tom doesn't read this.
The teacher took part in the children's games.
You ought to have done the homework.
It so happened that I had no money with me.
This is off-topic. Sorry.
I met the president himself.
I will call you tomorrow.
As for you, I don't know, but for me it's really very important.
I'll expect you next week.
When did you go to Kyoto with your sister?
Playing cards is very interesting.
Tom has already gone to bed.
He has nothing to do with it.
Stop acting like a child.
Do you watch TV?
I wouldn't sell that at any price.
Many things have changed in the last five years.
This is beyond the compass of my ability.
It's a bit strange as far as I'm concerned.
I have doubts about his career.
I've got nothing to lose.
His car is small and takes up little room.
They built bigger and better ships.
He was acquainted with everybody in town.
You know, you made me cry.
You look younger.
I must translate the sentences.
You look younger.
Actually, I've seen this movie before.
All the seats are occupied.
Leave us alone.
Didn't you see my birds?
That red dress looks good on her.
The hell with physics!
He was sentenced to three years in jail.
The police found no signs of foul play in the apartment.
She says she likes flowers.
I have good eyes.
Tom had no idea what to do.
You look like you've just lost your best friend.
Tom is a bit busy, so he can't help you today.
You are holding my hand in that picture.
The most dangerous beast is the beast within.
Tom decided to wait for another hour.
This photograph reminds me of my childhood.
Please step back.
Children are sometimes afraid of the dark.
Language and culture can't be separated.
What did you do with my pants?
Lincoln's parents remained poor all their lives.
As for incomplete sentences...
It is possible for him to do the job.
Tom ran to catch the train.
Bring me the key.
He remains calm in the face of danger.
After I had finished the job, I went to bed.
This is how I cook fish.
From here, one can view Mt. Fuji.
I'll give you a present.
Tom is a little over thirty.
Happy Thanksgiving Day.
They made us work all day.
Tallinn is the capital of Estonia.
I'm sure she will return soon.
Tom doesn't drink coffee, but he smokes cigarettes.
I think I'd like to marry her.
See you at seven tomorrow.
No matter how busy you are, you have to do your homework.
I think his opinion is very important.
She was able to solve the problem in ten minutes.
While John was reading his newspaper, his wife was watching TV.
I forgot my purse in the church.
My boyfriend never leaves the flat without cigarettes.
Few students could understand what he said.
She studied Japanese after dinner.
They live on the floor above.
I'm sorry I kept you waiting.
The president appointed each man to the post.
He belongs to a large family.
He came at me with a knife in his hand.
He died at the age of 70.
He was poor and could not buy it.
He ran at full speed.
Never forget that you owe what you are to your parents.
Are you referring to me?
I've been looking forward to meeting you.
I don't have a TV at my place.
I wanted to be a bus driver when I was five.
Deposit your money in the bank.
It was a good and interesting night.
He is as old as my father.
English words are often borrowed by other languages.
He regained consciousness in the hospital.
I've heard it said that you should never marry your first love.
His mind had lost its sharpness.
Asked about her job, she said, "My job is too complicated to sum up in a word."
Just follow your heart.
Can you describe the situation you were in?
I'd like to write hundreds of sentences on Tatoeba, but I have other things to do.
It is important for old people to stay strong.
He thinks that blue is the most beautiful colour.
Basically, you're absolutely right.
I'm glad to have this opportunity to work with you.
Mexico is a country located in North America.
He’s shivering because of the cold.
George accompanied me home.
I'm a student in a university.
Searching for the truth is easy. Accepting the truth is hard.
She wants to work at the hospital.
Is she healthy?
Is it harder to forgive or to forget?
She was kind to me.
Love comes in all shapes and sizes.
Where there's a will, there's a way.
Only through fire is a strong sword forged.
Monday begins on Saturday.
His advice didn't help at all.
You should pay attention to what he says.
At last, we reached the summit.
A beautiful lake lay just beyond the forest.
Stop beating around the bush and tell me what happened.
Size doesn't matter.
How much does this sofa cost?
I'm not rich enough to buy that.
He was looking for something in the dark.
Tom doesn't like that kind of music.
He goes to school by bus.
He tried again and again, but didn't succeed.
The crew is large.
The prices fell suddenly.
I'm too busy to help him.
Talk to me!
Talk to me!
We won't forgive you.
The capital city of Serbia is Belgrade.
It is impossible to be always a hero, but you can always remain a man.
Where can I speak with you?
He is now almost as tall as his father.
I've got to get out of here.
Children are full of energy.
Turn left.
Are you content?
I have no friend to talk with.
I'll call on you one of these days.
She turned her back to me.
Education is the key to success.
We're students.
We'll get them to talk no matter what it takes.
Helsinki is the capital of Finland.
Everything matters.
He usually comes home late.
Do you have guests for dinner?
That village has changed a lot from how it was 10 years ago.
My name is Hopkins.
He is capable of doing such a thing.
We must always try to help others.
He sings well.
I think you went too far.
That's a bad sign.
What did you say? Could you please say it again?
Ken took the wrong bus by mistake.
Hear what I have to say.
How many hours a day do you spend in your office?
It was only after years that my mother told me the truth.
I love watching TV.
Tom has to go to bed early tonight.
The leaves have all fallen.
Please take me away from here!
You have only to believe him.
Why did you buy flowers?
How many students are there in your class?
Sit down.
I'll telephone you every night.
He looked as if he hadn't eaten for days.
I don't have the address now.
They are my grandfather's books.
I think it's time for me to abandon that idea.
My mother looks young for her age.
This hotel was built last year.
He is accustomed to hard work.
He came by car instead of by train.
It's the highest building in this city.
He tried solving the problem.
Everyone's lying.
She was well-dressed.
Guess what he told me.
Bill doesn't like the fact that his father smokes a lot.
There's a phone call for you!
She spoke to him about the matter.
After I graduated from college, I got a job with my father's company.
We shouldn't leave the matter unsettled.
It concerns all the people living there.
Jack collects stamps.
Forgive me, my love.
I saw your brother the other day.
I watched TV yesterday.
Why don't you wear summer clothes?
I am to blame.
He drank a beer.
I'm just curious.
Which film did you see?
Many consider seven to be a lucky number.
Hello, said Tom, smiling.
Seriously?
We had to abandon our plan.
Do you like to study?
He neither smokes nor drinks.
Next time, you won't be so lucky.
You never know where you will be lucky.
The tea is hot.
I'm used to working all night.
Statistics indicate that our living standards have risen.
It's getting late. I don't wanna go home alone.
Are you being serious?
I met him on my way from school.
This song is known to everyone.
How about going to the movie?
I wonder why he was absent.
She became a mother when she was fifteen years old.
I'd like a cup of tea.
They invited me to play cards.
She grabbed my hand.
She's lost her car keys.
Do you know how to cook fish?
There's nothing left to lose.
They killed time playing cards.
Joseph can say "I love you" in fifteen languages.
They are talking in the kitchen.
Do you really want to put your life in her hands?
You did not need to come so early.
Happiness and success in life do not depend on our circumstances, but on our efforts.
My clothes are there.
How's your little sister?
He said he would give a helping hand to them.
I'm very busy this week.
Are you pointing at me?
Did you enjoy it?
I am the leader of this team.
Let the bird fly away.
This book is available at one shop only.
I have not read all the books.
How old this book is!
Do you have a map?
I'm in the garden.
Let us hope for the best.
Don't lose heart!
I don't feel like celebrating.
He is generous with his money.
I'll show you that I am right.
The baby is crying.
He is captain of the football team.
She screamed when she saw the snake.
My car is German.
I have no idea who she is.
I want to know your opinion.
I wonder what language they speak in Brazil.
Tom says he did not mean to kill her.
She treated him very well.
Don't mind him.
Tom drank too much.
Cats are nocturnal creatures.
When I was a boy, I thought that I wanted to be a doctor.
Our guests should be here within an hour.
She slowly closed her eyes.
I remember seeing you last year.
It's my duty to help you.
Look back.
I watched TV last night.
The number of murders is increasing even in a country like Japan.
Have you met her?
My brother always gets up earlier than I.
Do you like French wines?
That's your duty.
He died recently.
The man lost all hope.
I'm glad you enjoyed it.
He parked his car behind the building.
I returned to my hometown after five years' absence.
I am sure of success.
He began to run.
Do you hear the birds singing?
I don't know whether to accept or refuse.
I received my birthday present.
If I had known her address, I would have written to her.
It's up to you to decide whether or not to go.
I have no idea of what to do.
I don't remember how to do this.
Yesterday I met Christina.
Fifteen more minutes and I'll be out of here.
Is it cheaper to call after nine?
You have neither written, nor phoned.
I owe my success to him.
She told the story with tears in her eyes.
I met her in the winter several years ago.
But where do we get those sentences? And how do we translate them?
She had nothing to say about it.
Tom can't remember where he bought his pink socks.
Kids grow up so fast.
Good morning. It's time to get up.
He is very busy now.
This car is easy to handle.
She asked him if he was happy.
Any book will do as long as it is interesting.
Romeo, believing that Juliet was dead, decided to kill himself.
Give me another chance to try.
How about next Saturday?
He gladly accepted our offer.
He went to the post office to mail the letter.
You picked the wrong person.
What time did you go to bed yesterday?
If I should fail, I would try again.
He is old enough to understand it.
I always got up early in my childhood.
Don't tell him that, or he'll start crying.
Do you know whose car that is?
Don't come in.
Our son was killed in the war.
He made her happy.
He is fed up with my problems.
He got out a book and began to read it.
Give examples.
I regret going there.
You can smoke here.
What a pretty flower.
It was nice to converse with her.
At last, they reached the top of the mountain.
As soon as they return, I will telephone you.
This train is made up of seven cars.
Let Tom decide what you need to do.
The first thing you hear when arriving in Vegas is the ching ching ching of the slot machines.
I'm beginning to understand why you don't bother to try to explain things to Tom.
I'm looking for a gift for my wife.
I said "good night" to my parents and went to bed.
I took that picture a week ago.
He's a journalist.
There are many tall buildings downtown.
This book costs 4 dollars.
Please give me a glass of milk.
Don't rush yourself.
I was at the theater.
He has no capacity to be a teacher.
Really?
You can read this book.
She has no sense of beauty.
I don't like being treated like a child.
I am just dreaming.
Everything went smoothly.
He reminds me of my grandfather.
Cats are social animals.
It's never too late.
She is my daughter.
He smiled at me and got on the train.
Tom isn't a smoker.
Where the hell is Tom?
I have already done my homework.
He was named after his grandfather.
He left for London yesterday.
Did you ring him yesterday?
Do you think he'll come? "I hope not."
She shrugged her shoulders.
It is our duty to help one another.
I'm always very nervous.
The world belongs to the violent.
Do you mind if I watch TV for a while?
The room is spacious and light.
She has been hospitalized for 2 months already.
I am convinced that things will change for the better.
They could not tell whether he was dead or alive.
Let go of my arm.
Give me half.
In the name of mercy, stop crying.
They all laughed at his jokes.
Aren't you the one who's always saying we should spend more time together?
My father quit smoking.
He was very busy all day.
When I grow up I want to be just like you.
Don't let him know her address.
He is a scientist.
What is that thing in your right hand?
He has something of the artist in him.
This is a step in the right direction.
He is thirty years old.
Have you met him?
I couldn't come to your birthday party.
I can run faster than Ken.
My grandfather always sits in this chair.
We are breathing pure air.
I'll help you as long as I live.
When and where did you come to know her?
I don't want to go anywhere.
I'll try again.
The policeman caught him by the arm.
With whom did you talk?
Send this by airmail.
Man is a social animal by nature.
They say he's the richest person in the city.
Not everybody wants to be an artist.
We should try to understand one another.
Tom has made a lot of mistakes.
That's self-evident.
No matter where you may go, don't forget to write to me.
Nobody knows why he left the town.
Man is 70% water.
Be careful what you say!
She asked how to cook the fish.
That applies to him too.
I didn't understand this joke.
Don't fall off!
Do you want a drink?
It smells delicious.
Could you repeat the question?
I'm feeling guilty.
How about Friday?
Tom thinks you'll enjoy this.
Wait your turn.
I caught three fish yesterday.
I know his address.
It took me three days to read this book.
Be careful not to fall.
I wish you a Happy New Year.
He is rich and I am poor.
She looks very happy.
How would you translate this sentence?
You can smoke in this room.
I don't know why he's crying.
He was so poor that he could not buy the bread.
He has already finished his work.
She kept on crying.
He does nothing but cry.
She arrived in a car.
Either you or I must attend the meeting.
Tom died at the age of 97.
I've always wanted to meet you.
Take my advice!
It's an extreme case.
Whose glasses are these?
We will explore every planet that goes around the sun.
Please say hello to him for me.
All were satisfied.
Can this wait until tomorrow?
She is constantly writing letters.
You should not give up hope.
My father goes to church on Sunday.
This job is killing me.
Put your hands down.
Tom died in strange circumstances.
My father won't allow me to keep a dog.
My father won't allow me to keep a dog.
He went there on business.
Tom is a smoker.
Long live the Queen!
Don't call me again.
Don't call me again.
Health is worth more than gold.
It's not his idea, it's mine.
I can understand your point of view.
Of course.
We must finish this work at any cost.
Is that important?
My father doesn't like music.
I'm getting married.
John has a ready tongue.
I'll call for you at six.
The earth is round.
This sentence hasn't yet been translated.
We are longing for world peace.
You're on the right track.
Do you have enough energy?
I forgot the key and went back for it.
I have to make a call.
I'm tone deaf.
Send it to me.
I owe my success to his help.
Fool!
I won't go anywhere without you.
Forgive me!
It's time to get around to getting up and go to buy a drink.
How fast is that train going?
How fast does this train run?
Pickpockets may operate in this area.
I went to Italy for the second time in 1980.
I think I've lost my ticket.
It's a quarter to three.
I couldn't understand his joke.
She met him three years ago.
I was about to leave when you telephoned.
This was his one and only hope.
I'm waiting for a train.
Throughout Europe, people withdrew their money from banks.
He is not such a fool as you assumed him to be.
He won't leave us alone.
I would like to hear your opinion.
At best he may take third place.
He cried and cried.
My father works at the factory.
Give me an example.
Tom didn't take part in our conversation.
If you can read this sentence, then you're able to read.
I admit my mistake.
All the boxes are empty.
I experimented on animals.
I can't remember how to use this machine.
My father recently quit smoking.
This song always reminds me of my childhood.
You must put an end to this foolish behavior.
You know this old lady that lives on second floor?
You know this old lady that lives on second floor?
He earns three times more than I do.
He earns three times more than me.
You don't get up as early as your sister, do you?
You are stupid.
What's this called?
I sold a book.
She took no notice of what her father said.
My father helped me with my homework.
I'm sorry, but it's impossible.
I often make mistakes.
This is the first time for me to eat here.
I phone him every day.
Paris is the capital of France.
There are a million people in Auckland.
Auckland has a population of a million.
Let me reiterate what I've said.
His identity must be kept secret.
Everybody was singing except me.
She sings well.
What a fool he is!
You're so beautiful in that dress.
You never know what you can do till you try.
I feel like having a drink.
However much advice we give him, he still does exactly what he wants.
Have I kept you waiting?
He believes in Santa Claus.
See you at seven tomorrow.
The bakery is located next to the butcher shop.
He speaks in his sleep.
Just finished it.
How many sentences can I add in 16 minutes, I wonder... Let's try and see!
Reveal your secret!
A Persian cat was sleeping under the table.
He likes music a lot.
Wade lifts heavier weights than that.
May I offer you a glass?
If you love Tatoeba, then marry it!
If you love Tatoeba, then marry it!
I'm not a specialist.
Fear not because there is nothing to fear.
I often go to the movies.
She killed him with a knife.
He's lying.
I'm watching a movie.
That you have come early is a good thing.
A great number of people were killed in a moment.
The last card is mine.
How else can he act?
Either go out or come in.
Is the cat on or under the chair?
Please give my best to the entire family.
She hit him again and again.
There was a large crowd there.
Losing one's health is worse than losing money.
My daughter went to school.
My daughter went to school.
I'm planning to study tonight.
Don't treat me like a dog.
Don't let him fall.
Don't let him fall.
Dozens of letters are awaiting you.
No! Did he really say that? You can't be serious!
What kind of movies does Tom like?
She wished for a more relaxing life, but that was impossible under the circumstances.
Our class consists of thirty students.
My mother appears young for her age.
He left the country to study.
On my way to school each day, I generally see many dogs and cats.
On my way to school each day, I generally see many dogs and cats.
She tried it herself.
She tried it herself.
When was the last time you smoked a cigarette?
That word is very difficult to translate.
Human history is in essence a history of ideas.
This girl is always smiling, but she's not happy.
This girl is always smiling, but she's not happy.
For the first time in her life, Yuka has finished reading an English book.
For the first time in her life, Yuka has finished reading an English book.
For the first time in her life, Yuka has finished reading an English book.
For the first time in her life, Yuka has finished reading an English book.
This year we offer the same language course as last year.
I am not going anywhere on Sunday.
My uncle is possessed of great wealth.
I went to school by train.
Somehow you must find a way to finish this work in one month.
You're not obligated to answer that question.
Are you satisfied or dissatisfied?
It's difficult for me to solve this problem.
The teacher permitted the boy to go home.
Live and learn.
I can't speak that fast.
He had the fortune to find a job.
I will never make such a mistake again.
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
When was the last time you took the subway?
Don't forget!
Don't forget!
Show me where Puerto Rico is on the map.
I have nothing to add.
Your opinion is very important to us.
Everyone wants to know you; you're famous.
Everyone wants to know you; you're famous.
Eat more fresh vegetables.
Eat more fresh vegetables.
The next day Jesus decided to leave for Galilee.
I'm currently working at the school as a teacher.
My brother is rich.
I want to cry.
The world outside is very scary.
Graham Greene is my favourite writer.
Do you talk to your dog?
I found this restaurant by chance.
John goes to the market.
A police officer told me to stop the car.
Those who forget everything are happy.
The boy looked into the room.
Call up is a phrase that means to telephone.
Are you always busy?
I want something to drink.
It is you who are to blame.
Write your address here.
He may have taken the wrong train.
Of course I'll wait.
This is your own fault.
Experience is the best teacher.
Your behavior leaves much to be desired.
What's your proposal?
Calm down and begin at the beginning.
I love American food.
I sat back in the armchair and opened the book.
Oh, I have a good idea.
Oh, I have a good idea.
She spends time with her grandmother every Sunday.
Actions speak louder than words.
Children will believe what their parents tell them.
We watched TV after lunch.
We have five classes every day except Saturday.
Jim will accept your proposal.
It happened quite recently.
I'm busy with work.
The cat slept on the table.
This whisky is very strong.
He is always full of ideas.
I saw the movie.
I found this book interesting.
Is it far from here?
She laid the magazine on the table.
In those days, he was still strong and energetic.
I am a teacher. "So am I."
I used to smoke a lot, but I have given up smoking now.
Do you eat meat?
Do you eat meat?
This is the village where I spent my childhood.
This is the village where I spent my childhood.
We're the same age.
Do fish sleep?
Don't you have a pen?
She met her uncle at the shop.
The love of liberty brought us here.
The world is more dangerous than I thought.
A pill for every ill.
Could you help us translate this text?
I'm sorry I cannot go with you.
I'm sorry I cannot go with you.
I'm sorry I cannot go with you.
I'm sorry I cannot go with you.
I don't want to see him at all.
I don't want to see him at all.
I don't want to see him at all.
The bird sang in the tree.
I promise.
I see no reason why I shouldn't accept her offer.
He bought a car.
When I hear that song, I think about the place where I grew up.
He always wears dark glasses.
Choose a dress you like.
I can't believe that you actually got into Harvard.
This soup smacks of fish.
You have no taste.
I want you to sing a song.
Tom doesn't think it's such a big problem.
I received a letter three months later.
I have a very important meeting.
To my regret I cannot accept your invitation.
He is known as a great poet.
Tell me the reason why they are absent.
Tell me the reason why they are absent.
What is that big building in front of us?
Tom never used to smoke, but he does now.
I'm here to save you.
We're in no danger now.
He married Ann.
The woman is naked.
My cat likes to look through the window.
I see you've never slept with a cat.
I met her at church.
I am so busy that I can't help you.
He owes much of his success to his wife.
She has hundreds of books.
Give him a piece of advice.
We are not adding examples in Chinese.
This is the pen that I lost yesterday.
This is the pen that I lost yesterday.
It was a little too muggy for spring.
We can add milk to this coffee.
Be happy!
Be happy!
Be happy!
You'll get a lot of presents on your birthday.
There are sentences which everybody knows.
There are sentences which everybody knows.
He helped me to get changed.
The reason for my absence is that I was ill.
The teacher reads the book.
Who helps her?
My eldest son is studying right now.
My eldest son is studying right now.
Tom doesn't like studying.
At first, he thought English very difficult, but now he thinks it is easy.
This is my horse.
Turn toward me, please.
Try it again.
Try it again.
I can't apply my mind to anything with all that noise!
The death of the king brought about a war.
I often think about the place where I met you.
I think it's time for me to close the window.
He's out of town on business.
Moscow is the capital of Russia.
I have a special relationship with my aunt.
I wrote many sentences in Esperanto.
The capital of France is Paris.
We have almost finished our work.
How was the food?
Did you like the meal?
Don't smoke in the toilet.
Don't forget to mail the letter.
She saw me enter the store.
Don't smoke in the toilet.
What made you come here so early?
The important thing is not to win but to take part.
Tom hasn't changed.
He gave up smoking two years ago.
For whom did you give the keys of the house?
The sentence "This sentence is grammatically correct." is grammatically correct.
The police found a dead body in an abandoned car near the park.
She came home very late.
Are you sure of your answer?
My mother is seriously ill.
Are you sure you don't want to go with us?
That book is worth reading.
Leave him alone.
I sold all my houses.
Mr. Hirayama is a very good teacher.
Can I speak with you?
That which does not kill us makes us stronger.
I regret that I can't see you tonight.
I regret that I can't see you tonight.
I don't know the word 'impossible'.
I would like to see your mother.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
Do you happen to know what time it is?
Do you happen to know what time it is?
Do you happen to know what time it is?
It is said that her father was killed in a traffic accident.
It is said that her father was killed in a traffic accident.
Maybe she will not come.
It is time to get up.
We're sorry we weren't able to help you.
I remember meeting him in Paris.
I'm absolutely sure!
Do you remember the first name of your grandmother? - No, I just always called her granny.
You can read ten books in a week? Don't you mean in a month?
She did the right thing.
I have no doubts.
He rescued the little girl at the cost of his life.
I'm sorry, but can't answer right away.
You'd better quit smoking.
She has been waiting for him thirty minutes.
Tom is a very interesting person.
He sometimes comes home late.
Hundreds of people were killed.
She has done us many kindnesses.
Every day of thy life is a page in thy history.
Pains of love be sweeter far / Than all other pleasures are.
These aren't my keys.
It's easier to teach children than adults.
Don't shoot.
What do you do here so early?
In the course of a year my son grew stronger.
I wish to talk to your daughter.
We must start immediately.
This is a pen.
Jim promised me not to come again.
We'll leave as soon as you're ready.
How about 12:45?
I was a healthy child.
I was a healthy child.
It's your turn to sing.
I want that shirt too.
Nobody is rich in my country.
I hear that he sold his house.
He is hard to deal with.
It's worth a shot.
They refused to help us.
She will leave the hospital soon.
He glanced at her.
That's a cheap store.
Not a single word did he say.
We study the past for the sake of the future.
Victory is ours.
Do you still collect stamps?
I got up very early today.
My brother likes horror movies.
That's an order!
You must start at once.
Times have changed.
He hit me, not her.
She handed him the money.
I have a different opinion.
Health means everything to me.
Do you want some milk?
You should acknowledge your failure.
Tom and his buddies slit the throats of eleven men and women.
Tom and his buddies slit the throats of eleven men and women.
He made me sing.
I don't like buildings.
Really? You have a favorite writer you always read?
He came downstairs.
He is doing fine in school.
The rich grow richer and the poor grow poorer.
I look on her as my sister.
I'm accustomed to getting up early.
Do you like this colour?
Strange to say, none of us noticed the mistake.
Can I go for a walk?
She has lost weight.
What about having fish for dinner?
We all want you to be happy.
Nobody wants you to be happy.
Nobody wants you to be happy.
We chose her a nice birthday present.
I didn't forget to write the prices.
The soldier saved his friend at the cost of his own life.
Is that a joke?
This sentence is not French.
He was raised in the States, but his mother tongue is Japanese.
He has no knowledge, not to mention experience.
You have such a poor sense of direction!
I am not a doctor, but a teacher.
Kumiko runs as fast as Tom.
Tony carved his name in a tree with a knife.
Please get this work finished by Monday.
We plunged into the river.
He appears to be strong and healthy.
The document passed into the enemy's hands.
Let's meet in front of the theater.
I wonder what you're looking at.
Don't forget to write me.
Come here and have a look at it.
This bird lives neither in Japan nor in China.
Let go of my arm!
May I ask you to close the window?
I asked him for advice.
The store raised all the prices.
He was badly wounded.
He made up his mind to study abroad.
There has to be a first time for everything.
They made him work.
His sisters are both beautiful.
Are you sure that you want to go there?
Are you sure that you want to go there?
Are you sure that you want to go there?
She was carrying her baby in her arms.
My birthday falls on Sunday.
The capital of Brazil is Brasilia.
He was busy, and yet he came to help us.
I think him a fool.
He did what he promised to do for me.
I couldn't remember the title of that song.
I bought an old car.
I have a throbbing pain here.
I'm not going anyplace.
Thousands of people gathered there.
His opinion was unimportant.
It is up to you.
He refused to take the bribe.
I am very busy.
Children should drink milk every day.
I do not believe that God exists.
He grabbed her arm.
We can talk here. No problem.
I've lost my ticket.
I gave him all the money I had.
I'm quitting smoking.
She is the one you should model yourself after.
Children begin school at the age of six.
Man has the ability to speak.
He made us do the work.
Seen at a distance, the two look alike.
They took food and clothing.
If you turn to the left, you'll see a white building.
Is death the only way out?
Just look in the mirror.
I want to talk to her.
You don't need to be in such a hurry.
Where's the shirt I bought you?
She isn't kind to him. In fact, she's not kind to anyone.
Who translated this letter?
She repeated her name slowly.
He abandoned his hope of becoming a doctor.
My father gets up early.
Where can I buy a program?
I'll make you an offer you can't refuse.
Don't smoke in here.
He's looking good.
My problems are very similar to yours.
Hundreds of soldiers ate in silence around their campfires.
He needs the ladder.
This flower is as beautiful as that one.
You are not watching TV now.
You have been busy.
Yes, we were abroad, in Switzerland.
Oh, sweet name of freedom!
You may speak to him.
You should follow your teacher's advice.
This phenomenon is very easy to explain.
This phenomenon is very easy to explain.
I don't go to school by bus.
What are you having for lunch today?
Damn, I was wrong.
I usually get up at about six-thirty.
What's your home address?
Get in the car.
Why did you buy the flowers?
We meet sometimes at the shop.
They are the so-called victims of war.
Africa has a lot of nature.
Don't laugh at his mistake.
Sit at the table.
That doesn't concern us.
He had his only son killed in the war.
Tom tried to get Mary to help John.
I'm sorry, we don't accept checks.
Don't interfere with him if you want him to like you.
The man who lives next door to me is a doctor.
He is up to his ears in debt.
I hope you received the flowers I sent yesterday.
This one is prettier.
She's a professor.
It's unlikely she's as stupid as you think.
His daughter and my son are good friends.
I care a good deal about what you think.
I smoke cigarettes.
Today I discovered that there's a movie called "The Russians are coming! The Russians are coming!"
She called me.
He gave me an example.
Go back to your bed.
I'm healthy.
You could start your own company.
Don't meddle in my affairs.
I am the happiest person in the world!
Call your sisters.
I have no idea where he went.
Bill got up early so he could catch the first train.
He was standing at the top of the mountain.
She's about the same age as my older sister.
Your car is fast.
I was hit by the policeman.
He was a student at that time.
I've seen her naked.
He sold all that he owned.
Do you study every day?
Are you in a good mood?
The bread is not fresh.
Do you go running every day?
Is your dog mean?
Getting up at 6 a.m. was hard at first, but now I'm used to it.
It's his weak spot.
In a word, I think he's a fool.
I can't believe that.
The first word of an English sentence should be capitalized.
Why do people go to the movies?
She says that she is happy.
He turned the key.
He would sit and look at the sea for hours.
She sat in a chair reading a magazine.
They got into the boat.
She can't stand being treated like a child.
Are you in much pain?
Are you in a lot of pain?
Both their brothers are teachers.
They arrived too soon.
They arrived too soon.
They arrived too soon.
Call Tom and Mary this evening.
We have two television sets.
I can't accept your gift.
I am not in a hurry.
She gladly accepted his proposal.
Tom came into the kitchen.
Dad went to the bank because he was short of money.
How many bridges are there across the River Thames?
John walked over the bridge and crossed the road.
You will find both of the books interesting.
I had a happy childhood.
Get lost.
No one speaks with me.
What is the tallest mountain in North America?
Do you have a car?
You never get my jokes.
I can't believe that she did that to me.
There are a lot of beautiful buildings in this town.
Our father goes to work by car.
John's house is opposite the church.
Where's the nearest hotel?
I know a very nice little hotel quite close to here.
Grandma went to the market to buy food for the family.
It depends.
Grandma went to the market to buy food for the family.
Cats are nocturnal animals.
One learns by one's mistakes.
He's in prison.
It's not that I don't like your English, but for me it's important to use every opportunity to practise Russian.
This grass is too wet to sit on.
There is a page missing.
Birds are singing here and there in the park.
Tom will meet with all of you at 2:30.
There are many more vowels in French than in Japanese.
I have not yet collected sufficient materials to write a book.
Tom did what he promised to do.
They had a boat.
The earth is not a star, but a planet.
It's not that I don't like your English, but for me it's important to use every opportunity to practise Russian.
Tom spent three years in prison.
But she's innocent!
When did you go to bed last night?
Beware of the dog!
I'll give him a call tonight.
Whose money is this?
He drives to work.
The river that flows through Paris is called the Seine.
Is there any danger?
Why didn't you believe me?
I am the State! said the king.
She depends on her husband for everything.
I don't know for certain when he will come.
You're absolutely right.
Don't teach your grandmother to suck eggs.
Be quiet and listen to me.
Whose is it?
He repeated his name slowly.
Tom is up to his neck in debt.
Tom acts like nothing else matters.
Tom wants to keep things the way they are.
She is very pretty, isn't she?
Whose son are you?
Wherever you live, there's the capital city.
As a rule, he arrives at the office about eight-thirty in morning.
You have plenty of time to catch the train.
Milk can be made into butter, cheese, and many other things.
We've got to talk.
Can it be that a white horse is not a horse?
The train is here.
She walked slowly away from me.
They're in danger.
This really doesn't concern you.
He has lost all hope.
My grandfather died five years ago.
Tom says he doesn't want to live like this anymore.
I love my daughter.
Do you like summer?
He must be aware of the danger.
He forced her to sit down.
I don't remember where I put my key.
Oh, take your time. I'm in no hurry.
It is warmer today than yesterday.
Spring is my favorite time of year.
We're all in the same boat.
I'm certain that he'll come.
Should we wait for you here?
Tom caught a big fish.
I had to get up early.
Take care not to fall.
My opinion is a little different from yours.
It's easy to quit smoking. I've done it hundreds of times.
Tatoeba: We've got more sentences than your mom could ever say in her lifetime.
What kind of music do you like?
I am listening to country music.
I will endure.
You are impossible to deal with.
You can always ask me for help.
You can say what you like, but I'll never forgive you.
You can wait here.
You can't make me do that.
You didn't let me finish.
You have to believe me. I really want you to stay.
You have to spend more time with your son.
Do you think it impossible to finish the task before five?
What is in the box?
A good idea suddenly struck her.
A good idea suddenly struck her.
Every sentence in this book is important.
It’s clear that we’re going to the church.
I have many photos.
Tom is a fast driver.
Please don't shoot.
Please don't shoot.
Tom likes hot curry.
He'll go to the hospital today.
This must be a mistake.
You are old enough to understand this.
Have you already finished?
Pull yourself together, now. There's no point in crying.
He was busy.
Joking aside, what do you mean to do?
You never have time for important things!
The train was crowded with people.
Please don't forget to mail this letter.
I met her in London for the first time.
I want your opinion.
Turn to the left!
Don’t open the window!
There's only a little milk left.
What does she look like?
He didn't invent gunpowder.
The sun sets earlier in winter.
She was born with a silver spoon in her mouth.
Everyone says the view from here is beautiful.
Do you really think that's fair?
Human beings differ from animals in that they can think and speak.
What a beautiful bird!
Tatoeba: Sentences, sentences, and more sentences.
I'll give you back the money tomorrow.
They have lost a lot.
There are sufficient grounds for believing he is honest.
I stopped smoking and drinking.
I don't know how to use it.
This is the list of all the people buried here.
A book dropped from the shelf.
Are you sure that you want to do this?
Have you decided on a name for your new baby?
Let me check.
This is my grandmother.
How did Tom look?
Can you do without the car tomorrow? I need it.
You must fulfill your duty.
I can't carry this suitcase by myself.
I can't carry this suitcase by myself.
Let's drink to his success.
He likes hunting.
I am happy to meet you.
I finished the work.
I don't want meat.
Please come in one by one.
You're lying!
What the hell's wrong with you?
It's never too late to start.
You are satisfied with your life, aren't you?
You are satisfied with your life, aren't you?
She has lost both her parents.
You see, but you do not observe.
I like this color as well.
If something is given to you then take it. If you are beaten, then run away.
No one will believe us.
How long has it been!
He's a bit drunk.
He bolted out of the room.
The sun is setting.
Let me introduce my sister.
She wore a white dress.
What a beautiful dress!
Please don't forget to mail the letters.
Let me try.
His opinion is for the birds.
I'll call you as soon as I can.
A close neighbor is better than a distant relative.
I have read both of these books, but neither of them is interesting.
Don't treat me like a child.
The policeman commanded them to stop.
She grabbed his hand.
He saved her at the cost of his own life.
We happened to be on the same train.
My sister is cooking in the kitchen.
I can't stop laughing.
My grandmother lives by herself.
Tom nodded.
Reading books is interesting.
I go to church every day.
Which one will you choose?
She began crying.
The town has changed a lot since then.
Now you're safe.
Is it already five o'clock?! How time flies!
A lot of people were killed in World War II.
He kept on writing stories about animals.
I gave him advice, to which he paid no attention.
He's away on business.
She met her uncle.
The uncle gave me a friendly piece of advice.
It's very strange.
Someone is watching you.
Is this a gift for me?
Save me a seat.
This shirt is too big for me.
I was forced to abandon the plan.
Who did you meet there?
Tom frequently talks in his sleep.
Tom took his place at head of the table.
Today is my birthday.
He often asks silly questions.
There is no grass on the moon.
Get out of here.
She has a lot of English books.
She's sitting in the kitchen and drinking tea.
Have your soup without making noise.
I awoke to find a bird in my room.
I awoke to find a bird in my room.
Don't let him listen to this music.
Have you already chosen?
I will do whatever you wish.
None of his students could solve the problem.
Please forgive me for not having written to you earlier.
I am very glad to meet you today.
Tom eats, sleeps and breathes music.
What time will the movie start?
The soup's very hot.
The soup is terribly hot.
Your situation is analogous to mine.
Your situation is analogous to mine.
She supports her family.
It's a miracle!
Tom certainly wasn't crying when we left his house.
Why did you get up so early?
It's the last train.
The doctor recommended that you should give up smoking.
Suddenly, a good idea occurred to me.
You don't have to be scared.
Fool! - "From a fool I am hearing this!"
He is lying on the sofa.
I'm sure you'll like it.
You're the last hope for humanity.
Is that so bad?
The capital of Japan is Tokyo.
Suddenly, a good idea occurred to me.
Haruko likes warm springs.
Haruko likes warm springs.
How many pens do you have?
How many pens do you have?
You used to smoke, didn't you?
I'm pretty happy.
Yesterday I bought a pig in a poke.
Tom talks in his sleep.
She asked him to marry her.
Do you plan to go abroad?
What illness do I have?
We are applying butter on our bread.
They were all in convulsions of laughter.
If you had a time machine, when would you go to?
Oh, no! My house is on fire!
Are you speaking to me?
I forget to telephone him.
She was forty, but she appeared older.
There is a bus every fifteen minutes.
It's not the time but the will that you lack.
There used to be a prison here.
Nobody noticed her absence.
These aren't fish.
Tom couldn't find his key anywhere.
All people breathe air.
I have lost my keys.
I lost my ticket. What should I do?
The prices have gone down.
It's in the kitchen.
I can't get my money back.
While we're thinking about how to kill time, time kills us.
He was drunk with joy.
What the devil are you doing?
I don't have vodka.
Drop your gun!
Welcome to Tatoeba!
I can prove it to you.
Only vodka from Russia is genuine Russian vodka!
We can't be happy here any longer.
At any rate, it's all the same to me.
Tom was lucky to find his keys.
She went down the stairs.
The cat is under the table.
What he is saying is very important.
So many men, so many minds.
Beware of the dog!
The ship wasn't ready for battle.
Tom was born on a ship.
A whole is made up of parts.
Every time I call on you, you are out.
My friend invited me to dinner at the restaurant.
Why didn't you call me last night?
She gets up early.
I've done half the work, and now I can take a break.
Money doesn't grow on trees.
Modern Russia has many problems.
One thousand buildings lay in ruins.
We are all capable of loving and being loved at the moment of our birth.
He was constantly borrowing money from me.
Who's on the phone?
What's in this bag?
He always treats me like a child.
I can't remember her address.
A Mr. Smith has come to see you.
He and I are almost the same height.
I'll pay any price.
The roof of the house is red.
I have a serious problem.
This led to unexpected results.
Mom, I don't want to go with Grandpa. Leave me here.
Alexander wrote some sentences in Berber.
The town is famous for its old castle.
I've finally got used to urban life.
He has a black shirt.
Life is a mirror!
This sentence isn't in English.
I am not sure whether I will be able to come with you.
When I was a child, I believed in Father Christmas.
Where is the ladies' room?
He thinks he can prove it.
I beg to differ with you.
She went down to the fifth floor.
I am doing my homework.
I've got to talk to you.
Who is the woman dressed in pink?
Show me how to do it, please.
I'll give them a call.
He says that he enjoyed it very much.
You are such an idiot!
How time flies!
Could you please tell me your height and weight?
Where's the nearest bank?
She's about the same age as I am.
Do you remember your grandfather?
This is the hottest summer that we have had in thirty years.
I didn't meet anyone.
Go and get a chair from the next room, please.
I'm tired and I want to go to bed.
Wait till six.
The man was of normal height.
He drank a whole bottle of milk.
Good night, everybody!
He often helps others.
Even a child can read this.
A clear conscience is the sure sign of a bad memory.
Just you try!
At least I'm older than you.
She's been very busy this week.
Don't lose hope.
You have neither written, nor phoned.
You have neither written, nor phoned.
What time did you wake up?
It is still too early.
I had never seen that kind of fish until then.
He proceeded to the next question.
Remember to mail the letter on your way to school.
He asked for a glass of water.
My TV has quit working.
I'm not a student.
That cat really was blue.
He could not rest until he knew the truth.
We were poor, but we were happy.
The price doesn't matter.
I'll keep you informed.
I'll keep you updated.
Do you think Tom is dead?
I'll phone you as soon as I get home.
Please, call him.
He admitted his mistakes.
He let us go.
He let me go.
Spring is just around the corner.
Are you crying?
Are you crying?
I'll wait here.
I woke up.
I've lost.
Where's the bag?
I heard it on TV.
I love that show.
I love that song.
His poor dog is still alive.
He likes walking in the park.
My brother is an engineer.
I exercise my rights.
You can call us at any time.
Tom changed color.
Do you have any idea who would do this?
They are watching a movie.
They never pay any attention to me.
She went into the kitchen to see who was there, but there was nobody there.
Do you still remember them? Do you remember the happy days?
I'll give him a call.
Jim turned the key in the lock.
My uncle has three children.
Is your father in the garden?
What do I look like?
My last name is Jones.
Did you finish?
There are seven men and four women in my section.
She has as many books as I.
I can't believe you did this by yourself.
He married my sister.
Does everybody understand?
No kidding!?
How tall are you?
I saved your life.
Are you watching your weight?
Have you spoken with your wife?
The month is drawing to an end.
Which do you suppose she chose?
I want to go home and sleep.
She has a very good figure.
Tom doesn't realize how lucky he is.
I can't stand those kinds of people.
I have ten pens.
I'll call at seven.
Whose turn is it?
Solve the problem.
My apartment is near.
This book belongs to you.
Who invented karaoke bars?
Keep me updated.
Keep me updated.
The market was quiet today.
I will accomplish my purpose at any cost.
I'm seasick.
I hear laughing.
I am an American student.
He likes to work in the garden.
I expect that he will help us.
I have lost my friends.
I have as many books as he does.
Mother is cooking in the kitchen.
My mother tasted the milk.
Do I not destroy my enemies when I make them my friends?
She looked as if she had been sick for a long time.
You're early.
I hope you have a good time!
I met him in the crowd.
Who discovered the island?
I'm coming back.
I'm going back home.
Tom just wanted to talk.
My happiness depends on you.
My happiness depends on you.
There is a little water in the glass.
I'm helping you.
I'm helping you.
I'm not so sure.
My father doesn't waste his time.
Tom is probably lost.
Do you think I'm fat?
Do you think I'm fat?
Does she work in the kitchen?
I want a suit made of this material.
You met him at the university?
You met him at the university?
You met him at the university?
Is that a crime?
How far is it from here to the sea?
Father is in the garden now.
I hope to see you.
I hope to see you.
No one believed his story.
Never forget it.
Never forget it.
I owe my success to my friend.
I owe my success to my friend.
Take a seat.
The sun has set.
There is no hope.
Who runs faster, Yumi or Keiko?
It's my ship.
They let me go.
There was a thick fog around.
Did you buy any meat in the supermarket?
She sat in a chair reading a magazine.
Tom came a few days later.
The train will depart soon.
Send for a doctor at once.
I didn't meet anyone there.
They have already finished the work.
Tom wants to talk to you again.
Tom wants to talk to you again.
She's about the same age as my sister.
You're lying!
Did you finish?
I need a map.
Tom left a note.
I'm going to the cinema.
I don't want to stop.
I'm glad she liked it.
Whose chair is this? "It is mine."
Get out of here quickly!
She looked ill.
I read the whole book in one evening.
The man is naked.
No doubt.
I met Fred on the street.
Hundreds of people work in this factory.
You have better sight than me.
To your health!
I have been to the store before.
I am using Twitter.
He gave away all his money.
All I want now is a glass of water.
She came home very late.
The knife isn't sharp.
I am sure that we will be very happy here.
I am sure that we will be very happy here.
The letter does not say what time she will come up to Tokyo.
He will make a good team captain.
It's necessary to wait just ten days.
Let me out!
Let me out!
Let me leave!
You really want to talk about it now?
Don't forget to write to us.
I have a wooden table.
There's nobody inside.
Don't cry, she said.
She is about as tall as me.
She is as tall as I.
The car has been acting strangely.
This man only has to open his mouth for you to see that he lacks education.
She smells bad.
Tom lacks experience.
Please let me go with you.
Ken decided to go abroad.
It should be fun.
I have no further questions.
Are you trying to make a fool of me?
Everyone has their own strong and weak points.
The good I would, I do not: the evil I would not, that I do.
We will be together forever.
Let's sit here on the grass.
Tony was happy.
That song reminds me of a certain girl.
I have more dresses than my sister.
Do you take me for a fool?
Are you sure you don't want me to go with you?
Are you sure you don't want me to go with you?
Will you open the bag?
Will you open the bag?
He refused to pay.
The clever student finished the test quickly.
That depends on you.
Can I talk with you?
I hope that you'll help me.
Does he go to school by bus?
Everything is just beginning.
Tom is capable of doing it.
Why do you study every day?
This suitcase is too heavy for me to carry.
Count to thirty.
It's a fight of all against all.
They're in the garden.
Let her go.
Were you busy yesterday?
When he got to the station, the train had already left.
The parrot is dead.
He's a world-class scientist.
It's been fun.
You've got my sunglasses and I want them back.
Tom can run fast.
It's my fault, not yours.
The train is arriving!
He looked up at the sky.
Tom cried.
The success of her novel made her rich.
She had a clear conscience.
She had a clear conscience.
I am occupied with my own affairs.
I am occupied with my own affairs.
What's your favorite season of the year?
If you don't want this, I'll give it to someone else.
Are you sure?
When I grow up, I want to be a king.
I live on the ground floor.
What's your address?
What's your address?
Why do you not ask your teacher for advice?
I added his name to the list.
How much longer is it going to take?
Do you have a problem with this?
I went to the hospital to ask about his health.
With your connections, you should be able to find a job for Tom.
Enough TV, already!
Can I speak with Judy?
I'm an American citizen.
Do you see a star?
Do you see a star?
No one will believe them.
The middle finger is the longest.
My brother is not satisfied with his new car.
We'll check on it right now.
We'll check on it right now.
I go to church by car.
Don't touch the glass.
Tom likes to come here every year on his birthday.
Put this into English.
Put this into English.
My father is always busy.
Will you forgive me the debt?
Will you forgive me the debt?
Both her parents are dead.
I met my teacher by accident at the restaurant last night.
I met my teacher by accident at the restaurant last night.
With whom are you talking?
With whom are you talking?
You must start immediately.
I'd like to give you a piece of advice.
I'd like to give you a piece of advice.
You remind me of somebody.
It doesn't take very long.
It won't be long.
She followed me into the kitchen and picked up a knife.
She wrote him a long letter, but she didn't mail it.
Do you think he will like it?
Teachers also make mistakes.
Please translate this sentence into Japanese.
Please translate this sentence into Japanese.
Someone is inside.
My boss made me work last Sunday.
I am very happy.
I'm not sure she wants to talk to me.
I'm not sure she wants to talk to me.
Air is to us what water is to fish.
Tom is in trouble.
Tom isn't in jail.
Tom is still in the hospital.
Do you know by chance his name?
Do you know by chance his name?
I met him on my way home from school.
I met him on my way home from school.
Are you quite satisfied with your new house?
A fool always believes that it is the others who are fools.
He drinks a lot of milk every day.
He looks like a horse.
You're lightly dressed.
You're lightly dressed.
This movie is worth watching.
I haven't read any of his books.
A win is a win!
I'm sure I've seen him before.
I'll call you at seven.
I sometimes see him on TV.
You have restored my faith in humanity.
You have restored my faith in humanity.
He came close to losing an eye.
His mother prevented him from going out because she was anxious about his health.
You can't kill someone that's already dead.
Have you gone mad?
Are you being serious?
I finished the work by myself.
I finished the work by myself.
How come I've never seen you here before?
How come I've never seen you here before?
When did you first meet him?
When did you first meet him?
I was drinking milk.
We can't promise that.
I did not see the sign.
I did not see the sign.
When spring comes, the days get longer day by day.
Tom was killed in a car accident.
The neighbors called the police.
My dog sometimes eats grass.
We met at summer camp.
I think Tom is lying.
Don't let him do it alone.
That shirt is too large for me.
Let's talk about your job.
Let's talk about your job.
Do you need the key?
Do you need the key?
She opened a new store.
He was fully clothed.
The child is crying, because it wants to eat.
They look happy today.
Go straight, then turn right.
Go straight, then turn right.
I thought you were raised in L.A.
He's a quick study.
I cry every time I hear this song.
How long have you been living out of a suitcase?
She only worked for the sake of money.
He was reading a paper upside down.
I know it's important.
I have a friend whose father is a teacher.
I've lost my pen.
I've lost my pen.
Today is a holiday.
Delete his name from the list.
The President has fled the capital.
It's up to you to decide what to do.
I should have listened more carefully.
Things can't be all that bad.
I'm always busy.
I'm busy all the time.
We invited him to our house.
The building has twenty floors.
He stopped smoking because his wife and children asked him to.
If I were rich, I'd give you money.
I got some sand in my eye.
Help!
He works under me.
Are you coming in or not?
Are you coming in or not?
Are you coming in or not?
Are you coming in or not?
Give me your address and telephone number.
Give me your address and telephone number.
Give me your address and telephone number.
When do you want me to call you?
When do you want me to call you?
When do you want me to call you?
When do you want me to call you?
She always showed up too soon.
These days I am very busy.
We spoke yesterday.
This is a photograph of my home.
The old man fell down on the ground.
She always arrived too early.
How do you usually decide what to eat?
There is a market in the town.
How you can abide him?
I cannot abide him.
He had lost all faith in his ability to succeed.
I came to the conclusion that something was wrong.
The reports of my death are greatly exaggerated.
He who knows why he learns, learns better.
You can give Tom all of it, if you want to.
That sounds interesting. What did you tell her?
I'm going to see him tomorrow.
She's lost her car key.
It's a question of taste.
I make lunch every day.
All the students are present.
I'm so happy.
I'm so happy.
Do you know the name of this flower?
Be careful what you say!
Tom is still hospitalized.
Tom is still hospitalized.
At first, they didn't believe him.
She was listening to music.
No one believed her.
She's not in the mood.
Tom sings.
Sri Lanka is a beautiful island.
Whose are they?
Who made this box?
We cannot all be stupid. It would be against the laws of statistics.
That's a job of your own choosing, isn't it?
I will quit smoking for good.
I study from eight to eleven.
Nod your head if you understand.
He treated me badly.
He treated me badly.
Is he your teacher?
My husband is in jail.
This smells great! What are you cooking?
His novels also appear in French.
Please translate this Japanese text into French.
I'm making progress.
I'm not that stupid.
I'm not that stupid.
I'm not your friend.
Tom is quite drunk.
Whose is this food?
Is that a good idea?
My tastes differ greatly from yours.
He must be over fifty.
You aren't busy now, are you?
Which objects are in the room?
I saw him recently.
He wore glasses.
We help you, not to help you, but to help you help us.
Marry me.
You did not call Marie.
She found him handsome.
Just take my word for it.
This is an important event.
It was the happiest time of my life.
Jim is about as tall as Bill.
Why are you always so angry?
They aren't children any more, but not adults yet.
The boy told me why he was crying.
I'll show you how it's done.
Tom shut his eyes.
He is his usual self.
She has a very strong personality.
Tell him either to call on me or to ring me up.
Do you want to try?
Do you want to try it?
Do you want to try?
Show me that list.
Where did you buy the flowers?
Leave my family alone.
His book is very interesting.
Numerous examples can be given.
Call 110 right now.
My dog is dreaming of a cat.
Do we have something to celebrate?
He wrote the story about the things that happened before he lived.
He works for a large American corporation.
He works for a large American corporation.
I have no clue.
Tanks don't fear dirt.
This story is very famous; everyone knows it.
We used to have aeroplanes, but we had to sell them.
He liked that.
They were acting strangely.
She held him by the sleeve.
I can't believe you turned down that job.
Would you like to go to the lake with us?
I thought he was rich.
There was a bridge there.
They eat meat once a week.
I sent it to you two days ago.
I know what you want to talk about.
Our teacher is in a good mood.
Are you sure of that?
Are you sure of this?
Thanks for your gift.
Thanks for your gift.
We talked about it all night.
Show him how to do this.
She is in a green dress.
Her eyes become round in surprise.
Unfortunately, it's not possible.
Was that meant as a joke?
I'm sure he'll leave early.
I'm sure she'll leave early.
Are you sure you don't want coffee?
She is always busy.
Drop your gun!
Tell me why she is crying.
I don't care what they think about me.
We were in a hurry.
Which team are you on?
My mother looked at me with tears in her eyes.
I didn't understand the joke.
She was asked not to speak at the meeting.
The cat is not dead.
He came to see me yesterday afternoon.
That's the building where my dad works.
He has dozens of books about Japan.
When you're a parent it's important to set a good example for your children.
How come you didn't tell Tom about me?
I'm poor.
They don't eat meat.
I'm wondering if I love him.
I'm wondering if I love her.
They heard him come downstairs.
What do you suggest then?
I remember meeting her somewhere.
Which floor do you live on?
She is much taller than I.
My father was busy.
We definitely heard that sound.
I thought about you a lot.
Are you happy with your new car?
Speak clearly.
I know this joke.
There is no milk left.
The men have mustaches.
He completed his work at the expense of his health.
There were several hundred people in the plaza.
Don't leave the window open.
Defenestrate your clock to see how time flies.
Have you already seen the film?
Have you already seen the film?
Let's go outside.
Tom thinks that Mary drinks too much coffee.
I don't like to sing in public.
You need to go to bed again.
In a similar situation, I'd do the same.
I'm surprised to see you smoking; you didn't use to.
Tom is a citizen of the United States.
How many times a week do you go shopping at a supermarket?
She helped her husband with his work.
I was talking to my family.
Get a life.
Are we done?
I'm listening to this band.
What do you want to talk to me about?
What do you want to talk to me about?
She doesn't listen to music at all.
The author of the text of the famous song "I love you, oh life" died yesterday.
This is a little gift for you.
This is a little gift for you.
We should give her flowers.
Towns are very crowded today.
I haven't finished yet.
She would make everyone happy.
I just want you to remember this feeling.
Did he show you the picture?
I promise you I'll come early.
He looked asleep, but he was really dead.
All people are good at the bottom of their hearts.
Did Dorenda really come back?!
That's not a knife. THIS is a knife.
I often spend my free time listening to music.
Can you please pass me the newspaper?
I fear for the future of mankind.
We believe in the existence of God.
Will you permit me to go there?
Tom went missing.
When she saw me naked, she started laughing.
The key is on the table.
He has a great deal of experience.
He has a great deal of experience.
You must conform to the rules.
He bought his daughter a new dress.
She's spending too much time watching TV.
He has half again as many books as I do.
He is my teacher.
You must read this book.
She's busy now, so she can't talk with you.
She's busy now, so she can't talk with you.
She was very happy with my gift.
I was driving at 120 kilometers per hour when the police stopped me.
I was driving at 120 kilometers per hour when the police stopped me.
He said, "I want to be a scientist."
She wants to talk to you.
She wants to talk to you.
I'm sure that she will come back soon.
Don't leave me here.
Don't leave me here.
I see a bird on the roof.
That's news to me.
I'm sick of this.
Do your homework.
Leave us alone.
They treated me badly.
I feel like singing.
You can't live on that island.
Tom shrugged his shoulders.
Return to the ship.
She invited us to her birthday party.
I thought that was obvious.
He drank a little.
It's up to you to decide what to do.
Why do you want to leave today?
Why do you want to leave today?
Do you know she's in the church?
Did you enjoy yourself?
My ears burn.
Only humans can laugh.
O Hamlet, thou hast cleft my heart in twain.
Let's face it: this sentence is simply bad.
I did it against my will.
I did it against my will.
Teachers must understand children.
I lived in China for six months.
I didn't even receive one letter from her.
She lay down on the floor and started reading.
Tom can't believe what he's just seen.
They pay little attention to him.
He had an operation on his left leg.
Crocodiles have sharp teeth.
I crossed the street.
I crossed the street.
There's a white dove on the roof.
Tom doesn't allow his children to play with Mary.
I'm not as rich as I was.
No one is sure how many people died.
What made you think that?
What colour do you like?
Can you ride a horse?
We are sure of his success.
Leave me in peace!
I have a pain in my side.
He has pains in his side.
He has pains in his side.
The window is closed.
This coffee is too strong for me.
Translate the underlined sentences.
We translate sentences into other languages.
Promise me you'll never do that again.
Are you talking about me?
I was greatly impressed by the speech.
I'd like to find somebody to talk to.
So we love sentences. But, even more, we love languages.
Who sold you this car?
You'll never leave this town.
There is a mistake in the sentence.
He asked me if I were happy.
She wrote him a long letter, but he didn't read it.
I am sure of his success.
I'm going to make you an offer that you can't refuse.
What was that noise?
I always listen to this song.
Life begins when you're ready to live it.
How many books have you read?
Mathematics is an interesting subject.
If I were in your place, I would lend him a hand.
I promise you I'll help you.
I really need to talk to you.
She lost everything.
Can you read this?
Go to hell!
She's busy.
I lost face.
It's next to impossible to finish it in a day.
Which one do you think is correct?
You don't have to help me.
I have a friend whose father is a teacher.
The novel has been translated into many languages.
My grandfather is five times as old as I am.
You're completely right!
Since I didn't know what to do, I asked him for advice.
I have no regrets about what I did.
I did smoke when I was young.
At first I did not like him, but now I do.
Although I was tired, I did my very best.
I took good care that I did not fall.
I did what I promised to do for you.
Today I did not eat as I feel so sick.
I did it while I was drunk.
I did what I promised to do for them.
I did what I promised to do for her.
I did what I promised to do for him.
I didn't have to help Tom, but I did.
I didn't have to help you, but I did.
I don't think I did very well.
I can't believe I did that.
I could get in trouble if I did that.
The problems are easier than those I did yesterday.
I did not watch TV but studied English last night.
No matter what I did, no one paid any attention to me.
I did the work against my will.
I did so for the sake of my health.
He didn't study at all.
I thought you wanted Tom to marry you.
I think that's a good idea.
Someone grabbed me from behind.
I just came from there.
Everybody loves music.
Everybody loves music.
And what we really want is to have many sentences in many — and any — languages.
The law is still in effect.
He also speaks French.
He is too tired to study.
They look healthy.
The story was very interesting.
Wait!
No one expected this.
I wonder who she is.
Many museums are closed on Mondays.
Do you have anything to add?
How can you be so sure?
I don't want to go there again.
Pay attention to what he says.
The lake is deep here.
She hates country music.
This is the hospital which I was born in.
My family is more important to me than my job.
The wind lifts the leaves.
They want to talk.
The sun is bright.
You'll succeed if you try.
All of my attempts have failed.
He just wants to have fun.
This car is bigger than that one.
You shouldn't smoke so much.
For God's sake don't tell it to anyone.
I will see him at the first opportunity.
Playing music to me is like reading a book.
The water turned to ice.
The leaves on trees have turned red.
All of her songs became hits.
The novels he wrote are interesting.
Is this ticket good for this bus?
Which color do you like more, blue or red?
She refused my offer to help her.
If I were rich, I would buy it.
All the villages were beautiful.
He is beautiful like a god!
Let's talk about your school.
I grew up in the country.
The country declared war against its neighbor.
I tried writing with my left hand.
I think this book is worth reading.
His car was empty.
Classes begin next Tuesday.
He listened to the music with his eyes closed.
When will you finish your work?
We were just talking about you when you called.
This is the same car as I have.
I just finished reading this book.
He didn't notice me.
I wonder which way is the shortest.
It's my favorite song.
She'll spend the next four years in prison.
Whatever you say, I won't believe you.
Is that a picture of me?
She saved us all.
Are you scared?
I can't believe I'm here.
Leave him alone.
He is the same age as me.
Where's the mirror?
Tom will have to wait.
She used to get up early.
Why are you lying?
I love your daughter.
I love your daughter.
Please send us more information.
What kind of information are you looking for?
They're killing the planet.
This flower is more beautiful than that one.
What a beautiful night!
I don't need a new TV.
I need your advice.
He breathed deeply before entering his boss's office.
I very much regretted having lost so much time.
They lost everything.
Show me the photos, please.
Unfortunately, it rained yesterday.
I like music very much.
There are ten thousand students in this university.
You have a keen sense of direction.
Lake Baikal in Russia is the deepest lake in the world.
He's a fine young man.
Look on the bright side of things.
I use this.
I use it.
He told me that he was busy.
Even a cat may look at a king.
I have no idea why it is so.
Read.
I've met that girl before.
You look just like your older brother.
Sorry, we're closed.
He lost face.
At the time, we were just fifteen years old.
Admission to students only.
Is there a cash machine near here?
Go inside.
Do you love each other very much?
This book belongs to them.
They caught sight of the man among the crowd of people.
This is last month's magazine.
He aspires to become a teacher.
Art is a serious thing.
They will be safe with him.
My life would be completely empty without you.
He couldn't bring himself to believe her story.
Leave immediately!
My mother hates writing letters.
There's nobody on this ship except us.
Don't come in! I'm naked.
I'm looking for a gift for my friend.
It doesn't matter whether your answer is right or wrong.
He has not yet recovered consciousness.
Do you have bread for lunch?
The food wasn't good, but at least it was cheap.
That is a very complex machine.
Sorry, I can't let you stay here.
Why didn't you call me up?
You can't know that for sure.
Life without beloved person has no sense.
Don't forget death.
She liked the new dress.
It's too late.
My son went to London, where I was born.
She wants to talk to you.
Spring will soon come.
It was not long before we knew the truth.
Soon we saw a house whose roof was red.
I hope you will call again.
I hope you will call again.
There were still no visual signs of spring.
I'll call him later.
I can't believe I'm still alive.
He is incapable of telling a lie.
The task is so difficult that I cannot accomplish it.
One day, she told me that she wanted a pet cat.
It is clear that he is rich.
My arm is hurting badly.
I've lost everything.
I'm sure of that.
Someone tried to kill me.
What's the colour of her hair?
Keep to the left.
Never have I seen such a beautiful scene.
I am not a student.
I let him get the credit.
When did you finish?
Is your car next to her house?
Elizabeth immediately began playing again.
I should not have done that. It was wrong.
Shake hands with him.
I was not drunk.
I was not drunk.
He was more or less drunk.
He is more or less drunk.
Tom was running around the streets drunk and naked.
What kind of help do you need?
I'll forgive, but I won't forget.
Do you think I'm stupid?
It was far too late.
The school looks like a prison.
Winter is the coldest season in a year.
Night came on.
What does not kill me, makes me stronger.
I remember hearing that music somewhere.
After a while, he came.
What did Tom say about me?
English is considered an international language.
She decided on a blue dress.
He could not believe his eyes.
I like French food very much.
He left for London.
Don't be soft on kids.
When do you plan to leave for Japan?
Always look on the bright side of life.
I also went there.
Thanks for saving me.
This sentence is fine.
Is my sentence in Esperanto correct?
Your friends are really concerned about your health.
Nice to meet you, Ken.
It gets dark about half past five these days.
The birds were hungry.
I feel like someone is watching us.
She wouldn't allow me to read the letter.
Of course I should read this book.
I am very scared.
Real friends stick together through thick and thin.
He finally decided to try.
For certain, no one will look for this sentence.
This is a picture of my family.
What did John sing on the stage?
She's about the same age as my older sister.
Call me at this number.
Call me at this number.
It's not even on the map.
I wonder if you can handle this.
I have a good idea.
The student came back from London.
What made you come here?
I felt a sharp pain in the stomach.
Tom goes to church every Sunday morning.
A part of this land is mine.
I thought there was nobody in the kitchen.
There are many factors.
Those students really can't read.
Let's get out of this place.
There's a page missing.
Who are your most interesting friends?
Do you know the reason why the sky looks blue?
I drank some wine.
You're too drunk to drive.
We need to call someone.
Is it painful?
I want a new car.
The children were playing in the backyard.
We went to Hakone last Sunday.
Please put this into English.
Don't pay attention to her.
May I have the key?
Watch out for the car!
There is no worse fool, than an old fool.
You're not helping.
You're not helping.
Some believe that seven is a lucky number.
I'm not used to getting up early.
Basically, it is the same thing.
This sentence is grammatically correct.
I expected this.
That can wait.
I'm utterly convinced of it.
If you're busy now, I can come back later.
Are you busy, Tom?
This rule applies to you as well.
My mother is preparing dinner.
I'm not sure if this is correct.
Not knowing what to do, I called my mother for advice.
Don't smoke again in the toilet!
He caught the chicken.
Let's not forget human rights.
Where did you sing them?
I don't know her address.
We found the footprints in the sand.
'It must be very scary to be you,' Janina said in a whisper.
He was made to do it against his will.
I am repeating the answer.
She will return within an hour.
Some people read the newspaper and watch TV at the same time.
Please do not smoke here.
That is almost correct.
I have read the novel before.
I want a third alternative.
When I was little, I believed in Santa.
I learned from my mistakes.
We didn't have TV in those days.
They're teachers.
How interesting!
How do you feel about this?
A glass of water, please.
She applied to him for help.
He kept himself aloof.
Why aren't you helping me at all?
This part of the city is strange to me.
I don't want to talk to you.
One may add matres lectionis when the word could be ambiguous, but surely it is not obligatory.
The chairperson has asked for questions.
I am assured of your help.
Do you have any advice for me?
He cannot sing well.
This is such an easy problem that any student can solve it.
She has a wicked tongue.
I do hope you'll come again.
She has made the same mistake as last time.
Ladies first!
This book seems interesting.
I got to know him when I was a student.
He crossed the street when the signal was red.
I had no idea of what she intended to do.
Santa Claus was standing in the garden.
He's not fit to be a teacher.
We walked a lot.
I won't pay my son's debts.
Don't kill me.
The hospital opened last month.
He reached home shortly before five o'clock.
She declined to say more about it.
I was moved by the music.
He became a national hero.
She was wearing dark brown shoes.
A good idea crossed his mind.
We all make mistakes.
Have you finished reading that novel?
This novel consists of three parts.
Can I see this one?
His parents were pleased with his success.
I'm not sure I want to do this.
Is there a telephone in the kitchen?
The group was made up of four young men.
Not knowing what to do, I asked the teacher for advice.
Everyone in my family is happy.
Lie on your right side.
He stuck out his tongue at his teacher.
I love the music.
Sunlight makes my room warm.
Our class has a meeting once a week.
We have snow on the mountain all the year round.
Danger, danger!
The king governed the country.
I expect that I will see him on Monday.
I have just read this book.
As soon as we get the answer, we'll phone you.
Hold on for a few minutes, will you?
He kept it hidden from me.
Is there any help available?
I am no match for him.
What does not kill me, makes me stronger.
The plane climbed to an altitude of 10,000 meters.
Thousands lost their homes.
Many students bought the book.
He said that he was very happy.
You are Israel's teacher, said Jesus.
He did the work to the best of his ability.
It has a pleasant odor.
Last week I quickly read four books in my room.
Let me introduce my parents to you.
I can't put up with this noise any longer.
I'll be back at 6:30.
What a beautiful view!
This is an extremely important point.
The dog was dead.
The committee consists of twelve members.
If I had had enough money, I would have bought the bag.
What a sentence!
Make a sentence with each of these words.
Every house had a garden.
This clock is far more expensive than that.
We all laughed at his joke.
We don't trust strangers.
I'm sorry, I have no idea.
That's one of my favorite movies.
Tom has lost his hearing.
The number of tickets was limited.
Almost all the leaves have fallen.
Hot tears ran down her cheeks.
You can come as often as you like.
She's done nothing but cry all day.
It's too late now. Besides, it's starting to rain.
I don't want to talk about it right now.
She left early.
He left early.
He's a grown man.
All of these books are mine.
Their garden is full of very beautiful flowers all the year round.
We have to act fast.
Where is the captain of this ship?
His main object in life was to become rich.
Admission to the museum is thirty dollars.
I promise I'll be back in less than an hour.
You never have time for important things!
She is working on the problem.
We don't make mistakes.
I invited my neighbors to dinner.
She says that she enjoyed it very much.
She says that she enjoyed it very much.
Man is the only animal that laughs.
The sign means that the answer is correct.
Everyone is scared.
That's a joke, right?
Remember to see him tomorrow.
I eat fish every week.
What's your favorite free software application?
The children went to school in spite of the rain.
I bought this camera yesterday.
The boy fell off the bed.
You don't have to lie.
You should not talk here.
Because they’re watching television.
Science does not solve all the problems of life.
Nobody was paying attention to her.
Be sure to follow them step by step.
You must move quickly.
This meat smells bad.
I would like to see your products.
Your camera is only half the size of mine.
She is always dressed in black.
She always wears black.
Do you want to go to the movies or to the theater?
Because all his friends were poor, too.
Sit wherever you like.
We have enough time to catch the train.
Where I am doesn't matter.
Don't take chances.
One of my suitcases is large, and the other one is medium.
Karakorum is the early capital city of Mongolia.
The sister of your father or mother is your aunt.
How you've grown!
I remember the house where I grew up.
He explained his position to me.
My dream is to be a firefighter.
He seemed to enjoy his life and his work.
I bought a magazine in a store.
He quit smoking.
He must be stupid to believe such a thing.
Would you like to go to a movie tomorrow night?
How much is this camera?
The students laughed.
At any rate, I can go out when it stops raining.
Hi! Thanks for flying with us. How are you today?
She has a son and a daughter.
This smells good.
One event followed another.
It's all over for me. I lost my job.
I want to go to the movies today.
Whose suitcase is that?
I am pleased with my new house.
I am pleased with my new house.
Nobody seemed to have a motive for the murder.
I gave up smoking six months ago.
Please don't forget to see him tomorrow.
Don't be scared of making mistakes.
There is a border between America and Mexico.
I accept the offer.
He has started to write a novel.
I am responsible for the mistake.
The doctor pulled the paper from his pocket.
She replied she had never met the man before.
Where can I get the map?
Look at the sign just ahead of you.
Her character is similar to yours.
When I awoke, it was snowing.
I invited her to a movie.
You must let things take their own course.
I know that she has been busy.
I know that he was busy.
A friend of mine is studying abroad.
I'm not done with you yet.
My pet dog was seriously ill.
I still don't believe it!
A black car stopped next to the hospital.
What colour are her eyes?
I read the letter to him.
My brother can run as fast as I.
It's good now; neither too heavy nor too light.
He kept me waiting.
We happened to take the same train.
Whether the problem is important or unimportant, you must solve it.
This room gets little sunshine.
Now it's time to say good night.
He is in a hurry to catch the train.
In clear weather, we can see the island from here.
I don't like warm winters.
They have erected a new government.
I'd rather be poor than rich.
I don't want to be rich. I just don't want to be poor.
I don't eat meat.
You do look good.
Fame and success don't always walk hand in hand.
I am not concerned with the affair.
The master gave me an order to come in.
She did it while he was drunk.
I was chilled to the bone.
He is dead drunk.
I am looking for a shop.
I suggest we stay home and watch television.
You have two options: São Paulo and Rio de Janeiro.
There are too many choices.
One of the suitcases is completely empty.
You must put an end to your foolish behavior.
He's extremely happy.
She is no match for me.
She is weak by nature.
Most people like watching TV.
He came first. That's why he got a good seat.
To my dismay, my wallet was gone.
He failed notwithstanding my advice.
I can get a gun for you within five hours.
I like to sing songs.
The number of the chairs in the hall is 80.
Earth is the third planet from the sun.
I take my health seriously.
Life is full of secrets.
He's a little pale.
She made the same mistake as before.
He went backstage after the show.
She sent the letter by airmail.
The flower will come out soon.
Part of his story is true.
He solved the difficult problem.
The song always reminds of my childhood.
When do you go back to Japan?
Almost all the students like English.
The crowd is growing larger and larger.
You have made the very same mistake again.
I stand for freedom of speech for everyone.
I met her an hour ago.
A new student came into the class.
A new student came into the class.
You have made the very same mistake again.
Ten is ten percent of one hundred.
He used to play with her in his childhood.
He is not a poet but a novelist.
She asked us to leave her alone.
I have only a small garden.
This old fish has a strange taste.
Listen well to what I say.
Listen well to what I say.
Would you please close that window?
The light is off.
She was scared to cross the road.
I will endure.
He has his own car.
Are you stupid?
He's always looking at you.
Smile at the camera, please!
I don't know which key to use.
How much longer will I have to stay in the hospital?
I cannot account for her absence from school.
Let me go my own way.
It happened by accident.
What was inside?
He lost his memory.
You are going too far.
We've run out of beer.
She confessed her love to him.
Men cry too.
I'm not one hundred percent convinced of that.
The tree throws its shadow over the wall.
This is due to English being a world language.
He likes finding faults in others.
It's important to help people who are in trouble.
It's about time for the train to arrive.
We watched TV last night.
You are free to use this car.
He was born and raised in Tokyo.
Are you sure you want to be alone?
I think tomorrow is going to rain.
We go to school because we want to learn.
He was busy yesterday afternoon.
A portrait was hung on the wall.
Everybody likes his jokes.
I was very rich until I met her.
We export a lot of automobiles to that country.
Tom did it against his will.
You have knowledge and experience as well.
They enjoyed singing songs.
Eliza is crying.
We were just about to leave when she telephoned.
I haven't seen him for years.
My room is number five.
Treat her well.
I want to go abroad.
The situation gets worse and worse.
She won't believe it.
I smell something rotten.
Don't come too close to the fire.
I don't want to hear this.
The old man stopped for a moment to rest.
I woke up at five this morning.
I'll study a lot.
It's too late for me.
We've been busy.
I told her to sit down and to drink a glass of water.
I didn't think Tom would want to see me again.
I've gotten used to it.
The price of meat dropped.
She makes me happy.
This is not my type.
I can't remember her address no matter how much I try.
Do you want a bag?
I am a citizen of Sapporo.
I won't forgive her.
I write a letter.
He walked in the park yesterday.
No one took notice of him.
I help nobody.
Doctors refused to perform a second operation.
How much time do we have to finish this?
That mountain is about three thousand meters high.
Thanks a lot said he with a smile.
He caught a big fish.
I was forced to take medicine.
Do you have some wine?
She closed all the windows in the room.
You are old enough to know this.
It's fun to watch TV.
He runs fast.
I think friends are important.
When shall I return the book?
Watch out for her. Her weapon is language - if she wants to, she'll talk you to death.
I don't want to go anywhere.
We know you're busy.
A drunk man fell down the stairs.
I went out in spite of the rain.
She treated him like a king.
She let me penetrate her.
Apparently, he knew everything about me.
There are a lot of fish in that lake.
His socks are gray.
I'm lucky to have sincere friends.
The room was full of smoke.
They are gray.
This machine is easy to handle.
Would you mind closing the window?
It's very late, so I should already be in bed.
Both of her sons died during the war.
He finally decided to get married.
She asked him to come into her house.
I need some good advice.
He explained the matter to me.
Tom never told me his last name.
I invited him to my house.
I enjoyed talking with you.
I used to go to church on Sundays.
We're safe.
I have not yet finished my supper.
I had a room with a beautiful view of the mountains.
Why is Tom so happy?
How can I make him stop?
Get us out of here.
At least they listened to me.
I can't say anything against it.
This book is too difficult to read in a week.
She wants to save the planet.
He left for Paris.
He is an evil man.
If anything happens, call me right away.
Call me!
We have already forgiven you.
I don't like scary movies.
I wonder what became of her.
I'm going to regret this.
All the languages of the world are beautiful.
We happened to be on the same train.
It smells bad.
The sun is our most important source of energy.
I'm not sure I'm ready.
The red dress suited her.
Don't talk to anybody.
I translated all her sentences in Berber.
We must help each other.
We charge a commission of 3%.
Finding an apartment can be difficult.
Apparently some people need my blood more than I do.
This book contains a lot of photos.
What's your favorite kind of art?
What's your favorite kind of art?
They're beautiful.
You look pleased.
I cannot laugh in front of the cameras.
I met an American girl.
Don't you want to talk to me?
I don't believe you've met him.
My grandfather takes medicine every day.
It's a wholly new experience for me.
I have the same opinion.
Some people think it's a bad idea.
He said he would call tomorrow.
He is very sensitive to cold.
He doesn't look his age.
I was forced to start everything from the beginning, and that wasn't pleasant.
Tom waited inside.
Tom tried again.
Tom became serious.
Tom stopped smiling.
I want you to read it.
Up until now, they've been good neighbors.
Everybody knew Tom was in trouble.
Do you think Tom will forgive me?
These clothes are too small for her.
Work began almost immediately.
He stayed at his aunt's house.
You cannot kill yourself by holding your breath.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I'm calm.
My father hasn't gone abroad even once.
My girlfriend was crying.
When her neighbours were ill, she asked a doctor to give them some medicine.
She punched him in the face.
I didn't shoot anybody.
I'd like a beer.
I hope you have a happy future ahead of you.
Tom is loyal to his wife.
Please ask him to call me.
Why didn't you listen to me?
Don't cry.
I'd like you to leave immediately.
She began to sing.
She likes to observe birds.
Spring is just around the corner.
Please forgive me for opening your letter by mistake.
I'm trembling out of fear.
That sounds good!
Tom wants to be famous.
Tony's voice is nice.
Only fifteen minutes.
The trees will soon be bare.
Check it again.
I am helping my grandfather.
Something like this can happen to anyone.
What is that noise?
He was sitting there with a pipe in his mouth.
He is a good man at heart.
He slapped her.
Is this your picture?
You should stop playing.
I don't like to play on the slot machines.
Don't let children play in the road.
She's always happy and smiling.
You have only to play a role.
I'm sorry, but I'm already dating someone.
He is the richest man in town.
I want to live in a quiet city where the air is clean.
Not all were satisfied.
He didn't agree to my proposal.
You look smart.
The bank refused to grant me the loan.
You look smart.
I was raised in Tokyo.
I was raised in Tokyo.
That book is full of mistakes.
He's over thirty.
He left his keys in the car.
How old do I look?
There aren't any pictures or photographs on the walls.
It is impossible to do it.
Does mankind have dominion over animals and birds?
Paul is punctual like a clock.
It cannot be described in words.
He can ride a horse.
He is in his early thirties.
I have no idea where we are.
I never have had occasion to use it.
I'm not sure if he saw it.
Who the hell are you?
I chose these shoes.
Write your address, please.
What did you want to talk to me about?
You remind me of somebody.
Tom died in prison ten years ago.
She climbed down from the roof.
Many people think that children spend too much time watching television.
I haven't read a book in my life, said Tom.
I really want to be a good teacher.
Please return the book by tomorrow.
Each evening, a nightingale sang for us.
I will explain to him until he understands.
Pardon me for saying so.
She refused to pay.
She had a rough childhood.
What did she look like?
He had no clothes other than what he was wearing.
That's how I got to know her.
Add water to the soup.
All at once, something happened.
Allow me to help.
Can you come this afternoon or tomorrow afternoon?
Can you see me after supper?
Come and see me afterwards.
Go ahead and write your letter. I'll wait.
He handled the affairs of the company badly.
He proved that actions speak louder than words.
He tried to talk to her time and time again.
He waited until ten and left shortly afterwards.
How should he be addressed, "citizen" or "comrade?"
I can't adopt your view.
I really can't afford to buy this dress.
I want to go by air if possible.
I'm afraid it's too late.
Is it all over?
My advice to you is to leave immediately.
I'll never make that mistake again.
Now is the time to act.
Send the package to this address.
She has an agreeable disposition.
The restaurant is across the street from the hotel.
They sent us to the administration office of the factory.
Tonight we are going to hear an address by our chairman.
Try once again.
Walk across the bridge.
We tried store after store, but were unable to find what we wanted.
When were you admitted to the university?
He looked up at the stars.
The left hand doesn't know what the right hand is doing.
I had a bad stomach-ache.
A white dove is on the roof.
They are in the kitchen.
My parents made me go there.
Could you please help me? I've lost an important document.
The sun is about to set.
Tom's dangerous.
You should stay here till 2:30.
Hallelujah! I've found my dog.
What the hell do you know about that?
Some people like danger.
Tom is behaving oddly.
I need your address in order to send you a present.
I saw a white bird on my way home.
He made mistake after mistake.
You made the same mistake as last time.
To make mistakes is not always wrong.
I entered someone else's room by mistake.
I'll give you a call when I get home.
Are you pleased with your new job?
I have no one to talk to.
The train was packed.
Have you got any milk?
I met her in the winter.
I'm very much aware of the danger.
Let me help you.
The prices go up after six o'clock.
You've made no allowance for the fact that he is young.
I didn't expect this result.
I bought a new bag.
What did you major in at college?
Read the article.
I met him while I was staying in Paris.
I think he's lying.
We are different heights. He is taller than me.
I will wait for you.
I hope you behaved well at school today.
No matter how hard I tried, I couldn't remember that song's title.
What an idiot you are!
He looked at me in surprise.
I was in the hospital for a week.
He was in the hospital for a week.
I cannot help laughing at the joke.
It was nice to meet you.
Two is a couple, three is a crowd.
Don't forget who you are.
She wants to marry her daughter to a doctor.
Do you like Mozart's music?
One hundred is my favorite number.
Tom took off his sunglasses.
That doesn't seem too difficult.
I don't have any time to watch TV.
I have no time to watch TV.
Let them learn from us.
Her father never let her go to town with her friends.
I owe my life to you.
Tom doesn't talk with anyone.
Did you watch TV yesterday?
The child annoyed her with questions.
I'm sure.
Tom and I went to the same high school.
Don't do something you'll regret.
She is positive of passing the test.
I don't want to lose my girlfriend.
She doesn't eat meat, does she?
Give me a call sometime.
You have a lot of problems.
My friend wants to talk to you.
Well, what do you think of me?
He had fifty dollars.
He wants to marry my daughter.
He must be a quack doctor.
I want you to come at once.
I will never forgive you.
I have to admit that you're right.
Come back in a month.
I can't believe it either.
I've finished.
I caught a big fish yesterday.
I caught a big fish yesterday.
We're all on the same team.
You're up very early this morning. Do you have something to do?
I accepted a present from his sister.
Come back tomorrow.
Milk is of great value to babies.
He doesn't like fish.
He doesn't like fish.
Where is the entrance to the museum?
My name's Cyril. Nice to meet you.
I met him the other day.
I met him the other day.
You mustn't throw litter in the street.
Are you in a bad mood?
I had hoped to meet you there.
You seem busy.
You look busy.
She has forgiven him.
She has forgiven him for everything.
I'll get used to it sooner or later.
Even though he is my neighbour, I did not know him well.
I received a letter from him to the effect that he could not accept my offer.
This coffee is undrinkable.
I said it was OK for him to go.
Do you know who sings that song?
Should I wait for you here?
Should I wait for you here?
She was very kind to everyone.
She was very kind to everyone.
I am very pleased with my new house.
I'll phone you later.
Did you ask the price?
Did you ask the price?
I like the way you talk.
Never have I seen such a beautiful picture.
She sat on the sofa, reading a magazine.
It's not important anymore.
It's not important anymore.
School starts next Monday.
The weather was gorgeous.
Why should I help you?
Why should I help you?
They won't allow us to enter the garden.
Let's drive to the lake.
He was badly wounded.
I believed what Tom told me.
I believe you've been trying to contact us.
I saw an old film featuring Charlie Chaplin yesterday.
They cannot stop him.
Children grow up very quickly.
He traveled on business.
She can sing better than anybody else in her class.
She will always be in my heart.
It's fast and fun.
When he came to, he was lying in the park.
You should have refused his offer.
Some people like summer, and others like winter.
Some people like summer, and others like winter.
Do you think I'm crazy?
Esperanto is a good language because people from different countries can use it to talk to each other.
Good music speaks for itself.
The sea is blue.
I live on this planet.
What did you eat in the afternoon?
What did you have for lunch?
Have I kept you waiting long?
You must not come into the kitchen.
I can't tell you exactly how long it will take.
I wonder why Tom didn't call me.
Wait. Don't go.
It happened at about half past four.
Georgia is called "Sakartvelo" in Georgian.
I did what I was told.
Since it was already late, I went to sleep.
The grandfather is about to die.
The sun is a star.
Good morning, said Tom with a smile.
It's completely normal.
You can take a horse to water, but you can't make him drink.
You are very fortunate that you have such friends.
We will return sooner or later.
This water is odourless.
This water is odourless.
I don't talk to him anymore.
I don't talk to her anymore.
Tom eats a lot of fish.
I knew you'd like it.
I'll prove it to you.
She's neither in the kitchen nor in the living room.
She's a bad liar.
She'll like this game.
The doctor ordered me to stay in bed.
What a fool I was!
She liked it.
No smoking.
Don't drink out of my glass.
Do you have a pet?
How many lakes are there in Finland?
She left her keys in the car.
Almost no one believed her.
I must speak to him.
I have to talk to him.
I have to talk to her.
You're lying, aren't you?
McClellan wasted no time.
Don't let your feelings show.
You will soon get accustomed to your new school.
Are you for or against the proposal?
Are you for or against the proposal?
She took part in our project.
I am a famous actor.
What tempted him to propose to her?
I don't want to write with this pen.
Look, I don't want to lose my job.
If you had a million dollars, what would you do?
He seemed to like that.
Tom is helping his wife.
We're both students.
I lost sight of her in the crowd.
Tom got a phonecall from the hospital.
It's not a matter of price.
Yes, this title is to be quoted.
I love your garden.
You have no right to open this box.
I advanced the hands on the clock.
If you allow me to speak, I'll be able to explain everything.
I will never forgive him.
I will never forgive her.
I will give you a call tomorrow night.
I bought a pen, but I lost it.
Tell me which one to choose.
Hold on a second, I'll be right back. Don't hang up!
Do you like summer?
She loves flowers.
She loves flowers.
He was very pleased with the result.
Watch carefully.
He did the right thing.
Nobody but you can make me happy.
Have you been smoking?
He is the best for this project.
She loves nightclubs.
He gave me a present.
He left everything to chance.
Try this!
Who had this idea?
Fire is very dangerous.
Somebody stepped on his foot.
I returned his book to him.
I don't believe you. You're always lying.
A man can be happy with any woman, as long as he does not love her.
Holy cow!
Ikeda is my last name, and Kazuko is my first name.
I don't understand this sentence.
Did she like the film? - "Yes, she did."
I'm walking in the park.
Tom is reading a novel.
Tom was shot twice in the chest.
I will make her happy.
Do you think he still wants to marry me?
People like to talk.
There is no happy love.
Can I have some more milk?
Where can I obtain a map of Europe?
This book is so easy that even a child can read it.
She listened to music for hours.
He said he would give us his decision for sure by Friday.
My friends went to the cinema without me.
As soon as I've finished doing that, I'll help you.
I can't believe your mom let you go.
He has lost interest in politics.
I'm busy right now.
I'm occupied right now.
I'm not talking to you.
I forgot my briefcase.
I heard the children's happy voices.
God sent a sign.
Did you find your keys?
We were afraid.
Every man has his price.
Every man has his price.
I met her by chance.
It's been a pleasure talking to you.
She won't like this.
The rich are not always happier than the poor.
What have we got to lose?
Do you think she will like that?
That isn't convenient for me.
I'm not sure about it.
No one asked for your opinion.
We bought some vegetables and fish at the market.
There isn't any hope.
Her hair is dry.
Let's hope times change.
Promise me you won't tell her.
Promise me you won't tell him.
We will wait for you there.
Her cheeks were burning.
No one man can answer what's the meaning of life; this question stands before all mankind.
Maybe I'm just a fool.
Are you content?
Are you happy?
Tom doesn't run as fast as Bill.
Japan is famous for Mt. Fuji.
I met my friend on the street.
I'd like you to translate this book into English.
How old is your daughter?
What's your daughter's name?
I don't want you to change.
She's made up her mind and refuses to be talked out of it.
She was approaching thirty when I first met her.
She was approaching thirty when I first met her.
I spent three years in prison.
You should have seen that movie last night.
How many sentences did you translate on Tatoeba?
Foxes are wild animals.
A friend of mine is studying abroad.
A good idea came to mind.
Churches were erected all over the island.
She felt like crying.
She felt like crying.
Spring came.
She forced me to do it.
Please do not try this at home.
What would you do, if you lost your job?
I can't believe you said that.
I didn't see anybody following us.
Life here is much easier than it used to be.
I thought we'd be safe here.
She is used to living alone.
They eat fish on Fridays.
How about tomorrow?
Are you fucking stupid?
Are you fucking stupid?
That is the essence of the matter.
He said he was suffering from a bad headache.
She doesn't wear the cheap stuff.
The committee was composed entirely of young teachers.
That's for you to decide.
Don't go in there.
His story is well worth listening to.
I would like to talk with you again.
No one believed me.
It's beautiful weather today.
Don't leave your stuff behind.
Tom made me do it.
Don't even joke about it.
The school is closed.
He's happy.
A look of contentment appeared on his face.
Give me your impression of this book.
I was horrified.
Wood burns easily.
He is considered to be a highly qualified employee.
What's your full name?
We grow vegetables in our garden.
Tom is an adult.
I can't believe we're doing this.
I haven't read any of his letters.
The President refused to answer the question.
I'd like you to meet my wife.
A lot of soldiers died here.
I met an old friend by chance.
Do you want to come in?
Please bring me a glass of water.
We promised.
What do you want to talk about?
I want to watch what's on TV right now.
I'm sure you're busy.
Do you have any cheaper rooms?
Make a circle and hold hands.
Please open your bag.
Get out of bed.
Is this the reason you didn't want me to come?
Is this the reason you didn't want me to come?
They are pleased with your work.
This is the house where my father was born and brought up.
I must finish this work first.
I bet five dollars that he will not come.
I want you to take a look at this.
If I were rich, I'd go abroad.
I will call on him tomorrow.
Which floor do you live on?
She is kind to old people.
How did Tom manage to do that?
Judging from the look on his face, it seems that he has succeeded.
I wanted to disappear.
You must decide whether you will go by train or by plane.
We must do all we can to make Tom happy.
I'm glad to have this opportunity to speak to you.
She took a taxi to the museum.
I am used to living alone.
Isn't life wonderful?
A politician should serve the people.
He can't sing.
I will make you happy.
I'd be delighted if they asked me to give a speech.
She is dressed in white.
She was dressed in white.
Yumi is happy, isn't she?
Thank you so much for inviting me.
He picked up a handkerchief from the floor.
Attention! The walls have ears.
I'm a member of the team.
I'll pack.
I want to punch you in your face.
You must face your fears.
I've been wounded with a knife.
She is his present wife.
Leave her alone.
Rabbits have long ears and short tails.
You must do it at once.
How many hours a day does she spend in the kitchen?
You don't have a clue.
They're just students.
The American troops held their ground.
Do you need a car?
You'll get used to it soon.
These flowers have a really nice fragrance.
He felt that he was being used.
I didn't like the way she talked to people.
Most cars have clear glass.
It's dead.
I like to sleep on my stomach.
The house belongs to him.
A horse! A horse! My kingdom for a horse!
Thank God I am an atheist.
She is very angry with me.
It's natural for family members to help each other.
I'm sure you'll find a good job.
Your glasses fell on the floor.
When he finished speaking, everyone was silent.
You're sure there's no way?
My father gave me a watch, but I lost it.
Let me take a gander.
Here is the hospital where I was born.
Here is the hospital where I was born.
He wants to talk to you.
I cannot meet him out. It's raining.
The dogs were happy.
After he finished supper, he began to read the novel.
We helped each other.
Everybody loves my cat.
I was too happy to sleep.
The population of Japan is about 120 million.
That was an error.
That was a mistake.
This box is light enough to carry.
He arrived too early.
I do not like wearing anybody else's clothes.
I do not like wearing anybody else's clothes.
This is the hospital where Tom was born.
D.H. Lawrence is a novelist and poet.
Mind your manners.
This is an important step.
It's an important step.
He hired some new workers.
Akiko has an aunt whose name is Hana.
I wonder what happened to him.
I wonder what happened to her.
I already called him.
Iceland used to belong to Denmark.
Please keep me informed.
They had no idea what to expect.
Not every bird can sing.
I am sure of his victory.
There are lots of risky places in London.
Happy Thanksgiving!
May you both be happy!
He will end up in jail.
We haven't tried the drug out on humans yet.
The novel has sold almost 20,000 copies.
Time doesn't pass or go away, time remains inside us.
I feel a lot better now.
We'll all die sooner or later.
I wouldn't be so sure about that.
My father doesn't lift a finger at home.
That's my favorite movie.
They would have to move fast.
Did you call anyone else?
You were scared, weren't you?
He'll never forgive me.
Can't you see I'm busy?
Thanks for adding me to your list of friends.
Are there many flowers in the garden?
We've finished the work, so we may as well go home.
He lay down on the bed.
He ignored me.
Don't throw a stone at a cat.
It's a joke.
We didn't kill anyone.
I haven't met him before.
As soon as I can figure out how to send money, I'll send you some.
She called me many times.
I want to read this book.
I think he's happy.
Where are my clothes?
Are you sure you're not tired?
I don't want to marry you.
I wrote a song for you.
I don't regret anything.
I don't have any regrets.
He shrugged his shoulders.
I don't want to go to jail.
I will lead you to further victories.
She always got up early.
Tom didn't even cry.
Wow! What a big box!
The shirt is dirty.
I'm not too busy.
I'm not too busy.
I haven't all that experience.
Am I making lots of mistakes?
Read the article on page two.
She has beautiful rosy cheeks.
His question challenged us to think.
Language can be used in many ways.
He behaves very naturally.
He behaved in a strange manner.
The policeman seized the boy by the arm.
Mary likes watching TV.
She called him on the phone.
I did that work on the orders of my boss.
Things are going to change.
Some people traveled by train, and others by road.
Do you think he still thinks about me?
I have a lot of friends to help me.
Learning French is difficult.
He stopped smoking for the sake of his health.
This magazine is widely read.
This problem is only of secondary importance.
She wears beautiful clothes.
You did the right thing.
I found the glass empty.
You don't look happy.
This imbecile has sharp teeth.
Would you say it once more?
I have no time to engage in political activity.
Will you marry me?
I don't like being asked to go shopping.
Show it to me on the map.
He'll be married next Sunday.
You piss me off!
Unfortunately, I don't have time today.
I talked to everybody.
Wait here till he comes back.
I sent this letter to grandfather.
The winter has been very cold.
Tom avoided places where people smoked.
Come on up here.
Just let me see it.
Leave me alone or I'll call the police.
This sentence has five words.
He was drunk and angry.
Ignore it.
Give me the key.
Give me the key.
I'd like to know how to send money to France.
I not only gave him some advice, I also gave him a fellatio.
Tom was wearing a bulletproof vest, so the bullet didn't kill him.
He woke up in the middle of the night.
I don't have the desire to tell him the truth.
Eating ice cream always puts me in a happy mood.
I found the photo you were looking for.
It’s my pleasure to come to UTE-HCM.
Can you clean the mess up?
This is the hottest summer we have had in fifty years.
The sun is about to set.
The sun is about to set.
A boat suddenly appeared out of the mist.
Even though he was sick, he went to school.
One of my suitcases is missing.
An automobile has four wheels.
She likes my jokes.
There's another way.
They're students.
You're not my type.
You're not my type.
I don't censor your articles.
That is her car.
It wasn’t in Paris that we met.
Did you like the movie?
Her skin is whiter than snow.
You've come too early.
You've come too early.
I wonder if you ever think of me.
I can't stand him.
I can't put up with that noise any longer.
The house whose roof is green is mine.
Tom is a happy man.
A living dog is better than a dead lion.
Is money important for me?
Tom died in an airplane accident.
He served his king faithfully.
The value of the dollar began to drop.
I liked this movie.
Rise up, take up thy bed, and walk.
I hope you're right.
I hope you're right.
I hope you're correct.
He's always short of money.
Do you have any light beer?
What would you like to drink? "A dry martini."
We often hear you sing.
The movie starts at ten o'clock.
I'm sorry I'm calling you at work.
He has money, but he's not happy.
I know he left for London.
There are some foreign workers in my company as well.
My father often helps me with my homework.
I can't find the knife.
I want to have his only daughter for my wife.
He's rich and powerful.
She has three kids.
Ankara is the capital of Turkey.
He knows neither French nor German.
I really hope so.
Hospitals are very expensive.
He has bad eyesight.
I want you to read this letter.
You are a student.
Yes, with pleasure.
We won't forgive you.
What will the neighbours say?
I don't like summer.
I must get this work finished by next Tuesday.
The road was wet from the rain.
Why didn't you call me last night?
I'd like to spend less time at work and more time at home.
You're drunk!
I can't believe it's really you.
You're my only joy.
Do you think he is a good driver?
She helped us with pleasure.
He's a sophomore.
Are you sure we've never met before?
I want you to run to the store for me.
Don't talk in the classroom.
Let's beat it before it gets too late.
They laughed at his mistake.
Why did she come home early?
Do you expect me to believe you?
This sentence has seven words in it.
Are you a student?
They argued that the earth is round.
Leave my things alone.
Could you close the window, please?
I don't know where my keys are.
She would never own up to a mistake.
Are you in a hurry?
Are you seriously thinking about buying that old car?
We sometimes make mistakes.
We sometimes make mistakes.
I am already forgetting my grandmother's face.
Are you sure of your answer?
Wait!
I returned home by train.
She is wearing a green robe.
Rain or snow, out you go.
You have absolutely nothing to fear.
She makes me happy.
He didn't have a single pen.
I will never forget the day when I first met him.
He laid his bag on the table.
That's a woman's job.
It's 9:15.
I'll send you home in my car.
It seems to me that the pictures speak for themselves.
Which do you prefer, spring or autumn?
Everyone is happy.
There are many interesting people in the world.
He is studying at Kyoto University.
I bought him a magazine.
I'm not sure about it.
I hope you understand.
Can you explain to me why you refused his offer?
Release him!
You don't have enough experience.
I brought you flowers.
I brought you flowers.
Boys will be boys.
I'd like a room in the corner of the building.
He lost everything.
Everyone is happy.
You had better give up smoking for your health.
I'll send my man to you with the letter.
We wanted to speak to the president of the company, but he refused to speak to us.
Although the proposal seemed like a good idea, they refused it.
You look surprised.
The most famous supermarket is also the most expensive.
I thought I was happy.
I thought I was happy.
After a succession of warm days, the weather became cold.
I lost my phone.
Where are my wings?
I lost the watch.
Take off your clothes!
I'm as old as you.
It's not far from here.
Where do you use French?
Do you think that I should go talk to her?
My neighbor's dog is dead.
Collect your thoughts before you begin your work.
We are having a mild winter.
Do you want to go to church with me, Daudi? "No, father. I don't want to today. I'll go by myself tomorrow."
A year has twelve months.
They formed a new government.
You're in danger.
Speaking Esperanto is so easy that sometimes it requires a real effort.
You'll be asked why you want to be a teacher.
She is helping him.
Get me a glass of milk.
Did you already do your homework?
Give me the pen.
She doesn't know who built these houses.
At last, we got to the lake.
At that time, we were quite rich.
The television set will stop being the most important member of the family.
I haven't read the book you're talking about.
What time do you usually get up?
He let me go.
Nobody will believe you.
He helped me do my homework.
No one will believe you.
I'm sorry, I didn't recognize you.
I'm sorry, I didn't recognize you.
The more you study, the more you know.
My father has gone to America.
Do you really think this is a good idea?
Autumn is here.
They will be safe with me.
Whose idea was it to pitch the tent here?
You should set off as soon as possible.
I just want you to be happy.
I just want you to be happy.
I just want you to be happy.
I don't know what she thinks about me.
I haven't slept in forty-eight hours.
Don't make mistakes!
They are hardly likely to come at this late hour.
She kept me waiting thirty minutes.
He came again after a week.
I hope Tom didn't see that.
The dogs are in the garden.
The dogs are in the garden.
I rang the bell and waited.
I rang the bell and waited.
I rang the bell and waited.
A girl approached the king from among the crowd.
A girl approached the king from among the crowd.
I'll never forgive myself.
What were you like when you were fifteen?
She might have met him yesterday.
She might have met him yesterday.
I got married eight years ago.
My father is a teacher.
Don't get up.
There is a television in my room.
We must stand up for our rights.
A horse is an animal.
I think that this is important.
I think it's a bad idea.
I can't believe he did that.
I can't believe she did that.
I bear no grudge against you.
They've been caught.
My dog often lies on the grass.
Can I get to know you?
As their conversation was in French, I could not understand a word.
As their conversation was in French, I could not understand a word.
You may invite any person you like.
Have you done with the book?
Have you done with the book?
Have you done with the book?
Start singing.
Start singing.
I know it's not a joke.
I know that's impossible.
It was seven thirty.
He watched the game with his arms folded.
You ask questions about everything.
Please understand my position.
I'm sure that he'll succeed.
He has a few pens.
I am forbidden to use this telephone.
I am forbidden to use this telephone.
My mother's brother's wife is my aunt.
My mother's brother's wife is my aunt.
No one lives in this building.
The boy is afraid to go to bed in the dark.
If you're happy, I'm happy.
You see a tall building over there.
You see a tall building over there.
Please tell me how to get to ___.
My grandfather died in the Second World War.
She suggested that I go to the store with him.
I've detected a big mistake.
Maybe you'll succeed.
Maybe you'll succeed.
It's the dead of the night.
When do you leave here?
She slowly lost hope.
She slowly lost hope.
I frequently recall my happy childhood.
Classes start tomorrow.
I almost died a year and a half ago.
I regret that I couldn't go with her.
They decided to build a bridge.
My father is rich.
Everyone hoped that she would win.
Your lips are blue.
It reminds me of something!
It looks like he died from asphyxiating himself.
I'm leaving you tomorrow.
Give me a different example.
He let her go.
They don't help.
I must leave here today.
They're very poor.
Tom wanted to talk with you.
I promise not to tell Tom.
I'm your neighbor.
The train was full, so she was obliged to travel second-class, and had to stand all the way.
How long does this train stop there?
I can't use this machine.
Who's your favorite character in this book?
How much is it per box?
I don't like this song.
I don't remember when I first met him.
I don't remember when I first met him.
I don't remember when I first met him.
Doesn't that smell good?
How fast Bill runs!
No man lives in the building.
You're dreaming.
You're dreaming.
I'll call for you at three.
Tom wasn't expecting anybody.
We’ll leave at eight o’clock.
I spent last Sunday reading novels.
I'm a bit hungry.
I want to be as happy as Tom.
Do you want me to check again?
My grandmother has a twin brother.
I had doubts.
Some students like English, and others like physics.
Go on with your story. That is so interesting!
She accepted his hand in marriage.
He talked about her illness.
Has Europe lost its soul?
There used to be a church here.
At last, they experienced the joy of victory.
It is very interesting to listen to him.
Tom needs a sharp knife.
I think I can prove it.
Trusting yourself is the key to success.
When did you buy your car?
I see your cat in the garden.
Great weather, isn't it?
Nobody will believe that rumor.
He grew up in a little village.
My mother loves music.
That's a church.
Let's speak English.
She doesn't like music. "Nor do I."
There's a big fly on the ceiling.
He cannot be saved.
He lost his father at sea.
Water is important.
Both girls wear white suits.
Brian looks blue.
I don't want to live on this planet anymore.
I'm afraid of losing you.
The map is on the wall.
I do want to learn!
I do want to learn!
His parentage was unknown to us.
She heard him cry.
She heard him cry.
I'm not hurting your animals.
What's your favorite Beatles song?
Great Britain consists of Wales, England, and Scotland.
Could you tell me your name again?
Could you tell me your name again?
This winter has been mild.
Hospitals are very expensive.
Call the police!
His mother looks young for her age.
The movie was interesting.
People under 18 do not marry.
Because I was too busy.
Can I borrow your pen?
Can I catch a taxi here?
Call me at six-thirty, please.
His old cat is still alive.
Can I borrow some money from you?
I'm born in the U.S.S.R.
I met him in Tokyo by chance.
I met him in Tokyo by chance.
I met him in Tokyo by chance.
I met him in Tokyo by chance.
I'll call you up again in an hour.
We lost our cat and Tom found it for us.
I became acquainted with your father yesterday.
They couldn't judge me.
With the help of my friends I learn a whole bunch of new and interesting things.
Tom is breathing hard.
She expected him to take the bribe.
We all make mistakes.
Did your wish come true?
Did your wish come true?
We'll wait.
I'd like to make a call to Japan.
I am going to buy a new car.
Tom wanted you to think he'd left town.
You shall judge of a man by his foes as well as by his friends.
I get up early.
Everyone was listening very carefully.
These stories are very interesting to me.
These stories are very interesting to me.
These stories are very interesting to me.
Look out! There's a hole in the road.
You decide.
Shake my hand.
Shake my hand.
He called me up almost every day.
How many people climbed Mount Everest?
There are 1000 pupils in my school.
Has somebody a good idea?
She had lived in five different countries.
Please do this immediately.
I'm a good teacher.
I did everything automatically.
I did everything automatically.
Do you think you could make it before lunch?
Don't be a spoilsport.
We have to gather information.
My daughter is a tomboy.
I'm feeling cold.
Have you seen my keys?
Can't you see that we're speaking?
My hand is in warm water.
She let the secret out.
You have no idea.
I am accustomed to cold weather.
Quiet music was heard in the room we entered.
There's an interesting article in this magazine about education problems.
That was such good a book that I read it three times.
That was such good a book that I read it three times.
I called him, but the line was busy.
That was such good a book that I read it three times.
You know, I came across him in the street the other day, we stopped to chat.
Is there anything important?
This is an ancient law.
Children were running to and fro in the park.
Please choose one person.
Close your eyes, please.
He will arrive on the afternoon of the 5th.
She bought him a car.
She was panting.
I set myself realistic goals.
He lost his most beloved son.
Things changed.
Please come in.
I met a friend I hadn't seen for three years.
When the father came home, I watched TV.
Can you believe that?
Can you believe that?
Can you believe this?
Japan has a lot of beautiful mountains.
I have a suggestion for you.
I noticed her hands shaking.
It wasn't his idea.
I just want to talk with you a little while.
This was a bad idea.
The doctor didn't allow me to go out.
I'll be very busy next month.
I'll be very busy next month.
She will arrive in Tokyo at the beginning of next month.
I'll see you next month.
I'll see you next month.
Copenhagen is the capital of Denmark.
I suppose you won't mind if I take one.
She was satisfied with the result.
Can I have a bit more milk?
A new idea came to me.
Why do people kill themselves?
It's the best way to solve the problem.
Are you satisfied with the result?
Are you satisfied with the result?
Are you satisfied with the result?
You should give up drinking and smoking.
You should give up drinking and smoking.
You should give up drinking and smoking.
I'd like to know the exact time.
At least they should have a map.
At least they should have a map.
Are you Tom by any chance?
You must not smoke while working.
You must not smoke while working.
He wants to meet you.
He wants to meet you.
I'm sorry. I know I shouldn't have done that.
I'm sorry. I know I shouldn't have done that.
Please wait a little while longer.
Are you always busy?
Are you finished yet?
Why do you keep saying there's ample time?
You've probably seen that already.
Could I have another glass of beer?
She rejected his offer of help.
Let me alone.
My knowledge of French doesn't amount to much.
May I have some fresh cold milk?
Welcome to the Wild West.
Where does your grandpa live?
The company abandoned that project.
The company abandoned that project.
Would you take part in the project?
Would you take part in the project?
Would you take part in the project?
Would you take part in the project?
Would you take part in the project?
There were various objects in the room.
I don't want to go anywhere tonight.
I'm not wide awake yet.
Is Tom awake yet?
It's thirty kilometers away.
On the average, I go to the movies once a week.
That kind of story appeals to me.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
I thought I'd be safe here.
He talked to himself.
The old man sometimes talks to himself.
I think you're probably right.
I think you're probably right.
I think you're probably right.
Tom is shorter than average.
We're giving this away for free.
Your plan requires a large amount of money.
You made it.
Here's the address.
I like to walk in the mountains.
It is said that she is seriously ill.
Few politicians admit their mistakes.
Do you see a star?
We should keep moving.
This policy resulted in a great rise in prices.
The best way to know what a country is like is to go and see it with your own eyes.
The best way to know what a country is like is to go and see it with your own eyes.
Sixty minutes make an hour, and a minute is made up of sixty seconds.
Money counts for much in political circles.
Money counts for much in political circles.
Money counts for much in political circles.
I quit smoking three years ago.
Who's your French teacher?
Now sit down.
Now sit down.
The price will not come down.
Are you afraid of the dark?
Are you afraid of the dark?
Tom and Jim are the same height.
I think you're in danger.
Air is to men what water is to fish.
Call me when you're ready to go.
She asked me how old I was.
I haven't read the final page of the novel yet.
At last, they met face to face.
At last, they met face to face.
At last, the truth became known to us.
We decided to leave him alone for a while.
You should try to be more polite.
Wild animals live in the forest.
I think you lied to me.
I think you look fine.
When Tom woke up, he found that Mary had disappeared.
I can't lend you any money.
I cannot let them catch me.
I cannot let them catch me.
I can't let you.
I can't let you.
I can't permit this.
I can't allow that.
I can't let you in.
I am not a doctor, but a teacher.
I had to go there alone.
He succeeded, not because he made efforts, but because he happened to be lucky.
Please inform me of any change in his condition.
Tom turned his back on them and left the room.
Whose kid is that?
It's never too late to start learning foreign languages.
I'm dangerous.
I'm dangerous.
I'm very busy these days!
I'm very busy these days!
I can't believe we're really living here.
Dick forced me to agree with his plan.
Dick talks as if he knew everything.
Did you phone Tom?
I have a lot of confidence in you.
Many of my friends can speak French.
I can dispense with her help.
Meet me in the bar.
We should deposit this money in a bank.
What's your basis for saying this?
I think you know that's not a good idea.
I think you know that's not a good idea.
I think you know that's not a good idea.
I think you know that's impossible.
There was a steady increase in population.
Tom watches TV all the time.
A good start is half the work.
He had returned to England forever.
He left Japan for good.
He left Japan for good.
I think you have a problem, Tom.
I think you did the right thing.
Did you call him up yesterday?
Did you come by train?
I didn't like my teacher.
Did you complete the work?
This word doesn't exist in French.
Did you enjoy the game?
Did you find your keys?
That house is much better than this.
Did you have a nice summer?
It doesn't matter, right?
There was food enough for us all.
There was food enough for us all.
I think we've got a problem.
I think we're safe here.
I think we're safe here.
I see your cat in the garden.
All the flowers in the garden are yellow.
All the flowers in the garden are yellow.
They loved to spend all day playing together.
You may take either the big box or the small one.
I think it was a mistake that you didn't take my advice.
Winter is gone.
He tried writing a short story.
He tried writing a short story.
Where is the end of this line?
There is no shortcut to success.
There is no shortcut to success.
You don't have to help me.
Okay. Sorry.
I declined for personal reasons.
Did you invite him?
Did you let Tom drive your car?
Did you see my father?
Did you telephone him?
Did you watch TV last week? "No, I didn't."
Everyone began to laugh.
He gave the cat milk.
He died when he was 54 years old.
Tom tried to kill me.
Queen Elizabeth I passed away in 1603.
How tall is your brother?
He is a pleasant person.
You don't have to respond.
The key is on the table.
He addressed himself to the reporters.
I went to bed very late.
Please make my bed.
Tom didn't blame us for what we said.
Tom took the blame for their mistake.
Tom has left town.
Tom woke up.
It would have been better if you had waited yesterday.
Let the matter rest for the time being.
I have difficulty breathing.
Step aside.
Step aside.
Do you often travel abroad?
She handed me a sheet of paper.
She handed me a sheet of paper.
Do I have to do it right away?
He died a few hours later.
She went to sleep and never woke up.
Children and drunks don't lie.
I said I would make her happy.
Give up smoking if you want to live long.
I will wait outside.
It was obviously a joke.
Somebody's watching us.
It took me five hours to finish the work.
The topic is happiness.
What do you think of the new teacher?
A cat ran after a mouse.
A cat ran after a mouse.
A cat ran after a mouse.
What are you saying, God be with you!
You must talk with him about the matter.
Stop hitting your brother.
I met him on the street the other day.
I seized the cat by the neck.
I seized the cat by the neck.
It would be a mistake.
Tom thought he was a goner.
Do you have a map of the city of Kyoto?
Do you have a map of the city of Kyoto?
Do you have a map of the city of Kyoto?
I can't forgive any of you.
I thought I told you never to call me.
Please wait a bit.
Please wait a bit.
If you want to come back, I'll understand.
If you want to come back, I'll understand.
Take me away from here.
When are you going to quit smoking?
This is the sentence which I can't translate.
She wants to engage in teaching.
Tom punched somebody.
Tom found the drawer empty.
Tom found the drawer empty.
Tom took a knife out of a drawer in the kitchen.
Tom took a knife out of a drawer in the kitchen.
Tom took a knife out of a drawer in the kitchen.
Tom took a knife out of a drawer in the kitchen.
Tom opened the drawer.
I put it in the drawer.
I put it in the box.
I put it in the drawer.
I usually go to the cinema with my friends.
My grandmother raised a family of ten.
Tom has confessed.
It was all for nothing.
They shook hands.
His books are interesting.
The window to the world can be covered by a newspaper.
Mother has gone to the market.
She wrote a book about birds.
It sounds strange, but it's true.
How can we save the earth?
I can't stop thinking about her.
Do you go to school by bus?
Do you have a pen? "Yes, I have one."
She simply stared at me in amazement and went away without saying a word.
I owe my life to you.
What are the dimensions of the room?
I think we're being followed.
We have to move very carefully.
You must act more wisely.
I think we were lucky.
I think we should wait.
I think we should talk about this now.
I think we should talk about this later.
Ideas do not belong to anyone, they float in the air.
Don't forget to call me up tonight.
I expect to be called away soon.
Please return these books by Saturday.
The fire's blazing nicely now.
This happened purely by accident.
We met by chance the other day.
Will you call for me at the hotel?
He began to cry loudly.
She began to cry in a loud voice.
What is the largest mountain in Japan?
I think we need to talk.
It is a good idea to read this book.
It is a good idea to read this book.
The policeman spoke to a man on the street.
The policeman spoke to a man on the street.
Do you have nothing to say?
Do you know how to use this camera?
Sometimes I go by bus and sometimes by car.
I'll go to Tokyo by train.
How tall is he?
Farm prices had fallen fifty-five percent.
I'm old enough to drink.
For God's sake, get me out of here!
I am in the habit of taking a shower in the morning.
Don't take it so seriously.
My father named me after his aunt.
My father named me after his aunt.
Maybe you ought to just calm the hell down, my brother.
I am meeting my mother at the station at 4 o'clock.
She looked at him with a smile on her face.
She made him rich.
Do you know the name of this flower?
I don't like losing.
Is this your favorite song?
This is a violation of the law.
I think Tom liked it.
I'll be thirsty.
We'll be thirsty.
Please behave honestly.
I'm at work now, so I'll call you later.
In the summer, I wear short-sleeve shirts.
Have you finished the work yet?
Have you finished the work yet?
Have you done all your homework?
Have you done all your homework?
Tom, I want you to listen to this.
Nobody moves!
I can't stand the noise from the street.
We add examples in languages we know.
The lake is a long way from here.
She looks like her aunt.
His family really loves watching television every day.
She has no clue who she's with.
I don't particularly want to see the game.
What's in your suitcase?
Do you like music?
Is there a knife in the kitchen?
It took me some time to calm down.
We have had clear weather all week.
I think we have a problem.
I think we found the problem.
Are you busy?
What should I do in this situation?
What should I do in this situation?
What should I have done in that situation?
What should I have done in that situation?
What should I have done in that situation?
Are you busy?
He laughed until tears filled his eyes.
I want to be a teacher.
I'm almost sure.
What kind of stain is that?
Don't call her now.
Don't call him now.
I was busy all day.
Snow reminds me of my hometown.
The houses stand near to each other.
Tom didn't look very good.
The museum is closed Sundays.
This seat has a clear view of the stage.
We'll leave as soon as the weather clears up.
Tom pointed out some problems.
Tom wasn't expecting it.
Where did you put my keys?
She closed her eyes.
Do you think that dress suits her?
The window opened.
Stop it.
That's for you to decide.
I promise I'll call.
They made me do it.
He made me do it.
We cannot turn back.
The principal theme of the book is the American Revolution.
Tom can speak both French and English.
We translated the novel from Japanese to English.
How long did it take to do that?
Yes. You're absolutely right.
When does the magazine come out?
Who knows what all this will come to.
Tom made the same mistake again.
Tom made the same mistake again.
A good idea came across his mind at the last moment.
A good idea came across her mind at the last moment.
A good idea came across his mind at the last moment.
A good idea came across her mind at the last moment.
Please don't run in the classroom.
She said she was happy.
I can't believe I'm here again.
Do you think this book is worth reading?
I love his daughter.
I love her daughter.
It's up one floor.
That's fun.
He is dead.
I found her in tears in her room.
I slept with my clothes on.
You're right about that.
You're right about that.
He has recently returned from France.
You're killing me.
You're killing me.
I usually go to market on Friday.
I usually go to market on Friday.
I usually got up at five in those days.
I usually go home at four.
I know every word on this page.
How was your summer?
I'll call my husband.
I'll call my husband.
Where do you watch television?
This year is an important year for me.
This year is an important year for me.
The facts became known to everyone.
The facts became known to everyone.
Please show me another example.
The goods arrived yesterday.
Just ignore him.
Your daughter is not a child any more.
Your daughter is not a child any more.
He hoped to succeed.
Everyone makes mistakes sometimes.
Everyone makes mistakes sometimes.
I have got acquainted with them.
Do you like eating fish?
Do you like eating fish?
Would you like to travel abroad?
The circumstances did not allow me to go abroad.
He goes abroad every year.
She is keen to go abroad.
My father will not be busy tomorrow.
One million people lost their lives in the war.
One million people died in the war.
The team was divided into smaller groups.
Be sure to complete the work before you go home.
This concerns you.
Tom isn't used to living in the city.
What company do you represent?
Does he like music? "Yes, he does."
We're dreaming about coming back to our apartment.
I plan to go to the movies.
I'm going to go to the movies.
We'll meet at the station at nine o'clock.
Someone caught me by the arm.
I'm sure he's alive.
I didn't do my homework.
What is your planet like?
Do you have a subway map?
I'll call my husband.
I'll call my husband.
Don't fall off!
You cannot please everyone.
I was watching TV.
He left me the keys.
She left me the keys.
Don't lose heart.
Tom is facing a few serious problems.
I saw this movie a very long time ago.
I have seen that film long ago.
I saw the movie five times.
I saw the movie five times.
I have a lot of homework today.
I like that movie too.
Don't fail to write to me.
She fell down the ladder.
He approached and fell on his knees.
He approached and fell on his knees.
I am watching wild birds.
I am watching wild birds.
Fish live in the sea.
Fish live in the sea.
After I watched TV, I went to bed.
I belong to the sailing club.
She forgot that she bought him a present.
He's almost always in the hospital.
Did you hear that sound?
Everybody thinks I'm dead.
I dream in French.
Everybody's safe.
Tom won't let you go.
Tom won't let you go.
I must confess I haven't read it yet.
There are fifteen people here, counting the guests.
I'm a French teacher.
This room is not suitable for sleeping.
He forgot buying a present for her.
She admitted that I was right.
He admitted that I was right.
Finally, I'm done with this work.
Don't forget your bag.
Don't forget your things.
Won't you come over to my place?
Why don't you come over to my place?
You could at least say "thank you".
She was carrying the baby on her back.
Don't hurry, he added.
They would never meet again.
Your idea seems to be similar to mine.
Why is your cat so big?
What did he draw on the blackboard?
I don't like your behavior.
He shook thousands of hands.
Our plans for tomorrow depend on the weather.
I'd like to send this by registered mail.
I'd like to send this by registered mail.
I think there's hope for you yet.
I think there's hope for you yet.
Tom stayed calm.
Tom stayed calm.
Tom didn't believe me.
Tom became a Japanese citizen.
Tom is pretty busy at the moment.
I heard something fall to the ground.
He didn't look happy.
He doesn't look happy.
Give it a shot.
Then we decided to leave everything as it was, in its place - let him study where he wants to.
Get back to work!
Get back to work!
Try to stop me.
You have never wanted to study anyway.
This is the first time I've seen her calling her husband.
I don't want to study today.
I know that some of your students don't like you.
I know that some of your students don't like you.
Who's this Tom you always talk about?
What did Tom call his daughter?
Tom woke up naked.
Let's hope she comes.
Do you think in French?
Do you think in French?
Tom is a French teacher.
I got an A in French.
Tom is good at French.
Tom is teaching me French.
I know you are rich.
I won't move.
Could you spell your name, please?
I do the best I can.
We'll go to any length to send our child to a good university.
Welcome back.
I can see a strange blue bird on the roof.
They were both naked.
I have decided to stop writing in English.
The darkness around us was pitch-black.
Her skin is white like snow.
He seems to be rich.
I have difficulty in French.
Do you read French every day?
The money disappeared.
How did they become celebrities?
I'm writing a song in French.
The boy fell from the bridge.
Please speak to me in French.
Please speak to me in French.
Please speak to me in French.
Please speak to me in French.
French is difficult, isn't it?
French is difficult, isn't it?
French is my favorite subject.
Yesterday I went to sleep at 10 PM.
I am waiting for my driver.
I have hardly any French books.
I have hardly any French books.
Not all of us can speak French.
You can't read French, can you?
You can't read French, can you?
She liked him right off.
You can't read French, can you?
Tom spoke French to me.
You can't read French, can you?
Don't leave the TV on.
I have some French books.
Can you speak French well?
Don't let Tom talk to anyone.
Tom cracked several jokes before beginning his speech.
Tom is our French teacher.
Tom taught me some French.
Tom sometimes sings in French.
For goodness' sake, don't say that!
For goodness' sake, don't say that!
How do you say "love" in French?
I don't know many words in French.
I'm expecting someone.
I'll call him tonight.
I'll call him tonight.
I hope it was worth it.
I hope it was worth it.
This is an instance of modern British life.
Now you can cross the road.
Did you study yesterday?
I left my keys on the table.
You can use it anytime.
Let's face the facts!
You've got to face the facts.
I don't want to talk.
He was too busy to notice it.
I find foreign languages very interesting.
I find foreign languages very interesting.
I'd like to study in Paris.
You should have listened to me.
You should have listened to me.
What a cute baby! Peek-a-boo!
Life is not an exact science, it is an art.
I guess you want me to leave.
Would you like to come?
Would you like to come?
We left by train.
We left by train.
You must pay attention to his advice.
You must pay attention to his advice.
He tried with all his might to lift the box.
I liked your friends.
I liked your friends.
I liked working with you.
I enjoyed working with you.
I can make that happen.
I've given up eating meat.
I can prove it.
I can prove Tom did it.
He's good looking for his age.
Do you want to be rich?
Tom got into bed.
Tom seems sick.
I didn't know anyone could move that fast.
Albert is quick at learning.
I believed you.
I believed you.
I can prove it to you.
This building is new, that one old.
What's your favorite wine?
What's your favorite wine?
We watched a movie.
I don't have anything else to add.
Does Tom live far from here?
Wake up, Tom.
Tom, wake up.
I don't know why Tom is so angry.
If Tom would smile more often, he'd probably have more friends.
I wish Tom would smile more often.
I wish Tom would smile more often.
I found the box empty.
I think you might like it.
I think you might like it.
I think you might be overreacting.
I think you might be overreacting.
I think Tom might like that.
I think it's interesting.
I think this is funny.
I'll give Tom a call.
This will never change.
They've changed.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
I'd be happy if you'd come.
She had a flower in her hand.
I got up early yesterday.
Yesterday I got up early.
In those days, I was still a student.
It is strange that he has not come yet.
She has forgiven him for everything.
I'm a student from Italy.
Tom helps me in French.
Please tell him that I called.
Griselda fell from the roof.
You knew that, right?
They won't allow it.
I tried.
Don't make any calls.
I guess Tom doesn't know.
It's on the first floor of that building.
The dog had a piece of meat in its mouth.
Tom repacked his suitcase.
You aren't quite right about that — let me explain.
We walked for a long time.
I really am busy.
I really am busy.
Don't leave a trace.
I really am very busy.
I really am very busy.
Tom forgot his key so he crawled in through the window.
We're having cold cuts for supper.
What a crazy way to run a business!
I was crying.
Do you know that crying boy?
Do you know that crying boy?
When's your birthday?
I love you and I want to marry you.
Tom has gotten married.
Tom is in jail.
I will return the book as soon as I can.
I'm not wearing that dress.
Why didn't Tom call?
I'm not even sure if this is my key.
I'm not even sure if this is my key.
I'm not even sure if this is my key.
Let's talk.
Tom didn't know it was already after 2:30.
Tom didn't know it was already after 2:30.
But of course that was a long time ago.
A new difficulty presented itself.
She didn't go shopping yesterday, did she?
They live in constant fear.
Summer has just begun.
Try to find it.
I want to be famous.
I'm talking to you!
Tom is your teacher.
Tom left on Monday.
Tom says that he's happy.
As for myself, I like spring very much. I never liked summer.
This is a good place for hunting.
This is the book I want to read.
This is the book I want to read.
How many pupils are there in your school?
Tom couldn't get the book he wanted.
I think you need to spend a little more time on your homework.
They don't want to use it.
I have to set a good example.
I have to set a good example.
Tom accepted the offer.
There is no returning to our younger days.
Her death was a great distress to all the family.
Wake up at seven, please.
Does your dress become me?
I was your age.
I was your age.
Tom gets good grades in French.
Tom knows some words in French.
Tom teaches French to children.
I like to write songs in French.
I'd like to be a French teacher.
I'd like to be a French teacher.
Tom can speak French and English.
Class doesn't begin until eight-thirty.
This looks pretty interesting, Hiroshi says.
This looks pretty interesting, Hiroshi says.
This is what I was looking for! he exclaimed.
This is what I was looking for! he exclaimed.
I wouldn't have thought I would someday look up "Viagra" in Wikipedia.
I wouldn't have thought I would someday look up "Viagra" in Wikipedia.
You'll forget about me someday.
You'll forget about me someday.
I would never have guessed that.
I would never have guessed that.
That's a good idea!
It takes me ten minutes to walk to school.
That is rather unexpected.
That is rather unexpected.
That is rather unexpected.
I wonder how long it's going to take.
We went to London last year.
Call the police!
Call the police!
He disappeared without a trace.
I have class tomorrow.
We played cards last night.
He went to Africa to see wild animals.
Do you dream in French?
Do you dream in French?
Do you write in French?
Do you write in French?
Tom can't speak French.
Tom speaks good French.
Tom always speaks French.
I have a few French books.
I know a few French songs.
I want to speak in French.
Is this good French?
Do you have any books in French?
Do you have any books in French?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
French is pretty hard, isn't it?
Is it difficult to learn French?
Tom went abroad to study French.
Please translate this into French.
Please translate this into French.
Tom has read a lot of French books.
Tom teaches me French twice a week.
What books have you read in French?
What books have you read in French?
What books have you read in French?
They ate healthier foods.
Tom gave a speech in French.
Tom refused to speak French.
Tom speaks very good French.
Everybody rushed towards Tom.
Tom loves art.
I'm guilty.
I'm guilty.
I'm lying.
I've changed.
I've changed.
I've decided.
I've decided.
Keep singing.
Keep singing.
Nobody called.
Nothing's changed.
She found a man dead.
She found a man dead.
She found a man dead.
Please listen.
Please listen.
They fear that he may be dead.
Settle down!
Is the snake alive or dead?
Somebody laughed.
Someone started screaming.
Someone's shooting.
I found, to my surprise, that she was dead.
Stop crying.
Stop crying.
Stop crying.
Stop laughing.
Stop laughing.
Stop lying.
Stop lying.
Stop lying.
Try this one.
Try this one.
Tom is healthy.
Tom's guilty.
Tom is drunk.
Tom is drunk.
Tom is famous.
Tom is famous.
Tom is weak.
Tom is weak.
Tom's dreaming.
Tom's dead.
Tom's dangerous.
Tom's crying.
How did you solve the problem?
There are three different types of people in the world: those who can count, and those who can't.
Call us.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
You shall not enter the house dressed like that.
I don't know who to ask for advice.
I don't know who to ask for advice.
What am I supposed to do with this money?
My uncle's company launched a new product last month.
May I talk to you now?
May I talk to you now?
May I talk to you now?
May I talk to you now?
What color is this?
What color is it?
Having walked for sometime, we came to the lake.
We hope to meet you at UK97.
We hope to meet you at UK97.
We hope to meet you at UK97.
We hope to meet you at UK97.
He is very a dangerous man.
He is very a dangerous man.
Whose is the book on the desk?
The plan is bound to succeed.
When I want your opinion, I'll ask for it.
When I want your opinion, I'll ask for it.
No one had any questions about the plan.
This classroom can accommodate only thirty students.
Tom is used to living alone.
He's talking in a strange way.
I found the book very interesting.
Nobody comes to my country.
Don't you want to know what it means?
If a man says he is not afraid of dying, he is either lying or is a Gurkha.
Please drive carefully.
I was nine years old when I asked my mom if Santa Claus really existed.
I go to the movies every week.
You were lying, weren't you?
I'm sorry I kept you waiting.
Give it back to me!
Who are you talking with?
I am an Earthling.
I don't need a suitcase that big.
Tom lost seventy pounds.
Let's visit Tom.
Let's take a look.
Just let me see it.
Let me look.
Let me have a look.
Let me take a look.
They made us work all day.
Most children hate school.
He often watches TV.
A good daughter will make a good wife.
The people saved their country from the enemies.
Which of you will try it first?
Which of you will try it first?
Can't we just talk this over?
She'll try it once more.
I will never make that mistake again.
Edgar Degas was luckier than many painters.
Emi looks happy.
He showed us some pictures.
She showed me the present that she had received from her boyfriend.
I received a letter in French last week.
I received a letter in French last week.
If you speak French, I won't understand.
If you speak French, I won't understand.
Tom can speak French as well as you can.
Tom can speak French as well as you can.
Tom translated the document into French.
Who can speak French better, Tom or Mary?
We usually speak to each other in French.
Unfortunately, I hardly speak any French.
Do you know whether Tom can speak French?
Do you know whether Tom can speak French?
Unfortunately, my father isn't at home.
Do you know whether Tom can speak French?
Do you know whether Tom can speak French?
Children like playing more than studying.
He'll confess, sooner or later.
Do you think he will like that?
Do you think he will like that?
The sea is blue.
This is a bag.
You are hilarious.
You are hilarious.
You are hilarious.
You are hilarious.
You are hilarious.
She has no idea what she's talking about.
He doesn't know what he's talking about.
I will give you a call as soon as I know for sure.
The cat is old.
Is the boss in a good mood today?
Is the boss in a good mood today?
But Dad won't like it.
But Dad won't like it.
She liked that.
Are you dead certain that you can do it?
I've decided to go to the theater.
It happened in the dead of night.
It's very dead around here in the summer.
This lake is very deep.
Tom dealt fairly with me.
We spent three days in the country.
Whatever you say, dear.
You won't make mistakes.
You won't make mistakes.
I went up to the roof by means of a ladder.
I went up to the roof by means of a ladder.
She was better than I expected.
He was better than I expected.
Excuse me, is Xinqiao Restaurant far from here?
Excuse me, is Xinqiao Restaurant far from here?
She's determined to become a secretary.
She's determined to become a secretary.
There was a tall tree in front of my house.
Don't let them in.
Don't let them in.
This is the final straw.
Is this gift Laura's?
I want to give you something rare.
Mom is preparing a meal in the kitchen.
They're very dangerous.
They're very dangerous.
He didn't give me much advice.
When does the game start?
I was unconscious.
I was unconscious.
I just about died laughing when I heard it.
If there are any new developments, let me know.
The lessons are getting more and more difficult.
They differ in many respects.
They're always deep in debt.
I can't stay here forever.
If you act like a child, you'll be treated like a child.
If you act like a child, you will be treated as such.
If you act like a child, you will be treated as such.
No one will believe them.
We are poor because we are honest.
Every sentence in that book is important.
Every time cigarettes go up in price, many people try to give up smoking.
Every time I go there, I meet her.
Side by side.
He will always be in my heart.
I'll do my best.
I'm sure of that.
What is done out of love always takes place beyond good and evil.
Without music, life would be a mistake.
I feel strange today and I don't understand why.
He got off the train.
I'm sorry, but I can't go with you.
I'm sorry, but I can't go with you.
What is the capital of Haiti?
Is my answer correct?
Is my answer correct?
You can't live on that island.
You can't live on that island.
This is not a good idea.
He began singing.
The store is closed Mondays.
Don't talk to me that way.
Don't talk to me that way.
Don't speak to me like that!
The degree of civilization in a society can be judged by entering its prisons.
Tom sneered.
Tom chuckled to himself.
Tom claimed he wasn't afraid.
Tom claimed that he didn't kill anybody.
Tom claimed that he saw a UFO.
Tom claims he was drunk at the time.
Tom claims he was drunk at the time.
Tom claims that he can read people's minds.
Tom claims that he can read people's minds.
Tom claims that Mary promised him the job.
Tom claimed to be Mary's son.
Tom claimed to be Mary's son.
Whose friend are you?
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
That's not difficult.
Please watch closely.
Please watch closely.
Please watch closely.
Please watch closely.
Please just listen.
Please just listen.
Please just listen.
Please just listen.
Please come inside.
Please come inside.
Please come inside.
Please come inside.
Please come back.
Please come back.
Please come back.
Please call me.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Pick him up.
Open the windows.
Open the windows.
Open the gate.
Open the gate.
Open the box.
Open the box.
Open the box.
Open the box.
Open the box.
Open the box.
Now turn around.
Now turn around.
Now try this.
Now try this.
Now try again.
Now try again.
Now try again.
Now try again.
Now drink up.
Now calm down.
Now calm down.
Nobody here smokes.
Nobody here smokes.
No one moved.
No one moved.
Look at us.
Look at us.
Let me speak.
Let me speak.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Let me guess.
Leave the key.
Leave the key.
It's their fault.
It's so obvious.
It's so hard.
It's so hard.
It's safer there.
It's our fault.
It's our duty.
It's not weird.
It's been fun.
We'll be late.
We'll be late.
We weren't invited.
We were neighbors.
How many cats are there in the garden?
How many legs does a dog have?
How many legs does a dog have?
Squirrels can run really quickly.
That's my car!
He left Japan at the end of the year.
The soldier acted bravely.
He behaved badly to his sons.
Tom doesn't want to appear weak.
Tom doesn't want to appear weak.
Can't you speak French?
Can't you speak French?
He helped my mother and my sisters.
I like how you sing.
I love the way you sing.
I love the way you treat me.
I love the way you treat me.
I love the way you treat me.
I love the way you treat me.
This glass is dirty.
Don't take that tone of voice with me.
Don't take that tone of voice with me.
The knife is dirty.
I'd like to have a knife.
I'd like to have a knife.
You never wanted to talk about it.
You never wanted to talk about it.
You never wanted to talk about it.
She's good-looking for her age.
She's good-looking for her age.
He's good looking for his age.
Do you want to talk to me or not?
Tom acknowledged his mistake.
Whose cats are these? "They are Fatima's."
Whose cats are these? "They are Fatima's."
I hope she's okay.
I hope she's okay.
I hope she's okay.
I hope she's okay.
I hope she's okay.
I hope she's okay.
She would have called me if she'd had my phone number.
She would have called me if she'd had my phone number.
Tom refused to pay his bill.
Waiting for a bus, I met my friend.
Nobody wants to be poor in my country.
He's helping me.
She's helping me.
It belongs to me now.
The glass is dirty.
I don't have a guilty conscience.
She told him that she was happy.
Everybody knows that he lost his leg in the war.
You learn quickly.
You learn quickly.
What were you dreaming about?
What were you dreaming about?
What were you dreaming about?
Who were you dreaming about?
Who were you dreaming about?
Who were you dreaming about?
They did not believe me.
She's making progress.
He's progressing.
We're making progress.
Take off your clothes.
He took off his clothes.
He took off her clothes.
He took off his clothes.
She took off her clothes.
He took off his clothes.
She took off her clothes.
I don't know who started that rumor.
He didn't believe Ben's words.
I want to speak to her.
I want you to leave my family alone.
Words cannot describe the beauty.
Words cannot describe the beauty.
All of us can speak French.
All of us can speak French.
Do you speak French every day?
Do you speak French every day?
Do you know how to speak French?
Do you know how to speak French?
Do you have any French magazines?
Do you have any French magazines?
Do you think French is difficult?
Do you think French is difficult?
Do you think French is difficult?
Do you think French is difficult?
Rest assured that I will do my best.
We're going to the cinema. Come with us.
We're going to the cinema. Come with us.
I can get anything I want.
I can get anything I want.
I get everything I want.
Some people are fools, and I am one of them.
Some people are fools, and I am one of them.
My uncle brought a new TV set for us.
My uncle brought a new TV set for us.
I don't like this kind of joke.
I shouldn't have gone home late at night by myself.
You boob! I should not have asked you.
These horses are his.
These horses are theirs.
These horses are hers.
These horses are yours.
I take the bus to work every day.
I'm important.
I'm important.
In an old castle lived a king.
I think I've met you before.
I think I've met you before.
Will you take me to the gate?
His life has completely changed when he married her.
His life has completely changed when he married her.
She clothed herself in a new suit.
What does Tom want to talk to Mary about?
Tom saw a large bird.
Tom saw a large bird.
Tom saw a large bird.
Tom saw a large bird.
She is busy right now and she can't speak with you.
She is busy right now and she can't speak with you.
She is busy right now and she can't speak with you.
She is busy right now and she can't speak with you.
I have a son and a daughter. My son is in New York, and my daughter is in London.
I have a proposal for you.
I have a proposal for you.
I have seen him quite recently.
I am eating with my bro.
I just want Tom to be happy.
I don't want Tom to help me.
Tom wanted you out of here.
Tom wanted you out of here.
Tom wanted you out of here.
Tom wanted to speak with Mary.
Tom wanted Mary to be safe.
Tom wants to talk to Mary.
Tom doesn't want our help.
I'd like to hear Tom sing.
I'd like to hear Tom sing.
Tom wants me on his team.
Tom wants me on his team.
Tom may not want to stay.
I wanted Tom to be happy.
I wanted Tom to be happy.
Tom wants to talk to me.
I want Tom to read this.
I want Tom on the phone.
Tom has to want to stay.
Do you want Tom to wait?
Do you want Tom to wait?
Do you want Tom to wait?
Do you want Tom to wait?
Tom wants to disappear.
Tom may not want to go.
Tom may not want to go.
Tom wants to meet you.
Tom wants to meet you.
Tom wanted to sell it.
Tom wants us to talk.
Tom wants to sell it.
You might want this.
You might want this.
Do you want to wait?
Do you want to wait?
Tom didn't quit.
Tom didn't fall down.
Tom didn't fall.
You're both adults.
You're both adults.
You are weak.
You're weak.
You're weak.
We're weak.
I am weak.
I am weak.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I can hardly believe you're here.
I've been happy here.
I've been happy here.
I've been happy here.
I've been happy here.
I have no idea how to use this thing.
Tom looks happier than usual.
Tom was such a happy person.
I'm glad you're happy, Tom.
I'm glad you're happy, Tom.
What makes you happy, Tom?
Tom does not look happy.
We have no secrets.
We haven't met yet.
We haven't met yet.
We heard a noise.
We heard a noise.
We've got to win.
We've got to hurry.
We'll have to hurry.
Give me time to give you everything I have!
Give me time to give you everything I have!
Tom is your buddy.
Tom is still inside.
Tom is still breathing.
Tom is serious now.
Tom is safe now.
Tom is my roommate.
Tom looks well.
Tom is in church.
Tom is growing up.
Tom has chosen you.
Tom has chosen you.
Tom has chosen me.
Tom became calm.
Tom has betrayed you.
Tom has betrayed you.
Tom sold us out.
It'll probably take you about 10 minutes to solve this problem.
It'll probably take you about 10 minutes to solve this problem.
Do you have younger brothers?
Do you have younger brothers?
Can you pass me that thingamajig?
Can you pass me that thingamajig?
She didn't like this game.
What is the price of this watch?
Bill had always been a quiet, home-loving man, but after a few months in the job, his personality changed.
How old is your grandmother?
What can you buy at the market?
Please close the window.
That's fine!
Tom found the article interesting.
I cut the article out of the magazine.
And you're a teacher, right?
You are a schoolteacher, aren't you?
I know your roommate.
Write your name and address.
Tom got shot in the back.
Tom is used to hard work.
Quit acting like a baby.
The roof of my house is red.
What did they hit you with?
We'll be hungry.
Don't leave me here.
I hope Tom does well.
Are you in a bad mood?
I think you need to call Tom.
I think you need to call Tom.
I think you need to call Tom.
I think you need to call Tom.
I think we're in trouble.
I think we're in trouble.
I think we're in trouble.
I think we're in trouble.
Will you study tomorrow?
I want to call...
I can solve this problem.
The birds sang.
I don't regret what happened last night.
We will drink to your health.
I know what they'll want me to do.
When did you open your new store?
Give me the keys to your car.
Sorry!
I never talked to her again.
I owe you so much.
How can you stand all these noises?
I take my camera with me wherever I go.
I take my camera with me wherever I go.
I take my camera with me wherever I go.
Don't let them do this.
Tom wanted to talk to Mary about something.
Tom wanted to talk to Mary about something.
Let's do it this way.
Do you want the green or the blue?
Caution! Wet floor.
She is anxious about her father's health.
Wait here till I come back.
I hope to see you again.
Why did you listen to her?
Why did you listen to her?
Why did you listen to him?
Why did you listen to him?
She lived a quiet life in the country.
Tom doesn't like this kind of movie.
We could do it if we wanted to.
But now it's too late. The train is off.
Fiona's letters were becoming less and less frequent.
I need the following items.
I need the following items.
He drives a Ferrari.
Whose fault is that?
Where will the bus pick us up?
I wish you happiness.
It was impossible to understand his questions.
He lost his sight.
We hoped she would win.
You two are brothers, right?
I am pretty pleased with you.
I am pretty pleased with you.
A dog was running.
They never learn!
I'll wait till four o'clock.
I'll wait till four o'clock.
How happy I am!
No one lives in that building anymore.
I can't imagine why you didn't attend the meeting. Did you have something even more important?
I can't imagine why you didn't attend the meeting. Did you have something even more important?
I can't imagine why you didn't attend the meeting. Did you have something even more important?
We all are beta versions.
Please phone me before you come.
Please phone me before you come.
I do hope you'll come again.
I do hope you'll come again.
I want to see what there is inside.
As for me, there is nothing more I want to say.
We want to get more information.
I'll give him a pen.
We're just about finished for the day.
She is afraid of her own shadow.
Follow your desire.
Follow your desire.
I am reading this sentence.
Who seeds wind, shall harvest storm.
Tom is a rich man.
They sent him to North America.
They sent him to North America.
How many soldiers died in World War Two?
Tom is out of the country.
I've got married ten years ago.
No one will believe me.
Aw, my father's going to China.
This is the village where the poet was born.
This is the village where the poet was born.
You do not have a good memory.
You do not have a good memory.
I need to go in.
He's busy.
I regret having said so.
She left without saying even a single word.
I'll go to Greece.
Emily is wearing a beautiful dress.
Emily is wearing a beautiful dress.
He worked as an interrogator at Guantanamo.
Tom jumped out of bed.
I'll forgive, but I won't forget.
Experience has shown that money does not bring happiness.
Thank God it's Friday.
I have a cat.
He would do whatever it takes to make money.
The photo doesn't do us justice.
She is gone shopping.
On a bad road like this, I can't do more than thirty kilometers an hour.
I'm sorry, the manager won't be able to see you. He's engaged.
What division of the company do you work in?
You ought to set an example for the others.
Tom has been engaged in politics for years.
My pen won't work. What did you do to it?
If the boss finds this out, I'm done for.
Tom is a distant relative of mine.
Don't you think we ought to wait?
I'd rather not do domestic work.
I do wish we could finish today.
Do you think this color will do?
Do you feel more encouraged now?
Are you done with the book yet?
Tom gets up early and so do I.
Tom seems very distant today.
Could you give me an example?
When did you enter the army?
I enjoyed myself very much.
Don't disturb the others.
It may already be too late for him.
There was dead silence.
Can I visit a church?
And now, where is my pen?
We will explore every planet that goes around the sun.
I'm too drunk.
I'm too drunk.
You're too drunk.
Tom is too drunk.
She is too drunk.
We are too drunk.
They are too drunk.
He loves music.
Tom likes music.
We like music.
I was not drunk.
We heard a gunshot.
They are the same age.
They are the same age.
The goods arrived undamaged.
She wastes her money.
If I had taken that plane, I would be dead now.
I enjoyed it very much.
He must be very happy.
Get up, now!
She let me go.
She let her go.
She let him go.
He let us go.
He let her go.
Release him!
Let her go.
It's nearly impossible.
I tried to explain to him that we were not responsible for his mistake, but he refused to listen.
We hoped we'd succeed today.
I handed him a map.
The value of the dollar is going up.
You want to leave here, don't you?
You want to leave here, don't you?
What is it you want to talk about?
Allan is a poet.
These keys are not mine.
That is your victory.
I liked this game.
Tom will like this game.
I'll eat fish.
I'll eat fish.
You'll be in my heart today and always.
You'll be in my heart today and always.
Let's shake hands and be friends.
Tom cracked a joke.
I saw his car make a turn to the right.
I saw his car make a turn to the right.
How can I get there?
They lost their way in the mountain.
What a show!
Unfortunately, I don't have so much money on me.
He doesn't sing very well.
Where are the car keys?
Where did this come from?
The older we grow, the less we dream.
The letter Tom received said that he should return home as soon as possible.
Not now, please wait a bit.
Tom is a few inches shorter than Mary.
Tom doesn't seem to like it.
Tom doesn't seem to be leaving.
Tom doesn't like this at all.
Tom doesn't like talking to strangers.
Tom doesn't like talking to strangers.
Tom didn't want to stay.
Tom didn't want to stay.
Tom came into the room a few minutes after Mary.
Tom arrived home at 2:30.
Tom arrived home at 2:30.
Tom arrived home at 2:30.
Tom arrived home at 2:30.
There's no need to do that.
That's why I wanted to talk to you.
That's why I wanted to talk to you.
Does French have a similar expression?
Have you ever taught French to anyone?
Have you ever taught French to anyone?
Have you ever taught French to anyone?
Sorry, I didn't notice that.
Sorry, I didn't notice that.
Please don't let this happen again.
Please don't let this happen again.
Meet me at 2:30.
Meet me at 2:30.
Mary wants to buy a new dress. What do you want to buy?
Mary wants to buy a new dress. What do you want to buy?
Tom translated the letter into French.
I think French is a difficult language.
It worked perfectly.
It worked perfectly.
It worked perfectly.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
It seemed like you weren't interested.
We often hear French being spoken here.
It matters.
We often hear French being spoken here.
It matters.
It looks really good.
It looks really good.
It looks really good.
It looks really good.
It looks really good.
Is it really possible to do a brain transplant?
Is it really possible to do a brain transplant?
If I'm not too busy, I'll help you tomorrow.
If I'm not too busy, I'll help you tomorrow.
It's strange that nobody knows us.
That doesn't seem fair.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
I wrote the note.
I said I liked it.
I said I liked it.
Don't talk about me.
Don't talk about me.
Don't lie to me, Tom.
Don't judge me too harshly.
Don't judge me too harshly.
Don't be such a fool.
Don't be such a fool.
Doesn't Tom realize Mary loves him?
Do you want to buy a shirt?
Do you want to buy a shirt?
Do you want to buy a dress?
Do you want to buy a dress?
Are you saying this doesn't matter?
Are you saying this doesn't matter?
If I want your opinion I'll ask you for it.
If I want your opinion I'll ask you for it.
If I want your opinion I'll ask you for it.
If I want your opinion I'll ask you for it.
We went to a movie.
We went to a movie.
I have a feeling Tom is lying.
I have a feeling Tom is lying.
I have a feeling Tom is lying.
I have a feeling Tom is lying.
I feel safer here.
I'm sure Tom doesn't think that.
I'm sure Tom doesn't think that.
I'm sure Tom doesn't think that.
I'm sure Tom doesn't think that.
I'm sure Tom didn't mean that.
I'm sure Tom didn't mean that.
I'm sure Tom didn't mean that.
I'm sure Tom didn't mean that.
I saw it in the store.
I saw it in the store.
I saw it in the store.
I saw it in the store.
I read the book from beginning to end.
I saved Tom's life.
I said don't talk to me.
I said don't talk to me.
I said don't talk to me.
I said don't talk to me.
I don't like to run.
It was strange.
Tom carefully opened the box.
Tom carefully opened the box.
He's still breathing.
I speak Japanese, English, and French.
The international language Interlingue was published in 1922 under the name Occidental.
I like reading American novels.
I take a walk every morning.
John took a key out of his pocket.
John took a key out of his pocket.
She took something out of the bag.
She took something out of the bag.
She took something out of the bag.
She took something out of the bag.
He is a poet.
What is this cake called?
We don't talk to each other anymore.
Did you enjoy the movie?
Did you enjoy the movie?
Are you going to save us?
He's playing with my cat.
He told a good joke.
Drugs are a cancer of modern society.
Tom is the best student in our class.
She could feel her knees shaking.
They have nothing to eat.
I started talking.
Dead?
Everything has a price.
Are you afraid of the dark?
I don't know how to do it.
I can't leave now.
Where is the cat?
Tom put the key into his pocket.
I shut my eyes again.
If only I had taken your advice.
Get back to the ship.
You seem a kind man.
My grandmother died.
Why did you come home so late?
Why did you come home so late?
Why did you come home so late?
Tom woke up in the middle of the night.
I wanna get out of here!
He feels very happy.
I'm familiar with the situation.
Don't forget it.
Don't forget it.
Did you do your homework?
Excuse me for not having answered your letter sooner.
I remember this music.
That's completely understandable.
Ben put his hands in his pockets.
Tom passed out because of the heat.
There's narrow road to the village.
I don't like to run.
Don't kill too many birds and animals on earth.
I'm a social worker.
Everybody liked him.
He likes singing.
Singing is her thing.
I'll come early.
I'll leave tomorrow.
When will you leave?
The box was too heavy.
She is a member of this organization.
She is a member of this organization.
It's quarter to eight now.
You're very nice.
You're very cute.
You're too kind.
He paid no attention to my advice.
Emily is afraid of heights.
I don't know what's in there.
There's somebody who wants to meet you.
I think that he's a good teacher.
We hope to meet you again.
Don't expect miracles.
Not knowing what to do, I asked him for advice.
Why doesn't he talk to me anymore?
Why doesn't she talk to me anymore?
I'm talking.
I'm a student.
I still don't believe it!
I still don't believe it!
I still don't believe it!
I don't know whether to cry or to laugh.
I don't know whether to cry or to laugh.
I don't know whether to cry or to laugh.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I don't know whether he'll come by train or by car.
I didn't want to kill him.
Don't jump to conclusions.
Don't jump to conclusions.
I'm sorry, I didn't hear you.
I'm sorry. I didn't hear you.
Are you interested in flowers?
Who vanished?
Did you find out what time the meeting starts?
Did you find out what time the meeting starts?
I can't understand why he left so suddenly.
Tom wants to know your opinion.
Tomorrow's my birthday.
The painter died young.
I have to catch that train.
I am busy now.
The decision is in your hands.
The decision is in your hands.
You look pale.
I know I've been acting strangely.
I know I've been acting strangely.
This lake is deep.
He got an important position in the company.
Take off your hat when you enter a classroom.
My hobby is music.
My hobby is music.
They're all the same size.
What's your favorite number?
This is weird.
The walls are very thin.
We will be best friends forever.
We will be best friends forever.
They may be in danger.
Don't you see the exit sign over there?
Tom refused to execute the order.
I owe Tom a debt of gratitude.
Darkness is the absence of light.
He left his daughter a great fortune.
I have bought the same camera as you have.
The rich and the poor are afraid of death.
I love my grandmother very much.
I haven't seen any of his films.
Is this a newspaper or a magazine?
Oh my God!
When did you open your new shop?
Have you chosen a topic?
You must learn from your mistakes.
You must learn from mistakes.
I always wear boots when it rains or snows.
They are running in the park.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I don't want you to see me naked.
I don't want you to see me naked.
Our country abounds in products.
I know what you want to talk about.
We've made it.
She is looking for her car keys.
She is looking for her car keys.
Where are the guards?
Tom asked for my help.
He is accustomed to hard work.
He is accustomed to working hard.
It isn't totally exact.
Try it.
She's about the same age as my sister.
I hate that song.
Look back.
She has forgiven him.
I woke up at five.
My sister is having a conversation with her friends.
I've called the hospital.
I've called the other parents.
I haven't called Tom yet.
I have certain rights.
He lost his sense of direction in the dark woods.
Don't read books in a dark place.
I haven't called Tom yet.
Please, call him.
They translated the text.
This woman gives the impression of being wealthy.
We would love to work with you.
We would love to work with you.
Nobody helped her.
The information you gave me is of little use.
This movie is for adults, not for children.
I forgot my wife's birthday.
Tom forgot his wife's birthday.
Did you call me up last night?
I can't go back to prison.
This is my final offer.
Get away from me!
Call the doctor.
Call a doctor.
Call the doctor.
Call a doctor.
Call for help.
Call for help.
Give me a call later.
Call me later.
Call the cops.
Call the hospital.
Call the police.
Call the police.
Call this number.
Call this number.
Call your brother.
Call your father.
Call your wife.
Call your wife.
Can I finish?
Can I finish?
Can I finish?
Can this wait?
Can you breathe?
Can you breathe?
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
Ask an expert.
How about having a drink after we finish our work today?
He tried, and he got it.
He tried, and he got it.
He tried, and he got it.
It seems she is more than thirty years old.
It seems she is more than thirty years old.
It seems she is more than thirty years old.
I get up at 6 o'clock every morning.
I've got lots of ideas.
Linda came home late at night.
It's late. I have to go.
I was tired today so I went to bed early.
I went to the hospital yesterday.
I went to the hospital yesterday.
I went into the town in search of a good restaurant.
I'm not one of them.
The Dead Sea is the lowest place on earth.
This whisky is too strong.
I thought we could talk.
I thought we could talk.
I telephoned to say that I wanted to see him.
It's about 8 kilometers away.
Why do you study?
He is enamored of her beauty.
He referred to your illness.
He did not like her manner of speech.
He did not like her manner of speech.
I wrote a letter in French.
I wrote a letter in French.
It's nobody's fault.
I've never hit anyone in my life.
Seemingly no one payed attention to his words.
How do you say that in French?
How do you say that in French?
What a fool I was to do such a thing!
All of our meetings are in French.
Do you have any French newspapers?
Do you have any French newspapers?
I think my French isn't very good.
I think my French isn't very good.
When is she coming back?
I wish I didn't have to do all those things I don't want to do.
Sooner begun, sooner done.
You must do your best.
You must do your best.
You must do your best.
Are you going to sing here?
Are you going to sing here?
We lost our way.
Didn't you hear a scream?
Beautiful day.
Don't talk to them now.
No one is downstairs.
No one would listen.
No one else laughed.
Tom has no idea where to start.
Tom has no idea where to start.
No one is talking.
Write down his address.
Write down his address.
Nobody believed him.
I've taken some medicine for my stomach ache.
I've taken some medicine for my stomach ache.
I've taken some medicine for my stomach ache.
I've taken some medicine for my stomach ache.
My brother went to Bejaia.
No one's in sight.
It has nothing to do with you.
He lost a watch which I had bought him a week before.
I can't recall the last time we met.
I can't recall the last time we met.
A dog runs faster than a human.
I'm very angry.
Switzerland is called "Suisse" in French.
He's a bad liar.
I never said that it wasn't a good idea.
He's too drunk.
Stop calling me that!
He told me that he had lost his watch.
I want milk.
My bag is empty.
You don't lie well.
You don't lie well.
Tom never wears red.
How do you explain that?
How do you explain it?
Your teachers always speak well of your work.
Please don't follow this advice.
He's beginning to cry.
He didn't invent gunpowder.
We are not at the cinema.
He slept deeply.
Do I need the surgery?
Just go back to the kitchen.
Just go back home.
Take a look at this map.
Send me a picture of yourself.
Send me a picture of yourself.
Go to the shop.
Go to the shop.
Don't leave me alone.
Don't leave me alone.
Listen to this.
Listen to this.
It goes without saying that money is not everything.
It goes without saying that money is not everything.
There's nothing more to be said.
There's nothing more to add.
I left you a note.
I left you a note.
Sleep is necessary for good health.
I think it's important to tell the truth.
All the boys are the same age.
Greece has many islands.
Is there a barber shop in the hotel?
These shoes don't fit me anymore.
I'd like to talk about it.
Why is my father in the kitchen?
Why is my father in the kitchen?
Our teacher comes to school by car.
I hope he'll be able to come! I'd like to see him.
I talked to him.
I've spoken with her.
She is collecting material for a book.
Put more salt in the soup.
The fish smells bad.
Look out for the wild dog!
She gave him a present.
These are yellow flowers.
This book is about life in the Soviet Union.
My father is a bus driver.
My father is a bus driver.
They're both dead.
They're both dead.
They sent Lucy to prison for ten years.
When I woke up, I found I had been tied up.
She did what she promised to do for you.
She did what she promised to do for you.
He likes to run.
My knife is sharp.
This isn't a map.
I consider him a great scientist.
Tom said he was extremely tired.
Tom said he was completely exhausted.
I'll solve that problem.
She was going up a ladder.
I hope Tom will understand.
I hope Tom will understand.
I hope Tom will understand.
I would like to meet him.
I would like to meet him.
I would like to meet him.
I hope you die.
I don't want to have an operation.
Your idea is similar to mine.
Your idea is similar to mine.
I had hoped to finish it yesterday.
I have to read this article.
I have to read this article.
I want to go abroad next year.
We want to know the facts.
I want to make a phone call.
I want to see him very much.
I want to see the movie again.
I want to see that movie again.
I want to study abroad next year.
Someone took my place.
I want you to read this letter.
I want you to sing the song.
I want you to sing the song.
The man wanted to have a drink.
I'll meet you guys in Korea!
Horses are dangerous animals.
I really enjoyed the talk we had about politics.
He died suddenly at the age of 65.
One day he will return to Japan.
I don't play cards.
Give me a call later, OK?
Give me a call later, OK?
Give me a call if you need help.
Give me a call if you need help.
Give me a call if you need help.
I told Tom to give me a call.
I told Tom to give me a call.
Don't give me a call.
Give me a call sometime.
Why don't you give Tom a call?
Give me a call.
Why don't you give Tom a call?
Give me a call.
Well, it's getting late. Let's go now.
I know it's early, but let's go home.
Let's go on to the next subject.
You make me happy.
You make me happy.
You make me happy.
You make me happy.
I've got an idea.
I wonder if he loves me.
I have an idea.
I have an opinion.
You will get into trouble if your girlfriend finds out the truth.
Love me little, love me long.
There were a lot of boats on the lake.
Would you mind taking me home?, she said.
We forgave you.
We forgave you.
You should have refused his offer.
You should have refused his offer.
I regret having said that to him.
I regret not having bought that house.
I regret not having bought that house.
I regret saying that you were wrong.
I regret saying that you were wrong.
I regret saying that you were wrong.
I regret saying that you were wrong.
I wish I had seen the film.
You should not have lent the money to such a person.
I wish he had gone on to university.
I wish I had asked you for advice.
I wish I had asked you for advice.
I wish I had asked you for advice.
My mother bought me a new dress.
My mother bought me a new dress.
I'm looking for a gift for my father.
I'm looking for a gift for my father.
It looked like you didn't want to do what you were doing.
It looked like you didn't want to do what you were doing.
We don't want to lose you.
We don't want to lose you.
I'm safe here.
I'm safe here.
Why is Tom crying?
This song is familiar to us.
Unfortunately, my birthday is only once a year.
I've come to save her.
I've come to save her.
I've come to save him.
I've come to save him.
I've come to save you.
I've come to save you.
I've come to save you.
I've come to save you.
She came to save me.
He came to save me.
I know that you will forgive me.
I don't want to look stupid.
I don't want to look stupid.
I didn't want to look stupid.
I didn't want to look stupid.
She's lucky to be alive.
He's lucky to be alive.
She showed me her garden.
I'm not so sure now.
I'm not so sure now.
Are you reading an interesting book?
Are you reading an interesting book?
Tom will call.
You will have to study a lot.
He knows how to make women cry.
He knows how to make his wife happy.
He knows how to speak to children.
My grandfather lived till he was eighty-nine.
I don't like movies.
I don't like movies.
I built this for you.
He said, "Leave me alone."
What's the text about?
Tom talked with Mary for nearly an hour.
Tom talked with Mary for nearly an hour.
We're going to be rescued.
You were so happy.
You were so happy.
We want meat.
Everybody didn't go to bed.
My apartment is on the fourth floor.
Wallonia is a beautiful country.
Can you wait until I make up my face?
He's well dressed.
I shot the horse.
I shot the horse.
I set my watch ahead one hour.
I set my watch ahead one hour.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent you the money you asked for.
I sent Mary some flowers.
I sent Mary some flowers.
I sent a message to Tom.
I sent a message to Tom.
I say it's worth a try.
I say it's worth a try.
He translated her sentence.
She translated his sentence.
They translated each other's sentences.
I saw you on TV.
I saw you on TV.
I saw you on TV.
I saw you on TV.
We go to school to study.
We started talking.
He went to Tokyo on business.
I went there to meet him.
I went there to meet him.
I went there for the purpose of meeting him.
I went there for the purpose of meeting him.
I went there for the purpose of meeting him.
I went there for the purpose of meeting him.
I went there to see her.
I went there to see her.
I went to America to study.
I went to America to study.
We played cards to kill time.
We played cards to kill time.
I stood aside to let them pass.
I stood aside to let them pass.
She went to Italy to study music.
He went to London to study English.
She went to Paris to study music.
She went to the movies by herself.
She went to the movies by herself.
He came to Tokyo in search of employment.
I go to school because I want to learn.
I got up early to catch the first train.
I got up early to catch the first train.
I got up early in order to catch the first train.
I got up early in order to catch the first train.
He bought the land for the purpose of building a house on it.
He came to New York in order to look for a job.
He has gone to New York on business.
I hurried in order to catch the first train.
I hurried in order to catch the first train.
He hurried in order to get the bus.
They left early to catch the first train.
He stepped aside for an old man to pass.
I telephoned to say that I wanted to see him.
I'll allow this.
I'll allow this.
I'll be quiet.
I'll be quiet.
I'll help Tom.
I'll prove it.
I'll try that.
I'm busy, Tom.
I'm busy, Tom.
I'm busy, too.
I'm busy, too.
Did Tom finish?
Don't be hasty.
Don't be hasty.
Finish the job.
Don't stop now.
Don't stop now.
Has Tom called?
Here's the key.
Here's the map.
I have no food.
I have a map.
I promised Tom.
I was so happy.
I was so happy.
I was so happy.
I was so happy.
I'll be inside.
I'll just wait.
I'm kind of busy.
I'm a bit busy.
I'll try again.
I'll try again.
Are you relaxed?
Are you relaxed?
Are you relaxed?
Be happy for me.
Be happy for me.
Be happy for me.
Don't open that.
Don't come back.
I know the area.
I love the idea.
I want a dollar.
I was too drunk.
I was too drunk.
My glass is full.
I woke up early.
I woke up early.
I woke up early.
I woke up early.
Our class has forty-five students.
Seven is a lucky number.
I can't see the stage well from this seat.
I don't want to sleep on the couch again tonight.
You're drunk.
You're drunk.
You're drunk.
Please mail this letter the next time you go to the post office.
Tom went willingly.
So the Father is God, the Son is God, and the Holy Ghost is God. And yet they are not Three Gods, but One God.
It was never hard for us to find something to talk about.
Some people are working in the fields.
What time do you want to meet?
What time do you want to meet?
Tom looked back.
She told me to meet her at her house.
She told me to meet her at her house.
To tell the truth, I don't know him well.
Let's talk about this again tomorrow.
Something bad was about to happen.
You can't make me do that.
I just got a call from Tom.
I don't like modern films.
I don't know who I'm going to choose.
Wait a minute, please!
Wait a minute, please!
Had you come a little earlier, you could have met her.
Had you come a little earlier, you could have met her.
That crime is punishable by death.
That crime is punishable by death.
Aardvarks are nocturnal animals.
I don't know my neighbors.
I don't know my neighbors.
He always asks for your opinion.
He always asks for your opinion.
He heard a cry for help.
Everything was completely black.
My brother wants to study abroad.
He wants to work in a hospital.
I'd like to go to London someday.
I'd like to go to London someday.
We can give it a try.
Success usually requires hard work.
Practically every family has a TV.
It sounds interesting.
Their plan sounds interesting to me.
That sounds interesting. What did you tell him?
That sounds interesting. What did you tell him?
That sounds interesting. What did you tell him?
This sounds interesting.
That sounds really interesting.
I finally found my keys.
I finally found my keys.
I don't remember giving Tom a key.
I don't remember giving Tom a key.
Birthdays are important.
Tom was famous.
We're not safe here.
I'm from another planet.
I got up early so that I might be in time for the first train.
He translated a Japanese novel into French.
Let's meet together two years from today.
Tom pocketed the keys.
Where did you find your key?
Where did you find your key?
Where did you find your key?
Tom usually works from nine to five-thirty.
I got a call from Tom today.
Mom, where's the cat?
I can't believe that you love me.
That explains a lot.
He is as tall as his father.
Are you sure you don't want me to stay?
I lost my key.
We're not wealthy.
I often watch TV before dinner.
Please sing a song.
We're helping Tom.
You don't seem happy.
You don't seem happy.
Tom would like to talk to you.
Tom would like to talk to you.
Tom would never forgive us if we did that.
We have a lot to talk about.
Any student can answer that question.
Any student can answer that question.
Even a child can answer the question.
There are seven days in a week.
The sun always sets in the west.
The sun sets in the west.
The sun sets in the west.
I gave up smoking and I feel like a new man.
This must be my grandfather's house.
Barbecuing is one way to cook meat.
You've been busy, haven't you?
You've been busy, haven't you?
You've been busy, haven't you?
This is the very book that I wanted to read.
How long does it take by bus?
I'm fed up with him.
I'm fed up with her.
Tom could do it if he tried.
I heard a woman scream.
Beauty isn't important.
She has a sharp tongue.
I got acquainted with a woman in the bus.
People are complicated.
He was very happy.
It's half past three.
Study!
There are a lot of fish in the lake.
Try to think about it.
Bring the key.
This TV program seems to be very entertaining.
The road is long.
For the teacher, teaching her was fun.
This photo is my favourite!
Tom seems contented.
I'll talk to you tomorrow.
I'm a pretty good student.
I'm delighted to meet you.
He's a Jewish American.
The light is completely blocked out by the big tree.
Tom just called.
You can't understand this sentence, can you?
She's happy and satisfied.
A UFO is flying in the sky.
Get down on the floor!
I do hope you enjoyed the dinner.
I do hope you enjoyed the dinner.
My wife and children depend on me.
Are you still interested?
I don't want to talk to anybody today.
Tom doesn't know whether to turn left or right.
Give me a cigarette.
This factory manufactures electric stoves.
The car turned right when it reached the corner.
I have a feeling that something important is going to happen.
I've learned by experience that this is the best way.
We'd like to see the results of the experiment.
Do you know how it feels to lose an old friend?
Tom is a very important person in our town.
Tom built the whole thing at his own expense.
They're experimenting with a new car.
The teams are coming onto the field.
Fewer people come here every year.
Tom is the best man in his field.
I felt sure this would happen.
Say it over a few more times.
I feel certain of it.
Tom is pleased.
He wears socks and shoes.
Tom was naked.
There's a magazine in my room.
This belongs to me.
I'm afraid it's not a good idea.
Are you sure he can do this?
Are you sure he can do this?
Are you sure he can do this?
She never listens to the teacher.
He never listens to the teacher.
I'll come and see you at 3:00 p.m. on Sunday.
Thank you very much. You should also feel free to ask me for help in the future.
That doesn't mean that I will stop doing it.
I would like to write hundreds of words more to Tatoeba but I have to go back to my work.
I went to the cinema yesterday.
He was born to be a painter.
Tell him to wait.
But it isn't 12 p.m. yet, right?
Use your head!
Use your head!
Because he is dirty and wet.
You love your father, right?
Do you show Tatoeba to your friends?
What's your debt?
Let's check.
I couldn't call you; the telephone was out of order.
The cat's ear swiveled in the direction of the noise.
When was this university founded?
What's your favorite city in the world?
Where the bloody hell are you?
Don't use this until tomorrow.
Mother bought me a beautiful dress last Sunday.
Would you like to go to a movie?
The doctor performed the operation.
The doctor performed the operation.
Give that book back to me.
Go and get a chair from the next room, please.
Go back to your work.
Do you want half of this cake?
Do you want half of this cake?
She heard gunshots every night.
He's not in the mood.
People don't live forever.
I love you and think about you all the time.
I did not notice how she was dressed.
I did not notice how she was dressed.
He has no friends to talk with.
This is the house in which the poet lived in his childhood.
Don't shoot.
Tom looks drunk.
Tom looks drunk.
You always forget.
You always forget.
I don't know why I'm so happy today.
I don't know why I'm so happy today.
Write your address here.
Write your address here.
What position do you hold?
I would like your picture.
I would like your picture.
I would like your picture.
I would like your picture.
Your question is not relevant to the subject.
Your question is not relevant to the subject.
I will call you in an hour.
He looks exactly like his brother.
Most of them were university students.
France has a common border with Italy.
France has a common border with Italy.
I can't believe I forgot about that.
I can't believe I forgot about that.
Did Tom go?
I can sing.
I can wait.
I was busy.
I was weak.
I was weak.
I was weak.
I was weak.
Get serious!
Be serious.
Be serious.
Get up, now!
Go sit down.
Have a look.
Have we met?
I could try.
I could try.
I could try.
I could try.
I didn't go.
I didn't go.
I was angry.
I was drunk.
I was drunk.
I was happy.
I was happy.
I was naked.
I was naked.
I won't cry.
I won't lie.
I won't run.
I'll get up.
Can I use it?
Check it now.
Check it now.
Did Tom help?
Do it gently.
Do it gently.
Go back, Tom.
Grow up, Tom.
Here's a pen.
I called Tom.
I got caught.
I was helping Tom.
I helped Tom.
I need a bag.
I need a car.
I was stupid.
I was stupid.
I was stupid.
I was stupid.
I will shoot.
Bring it back.
Bring it back.
Close the box.
Close the box.
Close the box.
Come back now.
Come back now.
Don't lose it.
Don't lose it.
Get your keys.
Get your keys.
I got married.
I need my bag.
I owe you thirty dollars.
I owe you $30.
I owe you thirty dollars.
I owe you $30.
I told a joke.
I told a joke.
I tried again.
I tried again.
I tried again.
I tried again.
I tried again.
I tried again.
I was invited.
I was relaxed.
I was relaxed.
I was serious.
I was serious.
I was serious.
I was serious.
I will listen.
Cover your eyes.
Is it helping?
Don't judge me.
Don't judge me.
Get everything.
I must be sure.
I must be sure.
I'm downstairs.
Check your list.
Did Tom confess?
Don't shoot him.
Don't shoot him.
I'd like to try.
I'd like to try.
I'd like to try.
I'd like to try.
I'll just check.
I'll just check.
I'll let you go.
I'll let you go.
I'll let you go.
I'll let you go.
You're working? — "No, I'm just studying."
A dog is running in the park.
It's unusual for him to get up early.
I was in a rush.
I was in a rush.
I'll carry this.
I'll check that.
I'll check them.
I'll get my bag.
I'll keep watch.
I'll let Tom go.
I'll let Tom go.
I'll let Tom go.
I'll let Tom go.
I'm calling Tom.
We'll talk later.
Can I borrow $30?
Can't you decide?
Can't you decide?
Check your inbox.
Does this count?
Does that matter?
Drink some water.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Finish the story.
Sit down, Tom.
Have a seat, Tom.
I heard a scream.
I heard a scream.
I just need time.
I need a holiday.
I totally forgot.
I totally forgot.
I want to change.
I was having fun.
It is a fish.
I was just fortunate.
What I'm saying is quite true.
I was sure of it.
I was sure of it.
I wasn't serious.
I wasn't serious.
I wasn't serious.
I wasn't serious.
I will translate.
I'll forgive you.
I'll be watching.
I'll be watching.
I'll ignore that.
I'll never learn.
I'm always happy.
I'm always happy.
Is there a cat under the table?
This song is liked by many people.
Will you come with me to the store?
She allowed him to go alone.
Don't kill yourself.
The more languages you know the more of a person you are.
He knows how to cook meat.
Your mother's doctor wants to talk to you.
Don't go anywhere.
Don't go anywhere.
I know that sound.
I wasn't finished.
I wasn't finished.
I wasn't watching.
I wasn't watching.
I'll go right now.
I'll give it back.
They were dead.
Just use mine for now.
I am a student at London University.
Why did you cry?
Why were you crying?
Tom drinks milk every morning.
Tom is the only one here that can do this.
He ordered me to clean the room.
I'm in prison.
I'm being serious.
I'm being serious.
Did Tom seem happy?
Did Tom seem happy?
Here are the facts.
These are facts.
How are you, buddy?
I just lost my job.
I just lost my job.
I met a nice woman.
I met a nice woman.
I must find my key.
I must find my key.
I must make a call.
I must make a call.
I must talk to you.
I must talk to you.
I must talk to you.
I must talk to you.
I never forgot you.
I never forgot you.
I never forgot you.
I never forgot you.
I read Tom a story.
I read Tom a story.
I want to end this.
I want you to talk.
I want you to talk.
I want you to talk.
I will not help you.
I won't assist you.
I wish you success.
I wish you success.
I'll be home early.
I'll be back early.
I'll call security.
I'll give Tom that.
Grandpa bought it for me!
I'll give you this.
I'll give you this.
I'll never be rich.
I'll never be rich.
I'm a little drunk.
I'm a teacher here.
I'm going shopping.
I'm going shopping.
Now I can die happy.
Now I can die happy.
I knew Tom was dead.
I knew Tom was dead.
I know Tom was busy.
He always wears blue shirts.
I was feeling happy.
I was feeling happy.
He is just killing time.
I must finish my work.
I must finish my work.
I like women but I don't get along with them.
I need those car keys.
Tom hopes to see you in October.
Could you show me how to use that machine?
I gave the bag back to Ken.
She wanted to live a more relaxing life.
They were all friends as children.
Susan never smokes.
Tom is in the garden.
I thought it was obvious.
I thought it was obvious.
I told Tom you were busy.
I told Tom you were busy.
I told Tom you were busy.
Tom is my grandfather.
I told Tom you were busy.
I told Tom you were busy.
I told Tom you were busy.
Don't you think it's weird?
Don't you think it's weird?
Don't you think it's weird?
Don't you think it's weird?
I didn't say I believed it.
I didn't say I believed it.
I don't believe any of you.
I don't know what it means.
I don't look good in jeans.
I don't look good in jeans.
Do you have the same thing in a different color?
I know you want to be happy.
I know you want to be happy.
I know you want to be happy.
I meet new people every day.
I saw your name on the list.
I saw your name on the list.
I thought Tom had left town.
I thought Tom had left town.
I thought Tom was in prison.
I thought Tom was in prison.
I'll call you when I'm ready.
I'll call you when I'm ready.
I'll call you when I'm ready.
I'll call you when I'm ready.
I'll never be as rich as Tom.
I'll never be as rich as Tom.
I'm afraid that's impossible.
I'm glad to finally meet you.
I'm glad to finally meet you.
I'm glad to finally meet you.
I'm glad to finally meet you.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm glad to see you're happy.
I'm going to be your teacher.
Can't you just leave me alone?
Can't you just leave me alone?
Do you want me to lose my job?
Do you want me to lose my job?
Do you want me to lose my job?
Do you want me to lose my job?
I don't want to lose any time.
I don't want to lose any time.
I have absolutely no idea why.
I have an idea where to start.
I have more money than I need.
I have no desire to stay here.
I have no desire to stay here.
Have a look at the world map.
I am sorry to have kept you waiting.
Have you been smoking?
I'm going to call Tom right now.
Don't be a fool. Let me help you.
Don't think we're always serious.
Don't think we're always serious.
Don't you think it's really hard?
I didn't expect to see you again.
I didn't expect to see you again.
I didn't expect to see you again.
I didn't expect to see you again.
I didn't expect you back so soon.
I didn't expect you back so soon.
Don't you think it's really hard?
I didn't expect you back so soon.
I didn't expect you back so soon.
I told you Tom looked like John.
I told you Tom looked like John.
I told you Tom looked like John.
I told you Tom looked like John.
I was at a conference last week.
I was at a conference last week.
I wanted to sell Tom my old car.
I wanted to sell Tom my old car.
I want you to take me back home.
I was hoping for more.
I was hoping for more.
I wonder who Tom was talking to.
I wonder why Tom isn't here yet.
I'll try to make it before 2:30.
I heard a strange sound in the dead of night.
I don't like this idea at all.
Could you please repeat it slowly?
Could you please repeat it slowly?
Could you please repeat it slowly?
I don't expect you to understand.
I don't expect you to understand.
I haven't seen this movie before.
I haven't seen this movie before.
I wouldn't be too sure about that.
I wouldn't be too sure about that.
I wouldn't be too sure about that.
I wouldn't be too sure about that.
Working at home, parents can spend more time at home with their children.
Are you sure you don't want to live at home with your parents?
Are you sure you don't want to live at home with your parents?
Are you sure you don't want to live at home with your parents?
It was a beautiful day.
It was a disaster.
It was a pleasure.
It was difficult.
It was fair.
It was impossible.
That was important.
That was interesting.
It was painful.
It wasn't fair.
It wasn't hard.
Tom waited until 2:30.
Tom waited thirty minutes.
Tom wanted more.
Tom wanted to become a Canadian citizen.
Tom wants a meeting with you.
Tom wants a meeting with you.
Tom was 30 years old.
Tom was a teacher.
Tom was busy.
Tom was healthy.
Tom was inside.
Tom was rich.
Tom was so happy.
Tom was so happy.
Tom wasn't rich.
Tom wasn't rich.
I'm sorry, did you say something?
I was foolish enough to believe him.
I was foolish enough to believe him.
I was foolish enough to believe him.
I was foolish enough to believe him.
The picture is on the wall.
I'm sorry for the late response.
The bank is not open on Saturdays.
Tom went shopping.
Tom went to the lake.
I'll write a sentence in German.
I'll speak to him at the first opportunity.
If you allow me to speak, I'll be able to explain everything.
I'll have to speak to my boss about that.
I'll talk to you tomorrow.
If you want to talk, let's talk.
I'm already twenty and I have no idea what I want to do with my life.
I have no idea where I left my keys.
I have no idea what I need to do now.
I have no idea. That's why I'm asking.
I have no idea how I got here.
I have no idea how I got here.
I have no idea what I'm doing.
I have no idea what I'm doing here.
I have no idea what I'm doing here.
I have no idea where I am.
I have no idea why I was chosen.
I have no idea what I am doing.
I have no idea how much it costs.
I have an idea what it is.
Ken has two cats.
Ken has two cats.
I've never met anyone who makes me as happy as you make me.
I've never met anyone who makes me as happy as you make me.
Making you happy makes me happy.
Making you happy makes me happy.
I want to be with you forever.
We marched under a hail of bullets.
Wait a while.
Tom lost his glasses.
Tom lost his glasses.
It is difficult to give up smoking.
It is difficult, if not impossible, to solve this problem.
It is difficult to believe what you say.
It is difficult to speak three languages.
It is difficult to believe what you say.
It is difficult to talk to him.
It is very difficult for you to do this work.
It is very difficult for you to do this work.
It is a difficult problem.
I'm not sure what I want to do.
I'm not sure what I want to do.
I'm sure you'll tell me what I want to know.
I'm sure you'll tell me what I want to know.
I'm sure you'll tell me what I want to know.
I'm sure you'll tell me what I want to know.
What I want to know are the facts.
Guess what I want to talk about.
Guess what I want to talk about.
Read this first.
Let me tell you what I want for my birthday.
Let me tell you what I want for my birthday.
That's exactly what I want to talk to you about.
Guess what I want to do.
Guess what I want to do.
Guess what I want to do now.
Guess what I want to do now.
Let me tell you what I want you to do.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
What I want to know is how Tom got here.
I am waiting for the store to open.
I am waiting for my driver.
I am sorry to have made you wait.
I am so sorry to have kept you waiting.
I am so sorry to have kept you waiting.
I'm waiting for his telephone call.
I'm waiting and hoping for Alex to come.
I'm waiting for a very important call.
I'm waiting for Tom to get here.
I'm waiting for lunch.
I hope that Emi will appear soon. I'm tired of waiting for her.
I hope that Emi will appear soon. I'm tired of waiting for her.
I'm sorry I have kept you waiting so long.
I'm sorry I have kept you waiting so long.
I can't wait because I'm in a hurry.
I'm sorry I kept you waiting so long.
I'm sorry I kept you waiting so long.
I'm not sure how much we should wait.
I'm not sure how much we should wait.
I'm going to wait for you.
I'm going to wait for you.
I'm sorry to have kept you waiting for so long.
I'm happy to wait.
I'm happy to wait.
I'm going to wait.
I'm sorry to have kept you waiting.
I'm sorry to have kept you waiting.
I'm going to wait till 2:30.
I'm going to wait in the car.
I'm glad we waited.
I haven't met any woman I wanted to be married to.
I am not sure, but I think I want to be a teacher.
Which bus does Tom take to work?
Who made you so happy?
Who made you so happy?
Who made you so happy?
Who made you so happy?
Who made you so happy?
He watered the rose bush.
What kind of music does Tom listen to?
My father works at the factory.
I will go there by plane.
On the way home I'll stop by the post office.
She sang very well.
Tell Tom I want to talk to him right away.
Tell Tom I want to talk to him right away.
You're cute.
You are our new neighbor.
I need a pen.
Thanks for the gift.
Try again!
The soup is very hot. You shouldn't eat it now.
Tom sits in front of the TV set. He doesn't learn German.
He invited me personally.
I hope that Maria will write soon.
Tom became a taxi driver.
Tom became quiet.
Tom became quiet.
Tom began crying.
Tom started to run.
Tom began running.
Tom began to shout.
Tom began to open the present.
Tom believed me.
She did nothing but cry all the while.
Tom is a good friend.
Where is your cap?
I'm filled with joy every time I see you.
I'm calling you.
It is a shadow.
Why do you like coffee strong?
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God.
For heavens sake.
Our people don't take a taxi to the bakery.
Tom arrives today.
When I heard that song, it reminded me of when I was a kid.
Tom gets up at six every morning.
Tom gets up at six every morning.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to help Tom prove it.
I'd like to shake their hands.
I'd like to shake their hands.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like you back on the team.
I'd like your opinion on this.
I'd like your opinion on this.
I'd like your opinion on this.
I'd like your opinion on this.
I'll call you soon.
I'll call you in a little bit.
I'll call you when I need you.
I'll call you when I need you.
I'll call you when I need you.
I'll call you tomorrow.
I'll have it done before 2:30.
I'll meet you at the hospital.
I'll meet you at the hospital.
I'll see you in a couple days.
I'll see you in a couple days.
I'll wait thirty more minutes.
I'll wait thirty more minutes.
I'm afraid I can't allow that.
I'm afraid I can't allow that.
I'm beginning to get the idea.
I'm glad you liked my friends.
I'm glad you liked my friends.
I'm glad you liked my friends.
I'm glad you liked my friends.
Come back and pick me up later.
Come back and pick me up later.
Do you want me to try it again?
Do you want me to try it again?
Do you want me to try it again?
Do you want me to try it again?
Do you want to sell your house?
Do you want to sell your house?
Do you want to talk to someone?
Do you want to talk to someone?
Do you want to wait in the car?
Do you want to wait in the car?
Don't move. Don't even breathe.
Don't move. Don't even breathe.
Have you seen all these movies?
Have you seen all these movies?
Have you seen all these movies?
Haven't you two already talked?
I can't let them do this to me.
Is he satisfied?
I don't think that's the point.
I don't think they're teachers.
I don't think we'll meet again.
I don't like being a secretary.
I didn't want to use the phone.
I didn't want to use the phone.
I don't always dress like this.
I don't always dress like this.
I don't even know your address.
I did what was important to me.
I did what was important to me.
I didn't know what size to get.
I didn't know what size to get.
I didn't know who else to call.
I didn't know who else to call.
I have no interest in politics.
I hope we're not bothering you.
I hope we're not bothering you.
I hope you're not in any hurry.
I hope you're not in any hurry.
I hope you're not in any hurry.
I hope you're not in any hurry.
I hope you're right about this.
I hope you're right about this.
I hope you're right about this.
I just want to see my daughter.
I just wasn't paying attention.
I just wasn't paying attention.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I knew you wouldn't believe me.
I know all about the situation.
I know all about the situation.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I knew you'd never let Tom die.
I know you have homework to do.
I know you have homework to do.
Look at yourself in the mirror.
Look at yourself in the mirror.
I really thought Tom was happy.
I really thought Tom was happy.
I suggest you do it right away.
I suggest you do it right away.
I think you're trying too hard.
I think you're trying too hard.
He is a university student.
Unfortunately I have no money with me.
I have an extra ticket.
I have an extra ticket.
Having finished it, he went to bed.
I thought you were a scientist.
He accepted her gift.
The room is very bright.
I thought you were a scientist.
I thought you were a scientist.
I thought you were a scientist.
I told Tom that was ridiculous.
I told Tom that was ridiculous.
I told Tom the bank was closed.
I told Tom the bank was closed.
I was hoping you could help me.
I was hoping you could help me.
I was hoping you could help me.
I was hoping you could help me.
I'm very sleepy and it's late.
Though it is late, I want to go out.
Your phone is ringing, answer it please.
Let me see what's in your hand.
He acted in his own interest.
He acts quickly.
He admitted he had taken bribes.
He admitted that it was true.
He allowed John to enter yesterday.
Aren't you happy?
I wasn't sure what size to get.
I wasn't sure what size to get.
I wasn't even sure you knew it.
I wasn't even sure you knew it.
I wasn't even sure you knew it.
I wasn't even sure you knew it.
I went to school with your dad.
I went to school with your dad.
I wish we both weren't so busy.
I wish we both weren't so busy.
I wonder what Tom was thinking.
I wonder why Tom was so afraid.
I feel safe with him.
Visit my Facebook profile.
I will eat the meat.
I'm eating the meat.
This pen doesn't write well.
This pen doesn't write well.
That's correct.
He's too busy.
He looks well.
He looks well.
He loves trains.
He seems kind.
He looks young.
He looks pale.
He looks healthy.
Lunch is ready.
Dinner smells delicious.
Dogs are faithful.
Education is important.
We can see the whole city from here.
We can see the whole city from here.
I have a green shirt.
He always sings in the shower.
He always sings while taking a shower.
I know the subject well.
The bird on the roof is a crow.
Who is the girl in the pink dress?
Do you want me to wait?
Do you want me to wait?
Do you want me to wait?
Do you want me to wait?
Do you want my opinion?
Do you want my opinion?
You look happy today.
You look happy today.
Do you want us to wait?
Do you want us to wait?
Don't talk to them now.
Don't talk to them now.
I could make you happy.
I could make you happy.
I could make you happy.
I could make you happy.
I could make you happy.
I could make you happy.
I didn't shoot anybody.
I don't think it's odd.
I don't talk like that.
I don't want to forget.
I have plenty of ideas.
I have to get up early.
I haven't finished yet.
I hear a phone ringing.
I hear a phone ringing.
I hope everything's OK.
I hope everything's OK.
I hope you can help me.
I hope you can help me.
I hope you can help us.
I hope you can help us.
I hope you get the job.
I hope you get the job.
I just hope I can help.
I knew you'd like that.
I knew you'd like that.
I knew you'd like that.
I knew you'd like that.
I know how that sounds.
I know why Tom's happy.
I meet a lot of people.
I meet a lot of people.
I need a little advice.
I need a pen and paper.
I promise I won't look.
I see you've been busy.
I see you've been busy.
I see you've been busy.
I thought it was weird.
I thought it was weird.
I thought we said 2:30.
I thought we said 2:30.
I told you not to move.
I told you not to move.
I told you not to move.
I told you not to move.
I try to stay informed.
I want to drink coffee.
I have a lot of photos.
I want you to lie down.
I want you to lie down.
I want you to lie down.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I wanted to let Tom go.
I was afraid to say no.
I was afraid to say no.
I was hoping you'd ask.
I was hoping you'd ask.
I was hoping you'd ask.
I was hoping you'd ask.
I was just daydreaming.
I was just daydreaming.
I will leave you alone.
I will leave you alone.
I'm not telling you again.
I won't tell you again.
I wonder what it means.
I wonder what this means.
I wouldn't repeat that.
I wouldn't repeat that.
I'd be willing to help.
I'd be willing to help.
I'd better return this.
I'd better return this.
I'd do almost anything.
I'd do almost anything.
I don't know why Tom is so nervous.
I'll be in the kitchen.
I'll be there in a sec.
I'll call Tom tomorrow.
I'll call Tom tomorrow.
I'll call you tomorrow.
I'll call you tomorrow.
I'll call an ambulance.
I'll leave immediately.
I'll take it from here.
I'll talk to you later.
I'll talk to you later.
I'll wait for you here.
I'll wait for you here.
I'll wait for you here.
I'll wait for you here.
I'm a little busy, Tom.
I'm a little busy, Tom.
I'm afraid Tom is dead.
I'm aware of the facts.
I'm done with all that.
I'm completely serious.
I'm completely serious.
I'm coming to save you.
I'm coming to save you.
They are both good students.
You'll be safe with him.
Write the address and the home phone number.
There are many sentences about DNA, but none about RNA.
The queen stood beside the king.
If you're happy, so am I.
He belongs to the upper class.
This lake is deep.
Tom took off his shirt.
Fuckin' asshole!
I'm going back to work.
Are you sure that's all?
Are you sure that's all?
Are you sure that's all?
Do you want to go there?
Do you want to go there?
Eat as much as you want.
Eat as much as you want.
Half of them don't work.
I almost didn't see you.
I almost didn't see you.
I almost didn't see you.
I almost didn't see you.
I came here to save you.
I came here to save you.
I came here to save you.
I came here to save you.
I couldn't find my keys.
I couldn't find my keys.
I do hope we don't lose.
I don't think it's fair.
I don't want to go back.
I have a boat and a car.
I have a different idea.
I have an offer to make.
I have nothing to offer.
I have three grown sons.
I hope that's the truth.
I hope this is worth it.
Don't watch television.
I hope we can all agree.
I hope you like the job.
I hope you like the job.
I hope you're listening.
I hope you're listening.
I just can't believe it.
I just hope Tom is safe.
I just love you so much.
I just love you so much.
I know how hard that is.
I know how to do my job.
I know how to get there.
I know Tom is busy.
I know you're busy, Tom.
I must do as Tom wishes.
I must do as Tom wishes.
I need help immediately.
I need some information.
I promise I won't drink.
I think you'd like that.
I think you'd like that.
I thought you said 2:30.
I thought you said 2:30.
I thought you said 2:30.
I thought you said 2:30.
I thought you said 2:30.
I thought you said 2:30.
I want to give Tom this.
I wanted to talk to you.
I wanted to talk to you.
I wanted to talk to you.
I wanted to talk to you.
I wanted us to be happy.
I wanted us to be happy.
I was going to call Tom.
I was going to call Tom.
I was hoping you'd know.
I was hoping you'd know.
I was hoping you'd know.
I was hoping you'd know.
I was just doing my job.
I was just doing my job.
I was so busy last week.
I was so busy last week.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was talking about you.
I was up half the night.
I was up half the night.
I was told Tom was dead.
I wish I could prove it.
I wish I could prove it.
I wish I could prove it.
I wonder how that works.
I wonder what Tom meant.
I won't let you do that.
I won't let you do that.
I won't let that happen.
I wonder where Tom went.
I wonder who left these.
I work in this building.
I'd have waited for you.
I'd have waited for you.
I'd have waited for you.
I'd like that very much.
I'll be at the hospital.
I'll call you in a week.
I'll call you in a week.
I'll go back and get it.
I'm at the hospital now.
I'm busy right now, Tom.
I'm busy right now, Tom.
I'm glad Tom liked it.
I'm glad Tom enjoyed it.
I'm glad you're pleased.
I'm glad you're pleased.
I'm glad you're pleased.
I'm glad you're pleased.
I'm glad you're pleased.
I'm glad you're pleased.
All Tom does is watch TV.
Are you paying attention?
Are you paying attention?
Can't you leave me alone?
Can't you leave me alone?
Can't you see we're busy?
Can't you see we're busy?
Could I look at that one?
Could you leave us alone?
Could you leave us alone?
Does that make you happy?
Does that make you happy?
Does that make you happy?
He breathed deeply.
Tom answered carefully.
You never can tell what some people might buy.
He kept me waiting all morning.
The food in jail was better.
What have I done with my keys?
The cat is drinking your milk.
He was born in England, but was educated in America.
Jerusalem is the capital of Israel.
Oslo is the capital of Norway.
Islamabad is the capital of Pakistan.
Yerevan is the capital of Armenia.
Stockholm is the capital of Sweden.
Quito is the capital of Ecuador.
The capital of Italy is Rome.
The capital of Morocco is Rabat.
The capital of Italy is Rome.
The capital city of Serbia is Belgrade.
I'm very poor.
I'm very poor.
I'm very poor.
I'm very poor.
I'm giving you all I can.
I'm giving you all I can.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm glad you're not dead.
I'm going back to school.
Let me explain for those living under a rock.
Naturally.
Sofia is the capital of Bulgaria.
Minsk is the capital of Belarus.
Prague is the capital of the Czech Republic.
Ljubljana is the capital of Slovenia.
Bratislava is the capital of Slovakia.
Bucharest is the capital of Romania.
Lisbon is the capital of Portugal.
Podgorica is the capital of Montenegro.
Riga is the capital of Latvia.
Zagreb is the capital of Croatia.
Astana is the capital of Kazakhstan.
The capital of Vietnam is Hanoi.
Ignore it.
Talk to me.
Talk to me.
Tom's busy.
Was it fun?
Is Tom busy?
It belonged to Tom.
Was Tom busy?
Give it a try.
Give it a try.
Give it a try.
I wasn't busy.
I wasn't busy.
I'm busy here.
I'm busy here.
Nobody's busy.
Read it to me.
Read it to me.
They are busy.
Was it a joke?
Was it a joke?
Was that a no?
We'll be busy.
We're so busy.
Were you busy?
Were you busy?
Were you busy?
How do we look?
Sing us a song.
They look busy.
They seem busy.
This is theirs.
This isn't fun.
Tom is ignoring me.
Tom left early.
Tom looks busy.
Tom seems busy.
Tom's not busy.
Was that a yes?
We're not busy.
Who's not busy?
You need a key.
You need a key.
You'll be busy.
You'll be busy.
You'll be busy.
Aren't you busy?
Aren't you busy?
Aren't you busy?
Buy Tom a drink.
Buy Tom a drink.
Can you be sure?
Can you be sure?
Can you be sure?
Everyone's busy.
Everyone's busy.
Give Tom a call.
Give Tom a call.
Good night, Tom.
How did Tom act?
I was really busy.
I was very busy.
I'm always busy.
I'm always busy.
I'm always busy.
Tom has grown up and can stand on his own feet now.
It's raining, and we forgot to close the windows.
Tom fired a couple of shots in our direction.
Which branch of the armed forces were you in?
We must take a firm stand on this matter.
Tom works for me as my private secretary.
We may find it necessary to leave early.
Tom is a fool if he believes that story.
We need another day to finish this job.
Could I have a knife and fork, please?
That's a fine way to treat a friend!
Do you have a key to fit this lock?
We must finish this job tonight.
I have to go to the store first.
Can you figure out this problem?
Is thirty dollars enough?
I can't find my keys anywhere.
I represent an American firm.
I do this for the fun of it.
We live on the third floor.
It was all over in a flash.
Wait till I finish eating.
Do you know it for a fact?
Wait till they open fire.
They came in full force.
Tom stepped on my foot.
Tom is over thirty.
Where's the fire?
It's my lucky number.
Your wish is my command.
The room was full of smoke.
What's more important?
What's more important?
Mary is arrogant about her beauty.
Don't stop!
That's not relevant.
I meant to call her, but I forgot to.
Sorry that I forgot. I'm completely out of it today.
I can't believe I forgot.
I can't believe I forgot.
Tom thinks it was a good experience.
Tom thinks it was a good experience.
I am tired of homework.
I am tired of homework.
I’m too tired to run.
There's no way to translate it.
I'm tired of TV.
I'm tired of TV.
I'm tired of watching TV.
I'm tired of watching TV.
I'm tired of studying.
I'm tired of studying.
I'm tired of talking to you about this.
I'm tired of talking to you about this.
I'm tired of talking to you about this.
I'm tired of talking to you about this.
I'm so tired that I'm going to bed as soon as I get home.
I'm very tired. I don't feel like taking a walk now.
I'm so tired that I can barely move.
I'm so tired that I can barely move.
I'm too tired to do study.
I'm too tired to do study.
I'm suddenly tired.
I'm suddenly tired.
Jesus Christ!
Call me when you return.
He has no less than five English books.
Children played in the garden.
It was a piece of cake.
She looks at the world through rose-colored glasses.
You look so happy.
You look so happy.
You look so happy.
You look so happy.
You look so happy.
My new phone is thinner than my old phone.
Hello Grandfather.
They want you dead.
I can't believe I'm talking to you about this.
She was happy for some time.
Something has changed.
If you could go back and start your life again, from what age would you like to start?
Why do you need a new television?
The population of Osaka is larger than that of Kyoto.
Do you see the portrait?
She called him.
I had hoped we might become friends.
I had hoped we might become friends.
I had hoped we might become friends.
I've heard that song before.
Did you ever see that movie?
I decided to try again.
Will you help me with my English homework?
Will you help me with my English homework?
A large or medium-sized one?
I've heard this song before.
Tom bought a very expensive camera.
This looks interesting.
This looks interesting.
This looks interesting.
This wasn't my mistake.
He built a new house.
He came back home a while ago.
He came back last August.
He came downstairs.
He came even though I told him not to.
I almost caught the fish.
I almost caught the fish.
He came home late last night.
I didn't drink the milk.
I didn't drink the milk.
The car is blue.
I can't believe Tom is gone.
I'm glad you're safe.
I'm glad you're safe.
Tom likes watching TV in the evening.
It's still early.
She took a pen out of her pocket.
He quickly disappeared in the crowd.
Go and be happy!
Home sweet home.
He asked me if I was happy.
He can run faster than me.
He is the fastest runner in his class.
He can sing better than any of us.
He ended up in jail.
Tom handed Mary the menu.
If you were in my place, what would you do?
If you were in my place, what would you do?
If you were in my place, what would you do?
The shop is closed on Sunday.
The shop is closed on Sunday.
Don't mind him.
I own this sentence.
All kidding aside, it may work.
Tom isn't watching TV now.
He doesn't have a clue about anything. But he still has an opinion about everything.
Laurie sat on the chair.
There is a television in the room.
There's something inside this box.
He always forgets his money.
What is your favorite holiday?
We often play cards on Sunday.
I never dreamed that I would meet her again.
Don't treat me like I'm stupid.
I'll pay for your lunch today.
I'll pay for your lunch today.
He closed his eyes.
This song is not loved by girls.
Once upon a time there was a poor man and a rich woman.
There are three kinds of people in the world: those who can count, and those who can't.
Jimmy knows everything about cars.
I go to the church on Sundays.
I have a key.
I'm not so sure anymore.
If you're busy, I'll ask someone else to help me.
I'm not asking for their opinion.
He showed me a lot of beautiful photos.
I take the subway almost every day.
Let me have a look.
Fatima is the eldest student in our class.
Is this the key your uncle is looking for?
I went to the hospital.
I went to the hospital.
Prices have gone up a lot in the last year.
I'll be there on the fourth.
I'm going to go right away.
Tom wants to go by train.
Do you often go to town?
Do you like French wine?
The shop is open from Monday to Saturday.
You're an adult.
You're an adult.
Tom needs money for college.
Tom needs money for college.
I must catch the first train.
I must catch the first train.
The policeman caught the man by the arm.
The policeman caught the man by the arm.
He said, "Leave me alone."
He said: "Leave me in peace!"
He said: "Leave me in peace!"
He said: "Leave me in peace!"
I like your shirt.
Mogadishu is the capital of Somalia.
There were three men.
He had an odd look on his face.
He had an odd look on his face.
He had an odd look on his face.
The sister of my mother is my aunt.
I like the waves of the Black Sea.
I've got to go to the hospital.
He was sent to jail for murder.
I was moved by this movie.
I heard an interesting rumor.
Now, you have to choose: either me or Tatoeba.
Now, you have to choose: either me or Tatoeba.
Now, you have to choose: either me or Tatoeba.
My language is very complicated.
Do you think he'll like it?
You'd better go. It's getting late.
It was all my fault.
It was all my fault.
What's for lunch?
I have nothing else to lose.
This sentence is too long.
They showed me a lot of beautiful photos.
I promise not to sing.
You can watch television after dinner.
You can watch television after dinner.
You can watch television after dinner.
You can watch television after dinner.
She showed him my picture.
My grandfather is very healthy.
I want to get out of here.
I don't mind waiting for a while.
I don't mind getting up at six.
I really like trains.
This is the largest museum in the city.
He studied abroad.
We finished the work.
I suppose you have the right to know.
He cried out in pain.
He cut his sister a piece of bread.
You have somebody you can talk to, don't you?
When she was abroad, she often used Skype.
Tell me truly what you think about it.
Tell me truly what you think about it.
You look pale. What's the matter with you?
You look pale. What's the matter with you?
You look pale. What's the matter with you?
I'll phone you later.
I caught her by the hand.
I caught her by the hand.
I caught her by the hand.
I won't allow it!
I called them.
I wish I could sing like you do.
You too have no idea how important you are for me.
I don't want to go back to the way things were.
The last time I saw him, he was very healthy.
Don't laugh at his mistake.
I won first place.
I got first place.
Don't look into the box.
Don't look into the box.
It's a large amount.
Take a look.
It smelled really good.
They're attempting to contact her.
We hurried to catch the bus.
We hurried to catch the bus.
We all want Tom to be happy.
Tom's changed so much that I don't think you'd recognize him if you saw him.
We'll talk about it tomorrow.
I'll be busy next week.
I guess you will be very busy tonight.
He is probably busy.
Bottoms up!
The boy made his parents happy.
No one took notice of him.
She has about as many stamps as I do.
Don't make the same mistake again.
Don't make the same mistake again.
She and I are in the same class.
He and I are in the same class.
Are these all the sizes you have?
We laughed.
Spring comes after winter.
There is no market for these goods in Japan.
We're very interested.
Don't let him take the car.
He showed us a picture of his mother.
Tom read somewhere that short people need more sleep than tall people.
The teachers teach.
I came here to learn.
They have English lessons three times a week.
Elaine is in hospital.
The hospital is crowded.
Why would you want to do something like that?
Is there a shop here?
I can't believe she did that!
They won't hurt you.
I can't believe she just said that.
The bird flies.
That house belongs to them.
Laurie drank the water.
There's also a toilet on the fourth floor.
The captain ordered his men to fire.
Do I have a knife?
I don't like to use Google Translate.
I'm singing a song.
There is a toilet on the fourth floor, too.
The pies are still cooking.
I'm sure I will find a way.
Even though I'm sitting here in the sun, I'm still cold.
I'm a student, but he isn't.
This fall was long and not too cold.
This car is very expensive.
So, where do you want to do this?
They don't seem happy.
They don't seem happy.
I know it was strange.
Try the cake.
We are on the same level.
We are on the same level.
He sat beside her with his eyes closed.
Why isn't anyone helping Tom?
You don't listen, do you?
You remember me, don't you?
It's obvious that she doesn't care about us.
Sébastien got married three days ago.
He died from the cold last night.
He doesn't have the ability to do the work properly.
He drank a little.
He drank three bottles of beer.
We are on the same level.
Why don't you come over?
I was in the hospital last week.
You didn't even cry.
I wasn't expecting it from you!
I wasn't expecting it from you!
I wasn't expecting it from you!
I wasn't expecting it from you!
I managed to catch the last train.
I managed to catch the last train.
I managed to catch the last train.
He played with his cat.
Having seen him in the picture, I recognized him at once.
I don't want to go back to prison.
They will help the poor.
He's wearing a kilt.
When do you watch TV? "I watch TV after dinner."
How much TV do you watch?
Do your homework before you watch TV.
Do you want to watch this movie again?
Watch carefully how I do it. Did you see it?
Tom's important.
Long live the King!
Everyone has the right to personal liberty.
Tom is happy again.
Those students are in the classroom.
I can't believe you did that!
We eat bread and butter for lunch.
What's your favorite European city?
What's your favorite European city?
You're looking well.
Can I study here?
Leave the suitcase there!
I have a normal eyesight.
Stop pretending you don't know the answer.
They have the horse.
I've never seen you look so nervous.
The king is naked!
Did she like that dinner?
I can't read small letters.
What's the capital of Sri Lanka? "Sri Jayawardenapura Kotte." "Correct!"
I wish I had seen the film.
It doesn't seem right.
We ran in the park.
Tom was singing.
He speaks as if he were rich.
He's done his homework.
How many documents do you have to translate?
He extended his right arm.
Helena is a secretary, right?
Tom doesn't like summer. He says it's too hot.
She lost her son in a car accident.
When does the show start?
Those are our teachers' cars.
Those are our teachers' cars.
The committee meets twice a month.
She went to France in order to study music.
Bring me that glass of milk.
She gave me a shirt.
He fell off the horse.
He finally decided to try.
He fired three shots.
The cost of the painting is very high.
Turkey is a beautiful country.
The First World War took place between 1914 and 1918.
Bill brought me a glass of water.
I called her last evening but she didn't answer.
I will call her once again tomorrow.
I wanted to call you but I didn't have your number.
Never call me again!
I'll be calling you every morning.
I call her every evening.
Seriously? I haven't noticed.
The bottle is on the upper shelf.
My mistake cost me my fortune.
Don't throw a stone at the dog.
Don't be too sure.
Tom died with a knife in his back.
He went to bed early.
I've never heard this song before.
How is this flower called?
I've always wanted to know what that meant.
There's the problem.
I was happy, wasn't I?
I was happy, wasn't I?
I was happy, wasn't I?
I was happy, wasn't I?
I was happy for her.
I was happy for her.
I was happy for him.
I was happy for him.
It's almost a miracle.
Don't cry. Crying doesn't solve anything.
I owe my success to my friend.
Her beauty was beyond description.
Her book is very interesting.
I owe my success to my friend.
I owe my success to my friend.
I don't know any French songs.
Do you want to drink something?
No one listened to me.
Promise me you won't tell Mom.
Promise me you won't tell her.
Pass me the butter, please.
You matter.
You are important.
The children like to watch television.
Do you often go to the church?
Are you for or against his idea?
Tom is repeating what he said.
What's your favorite castle in Japan?
She smiled and accepted my little present.
Have you met a lot of Esperantists here?
He loves trains.
Her long hair was completely wet.
I love martial arts!
I am full of doubt.
When I was your age, I had a job.
He hung up.
Her eyes were filled with tears.
Say that again, please.
The house is burning!
We are here because we want to speak a new language and so, we must speak it!
He did it for the money.
I can't read this.
If you follow me, I'll show you the way to the hospital.
He told me not to smoke.
That is no business of his.
Do you cry often?
Give me an example.
This happens all the time.
Wait for six hours.
This shirt suits you well.
Don't forget to talk with him tomorrow.
Tom commutes to school by train.
Tom commutes to school by train.
It doesn't matter.
She looks very happy today.
He studies much harder than before.
I know you're busy, too.
Wait till six.
Wait till six.
He used to get up early.
His answer is to the point.
She went off with her friends.
The lunch is on the table.
People shouldn't abuse animals.
She has taught music for thirty years.
I should've finished that sooner.
She told us that the road was closed.
She called the students into the room.
She called the students into the room.
I didn't know you had a cat.
I borrowed money from my friends.
Stand back, please.
He chose a good wife.
I must study.
Mary hasn't cut the meat yet.
The baby started to cry.
There is no money in my bag.
You look good!
How do you spend your free time?
Only college graduates are eligible for this job.
I'm in the habit of sleeping late on Sundays.
What language group does French belong to?
A group of students stood in the street.
Did they grant Tom permission to leave?
I shook hands with Tom and left.
The business has changed hands.
That's no way to treat a guest.
It's a gray stone building.
Tom gave me good advice.
Tom is a grown man now.
We'll be there by 2:30.
Open your book to page 59.
Open your book to page 59.
I'm sorry, I'm busy right now.
I want to be a journalist.
Why did you come this early?
I met her by chance on a train.
It's not on the map.
It's not on the map.
It's not on the map.
This time you went too far.
You'll forget about me someday.
It may save your life.
His grandmother looks healthy.
I'm not as busy as Tom is.
There's no time to lose.
There are no classes today.
I have no doubt about it.
I wonder what Tom will think.
He found the box under the table.
It was hard to believe.
I think you're going to like it.
Where are the keys?
I'm at the hospital.
I'm going to church.
We're in the garden.
I'll never forgive you.
Listen to yourself.
Listen to yourself.
Look, honey. You can't do that!
His house is not far from here.
He left for New York a week ago.
Tom likes to tell dirty jokes.
He has narrow shoulders.
I didn't know how to do it, but I was willing to give it a try.
His new novel is worth reading.
I was trembling with fear.
Children have to learn foreign languages.
Tom is expecting someone.
Jessica was singing a song.
He died during surgery.
Try it. You'll like it.
It's the perfect opportunity!
And that's how my dad met my mom.
I got nervous.
My goal is to be happy.
My goal is to be happy.
My goal is to become happy.
My goal is to become happy.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I don't understand what the teacher said.
They are important matters.
Have you been drinking?
He's in a good mood today.
I'm sure that my friend already heard about this.
They most certainly know.
I grew up here.
I grew up in this house.
It's all the same.
Call security!
Call security!
I'd like to talk with you privately.
God or nature.
How would you translate this sentence?
I am dead.
I am dead.
You're dead.
You're dead.
It's dead.
It's dead.
They are dead.
If only I had a map, I could show you the way.
Today is my birthday.
Do you smoke?
Don't you smoke?
Don't you smoke?
You've come too early.
I remember that I met the queen.
I suppose we should tell Tom the truth.
I just woke up.
You're on the list.
He's dead?
The building has twenty floors.
The building has twenty floors.
You know it doesn't matter.
You know it doesn't matter.
I am thirty years old.
Are you sure you don't want to go with us?
You can't go in there!
You can't go in there!
There are four seasons in a year: spring, summer, autumn and winter.
Tom is my student.
I will gladly help you.
How much time does it take?
I'm absolutely sure!
I went to the market.
Stop hitting the cat!
Stop hitting the cat!
I saw him enter the room.
There are some flies on the wall.
Health is an important condition of success.
I owe you a lunch.
That's to be expected.
It hurts so much.
I've got some suggestions.
I don't remember where I put my key.
Tom was in the kitchen.
Tom was in a good mood.
Why are they crying?
I never noticed.
She's not sure she's ready.
He's not sure he's ready.
Tom says he can't put up with the heat any longer.
Tom says he can't ignore the smell any longer.
I'm not sure I'm ready.
He heard a shout.
I am an engineer.
He is not a student.
Life is a beautiful thing and there's so much to smile about.
That always helps.
Please stand back!
I don't have a suit.
Did you know that the star nearest to Earth is the Sun?
Which bed do you want to use?
I think Tom will enjoy this.
She is always free in the afternoon.
Does that belong to you?
Does that belong to you?
There's nothing to fear.
You've got nothing to be afraid of.
Please wait.
Hold the box with both hands.
It was the only way.
Is your uncle still abroad?
The children have been instructed to take their places.
You don't need much intelligence to understand that.
The history of France is very interesting.
Why is Tom in such high spirits today?
I helped the old man cross the street.
This building has three floors.
Who helps you with your housework?
May I see the inside of the house?
Tom held office for a long time.
Prices have reached a new high.
Why do you insist on going?
Is that too heavy for you?
The light hit Tom's eyes.
Tom is a heavy drinker.
This price is too high.
Come here this instant.
That movie was a hit.
Don't ever lie to me again.
I knew nobody would believe me.
How can I serve you?
I knew they were on the list.
I have to remember to mail the letter.
I knew this was a bad idea.
I knew this was a mistake.
When and where did you come to know her?
He decided not to go to the meeting.
I spent a week in the hospital.
I shoved my hands into my pockets.
We need fresh air.
Where are your car keys?
You're in a good mood today. Did something nice happen?
Tom didn't like that movie at all.
The desk has three drawers.
Are you speaking to me?
She's a Pisces.
We invited them for dinner.
They invited them to dinner.
Everyone has their own point of view.
Is that really important?
I wonder who this is from.
I wonder what his name is.
I will buy a watch at the store.
How about 12:45?
Tom felt his knees tremble.
You're going to be famous.
Look in the mirror.
He hasn't read the book yet.
My brother caught a big fish.
Sing the song once more, please.
He is about my age.
He is totally dependent on his parents.
Sound is less quick than light.
It's like summer outside.
We ran after the cat.
I let them go.
I let them go.
He was on the roof with his electric guitar.
I can't reach the top shelf.
How do you plan to get home?
The museum is open from Monday to Friday.
She fell from the tree.
I'm accustomed to getting up early.
A sound mind in a sound body.
How can I get to the police station?
We meet here once a week.
You're in danger.
How did you get to know him?
How did you get to know her?
How did you get to know him?
He used to get up early when he was young.
Tom looks frightened.
I'll help you with your French, if you help me with my English.
In Russia women hit you, and not vice versa.
The cat crossed the street.
He went shopping.
I've lost my car key.
When I grow up I want to be a great scientist.
The revolution has its own laws.
I will go to the university tomorrow, too.
I caught the last bus.
It's against my principles.
I had hardly started to eat when I noticed that she was crying.
I sold a book.
Tom told me to give you anything you want.
Go back to bed.
She looks very good.
I've lived here since I was a kid.
I'll call you.
I'll give you a call.
Give us a call.
Are you healthy?
Are you healthy?
That is a boat.
Somebody called.
What do you think of the movie?
How did you get to know that person?
How do I get to Gate 5?
He finally reached the hotel.
He is a good student.
Many people do not trust the government.
I have doubts.
I have information.
I want them to give me my money back.
We have nothing to lose.
We're in a hurry.
No one's watching me.
No one can figure it out.
No one speaks with me.
I don't have anybody else to turn to.
No one knows what Tom looks like.
Tom soon realized that no one was paying any attention to him.
The store is close to my house.
Why are you showing me this?
It was so hot that I thought I was going to pass out.
They sang in chorus.
Who owns this house?
Can you put that into English?
Get into the car and wait for me.
I don't want to make an issue of it.
I got into trouble.
It was a friend of mine who called.
When does the next issue of the magazine come out?
Do you like fish?
I didn't expect to see you here.
I didn't expect to see you here.
I didn't expect to find you here.
I didn't expect to find you here.
I didn't call an ambulance.
I don't find it that interesting.
I like yellow.
They have taken her away.
He always listens to serious music.
A year of snow is a year of prosperity.
Tatoeba is watching you.
Tatoeba is watching you.
He hasn't gone anywhere - he's at home.
He did not so much as turn his head.
He saved me from danger.
He was aware of the danger.
He was unaware of the danger.
I won't allow you to date my sister.
She gave him all the money that she had.
I forgot to send the letter.
I've forgotten to post the letter.
I'm afraid she will fail.
Just as you treat me, so I will treat you.
When will you complete the preparations?
Please don't cry again.
You smoke too much. Don't smoke so much!
I hope you'll be happy forever.
Listen to me!
Many famous artists live in New York.
Is everyone happy?
I went to the city yesterday, but I'm not going today nor will I tomorrow.
I didn't expect you so soon.
I didn't murder anyone.
I didn't kill anybody.
Tom knew it was impossible.
Tom just got married.
Tom is still in prison.
Tom is in jail now.
Tom hasn't changed a bit.
When was the last time you rented a house?
When was the last time you rented a house?
Tom put up with the pain for a couple of weeks before finally going to the hospital.
Do you want to end up like Tom?
Do you want me to come in with you?
Do you think that Tom is happy?
You promise?
Do you promise me you'll do that?
Do you have a gun?
Don't you have something to do?
Why are you reading this novel?
What do you think of his suggestion?
Follow the stars.
How do I use this?
How do I use this?
She guided me to the palace.
I wouldn't be so sure about that.
There's no danger.
He stood there with his eyes closed.
It's the best film of the year.
I do not know the exact place that I was born.
I almost caught the fish.
You are beautifully dressed.
You are beautifully dressed.
You are beautifully dressed.
You are so kind.
You are very rich.
It is interesting to watch stars.
He closely resembles his father.
I have a present for me.
I caught more fish than Tom did.
Fish don't like sunlight.
I shouldn't have walked home late at night by myself.
I wanted to have a word with you about what happened.
Eat your soup while it is hot.
It was a huge success.
We are used to living in a big city.
The President died unexpectedly.
Having a good time, old sport?
It depends on the weather.
How many national parks are there in Kenya?
How many museums are there in Oslo?
They're watching me.
How high is Mont Blanc?
How high is Mt. Fuji?
I can't read French, nor can I speak it.
Suddenly, something unexpected happened.
Tom jumped up from his chair.
The joke is on Tom.
Tom's crying. "I know."
It's just across the street from the church.
There's a white building just around the corner.
This house is famous.
I thought Tom had stopped smoking.
Wait for me in the meeting room.
The present government has many problems.
I wonder who started that rumor.
His son trembled with fear.
He neither wrote nor telephoned.
The building that I saw was very large.
I can't believe Tom figured that out.
This car was so cheap that he could buy it.
It is possible that I forgot my keys.
Welcome to Canada!
You fool, I had to do it!
She understands the core of the problem well.
Where is the train?
My pants are too short.
Wait here. I'll return shortly.
I get goose bumps when I see a horror movie.
She was wearing a gown of satin.
That reminds me of home.
She's busy with her work.
How high is that mountain?
I call her up every day.
Please say hello to your wife for me.
I'm not doing this for money.
I'm not certain Tom is happy.
Rome is the capital of the world.
I can't sing.
I can't sing.
She had no idea how she got there.
She had no idea how she got there.
This book contains a lot of short stories.
Are you students?
We need to talk about how to do it.
This is a good idea.
The lake is big.
I'm important.
I'm important.
Do you want to drink something?
I don't want to lose you.
That's a pretty dress.
Give me your best smile.
How many times a day do you look at yourself in the mirror?
There are animals here.
I am calling my brother.
What a miracle!
We can't leave our suitcases here.
He explained to her his circumstances.
Tom never knew if he had accomplished it.
Look closely.
Let's meet at one o'clock.
This was not a joke.
When do you study?
There's some milk in the bottle.
If I had known your telephone number, I would've called you.
Tom didn't kill anyone.
Tom doesn't wear glasses, but he used to.
On the whole human beings want to be good, but not too good and not quite all the time.
I hope this seat is not occupied.
What's your impression of that person like?
I will call you within a week.
His legs were trembling from fear.
Tom dragged himself out of bed.
Your pen is better than mine.
That's a very interesting story.
He arrived safe and sound.
I'm trying to be happy.
Look at that!
This is a glass of water.
It's in the kitchen.
I want this bag.
I have worked in this factory.
I guess after so many beers Tom is probably very drunk.
Tom is on the roof.
What did you have for lunch today?
I'm used to the noise.
Their boy was named Edward.
The white cat is under the tree.
Without your help, I would have been unable to do it.
I found the book interesting.
They were, for the most part, college students.
Nothing seems to grow in this soil.
The idea of God would be more interesting if instead of having created humans he had found them.
Paper burns quickly.
Please fetch me a piece of paper.
Ultraviolet rays can cause skin cancer.
He gave his life for his country.
He went to London two years ago.
I knew you'd come back sooner or later.
I knew you'd like it.
Why didn't you listen to him?
He left Tokyo for Osaka.
What's wrong with running around your house naked?
I don't like this sentence.
Not every citizen of Russia is Russian.
Can you wait a bit?
He crossed the street.
I was the same age as you.
We don't know our neighbors.
I don't like your suggestion.
I don't like your suggestion.
It was late, so I went home.
It was late, so I went home.
You promise?
I wanted to talk with you.
This shirt costs ten dollars.
I will go to the meeting.
Don't ever call me again.
Don't ever call me again.
I'm going to teach you some karate.
Is smoking allowed here?
I didn't tell him you were coming.
Will you help me translate?
Stay for lunch.
May I keep this photograph?
Knock before you open the door.
I've lost the key to my room.
How many kilometers is it to the next town?
Give me the big knife to cut the bread.
Certainly, my knowledge of French is limited.
Are you for or against his idea?
Can you give me an example?
I put on my glasses to see the blackboard.
Kate found the watch which she had lost.
She went shopping with her friend.
She went shopping with her friend.
He carried her bag.
I like being on the team.
She was wearing a beautiful dress.
Do you get up at six?
Don't you find it interesting?
Tom got lucky.
I'm not eager to meet him.
I hope she's safe.
When will you give me back the money you borrowed from me a year ago?
Is the bank open today?
I waited.
I waited.
This song reminds me of my childhood.
That song reminds me of my childhood.
You may use my new car.
I'm the guilty one.
He didn't even read it.
Hindsight is always twenty-twenty.
Our neighbours were forced to sell their house.
I'd like to talk to you about what happened at school yesterday.
I won't let you go.
They won't let you go.
Never forget who you are!
It's a beautiful day, isn't it?
I'm in danger.
I'm completely naked.
I'm not lying.
You are coming home late, right?
The sun sets behind the mountain.
Watch carefully. I'll show you how it's done.
She was born in the United States and grew up in Japan.
I didn't like it.
My children were taken away from me.
I saw a beautiful bird.
I saw a beautiful bird.
Did you find your keys?
There are a lot of things you don't know about my personality.
He's a Sephardic Jew.
What's the program for tomorrow?
How soon will you be able to finish that job?
May I sleep on the couch?
Has Lucy already called?
He wrote a sentence on the paper, but I didn't understand the sentence.
And do the travellers remember him?
You don't want to go to prison, do you?
I asked her to go to a movie with me.
The city I grew up is very beautiful.
You were drunk, weren't you?
You were drunk, weren't you?
Every ship needs a captain.
Tom could never forget the horror of the war.
It's my pleasure.
It's my pleasure.
Whose socks are these? "They are my sister's."
Was that Tom who was playing the organ at church last Sunday?
There is one problem.
How kind you are!
She wants a serious relationship.
A dog can run faster than a man can.
Better the devil you know than the devil you don't.
It's a good movie.
Tom likes to sing.
Bet you thought we were all done talking about the lesson?
What is your favorite color?
What is your favorite color?
I wasn't present at the meeting.
I can't help crying.
I have to finish what I started.
Happiness is good health and a poor memory.
I feel much safer now.
I don't think I can do it.
There's a little bit of water in the glass.
I can't find my key.
I have a magazine in my room.
I got acquainted with him three years ago.
The dog is afraid of the horse.
We have to admit that our team is inferior to the American one.
I don't use them.
I don't use them.
I agreed to the proposal.
Good night, my friends.
Good night, my friends.
He has gone to America.
It doesn't hurt at all.
I don't waste time.
You'll lose time.
We'll lose time.
You'll lose time.
You will go, you will never return, in war you will perish.
You will go, you will return, never in war will you perish.
Bright picture.
He claims that he is a painter.
Many of the people died.
I agreed to the proposal.
Don't go without a hat.
Don't go without a hat.
I never thought about it that way.
He is abroad.
Turn left at the corner.
Hi Tom, and welcome to Tatoeba!
She got caught.
He got caught.
Thank you very much for your present.
Thank you very much for your present.
Pull yourself together and stop crying.
It was already late, so I went back home.
This time, you've gone too far.
This time, you've gone too far.
Happy is he who has a homeland.
The light was so strong that Tom had to shut his eyes.
I love to walk along the river in the mornings.
Do you wish to speak to the lady of the house?
Tom is below the general level of the class.
Tom always looked to his father for help.
The crew lowered the body into the sea.
Tom is a lot better than people think.
Tom had a great love for the theater.
The big window looks out on a garden.
What are we going to have for lunch?
Tom has a level head in emergencies.
I don't want to lose any more time.
I consider the price too low.
Tom has very liberal views.
Where is the ladies' room?
It's too heavy to lift.
Don't lose hope.
I suppose you want to ask me where I've been.
The sentence you're reading doesn't exist.
It's still a long way to the top of the mountain.
I always got up early in my childhood.
I'm 30 now.
I'm a bit tipsy.
I can't allow you to do that.
I can't allow you to do that.
She told her son to wait a minute.
I'm not sure I want to see this.
Pardon me, how do I get to Downing Street from here?
Follow your sister's example.
Follow your sister's example.
A bottle of rosé, please.
I'm drunk.
The soul is eternal.
I am sorry I cannot help you.
I'm writing a letter to my daughter.
Tom lost his wife three years ago.
Do you think we'll make the train?
I maintain that I'm not at fault.
Tom almost never makes a mistake.
Where can I buy a magazine?
I'd love to see this movie.
I promised to help my brother with his homework.
I'm not busy tonight.
Kim's smile was very sweet.
You don't know what you're missing.
I think he's Australian but I'm not certain.
She runs fast.
I am a member of the baseball team.
I'm a new student.
I am a professor.
I am a student, but he isn't.
I'm also a teacher.
I'm unsure.
I'm not convinced at all.
Young people must not study.
Jim has gone to London.
I have no idea who that is.
I can see my house from here.
The cat is on the roof.
In other words, she wants to refuse the proposal.
Promise me you won't do that again.
Promise me you won't do that again.
Promise me you won't do that again.
Promise me you won't do that again.
Promise me you won't do that again.
Promise me you'll never do that again.
What does he look like?
I don't know what Tom looks like.
Modern cats don't eat mice.
Children always want to become adults.
Do you think I'm silly?
Do you think I'm silly?
Boys and girls play in the garden.
I'm listening to Björk's latest song.
I sometimes hear my father singing in the bath.
I wouldn't be so sure.
I lost my house keys.
Cars arrived there one after another.
What is important for you?
What's important to you?
Forgive your enemies but don't forget their names.
Is her hair naturally red?
I saw her enter the room.
Shake my hand.
He told me that his grandfather is over ninety.
Wait five minutes, please.
Wait five minutes, please.
I can't excuse her.
I can't forgive him.
When are you coming back home?
I have a meeting today.
I'm now about as tall as my father.
I am accustomed to studying English every evening.
I am acquainted with the chairman of that club.
I am afraid of what the teacher will say.
I don't have a cat, and I never had one! — "But yes, you had one. Why are you lying then?"
What time do we get to San Francisco?
I was deeply touched by the story.
We heard her cry.
We'll let you know the result within a week.
Why are you lying?
I should've expected it.
I still don't remember calling you.
They're able to sing.
I don't want to talk about the weather.
He's in danger.
We're in danger.
I know you're busy, too.
I know you're busy, too.
I know you're busy, too.
She's in danger.
I know they'll all want to help you.
I know they'll all want to help you.
I know that this is important to you.
I know that this is important to you.
I am busy now and can't play with you.
I'm counting on you.
Does it matter to you what other people think?
I'm sure she'll leave early.
I'm sure he'll leave early.
Don't forget we have to do our homework.
I had no notion that you were coming.
Did you like his music? - "No, did you?"
I thought you'd probably already gone home.
I sold it for ten dollars.
There are many words with meanings I don't know.
Dinner is about ready.
How far above sea level are we?
He is above average height.
He said that he was happy.
Please, help my daughter.
He seems to have finished his work.
Why did you come so early?
Can I see you again?
He's been abroad for six years now.
When do you expect to go abroad?
I met him by accident.
I hadn't expected anyone to be home.
Tom was in tears.
She was in tears.
He was in tears.
I hope you feel better tomorrow.
I hope you feel better tomorrow.
I hope you feel better tomorrow.
I'll leave my number in case you want to call me.
He made up his mind to try again.
I know that this is important for us all.
Hang in there.
Hang on.
I'm a city dweller.
May I accompany you home?
I'd like to see your father.
I got a call from the school today.
Stop pulling my hair.
Stop pulling my hair!
How did you get to know him?
How did you meet her?
I didn't call.
I didn't call.
This sentence does not belong to me.
I'm watching you.
Listen.
I have some serious problems.
What a fool I was!
What a fool I was!
What a lot of pens!
I am just going for a walk.
We've got a serious problem.
They're watching you.
Are you dating anyone?
By all means consider yourself invited.
Did you meet anyone on the road?
Man to man, what are the facts?
I'd like to buy a small mirror.
Can you make room for one more?
I meant to call, but I forgot.
Are you dating anyone?
You're disturbing my reading.
How happy I am today!
How happy I am today!
How happy I am today!
How happy I am today!
Thank you for your recommendation.
He asked her why she was crying.
Whose is this phone?
We rowed up the river against the current.
I'm afraid it's too late.
Turn left.
The number of students is dropping.
Tom is breathing.
Math and English were my favorite subjects.
I don't know which one to choose.
I don't know which one to choose.
It's news to me.
First, I'll try to understand why he thinks so.
I knew he was lying.
I just want you to think about me once in a while.
I just want you to think about me once in a while.
We have to get as much information as possible.
She had a happy childhood.
I hope to see you again.
Tom is delighted.
Please raise your hand before you speak.
I am not as busy as Yoshio.
I'm not in a position to give you any advice.
I don't wish that on anyone.
She is in grave danger.
He is in grave danger.
You are in grave danger.
You are in grave danger.
They walked upstairs.
We walked up stairs.
You look busy.
Look! There goes a shooting star.
Oh, seriously?
This room is pleasant to work in.
Follow his example.
The box is made of wood.
She is always smiling.
I can't go with you.
I can't go with you.
You depend too much on others.
He hired some new workers.
I can't go to work in these clothes.
I found her cat in an empty room.
Don't call us, we'll call you.
Sorry, I forgot.
That depends on you.
I quit smoking.
I got acquainted with him last year.
I dislike cold weather.
I want something to drink.
Don't talk to anyone.
Don't talk to anybody about this.
Don't talk to anybody about this.
Sorry, my mistake.
How does the couch look without the cover?
This is really strange.
Breast cancer is a disease.
I thought you had homework.
I thought you had homework.
Please tell him to wait.
The store is closed on Sundays.
The store is closed on Sundays.
The children are singing around the campfire.
I can't stand him.
It depends on the context.
Please add me on Facebook.
Everything depends upon your decision.
They ran upstairs.
Don't throw rocks into the river.
The king got undressed.
What's your favorite animal?
What's your favorite animal?
I have to get up early tomorrow. Can you give me a call at six?
My life was in danger.
I call on him every other day.
Have some tea.
What do you think of his suggestion?
What do you think of his suggestion?
What do you think of his suggestion?
It's a quarter to two.
I don't want this shirt.
What time's the next train to Washington?
I want to meet him.
I want to meet her.
Many thanks for your effort!
Many thanks for your effort!
Paedophilia is a crime.
You know almost everything about me.
What were you doing at the hospital?
I thought she was 30 at most.
I thought she was 30 at most.
I don't think that would be a good idea.
Don't interfere with Tom while he is reading.
I owe what I am today to my uncle.
Are you spending enough time with your kids?
Are you spending enough time with your kids?
Please tell me where the police station is.
I help him.
I am terribly hungry.
I am the happiest man on earth.
I'm thinking of going abroad next year.
The cat is looking at the fish.
The cat is watching the one fish.
I don't want to meet your parents.
I will tell her what to say at the meeting.
A mistery is what's not clear. For example, this is a real mistery.
Call home!
Call home!
If you're tired, why don't you go to sleep? "Because if I go to sleep now I will wake up too early."
I want to cry.
I'm very happy with my new car.
I felt very happy.
Don't speak to me like that!
Let's speak about it.
Let's speak about it.
Who built it?
Who built it?
I can hardly believe this.
She can't be over thirty.
I received a warm welcome.
Why did he quit smoking?
Where did you get this list?
Where did you get this list?
He doesn't lie.
She was dressed all in black.
Thank you for the offer.
Richard Roberts is the author of numerous books.
Who's on the team?
Tom is an old student of mine.
They came in one by one.
The doctor said Tom needed an operation.
Let's try to make the call once more.
Is your offer still open?
I'll be there at 2:30, OK?
Do you know how to operate this machine?
Come at once.
It's quite evident that you really love Russian.
It's quite evident that you really love Russian.
I love my motherland.
Tom will never forgive you.
Tom slammed down the phone.
Tom said he'd call at 2:30.
Tom said he'd call at 2:30.
Tom sleeps with his mouth open.
Are you in danger?
Are you in danger?
That dog runs very fast.
I think you'd better talk to her.
Tom has nothing else to do.
My father was a teacher.
It must be a mistake.
Tom won't listen to you.
Tom was in the hospital.
Tom was in the hospital.
Did anyone else help you?
When I hear this song, I think of him.
When I hear this song, I think of her.
All his sentences are short.
All his sentences are short.
I'm in a good mood.
I'm in a good mood.
I don't want to be famous.
I don't want to go to the hospital.
I don't want to give Tom my key.
It's obvious that he's right.
This shirt has long sleeves.
Tom rolled up his sleeves.
It's not very far from here.
Sit at the table.
I can't find my keys.
I'll write or phone you next week.
Don't drink out of my glass.
I can't believe Tom is dead.
I can't believe Tom is dead.
I work as much as you.
I should have listened to you.
Don't let them see you're afraid.
Don't let them see you're afraid.
He found me a taxi.
Tom got off the train.
He suddenly stopped.
There is no other way.
She wants to live closer to nature.
He wants to live closer to nature.
Out of twenty students, only one has read the book.
The bridge is closed.
You'll be safe with her.
You'll be safe with her.
You'll be safe with him.
They will be safe with her.
You'll be safe with me.
Tom lost his eyesight.
I believe the police will ignore you.
The chairman called the meeting to order.
This is something out of the ordinary.
Shall I wait here or come back later?
Who ordered you to do this?
The captain gave the order.
I've been studying off and on all year.
The chairman's office is to the left.
Were you an officer in the army?
Tom is a government official.
Oh, so you knew it all along?
What office does Tom hold?
Are you a police officer?
How often do trains run?
This building is new.
Please, don't kill me.
With pleasure!
I ignored him.
I ignored her.
I saw a man dressed as a ninja.
I'm playing in the garden.
I am very pleased.
Welcome, ladies and gentlemen!
I wonder if he likes me.
I wonder if she likes me.
Never did I dream of meeting you here.
In Soviet Russia, television watches the audience!
In Soviet Russia, television watches the audience!
I've made a list of foods that I can't eat.
I've made a list of foods that I can't eat.
I think Tom is in the garden.
I hate this.
Ask no questions and hear no lies.
This sentence makes no sense at all.
Read the book again and again.
This dress fits you well.
He is not a teacher but a doctor.
People learn from experience.
Tom says that Mary definitely wanted to go with us, so we should wait.
We expected you at 2:30.
We expected you at 2:30.
I, the Preacher, was king over Israel in Jerusalem.
Will you meet her?
Take her picture away from me.
Tom tried to explain the situation to Mary.
Sit here.
Sit here.
I feel a lot better today.
Suddenly, I saw a beautiful bird.
What's wrong? "I don't have a key."
We're just talking.
Our milk speaks Piedmontese.
How are you going to solve this problem?
You won't believe what just happened!
You won't believe what just happened!
You won't believe what just happened!
You won't believe what just happened!
You won't believe what I just saw!
You won't believe what I just saw!
You won't believe what I just saw!
You won't believe what I just saw!
Where's the nearest metro station?
The sun is starting to go down.
I've never read a novel in French.
Speak louder. Your grandfather's hearing isn't so good.
She doesn't show her true feelings.
He doesn't show his true feelings.
She didn't want him to leave the room.
Lift up your hands in the air.
Lift up your hands in the air.
Melanie is drinking milk.
I bought a pen for your birthday present.
I'll never forget going to Hawaii with her.
The child is learning quickly.
I studied abroad.
Do you remember your grandfather?
Can you read this?
Can we quit talking about this?
I thought you wouldn't like me.
The water is rising.
Her mother is calling you.
My favourite colour is red.
Milan Kundera is my favourite writer.
The surface of the earth is 70% water.
Do you like this colour?
I don't remember when and where I met you.
I don't remember when and where I met you.
This is a historic moment.
What does USSR stand for?
I'm certain that he'll come.
Bill, give me a call this evening.
My brother likes music.
Look! The book is burning.
I helped an old lady across.
I bought this book the other day.
I came early in order to get a good seat.
Reading books is very interesting.
Tatoeba is not a school — it is a university!
Drink your milk.
He and I are the same age.
Somebody's coming up the stairs.
The main islands of Japan are Hokkaido, Shikoku, Honshu and Kyushu.
By teaching, we learn.
I can't stand this noise anymore.
The cat is reading a book.
She felt her knees tremble.
I remember my mother teaching me the alphabet.
I remember my mother teaching me the alphabet.
If I were you, I wouldn't talk to him.
You made it.
She will be famous in the future.
I lost sight of my friends.
You can call us at any time.
I can understand this problem to some extent.
I can't agree with you on that point.
I can't believe Tom is getting married.
I can't believe Tom is really planning on doing this.
I can't believe Tom really said no to me.
Let's cross here.
The island is easy to reach by boat.
Welcome to Australia.
You are too young to marry.
A driver was sleeping in the car.
We didn't talk yesterday.
Yesterday was my birthday.
I don't know if that's a good idea.
I don't know if he's dead or alive.
Ken is too busy to come.
Ken is so busy that he can't come.
We can see many stars tonight.
The four seasons of the year are spring, summer, autumn, and winter.
Say it again.
There is more pleasure in loving than in being loved.
Noo! cried Tom.
I was dreaming.
I was dreaming.
I was pleased.
I phoned.
Could you spell it, please?
Don't you have classes today?
Don't you have classes today?
He's not my type.
Tom thinks you're lying.
I've lost my bag.
I'm on good terms with the neighbors.
I can't carry this suitcase. It's too heavy.
I can't drink milk.
For the most part the weather has been nice this summer.
Tom painted a good portrait of his mother.
Tom's part of the work isn't finished.
Tom refused to take part in the game.
It's over three kilometers from here.
The city has many beautiful parks.
Why are you so pale today?
We've been pals for years.
Use your other hand, too.
Call me tonight.
Do you want this shirt?
Do you want this shirt?
This watch was your grandfather's.
Welcome to this world!
I don't have anything to read.
Is this your pen?
Is this your pen?
You must return him the book.
Tom only wears a suit on special occasions.
Look at me when I talk to you.
I am very happy.
I heard a noise.
I heard a noise.
I didn't expect this.
You're never at home.
Why did you become a teacher?
You don't seem very sure.
Did Tom tell you who to give the money to?
How soon will the meeting begin?
Come in!
Step inside.
Can I talk to you?
May I speak to you?
Pull!
Pull!
Read.
Where did you meet?
It's time for lunch.
Tom was dressed completely in black.
I see the person and the flower.
He gives meat to the dog.
We'll expect you for dinner on Thursday.
Where can I get information?
He seems to have good hearing.
He wrote a lot of stories.
I can't stand that noise.
Was it interesting?
He's in a good mood today.
She went too far.
Lie down on your left side.
It's a long way from here to school.
Thank you very much, she said with a smile.
They've crossed the border.
Could you translate that for me?
Don't kill me.
I just can't believe they're getting married.
I just can't believe this.
She won't leave me alone.
I would've liked that.
My older brother wants to study abroad.
Thank you for calling me.
Thank you for calling me.
I just want to talk to them.
I just want to talk to you.
I just want to talk to you.
He forced me to go.
It's a bad idea.
My boss invited me to dinner.
Dinner can wait.
My plan is different from yours.
He always wears dark clothes.
She is in a very good mood.
I'm sure he will come.
We came to the conclusion that he had been right.
Every student has to leave school by six.
We had a good time playing cards.
We had a good time playing cards.
The books are on a low shelf.
Who did you talk to?
I met him for the first time.
You built that all by yourself?
You built that all by yourself?
I shouldn't have said that.
Do you think I don't understand what your plan consists of?
Do not judge so that you will not be judged.
I caught a big fish yesterday with my bare hands.
I caught five fish yesterday.
I climbed to the top of Mt. Fuji.
Could you show me the way to the theatre?
I'm asking for your advice: what should we do in this situation?
If you want to, call me this afternoon.
Do you think he would forgive me?
Tom can handle it himself.
I needn't have hurried.
I don't go to church.
Tom brought flowers.
He sang a song.
We'll talk here.
There is no time. Your sword is enough.
I wonder what's for dinner.
It hurts.
I'm not sure I believe you.
I really liked your story.
I liked your story.
I liked your story.
Tom disappeared without leaving a trace.
Tom disappeared without a trace.
May I have a glass of milk?
Unfortunately, Nancy was right.
He got on the train.
Tom caught a fish.
He must have drunk too much last night.
Everybody wants permanent peace.
Here is one picture of me.
He asked me to take a look at it.
I know that you still think about me.
I love autumn.
They would stay there for the winter.
He's wanted by the police.
Put yourself together.
That's why he lost his job.
That's why he lost his job.
I hope to meet this man.
I'm not at all busy.
Red is not your color.
I would like to hear your opinion.
I think my parents know.
I think my mom knows.
Tom can't read all these books in one day.
They talked about it on the telephone.
I spoke to her yesterday.
I spoke to him yesterday.
I spoke to her yesterday.
I couldn't eat fish when I was a child.
I admitted that she was right.
It didn't hurt at all.
Is the bank open?
I don't like that idea.
I don't like the idea much.
Why aren't you helping?
Why aren't you helping?
Tom wouldn't lie to me.
People make mistakes.
I am going abroad this summer.
I have to talk to you alone.
I have to talk to you alone.
I met a friend.
I like your shirt.
Wet clothes clung to her body.
Could you call Tom?
Could you call Tom?
Could you call Tom?
Today's my daughter's birthday.
The apartment consists of three small rooms and a bath.
The apartment consists of three small rooms and a bath.
It is interesting to look at the stars.
Watch and learn.
Watch and learn.
I wonder who they are.
I'll never forgive you.
I'm a government worker.
I am afraid the loss will amount to one hundred million dollars.
Japan and Korea are neighbours.
Tom is a graffiti artist.
I wonder what they have in common.
I don't want to get married.
I'm very short.
I was about to leave my house when she called.
What's your favorite soccer team?
Let's appeal to the public and see what it will say.
I owe my success to her help.
She makes it a rule to take an hour's walk every morning.
Welcome to Dublin!
She wore a red dress.
Tom never listens to the teacher.
We were satisfied with the delicious food.
Have you been abroad?
He never pays attention to what I say.
I've never met a woman as stupid as you.
It's obvious that she doesn't love her husband.
We met her by accident.
Summer is the hottest season.
Tom is a well-known painter.
Tom is a well-known painter.
Speed kills.
What is this animal called in Japanese?
I have every confidence in his ability.
The girl had no one to turn to for advice.
It's in a small room at the end of garden.
Why are you crying?
Tom had to stay in the hospital for a week.
Bill was killed with a gun.
She is very afraid of the dark.
I've got nothing to say.
Have a nice holiday.
You have little to gain and much to lose.
My father quit drinking.
That box is bigger than this one.
That box is bigger than this one.
I didn't expect such a nice present from you.
I didn't expect this question.
I didn't know for certain which train to take.
I didn't know he had a weak heart.
I didn't know where it came from.
I can't tell you how I love you.
I haven't the faintest idea.
Power is like being a lady. If you have to tell people you are, you aren't.
How many died?
The plans were discarded.
How could you do that?
I'm eating soup in the kitchen.
I don't think these ink stains will come off.
I have a million questions.
I have a million questions.
Don't let yourself be used.
It seems that he's happy.
He looks happy.
Young people wear their hair long these days.
He was in good spirits.
His parents go to church every Sunday.
It's a fact.
I lost my driving license.
You're good at speaking French, aren't you?
I am as rich as he is.
Tom is going to propose.
Science begins when you ask why and how.
I'm sure I heard something.
Your life is in danger.
My life is in danger.
Her life was in danger.
His life was in danger.
As he grew older, he became more obstinate.
I saw something white in the park.
Where's my lunch?
Why haven't you called?
Talk to somebody.
We're going to lose him!
I didn't expect you to get here so soon.
The students like it.
There's nothing I can tell you.
I've got nothing to say to you.
I'll have to explain that to my father.
Mike sings well.
Mike sings well.
I can't bear it.
I can't stand her.
He does this all the time.
I need to talk with you about something.
The car went out of control and pitched headlong into the river.
You could have omitted that last phrase in your letter.
You forgot to put a period at the end of the sentence.
You certainly picked a nice time to start an argument.
Tom would be a better teacher if he were more patient.
They couldn't prove Tom was a party to the crime.
That's a very common phrase where I come from.
My mother won't let us keep pets in the house.
I don't want to hear another peep out of you!
Are you doing anything in particular tonight?
Tom picked up all the information he could.
The doctor performed a difficult operation.
I like to see a good movie once in a while.
Were there many people at the meeting?
That city has a very interesting past.
Days pass by quickly when you're busy.
Walk past the church and turn right.
It's three kilometers over that way.
The boss picked me to do the job.
Tom cut the pie into six pieces.
Where should we pitch the tent?
Did you enjoy the performance?
Can I have a room of my own?
Was that my phone ringing?
Is your job permanent?
She listened to me.
The Colonel said the situation is under control.
However, I am not a specialist.
The price is low, but the quality isn't very good.
Tom does not know how to sing.
Tom liked that.
Tom liked that.
I'm sure Tom will help you in the garden.
She almost fainted.
She has gone shopping.
I don't smoke anymore.
I don't smoke anymore.
Tom was raised in an orphanage.
Mr Hopkins spoke in such a loud voice that I could hear him upstairs.
I think you sent me the wrong document.
I think you sent me the wrong document.
I told you I hated that shirt.
I told you I hated that shirt.
Don't lie to us.
Be careful. The soup's very hot.
Look, I don't want to lose my job.
Victory, or death!
I understood how to solve the problem.
Why do you put up with that?
Why do you put up with that?
I have no idea how this works.
I've already seen that movie.
Our train had already pulled out when we arrived at the station.
I don't want to open the window.
How much is Zambian Kwacha in US dollars?
I think highly of him.
I'll talk about you.
He sang while working.
He is quick at learning a foreign language.
I love shopping!
Did you want to speak with me?
Did you want to speak with me?
I'm sure you're wrong.
I'm sure you're wrong.
I'm sure you're wrong.
He went from Tokyo to Osaka by plane.
I'll pay thirty dollars for it.
He lost everything he owned.
I gave him all the money I had.
I gave her all the money I had.
I wouldn't be too sure if I were you.
Do you remember meeting me before?
Look, I've had a long day and I want to go to bed right now.
Did he propose to you?
We got off the train.
Why didn't you believe me?
I want to learn.
Today is my little sister's birthday.
Today is my sister's birthday.
It doesn't matter where he comes from.
I heard you talking.
I heard you talking.
I heard you talking.
I heard you talking.
I heard you talking.
I heard you talking.
What's Grandma doing? "She's sleeping on the couch."
He is able to speak five languages.
There are beautiful lakes here and there.
I want to be a film star.
Leave it closed.
Leave it closed.
Leave it closed.
She called up her mother on the phone.
His daughter, as well as his son, were famous.
Do you know that song?
Don't cry.
I don't translate novels anymore.
She must be dead.
I grew up in a poor family.
I grew up in a poor family.
Has he met them today?
I'm not sure I want the job.
I think the mistake is mine.
I've become used to Tom.
I've become used to Tom.
Fear your own shadow.
I don't like leaving the job half done.
Never wish anyone harm!
The most beautiful flowers have the sharpest thorns.
I ate a hot dog for lunch.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
Go to the store!
They talked about various subjects.
They talked about various subjects.
Tastes are diverse.
It's a question of taste.
I'm quite busy.
It was nice talking to you.
I can't believe Tom is really here.
Can you wait a bit?
Jiro Akagawa has written over 480 novels.
She sang pretty well.
You must always do what is right.
This is little different from what I want.
I just discovered the dark side of Tatoeba.
She asked him not to leave her alone.
He looked back over his shoulder.
He overlooked my mistake.
He told me that I could sleep on the sofa.
You smoke too much. Don't smoke so much!
It's good that you are coming.
Whether she will agree or not is not clear.
Last night, I stayed home waiting for you to call.
You'll come back early, won't you?
That was an interesting day.
By the way, Mike, please tell me how to get to your house.
I get along with my younger brother.
This job is a good one, but the trouble is that I cannot study.
Tom read a book while he was waiting for the bus.
I had the same problem when I was your age.
Tom works for the government.
Listen to me, please.
Listen to me, please.
They felt he was too weak.
There is little hope.
It was very painful.
I owe it all to you.
I owe it all to you.
God is nature. Don't go against nature.
Of course there should be local hospitals.
It's changed so much, there are some places I don't even recognise.
The mountains are beautiful.
I don't usually eat this late.
I don't know what that word means.
Between you and me, I'm going to quit my present job soon.
I'm sure Tom loves you.
Tom couldn't decide what to buy.
You should get your eyes examined.
She reminds him of his mother.
I'm sure Tom loves you.
Every time I see this picture, I remember my father.
Tell Tom to pick up the phone.
While we were speaking, he kept silent.
I just spoke with the police.
My sons have grown up.
Tom wouldn't leave me alone.
Tom has been taking walks at night.
I'm meeting the professor at 1:30 p.m.
Are you interested?
Today was definitely shorts and T-shirt weather.
That's hard to believe.
That bridge is very beautiful.
Tom likes the idea.
He raised a weapon against me.
I will explain the situation to you later on.
You'll get used to it rapidly.
We speak Mari.
That's true, too.
We must be loyal to our principles.
Let's get this over with.
This movie is politically incorrect.
Procrastinating is an art.
She went to bed late last night.
That's not so important.
We should be faithful to our principles.
Death doesn't understand jokes: people call for it, and it comes.
Sorry that I'm calling so early.
The Soviet troops have started the withdrawal from Afghanistan.
I owe what I am today to my parents.
Do you have the shirt one size bigger?
Can you give us any advice?
What account can you give of your misbehavior?
But how are you going to decide what is important, and what isn't?
I thought it was a joke.
She was sitting there with her eyes closed.
It's nice meeting you.
He lies as naturally as he breathes.
Should I call you "thou" or "you"?
You're so serious.
He fixed the problem in a jiffy.
His name has a very interesting meaning.
I need an operation.
She will give you what money she has.
She will give you what money she has.
Roll the dice.
Tom didn't do his homework.
That's a beautiful photo.
Do you know whose this is?
I wish I had more time to talk to her.
The tree fell to the ground.
No animals are to be found on the island.
Without knowing what may happen tomorrow, I live in permanent fear.
You are not the first to make this mistake.
How beautiful nature made you! To whom are you fated to belong?
I tried to solve the problem, but I couldn't.
Tom doesn't think he has the time to help you today.
Tom seems happy again.
I want to drink one more bottle of beer.
What songs would be on your list?
She turned around and smiled.
Mr. Spencer works in a shop.
Victory is possible, though unlikely.
I loved this dress.
The population of Tokyo is four times as large as that of Yokohama.
Can you bet your butt that it's true?
He was my student. Now he teaches my children.
He looked up at the night sky.
I'm also a Jew.
The storm is dangerous.
I have no reason to lie to you.
Tom couldn't see the lake from where he was standing.
I often make mistakes when speaking in French.
He introduced his daughter to me.
It's starting again.
It's starting again.
A bird was flying in the sky.
A bird was flying in the sky.
I tried writing a novel.
The leaves fell.
She fell down senseless on the floor.
They bother me.
Did you enjoy watching the night game last night?
That's my dress.
Here's the map you are looking for.
I'd like to leave this town and never come back.
Wood is flammable.
I heard a strange sound.
I heard a strange noise.
Don't leave your glasses on the table.
I want to invite you to dinner.
I gave Tom a little more time to finish his report.
I saw a boy knocked down by a car.
The garden belongs to the house.
He was hanged during the Revolution.
My father didn't allow me to study in the USA.
I first met him three years ago.
The population of China is about eight times as large as that of Japan.
Sorry to have kept you waiting.
I don't like studying.
I got off the train.
I walked along the river.
I love fish.
Tom doesn't know the half of it.
He came early, as he had been asked to do.
Have you finished it? "On the contrary, I've just begun."
To my mind, it was his mistake.
What the hell is the matter with you?
Who's your favorite blogger?
Are you free tomorrow evening?
These vegetables cook slowly.
I love the Fatherland.
Shall we start the meeting now?
Young people are usually full of energy.
She spoke in a weak voice.
I am interested in this book.
He gave me money, but I gave it back to him immediately.
You're not old enough to drink.
Tom was hoping the committee would adopt his proposal.
I'll call you in a couple of days.
I screwed up my courage and went there.
Tom looks happy.
I'm fed up with him.
The pain was worse than he could stand.
I can't carry this stone.
Tom was feeling a little guilty.
Tatoeba always needs more sentences!
I'd like to drink some herbal tea.
I can see much better with these glasses.
Freedom of speech was restricted in this country.
She doesn't look happy.
A unicycle has one wheel.
His car has no wheels.
Good night, Tom!
I'm solving a puzzle.
Did you guys quit making music?
Why was I not aware of this?
Has she finished the book yet?
He's a bus driver.
She's a bus driver.
I'd like to talk to you a little.
Wear whatever you want to wear.
Tom runs very fast.
One hundred and twenty-five years have proven that Esperanto is more than a language.
Hopefully you won't lie to me any more.
How many bags do you have?
You and I make a good team.
Emily is doing her homework.
He is fresh from college.
The policemen had already left.
He much enjoys going to the cinema.
Tom has been reading a book all afternoon.
The boss made them work day and night.
You don't have to decide right now.
The sky is clear. Lots of stars are scattered across it.
Tom believes in paranormal phenomena.
Has your neck thickened during the previous year?
They looked very happy.
I've made a terrible mistake.
Today is your daughter's birthday.
That sounds right.
Spring has arrived early.
French is a difficult language.
Every time I see it, I remember him.
I wish to speak with you in private. Call me.
I hope you'll find what I'm searching for.
He is older than he appears to be.
These things belong only to me.
I wanted to buy a suit, but it was too expensive.
As a child, I couldn't eat fish.
In a town you may pass unnoticed, whereas in a village it's impossible.
You built it, didn't you?
Is Tom on this ship?
If only her husband would help her, most of her problems would disappear.
Some friends invited me to dinner.
The drunken man couldn't walk straight.
I thought I heard music.
What do you find important in life?
John struggled to find out the answer to the physics problem.
I think it's true that he wasn't at the scene.
I was looking at a dog. However, when I looked again, it had turned into a cat.
I have nothing to say to her.
Tom lost his dog.
We lost our dog.
When will you call?
Tom seems to be unwilling to tackle the problem.
Sooner or later, she will appear.
It was really fun.
She's more experienced than I am.
Why don't you shut your mouth?
Many a mickle makes a muckle.
Is it mandatory?
I feel fortunate to have known you.
He is utterly unguarded.
I like your last name. Can I take it?
We have to close the window.
He has boozy breath.
I love cinema.
He has boozy breath.
I asked her to pick me up around four.
There is something you must know.
I am glad to hear of your success.
You have thirty seconds.
You have thirty seconds.
They were all guilty.
We're journalists.
I don't like this song.
She gave me a piece of good advice.
Masaru can't finish the work in an hour, can he?
Don't forget.
I want to buy the dress.
I assume you know what this is about.
Tom knows a man who speaks French.
We stopped talking so that we could hear the music.
Don't call him now.
I'm waiting for the ferry.
Use the telephone.
Maybe it would be better if I were to just stay inside. Who wants to go out when the weather's like this?
The sun at dusk is red.
He accepted her offer.
What is the Smithsonian Institution?
Let's keep this conversation sub rosa.
Show Tom the picture.
Tom refused to help us.
Tom refused to help us.
Tom refused to help me.
Tom refused to help me.
Tom was a little drunk.
Tom climbed the ladder.
The Russian language is a great thing. It seems that thing is too great for my small head!
We're on the same team.
Tom fell into the water.
Tom tried to understand.
What's in the briefcase?
Where are my sunglasses?
That's not up to you.
Do you think Tom is busy?
Are you having fun?
Tom is always watching TV.
How was your birthday?
Tom shut his mouth.
She made noise.
Sorry that I love you.
Sorry that I love you.
I'll have to talk to my daughter about things heart-to-heart.
Will you shut your mouth or not?
How did you get my number?
How do you get this stuff?
Could you go to the store?
What made you do what you did?
The air is fresh in the morning.
I thought Tom would want this one.
On Tatoeba, you can't translate more than 15 sentences on a page.
There is not much hope.
The doctor told him to give up smoking and drinking.
You may choose whichever book you like.
You may choose what you like.
You may choose any of them.
You may always use my dictionary.
I will not borrow money from those people.
Mistakes like these are easily overlooked.
This kind of mistake is easy to overlook.
These kinds of mistakes are easy to overlook.
I have no idea what you're talking about.
I have no clue what you're talking about.
I have no clue what you're talking about.
I have no idea what you're talking about.
The law is the same for everyone.
Is the cat all right?
I really wasn't sure.
I'd like some cheese.
Why are you crying?
How was your summer?
He owed a lot to her.
Don't make fun of me when I'm talking seriously.
May I introduce my friend to you?
May I introduce my friend to you?
She showed us her mother's photo.
I got to know her through one of my friends.
I know you've been waiting a long time, but could you wait just a little bit longer?
My parents don't want me to get married.
He is a very good teacher.
I wasn't talking to you.
I wasn't talking to you.
Why do you always talk about Tatoeba?
You don't have much money but I'm happy because I'm with you.
She rented a room.
She set a bird free.
Autumn is beautiful in its own way.
The star is so bright as to be seen with the naked eye.
Do you think he is dead?
I'll call if we need you.
There are no stupid questions, only stupid answers.
Even the best fish smell when they are three days old.
Somebody just called.
Why didn't you call somebody?
Why didn't you call somebody?
I'm not accustomed to getting up so early.
A good idea struck me.
You don't have to stay in the hospital.
He turned to his friends for help.
I've brought you a gift.
My father used to drink till late at night.
I like this blue dress.
I like this blue dress.
What color are your wife's eyes?
What colour are your eyes?
What colour are your eyes?
The gap between rich and poor is getting wider.
He was never to return to his native country again.
She fell off her horse.
What do you think of my idea?
What do you think of my idea?
What do you think of all this?
What do you think of all this?
How about some tea?
Tom has decided to quit smoking.
The teacher and I sat down face to face.
Show me the picture.
I'm now about as tall as my father.
He is well read in English literature.
He is well read in English literature.
He is well read in English literature.
I still think about her from time to time.
The new bank is on Baker Street.
It is important for him to get the job.
Don't cut in line.
You've got to face the facts.
Tom will meet you there.
Tom will meet you there.
Over my dead body!
What's the name of the girl we saw at the festival that day?
Tom seems to be as fit as a fiddle.
I've got nothing to give you.
I don't have anything to give you.
I don't have time to explain.
Which team do you think will win?
The women whose daughter you spoke to doesn't live here.
You don't have to answer these questions.
All the stories are interesting.
All the stories are interesting.
They say Australia is a wonderful country.
The car stopped.
Life can't be stopped, it always goes on.
The soldiers were on the alert.
You shouldn't be afraid of making mistakes when learning a language.
You showed your best.
I'm sure you did your best.
Can we talk about it?
No one likes me in the company; I know that well.
Someone is calling you.
Which is more important, me or Tatoeba?
In general, men run faster than women.
My grandmother on my mother's side lives in Osaka.
My grandfather on my mother's side passed away ten years ago.
Tom objected.
I really hope you're right.
I really hope you're right.
I'd like you to tell me if there are any mistakes in this sentence.
Do you know what Tom was wearing?
Do you remember what Tom was wearing?
Could you tell me if there are any mistakes in this sentence?
Please see if there are any mistakes in this sentence.
I lost the watch that my father gave me.
That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons that history has to teach.
Please watch this movie.
He said that because he was tired, he'd go home early.
Tom fell off his horse.
Women use perfume because a nose is easier to tempt than an eye.
I can't get you that dress.
I can't buy you that dress.
None of the students could solve the problem.
I have lost my keys so I can't get into my flat
The rain compelled the water to run over the banks.
Her eyes were moist with tears.
Where can I find the key to your heart?
If she hadn't made waves about it, she never would have got her money back.
I'm not sure if he saw it.
She runs faster than I do.
That doesn't matter anymore.
The teams had just started to play when it began to rain.
We were on the point of leaving when Tom arrived.
The manager offered to show me around the plant.
That was a difficult period in American history.
Did you give Tom a present for his birthday?
Let's all pitch in and get the work done.
Be sure to put it back in the same place.
It's a pleasure to be able to help you.
Where do you plan to spend the summer?
Tom is too busy to see you at present.
When are we going to play their team?
They plotted against the government.
When did you plant this tree?
Tom wants people to pity him.
Tom played his highest card.
Put your suitcase over here.
Just watch and learn.
Tom is making progress.
Tom is likely to be back soon.
Tom hardly ever talks to anyone.
Something smells good.
Tom, get us out of here!
No other lake in Japan is as large as Lake Biwa.
That sounds serious.
You'll be perfectly safe.
You're in a bad mood today, aren't you?
He'll come before lunch if he comes at all.
He didn't do a stitch of work.
The dogs, the cats, and the horses are animals.
The boy said that the taxi vanished into the fog.
It reminds me of the good old times.
We grew up together.
The police will put you in prison.
Laughter can kill.
Please come into the room.
Don't wander from the subject.
Both my brothers are teachers.
I have a very important issue to you. An issue that can't be addressed on the phone. Can we meet?
I have a very sore arm where you hit me.
Flowers are yellow.
I'd like to work at a hospital.
The happy cat is purring.
Show her what you're capable of.
I don't like your face and I can't bear your company any longer.
I looked back to see if she was looking back to see if I had looked back.
That woman goes to church every evening.
I don't like your face and I can't bear your company any longer.
This sentence doesn't exist yet on tatoeba.org.
You must study your whole life.
Your name stands first on my list.
Your name stands first on my list.
Your name stands first on my list.
Your name stands first on my list.
Your name stands first in the list.
Your name is first on the list.
Your name is first on the list.
Tom hardly believed his eyes.
Tom could hardly believe his eyes.
You've gone too far.
You've gone too far.
I hope he sees this.
He is full of new ideas.
I really like this song.
I shouldn't have gotten up so early.
Do you feel birthdays are important?
I wish that we could spend more time together.
Tom is at lunch.
Tom is badly wounded.
Everybody desires happiness.
The rumor is believed to be true.
Some people laugh at his jokes, but others don't.
They accepted the offer.
Where are we meeting?
Where shall we meet?
I don't know how things were a hundred or fifty years ago.
Whose friend is he?
You smell so nice.
You smell so nice.
What do you want for your birthday?
My son knows all the letters well.
Arlan went to the boss.
It's pleasant to be next to her.
The children spent a lot of time in the open air.
I don't know how long it'll take.
Iceland used to belong to Denmark.
You have to drink water.
I must get back to my work.
I have to call Tom.
He's rich, young and handsome.
Soon after, it began to rain.
How long have you two been going out together?
Tom is out cold.
Would you like to be famous?
I don't know who you want to meet.
Nothing happens by chance.
It beats me where she's gone.
It's much easier dealing with animals than humans sometimes, well, most of the time, actually.
Tom nodded silently.
There's a bird on my dad's head.
The children love playing in their new tree house, which they built themselves.
I've been lopping trees all afternoon and shredding them into mulch for the garden.
You're perfect for the job.
You're not rich, are you?
You'd be perfect for this job.
You'll be perfect for this.
You're a middle child, too, aren't you?
Tom nodded slightly.
You seem to be in a bad mood today.
You have to expect that once in a while.
You have to expect that to happen once in a while.
Tom nodded slowly.
Tom nodded understandingly.
Why would they do this to me?
Tom has gone underground.
Why did you take this job?
Why did Tom lie?
Why did Tom call?
Why are you taking this so personally?
Why are you so jumpy?
Why are you so certain?
Why are you being so difficult?
Why are there three?
What's that going to prove?
We could meet after work.
We must know for certain.
We were all so busy then.
We weren't all that busy.
When did they leave?
He stopped drinking.
We want complete sentences.
Tom must be around thirty.
I'm drinking water in the kitchen.
Do cats see in the dark?
This is not going to end well.
Are you expecting anyone?
Are you expecting anyone?
The shop is closed today.
I live across the street.
I know what makes me happy.
You bought me a gift?!
The policeman was drunk.
I've lost it.
You'll be safe.
The soldiers laughed.
That's your opinion.
Just ignore it.
Just ignore it.
Where is the kitchen?
She differs from the others in that she has a goal.
I don't like movies.
I'm sorry, but I already have a girlfriend.
You've changed.
He has changed.
Tom has changed.
We have changed.
You have changed.
Hope is not lost.
Today the weather is so bad that a good master wouldn't let his dog out.
A good master wouldn't let his dog out in such cold weather.
Just check it.
May I speak with him?
My grandmother can cook very well.
The social worker was asked to follow up the information about the Stevenson family.
Let's not talk to her.
I watch television all day long.
He never laughs at my jokes.
My daughter is often sick.
This doesn't concern you, Tom.
Tom leads a quiet life.
I'm pretty sure he likes me.
She has never had a bad experience.
I don't forget my friends.
There's a mistake in the third last line.
Please send the merchandise by return.
If it were so easy to take a house with you, I would at least have brought one with a kitchen and a bathroom.
My mom wants me to study in Switzerland.
Ah, bummer!
Today's math class was more interesting than usual.
The tea is so hot that I cannot drink it.
He can hear the grass growing.
He is as punctual as a clock.
This is my opinion, not yours.
I'm watching your behaviour and don't even know what to think.
From any point of view, a fool is still merely a fool.
You promised me to come back before summer.
What size do you take?
What have you discovered?
I never asked your advice.
Do you want me to confess to the murder?
We took his story on trust.
We took his story on trust.
I've written a lot of stories.
Could you translate this sentence for me?
Could you translate this sentence for me?
I am not your daughter.
I am not your daughter.
That's the limit.
I don't remember seeing you two years ago.
I assume you know who did this.
I can't stand hospitals.
Who wants to translate this article?
Big Brother is watching you.
More and more Russian soldiers lost hope.
Fifteen is not a prime number.
Fifteen is not a prime number.
Tom was almost in tears.
I don't make mistakes very often.
I hope you like it.
I hope that you will like it.
I hope you like it.
Brain surgery is very complex.
Can I have it back?
Read it once more.
Do you hear the birds singing?
I've got a white horse.
As long as there's life, there is hope.
I said: "I'm not interested."
These are the Faces of Evil. You must conquer each.
I guess I'd better get going!
I'm sure you'll like Tom.
Tom is watching TV.
Daniel, give Emet and the others my regards.
Man is a social being.
What was your response when he invited you?
Finally, I didn't understand whether tea is good or bad for our health.
The building on the mountain is our school.
Are you in?
He fears his own shadow.
I am cooking the lunch.
This is how he solved the difficult problem.
Is there a problem I should know about?
I hope you understand me.
I hope you understand me.
How much money did Tom promise you?
How much does Tom know about this situation?
How much do you think Tom needs?
How much do you think Tom needs?
How many black and white movies have you watched?
How many mistakes did Tom make?
What's wrong here? "The author's DNA".
There are no live animals in the museum.
While in Japan, she bought the camera.
If you can read this sentence, it's because you know how to read.
On what planet are you?
I'm sort of glad it's you and not him telling me; I couldn't bear to see that man again.
I think he will succeed.
How much longer is it going to take?
How many are on your team?
I was greatly moved by her kindness.
Fuck-suck! cried Robert, "and what the hell should we do now?"
He is obstinate in his opinion.
I assume that's a joke.
Do you like ancient history?
Do you like ancient history?
I think that we should try again.
Ha hasn't confessed yet.
Why do you want to talk to me?
Why did you want to talk to me?
I think you know why I'm calling you.
I think you know why I called you.
I think you know why I called you.
What is life's greatest pleasure?
It's one of life's greatest pleasures.
Food is one of life's greatest pleasures.
I don't have any homework tonight.
Your tea will get cold if you don't drink it soon.
Other people need nine or ten hours of sleep.
He is wearing a green women's robe.
He has gone out for lunch already.
Let me see that list.
The church is on the other side of the street.
This building is very large.
You keep forgetting to do your homework.
I drank some milk.
She is kind to him.
I completely forgot about Tom.
I'm not guilty.
She does have a lot of math homework.
We've only been dating for a month.
We got to the station at six.
Just look at him.
He will try it.
I'm going to sell my house.
Would 8:30 be convenient for you?
Yes, I've seen cats without a smile, but a smile with no cat...
Good morning, friends, this is the programme "Life is pain!".
We have a very famous jew as a guest.
I'm quite sure of her success.
I will be free tomorrow afternoon.
I pointed my camera at her.
You can do whatever you want to do, of course.
Why don't you wear a dress?
This is something I need to do alone.
It doesn't seem very fair.
It doesn't look so bad.
Tomorrow I'm going back home.
I'm glad it makes you happy.
I want to talk to you about something else.
Come and keep me company.
I don't expect you to remember.
Go inside.
Are you sure you don't want to do that?
The people are angry.
I don't like homework.
Look, this is a true story.
It's not your fault.
There are no birds in this forest.
Tell me where the police station is.
I suppose you'll be studying all day tomorrow.
She had nothing to do yesterday.
Something stinks here.
I have a few books.
Why did you get up so early?
I may have made a big mistake.
He is always happy.
I can't believe this is taking so long.
He writes poems and novels.
This sentence already exists.
She is always cheerful and smiling.
Tom went across the street.
Pull out and put down.
That's a very good idea.
That is too scary.
Tom was very lucky.
I didn't have much time to think over your proposal.
Tom said that he couldn't remember the last time he saw a movie.
Do you pay attention to what I say?
Everything comes to an end sometime.
The cat likes to play in the garden.
We looked at the sky, but couldn't see any stars.
You're not going to like this.
Why don't you leave them alone?
Why don't you leave them alone?
When is her birthday?
When is his birthday?
I lost the desire.
It's curtains for me!
It is as good as lost.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
John was born in a hospital and he died in a hospital.
He caught three fish.
That's what resolves the question.
I'm sure you're very busy.
Leave them alone.
Tom went to go call the police.
Are you busy on Monday?
I know exactly where I left my keys.
Sometimes I don't quite get what comes over you. I wish I knew that!
Sometimes I can't quite get what comes over you. I wish I knew that! "I wish I knew that, too."
Does your throat hurt?
I'm sure you can do even better.
You must do it even if you don't want to.
You must do the work even if you don't like it.
Kate is smarter than any other student in our class.
He confessed that he loved her.
Just as you treat me, so I will treat you.
We're professors.
The river is about half as long again as the Thames.
The capital of Zimbabwe is Harare.
What's the best way to approach a girl?
You'd have done the same in my position.
I believe you, but unfortunately Tom doesn't.
They marched quickly toward the capital.
We went to the theater early so we could get good seats.
Mother told Father about me.
This television is very heavy.
I brought a present for you.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I'm sure you're very busy.
I help Tom almost every day.
He wants an iPad 4.
It was not the same situation as now at all.
I met him at a club.
I met him at a club.
Where did I put my keys?
Where did I put the car keys?
Time is up now.
The photo didn't come out well.
They call this planet 'Earth'.
There's nothing to force here!
What's wrong with being nude in your own house?
Are you sure you want to do that?
We've known each other since we were children.
Why did you want to talk to me?
What do you conclude from that?
I'm happy with what I have.
This sentence is too short.
The stars look very beautiful tonight.
Tom needed time.
He was promoted to section chief.
Tom may do whatever he wants.
Tom will like this game, I think.
She looks so fake.
I went shopping to buy something.
I'm speaking a foreign language.
Your soul belongs to me.
How much money does Tom need to borrow?
Twenty-eight, twenty-nine, thirty or thirty-one days make up a month.
Would it be fair to the others?
I could not have done otherwise.
Tom tried to ignore the pain.
I went to the theater early to get a good seat.
We went to the theater early to get good seats.
I went to the theater early so I could get a good seat.
I have complete faith in his abilities.
I don't have anything to do right now.
I got letters from a person I've never met.
What's the best way to approach a guy?
Is it really all over?
You can meet us downstairs when you're ready.
Tom is very busy and doesn't have much time for relationships.
The cat loves playing in the garden.
You're lucky you were born in this beautiful city.
It's interesting to learn a foreign language.
And you're a teacher, right?
He hit me twice.
They gave their horses water.
Whose things are those?
Tom must be drunk.
Don't pick up that phone.
Let's leave the decision to our teacher.
That's a severe disease.
That's a severe disease.
I made some calls.
He'll come at quarter past three.
He'll come at quarter past three.
We went where the others had gathered.
That's the first sentence I've added.
I need a cigarette.
I'm totally drunk.
If you have the desire to talk, you know where you can find me.
Your grandmother meant a lot to you, didn't she?
Among other things, we talked about the weather.
I think my neighbour may have died.
Tom is in court.
Tom is in court.
Do you want to try? "Why not?"
I have two flowers.
I'm getting in now.
You've reached the bottom.
I'm sure I've never seen her.
I couldn't call you.
I haven't used this very much.
She is looking forward to going to the movies with him.
Can you talk to me?
When you expect to get something for nothing, the only person you're fooling is yourself.
This was one of her better attempts.
I don't feel like going shopping with you today.
She confessed that she loved him.
Isn't this a wonderful evening?
I'll show you that you're wrong.
My opinions may have changed, but not the fact that I'm right.
Who is on the train?
Don't forget that she's a woman.
I wonder if Tom still remembers me.
I'm busy all the fucking time.
I'm always in a fucking hurry.
He was deeply moved by the story.
I've been back home for a week, but I'm still suffering from jet lag.
I've been back for a week, but I'm still suffering from jet lag.
Call me when you're ready.
Call me when you're ready.
Call me when you're ready.
Call me when you're ready.
Call me when you're ready.
Call me when you're ready.
I have a sharp pain in my chest.
His birthday is August 21st.
Tom showed up at about 2:30.
It's the first time I hear this word.
I'm sorry that I didn't reply sooner.
I'm sorry that I didn't reply sooner.
What's the longest English word?
What's the longest German word?
Tom is a bus driver.
Tom is losing consciousness.
I'll call someone.
You were very busy, weren't you?
Your friend's in the other room.
Are you planning on buying a car?
Are you planning on buying a car?
Are you planning on buying a car?
Are you planning on buying a car?
I had no idea anything was wrong.
I had no idea anything was wrong.
How do you pronounce the sign @ in this language? "at"
Colorless green ideas sleep furiously.
You must see a doctor.
The coldest winter I ever spent was a summer in San Francisco.
The more you explain it, the more I don't understand it.
Dogs can see in the dark.
Tom believes in life after birth.
Tom took the wrong train.
Get out of my kitchen!
Are you up?
Are you up?
That feeling is called love.
You'll go with me. Full stop!
Tom lost his wife seven years ago.
Where did you take this information?
When he was a child, his ambition was to be an English teacher.
I promise you that I'll never abandon you.
My fear is more than my desire to try.
Thanks for the tip.
Tom confessed his love to me yesterday and we have started dating.
You have expensive taste! the shopkeeper exclaimed. "Are you sure you don't want to look through our cheaper variants first?"
We shouldn't have gotten up so early.
All my friends speak French.
I have become disgusted of living.
Someone is lying.
The boy is speaking to his grandfather.
Tom is a new student.
What Tom said made you smile, didn't it?
My father uses his time well.
He brought me a coffee even though I had asked for a tea.
I like the smell of fresh bread.
During a conversation, ask about the man you're talking to.
The first movie is bad, but the second is good.
Are you now married?
This sentence is not in Polish.
He imparted all his knowledge to his son.
Now I can go home with good conscience.
Everybody tries to do their job with an honest effort.
Please wait for me at the entrance of the building.
They try to resolve the problems of the city.
I hope these companies will be ready to deal with us in the future.
Things aren't moving.
Unfortunately, no one deals with this question.
It's never been harder for us to work than this year.
Her face became pink.
He studied for ten years.
For God's sake!
It is warm there all the year round.
Whom did you see at the theatre?
What can be added to the happiness of a man who is in health, out of debt, and has a clear conscience?
Is my aunt's ex-husband my ex-uncle?
He told his son to get down from the ladder.
You need protection.
You need protection.
She was pleased with the gift.
She was pleased with the gift.
He has gone to Spain.
I am not used to hard work.
I can't get this work done by anybody.
Pick up your things and go away.
You have lovely eyes, don't you?
I have a nice present to give you.
I have a nice present to give you.
Whose son is Tom?
He bought her a drink.
A synesthet can hear colors and see sounds.
Something is moving behind the bush.
He succeeded in entering the university.
Without your help, we wouldn't have finished in time.
Their goods are of the highest quality.
I'm still kind of busy.
I'm sure you're doing your best.
Red clothes suit her.
With pleasure, my dear.
We must stay perfectly calm.
It's moving fast.
The bush is burning.
Few people know what the word "hipster" means.
I've read the book in one go.
That's my favorite book! Honestly! The book is worth reading.
Nobody's happy.
When will your homework be finished?
I can go by train.
I can take the train.
You should always try to do your best.
I'm sure Tom will do his best.
She accepts the gifts.
Please calm down.
Esperanto is pretty much of a non-language.
What is the area of this city?
I called Tom the following morning.
I'm sure that's not what you want to do.
He hit me on the shoulder.
I lied constantly to my wife.
It gives me the shivers.
They had some doubts about their commander.
She allowed me to leave.
Tom suddenly disappeared.
I didn't use to smoke.
I seriously don't want to go to work today.
I'm hoping you can help me.
How fast is your internet connection?
Won't you be so kind to tell me why?
I think Tom probably doesn't like you very much.
She called me up very late last night.
I would like to drink something.
I had an interesting conversation with my neighbor.
People of the world, how do you spend the last day of the old year? Here, on Caroline Island, we met the new year a little earlier than you did.
We finally reached the lake.
We finally reached the lake.
What's the longest word in French?
What's the longest French word you know?
You've had plenty of chances.
You've succeeded where others have failed.
You're very different from us.
You're very different from us.
You've never forgiven me, have you?
You've never forgiven me, have you?
You've never forgiven me, have you?
You've probably done this many times before.
You've probably done this many times before.
You've definitely gotten better at French.
You've definitely gotten better at French.
The young engineer was deficient in experience.
We will stay at home rather than get there so late.
Wait until you receive the letter.
Wait till the chairman recognizes you.
Tom's answer was quick and to the point.
Tom repeated what he had just said.
Tom is so quiet you never know he's around.
Tom is really younger than he looks.
Tom is a big railroad executive.
This magazine has a picture of the Queen.
This house remained in their family for years.
They recognized the new government.
There's an emergency exit in the rear.
There was such a racket at my house last night, I couldn't sleep.
Quit it!
Put our bags up on the rack.
Please send my regards to your wife.
Our relations with our director are excellent.
Only a few drops of rain have fallen.
I live quite near here.
I live in a quiet neighborhood.
Have you read your mail yet?
Have you been invited to the reception?
Give my regards to your sister.
Can you quote me a price for the house?
As a last resort, we can stay at my sister's.
Who wants a piece of cake?
Who wants a piece of cake?
Where's the key? Ah, you have it.
What're you doing with my car?
Why did he buy another car?
Most students can speak English.
I have three cameras.
The problem is that I don't remember where I've parked my car.
I understand how to solve the problem.
Tom is driving to the hospital.
Tom always wanted to be a teacher.
You might need professional help.
Maybe that's just what he wants you to believe.
Tom stopped at a convenience store to get a drink.
It's getting beyond a joke!
She's a victim of her own success.
He's a victim of his own success.
Why won't you talk to me, Tom?
You are ten times better looking than I am.
How could you do this to us, Tom?
How could you do this to us?
Tom was duly impressed.
Tom was dressed in clothes similar to John's.
Tom was dressed casually.
Tom was badly wounded.
Tom wants to be happy again.
It's good to have you home.
Tom waited for everyone to sit down.
It's a thing which you use when you watch films.
They don't seem to be very pleased.
You don't seem very pleased.
I'm busy tonight.
One more word, and you're dead!
The future belongs to God.
Tom took a sip of his milk.
Tom took a sip of his drink and put the glass back on the table.
I want a sword like this!
My whole body is black and blue.
Give me back my bag.
Give me back my bag.
Give me back my bag.
Give me back my bag.
Tom needs an operation.
I knew that you would check this sentence very carefully.
Tom was thirty.
I've lost my watch.
Tom wrote stories.
Was Tom surprised?
I think you'll enjoy it.
Is Tom lying?
Is Tom safe?
Is Tom sure?
Is Tom unconscious?
They want to speak to you.
They want to speak to you.
Tom wanted some fresh air.
I know Tom is watching us.
I know Tom was the one who did it, but I won't ever be able to prove it.
You're dreaming again.
Is this enough money?
Tom has stopped smoking.
My brother helped me with my homework.
You're taking this too personally.
Please give me the exact address.
Please give me the exact address.
You saved my life.
Her expectations are too high.
Yesterday, they went to the movies.
I hope Tom can do what we asked him to do.
I hope Tom can do what we asked him to do.
I hope Tom can do what we asked him to do.
I hope Tom can do what we asked him to do.
Did you go to Cairo or Alexandria?
We've already done our work.
Estonia's population is about 1.3 million people.
Would you please help me translate this?
Would you please help me translate this?
I use Google almost every day.
I came here to study.
I came here to study.
Are you badly hurt?
Are you badly hurt?
I don't want to go, and besides it's too late.
Tom realized that could be a problem.
We'll decide it like men, bring the dice!
You understand me, and that's the most important thing.
I've always wanted to live in this neighborhood.
Tom collects stamps.
I'm looking for my keys. Have you seen them?
I'm looking for my keys. Have you seen them?
You're the teacher.
I'd like to try this.
She was the last woman I expected to see.
I would help you if you were in trouble.
He is always smoking.
I have complete confidence in you.
I'm full of joy.
Why do you need a new television?
You're acting strange tonight.
I love Laurie so much.
We're watching a movie.
We should call Tom.
He reached the last level.
You'll find the shop between a bank and a school.
I'm not related to Tom.
Tom isn't related to me.
Wars don't simply start like winter starts, but rather it is people that start a war.
Do you happen to know how to get downtown from here?
She has gone to Italy.
I think I met you in a past life.
I think I met you in a past life.
She wants to buy a present for her boyfriend.
I just emailed you.
I just emailed you.
Are you sure it's impossible?
We learn about ancient Rome and Greece.
Mary looks beautiful.
Tatoeba is so fast! I can't believe it!
We want to talk with you.
We want to talk to you.
Man is distinguished from all other creatures by the faculty of laughter.
What do you know about me?
Stay inside.
What if you gave a speech and nobody came?
He was wounded by a bullet.
My favorite German band is Juli.
Tom is probably in the building.
Tom is probably in the building.
Why do onions make you cry?
Please remember to post this letter.
I'm starting to love this picture!
Tom spends too much time playing games.
I can't believe he's dead!
He came by train.
Tom is learning.
Tom is here to assist us.
Tom felt like a fool.
I don't recall asking for your advice.
Tom felt like a fool.
Don't leave things half done.
I didn't know it back then, but I know it now.
Tom doesn't watch TV at all.
If it means what I think it means, we're in trouble.
The war began three years later.
I do my best.
Call up Tom right away.
The flower is red.
I'm sure the guy you saw wasn't Tom.
The period is missing.
Everlasting fear, everlasting peace.
I don't know about João, but Maria lost her father when she was young.
You need technical knowledge to understand how this system works.
You can't establish a company without people.
Would you like to go to the theater this evening?
Tom uses Twitter every day.
Tom uses Twitter every day.
I signaled the car to go slow.
Tom could speak French.
Tom could go to prison.
He always leaves the window open when he sleeps.
Tom has lost control.
Do you want a drink?
Read and translate.
Read and translate.
The water is hot.
We're busy.
I am glad to run into you here.
Please mark the correct answer.
I'm sorry I made you cry yesterday.
Repeat your name!
Repeat your name!
Stop looking at me.
The first naked woman I saw was in a National Geographic magazine.
You aren't thirty.
Go away from the window.
Go away from the window.
This makes me happy.
In an instant, everything changed.
Tom sighed deeply.
Tom was drunk.
Tom almost never watches TV.
Tom took off his cap.
Tom lost his memory.
Tom fell into the river.
Tom is in the kitchen.
Why did you come so early?
You should've called me.
You should've phoned.
You should've called me.
Tom is in a bad mood.
I wonder what Tom will say.
What Tom said is true.
Tom was sound asleep.
Tom is accustomed to getting up early.
Tom repeated his question.
Tom played the part of Hamlet.
Tom disappeared into the crowd.
Tom decided to become a teacher.
Tom worked until late at night.
What you say is more important than how you say it.
Tom has his eyes closed and is pretending to be asleep.
Are you happy now, Tom?
Can you call Tom?
Did Tom actually say that?
I was hoping you'd say that.
I was hoping you'd ask that.
Hand me those papers.
Hand me the keys.
The student had his cellphone confiscated after it began to ring in class.
I'll never stop loving you.
Do you like the same kind of music as your parents do?
I think it might rain this afternoon.
I can wait a little bit longer.
I suppose I could wait a little bit longer.
I wonder if Tom would know how to do this.
I wonder if Tom will come tomorrow.
Tom had dreamed of going to Harvard all his life.
Damn it, Tom. I said no!
Her house is on the other side of the bridge.
We must take into account the fact that she is old.
Was that you in the car?
I couldn't believe this!
Now you're safe.
You'll have to run if you want to catch the train.
Won't you sample some of my wine?
Will you return this pen to me when you are through?
Tom retired from public life.
Tom is not the same as he was thirty years ago.
This is being done for your safety.
They have a round table in the living room.
These pipes screw together.
The car ran into a tree.
That's a safe guess.
That victory turned the scales in our favor.
Take the same road home that you came on.
Save dinner for me.
Roll over on your back.
Let's get at the root of the matter.
It's too early to decide.
Is there room for one more?
Is food scarce around here?
Is everything satisfactory?
Ignore it. It's only a rumor.
I'll stay right here until you get back.
I want some salt for my meat.
I thought I heard a scream.
I live here all year round now.
I don't like to sit too close to the screen.
How do you like my rose bushes?
Do it for my sake.
He is in the hospital at present.
She wants to drink some warm milk.
I want Tom to be happy.
Tom rushed out onto the road without looking both ways.
Nobody is in the living room, but the TV is on.
I like fish more than meat.
No one sees my tears.
When I grow up, I want to be a fireman.
I gave him my address.
I didn't want milk.
Tom was the last person I expected to see.
You don't have to pay attention to what Tom says.
They started shooting.
Tom is pleased with his new car.
What time is the last train?
It's no use crying over spilt milk.
Tom got killed in an automobile accident.
Cool Autumn arrived.
Tom didn't want his friends to see him cry.
She cabled us that she was coming.
I have recently given up smoking.
I wasn't able to attend the meeting due to illness.
That's completely irrelevant.
The situation is under control.
I'd like to believe we learn from our mistakes.
I understand the sentence, but I'm not able to translate it.
The prices are high.
You seem to be having fun.
This could become a serious problem.
There is only one store on the whole island.
They closed the shop.
He suddenly stopped talking.
It's a pity that he can't get married to her.
I can't believe Tom is already a sophomore.
Will you sing some English songs for us?
That was a stupid idea.
Wasn't Tom here earlier today?
Are you having second thoughts?
Don't sing.
Don't sing.
You've been very good to me.
I love him, but he doesn't even know I exist.
I was busy yesterday.
Don't bother me now.
I'm going to drop by the supermarket.
They fight constantly.
Mother Nature is beautiful.
What about Portugal?
Why do you need so many clothes?
Have you finished the papers?
I know you're in there.
There is a small garden in front of my house.
Okay, you caught me.
I like the way she laughs at my jokes.
My eyesight is not good.
Are you in the square?
Are you sure that you want to quit your job?
The situation is complicated.
I'm sorry Mohammed, I forgot your name!
I was cold and wet.
He has a flower in his hand.
He has dozens of books about Japan.
Tom said that the soup was too hot.
I'll bring the glasses.
I decided on telling her of my love.
I decided on telling him of my love.
I succeeded in reaching the top of the mountain.
I meet her once a week.
I've got homework to do.
Will you have another slice of pie? "Yes, please."
That girl has very delicate features.
They like reading English literature.
She needs someone who is able to understand her.
Tom was busy, so he couldn't help us.
No matter which you make, you will be satisfied with it.
It takes at least four days to change.
It's time to prepare dinner.
Are you lying to me?
Jessie gave orders that Alex was to be treated well.
If anyone thinks differently, they surely do have a problem.
This kind of work is very dangerous.
She helped her younger brother finish his picture.
I live in North Sweden.
A bird was flying high up in the sky.
Call your brother.
I'd like some coffee.
Tom stopped reading.
I've never heard my mother sing a song.
Please repeat.
He is supposed to be the best doctor in the town.
We won't know whether we can do it or not unless we try.
He arrived late as usual.
He dismissed most of his men.
Tom doesn't go to church very often.
I'm glad we talked.
Give me your knife.
Liisa was sick of the noise.
He had a gun on his person.
I liked it a lot.
I owe you a lot.
That's my point.
I hope that's enough.
Even I can understand this sentence. It's very easy to understand.
You look happier than usual.
There's something I want to talk to you about.
I cannot add a sentence like this to Tatoeba.
My car is a Ford, just like yours.
This was your idea, Tom.
This was your idea, Tom.
Nature is beautiful.
The police officer asked me what my name was.
We accomplished everything we wanted to.
Tom doesn't want to move.
The prices here are a bit high.
We appreciate the advice.
We assumed you were dead.
We can be there in fifteen minutes.
If John phones me, please tell him I'll be back by seven o'clock.
We can go together if you wish.
We're doing our best.
Today I have neck pain.
The birds are singing! Isn't it beautiful? "NO!"
Everybody agreed with his idea.
Everybody agreed with his idea.
I'd like to see that happen.
I'm prone to forget names.
I thought you didn't want to talk to us.
It depends on the size of the chair.
It depends on the size of the chair.
Did he come by bus or by train?
We'd all be interested in hearing your opinion.
Don't open the present yet.
Don't open the present yet.
I want to talk to you after class.
I want to talk to you after class.
We're aware of the situation.
There is nothing left to eat.
The new teacher is more like a friend than a teacher.
It was impossible for me to answer this question.
The population is growing.
Did you like it?
Did you enjoy it?
Will you go to the movies with me?
He sold us out.
He had to carry the bag.
Get on the bus.
Get on the bus.
This task is too much for him.
Hand it over.
Hand it over.
Hand it over.
Hand it over.
I bought you a gift.
I bought you a gift.
The more, the merrier.
I promise I'll never do that again.
You don't have to pay attention to what he says.
You can't believe a word he says.
Thomas does not eat fish.
Can you spell it?
That's not your fault.
He always looked happy, but never was.
She always looked happy, but never was.
It turned out well.
May I speak to you in private?
May I speak to you in private?
Can we talk in private?
Tom, it's me. Can I talk to you?
Tom got here before I did.
What are you doing for New Year's Eve?
What are you doing for New Year's Eve?
Why didn't Tom call for help?
I don't feel like answering questions.
I told Tom that I really wasn't interested.
I'm sure of my sentence.
The line is moving very slowly.
Tom decided to leave work early.
It finally stopped raining towards evening.
I'm used to this kind of cold.
I'm used to this kind of heat.
I'm not used to this cold.
I'm not used to this heat.
Tom went to the post office to mail a letter.
Tom looked both ways before crossing the road.
Tom is my neighbor.
I hope it wasn't too painful.
Tom likes reading magazines.
Do you think he will like my gift?
Let me try again.
What's the point of studying foreign languages besides English?
Pick a card.
He mistook me for my younger brother.
You look sick.
Stop. You're hurting me.
Does your throat hurt? "Yes, a little."
I don't feel like eating anything today.
There is no limit to human desire.
I hope Granny will like the present.
If one plays good music, people don't listen and if one plays bad music people don't talk.
Someone is watching you.
Do you know what they're called?
Do you know what they're called?
The sea can be heard from here.
Spring is followed by summer.
Spring is followed by summer.
She is too weak.
Take my advice.
Take my advice.
We've got to get back to the ship.
Thank you for helping me to cross the road.
Thank you for helping me to cross the road.
Thank you for helping me to cross the road.
Thank you for helping me to cross the road.
I want to know the facts.
Did you invite him?
Don't leave them alone.
Don't leave them alone.
I grabbed the cat by the neck.
To think I might have been married to that woman! It was a close thing once.
Excuse me, I'm coming through.
Is Dad in the kitchen?
Do you like spicy food?
Spring is on the way!
Tom told me he's getting married.
Who's your favorite politician?
I had a slight headache, so I went to bed early.
I've got to talk to you.
I've got to talk to you.
You can't give me orders.
You're lying.
The world has ended yesterday while I was sleeping.
Leave my family alone!
What the hell were you thinking?
I think I'm drunk.
We have a new neighbour.
I have no idea where we are.
They spend a lot of time together.
It's hard to love somebody when you don't know whether they love you as much as you love them.
It would be better to try.
Did Tom listen to you?
Which did you choose?
Which did you choose?
Which did you choose?
Which did you choose?
He wasn't interested.
Probably he will come soon.
Where did you get this key?
Where did you get this key?
How did you get that information?
How did you get that information?
Where did you get these pictures?
Where did you get these pictures?
Where did you get these clothes?
Where did you get these clothes?
Where did you get the money?
Where did you get the money?
Where did you get these clothes?
Where did you get these clothes?
Where did you get these pictures?
Where did you get these pictures?
Which would Tom choose?
Who are you going out with?
Christopher Columbus did not find fame. It was fame who found Christopher Columbus.
In case anyone's interested, I don't plan to be here tomorrow.
Where are all our suitcases?
I didn't tell you because I thought you weren't interested.
When will this end?
Our offer still stands if you're interested.
When are you getting married?
What you do with it is up to you.
What you do with it is up to you.
What you do with it is up to you.
What you do with it is up to you.
What you do with them is up to you.
What you do with them is up to you.
What you do with them is up to you.
What you do with them is up to you.
What would you choose?
What would you choose?
What time is lunch?
What time did you get up?
I thought you might be interested in trying some of these games I programmed.
You're nervous.
Do you think that Tom would be interested in that?
What makes you special?
She did the work alone.
What makes you so sure?
What makes you so special?
What makes us special?
What makes Tom so special?
I'll go to my bed and cry.
What made you think that?
We'd all be interested in your point of view.
I've heard rumors.
I was shot.
I've forgiven you.
I've been sued.
Tom said you were dead.
Tom had never been so busy before.
I was watching.
I've been waiting.
I've brought lunch.
I've called twice.
What do you think of this shirt?
What do you think of this shirt?
I've checked everywhere.
What do you think of me?
What do you think of me?
What do you know about all this?
What do you know about all this?
I've heard rumors.
Were you thinking about me?
Have you been thinking about me?
Were you thinking about me?
It is pleasant to sleep under the tree.
Tom was in a better mood an hour ago.
Tom was absolutely quiet.
Tom was a public servant.
I don't want to kill you, Tom.
I don't want to lose you, Tom.
I don't want to talk with you.
I don't want to talk with you.
I just don't want to lose you.
I just don't want to lose you.
I suppose I shouldn't have said that.
Tom admitted that he is afraid.
Tom admitted he was afraid.
Tom said he was going hunting.
I can't find my keys.
Tom is one of our best workers.
Tom is one of our best workers.
Tom is one of our best detectives.
Tom is about my age.
Tom entered the building unnoticed.
Tom closed his eyes tightly.
I can't believe what an idiot I've been.
This isn't about me.
Would you like a glass of water?
Tom gathered his stuff and left.
Tom feels very guilty about what happened.
Tom felt obligated to help.
I thought you wanted to call your wife.
It's wrong to lie.
I saw tears in her eyes.
I saw tears in her eyes.
The facts speak for themselves.
They sit in the kitchen and drink tea.
Do you talk to your dog?
You've made a mistake.
The next day the wreck of the ship was discovered on the shore.
So you decided to come after all.
You looked scared.
This is my song.
I lost my glasses.
Please step aside.
Choose one person.
No one finds this interesting.
This is all Tom's fault.
This is all so strange.
This is all a mistake.
You won't finish today if you just sit there.
Why are you so serious?
Where's that smoke coming from?
Tom slipped the letter into the box.
Tom sings beautifully.
Tom enlisted in the service.
This is a serious matter.
They sought Tom's help.
They saw Tom through the trouble.
These are the simple facts.
The room is rather small.
The child ran to his mother.
That's the best movie I've seen in ages.
Thanks for seeing me off.
Serve the coffee now, please.
My father became senior foreman at the plant.
Is Tom's illness serious, doctor?
I've never sung this before.
I'm dying for a smoke.
I seem to be interrupting.
I haven't gone to the movies since I got here.
I didn't understand that last sentence.
How long did you serve in the army?
How about singing that song for me again?
For once, Tom simply had nothing to say.
Fall is my favorite season.
Do you smell smoke?
Can you set this poem to music?
Blood rushed to Tom's face.
How long did you serve in the army?
How long did you serve in the army?
How long did you serve in the army?
I want to close my account.
What do you think of his suggestion?
What do you think of his suggestion?
What do you think of the new teacher?
What do you think of his idea?
What do you think of his idea?
That man is not a professor, he is a doctor.
You remind me of my mother.
It's warmer.
It rained a lot that winter.
Tom asked me if I were happy.
Tom asked me if I were happy.
Everybody's so busy.
The store is not open today.
She is not less than thirty.
It is evident that the Earth is round.
I'm sitting on the sofa.
I lost a lot of blood.
I write poems.
Don't meddle in his affairs.
The cat played with the live mouse.
I can't make heads or tails of what you say.
You're the most important person in my life.
When did he go to Europe?
I wonder what will happen.
I need a clean shirt.
Tom won't leave me alone.
You ought to have taken your father's advice.
He has braces.
She has braces.
The medicine saved her life.
He started to cry.
She did not cry.
If you want this job, you must apply for it by tomorrow.
Tom is calling his mother.
Tom is helping his wife.
I am talking to my sister.
I am talking to my sister.
Mind your own business!
I am sure you are right.
I hope you're happy, too.
I hope you're happy, too.
I hope you're happy, too.
I hope you're happy, too.
That was just a joke.
Tom came for the sole purpose of getting information.
They're having a social at the church tonight.
It's all right now, and I hope it'll remain so.
I'm sure Tom will sober up by morning.
I'm not drunk. I'm as sober as a judge.
I arrived late, so I didn't hear everything.
I'm sorry. I forgot.
Tom feels much better now.
Is today your birthday?
Tom knew it was a mistake.
It's Tom's fault! He made me do it.
It's Tom's fault! He made me do it.
I usually go to market on Friday.
Tom hasn't been paying attention.
I got here as fast as I could.
You'll find the shop around the corner.
Norway is the richest country in the world.
How did Amy look?
That is the fastest car.
She was very delighted with my gift.
It is advisable to go by train.
We have so much to learn.
Tom wasn't aware that nobody was listening to him.
You are her daughters.
Lie on your stomach.
He made me smile.
Give it back to me!
Our baby was born healthy.
If you want happiness for a lifetime, help someone else.
Same difference, he said.
Who sings the best of all the boys in your class?
I thought you wouldn't tell her that we hadn't done our homework.
I thought you wouldn't tell her that we hadn't done our homework.
I thought they wouldn't like you.
I thought they wouldn't like you.
He has a meeting every Sunday afternoon.
She has red spots all over her body.
Let me have the novel when you have done with it.
She's busy now and can't talk with you.
She's busy now and can't talk with you.
Do you want a glass of water?
Tom said he doesn't eat meat.
About how many English words do you know?
How many English words do you know?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
What time did you wake up?
We're safe here.
He will tell me everything sooner or later.
It's close.
I paid attention.
The coffee is very hot.
Where are my boots?
You are guilty.
I need the car keys.
Tom hits me.
Don't hold it upside down.
Don't hold it upside down.
Don't hold it upside down.
Don't hold it upside down.
You won't like me.
You won't like me.
They won't like me.
Tom will like me.
He lived abroad for many years.
I do not know whether to accept or to refuse.
I made her happy.
You looked lovely.
You looked lovely.
Tom doesn't look happy, does he?
We anticipate success.
He gave me a piece of advice.
Let's listen.
Can you sing the song?
I hope you slept well.
I hope you slept well.
I hope you slept well.
My dog is also watching TV.
Your students don't like me.
If you want, we can talk later.
If you want, we can talk later.
If you want, we can talk later.
I can read them all.
I know you're not lying.
I think she's interested in you.
I think he's interested in you.
Whose land is this?
There is always something to translate in Tatoeba.
Tom handed Mary a glass.
Tom handed Mary a glass.
If you want, we can talk later.
I don't feel like talking.
I don't expect you to forgive me.
Pay attention on the road.
Pay attention on the road.
Don't smoke in bed.
Don't smoke in bed.
Please don't smoke in bed.
Please don't smoke in bed.
I don't feel like telling her the truth.
Tom nodded his head.
I want to talk to him about it.
I know how to treat a lady.
I know how to treat a lady.
We don't drink milk.
We don't talk much.
We won't allow it.
Tom leaped to his feet.
What was that sound?
Authorized personnel only.
Excuse me, I'm very busy.
Tom is climbing a tree.
We'll meet in the park.
We'll meet at my house.
We had nothing to lose.
Tom wanted to meet you.
Tom wanted to meet you.
Tom waited for the bus.
Tom can't sing well.
He asked me on date, and I was like, "no way," and then he was all like, "whatever, I'll ask your sister."
At any rate, we have to finish this chapter before we can start on the next.
I like this color.
I like this song.
Please wait a minute.
Mathematics is an easy subject for me.
We hoped for a miracle.
Unfortunately, she lives abroad.
Tom is so happy.
Tom didn't want to get married.
Tom didn't want to get married again.
Thanks for the good advice.
I found the money that Tom had lost.
We won't meet again.
He is a very agreeable person.
We won't get caught.
We'll wait a while.
We're going to win.
Tom was breathing heavily.
Tom was breathing deeply.
Tom says he's rich.
Tom says he's rich.
Tom says he's happy.
The soldier was killed in action.
Tom didn't notice that he was being followed.
Add more salt to the soup.
Tom isn't watching TV now. He's sleeping.
Tom began to sing.
Ken stopped talking and began to eat.
What colour is her hair?
What colour is his hair?
Tom and Mike became acquainted through their mutual friends.
That will give you a vivid impression.
I will call you within a week.
That's not my opinion.
Tom was so busy.
Why is he in the church?
Tom is my buddy.
Security was increased in the city.
You're grown up now.
When are you coming back?
When did you leave?
When did you leave?
When did you go?
In many English words, there are letters that aren't pronounced.
Everyone felt safe.
This song is for you.
That's an interesting story.
I wonder why she didn't tell him about it.
I will wait here till he comes.
Read Lesson 10 from the beginning.
When did you see the film?
We happened to meet her in the park.
I have tried to talk to her.
How do I look? "You're the most beautiful woman in the world."
Who's speaking at the meeting tonight?
Who started this rumor?
When will we start taking lessons?
We're moving at a good speed now.
We won't be leaving town before spring.
We went to the spring for water.
Try to keep up your spirits.
Towns sprang up all along the railroad.
Tom is weak now, but his intellect is sound.
The ladder is standing in the corner.
Spin the wheel around.
I'll always stand by you in case of trouble.
I want three dollars worth of stamps.
I hope you're in good spirits.
I had a sound sleep last night.
I can't see the stage from this seat.
How much space does the building occupy?
How far are we from Red Square?
Has the performance started yet?
Does this book go in any special place?
They refused to give up their way of life.
Let me go!
Let me go!
Allow me to go.
Let me go.
Please let me go.
Please allow me to go.
Please allow me to go.
Please let me go.
Please let me go.
Please let me go.
I'll make you a drink.
We had to come back soon because school was about to start.
Tom doesn't care who does the job as long as the job gets done.
Take your hands off my neck.
Who allowed him in?
Who allowed her in?
Look! The train has arrived!
I failed.
We did our best.
He feels a lot better today.
He feels a lot better today.
Give me your soul, said the evil.
I think Tom will like this wine.
I felt left out.
Tom died fighting for what he believed in.
Please wake up.
He was shivering from the cold.
He's a world-class scientist.
He's a world-class scientist.
Don't stop.
Today, I'll sleep on the couch.
The kids are having fun.
We were having fun until you came.
I've got nothing to do.
I saw a cat on the roof.
I study at the university.
The teacher writes on the board.
Most of the shops were closed.
We have a cat, and we all adore him.
We enjoy talking.
The coffee is hot.
You're my only joy.
You made a good decision.
You made a good decision.
Is the snake alive or dead?
In any case, I must finish this work by tomorrow.
I can't believe it.
It can't be that he is busy.
I can't really be certain that Tom didn't take the money.
Make love, not sentences.
I was forgotten.
He was holding a pen in his hand.
He was holding a pen in his hand.
My neighbor's dog is dead.
Open fire!
Open fire!
Are you having fun?
I'm wasting my time.
Tom sat down on the sofa.
I'm sorry to call you so late at night.
I'm sorry to call you so late at night.
Kaliningrad was once called Koenigsberg.
What time do you arrive tomorrow?
What time do you arrive tomorrow?
Tom wasn't paying attention.
Don't change the topic.
Don't change the topic.
I'm having fun.
This is my teammate, Donnavan.
This makes absolutely no sense.
You're young. You have your whole life ahead of you.
You're young. You have your whole life ahead of you.
You're young. You have your whole life ahead of you.
You've got your whole life ahead of you.
You have your whole life ahead of you.
I want him to sing a song.
I'm sure she'll like it.
I'm sure he'll like it.
I'm sure she'll like it.
I'm sure he'll like it.
I'm sure she'll like it.
I'm sure she'll like it.
I'm sure he'll like it.
I'm sure he'll like it.
This movie is for adults only.
Why did you go away?
Why did you leave?
Why did you go away?
Are we safe?
Don't just stand around, lend a hand.
Are we finished?
The hospital was far away from his village.
You're never satisfied.
Are they dead?
Anybody can try.
There's a mistake in the bill.
Am I invited?
What time did Tom leave?
You have to get up.
Am I early?
Soldiers must follow orders.
Tom liked horses.
Tom just proposed.
I borrowed it.
Tom forgave me.
There is probably an easy solution to the problem.
Tom needs protection.
Why didn't you listen to his advice?
Why didn't you listen to his advice?
Tom needed protection.
Tom has lost everything.
Tom looked back.
Tom lived upstairs.
Tom listened intently.
Tom liked you.
Tom liked you.
Tom liked you.
I'm sorry if I hurt your feelings.
It's not that far from here.
Tom fell from the tree.
Tom had his car key in his left hand.
I will be watching TV about this time tomorrow.
Tom was raised in a small village.
Tom ran at full speed.
Someone's been very busy.
Is Tom guilty?
I can't stop thinking about what happened.
Is Tom drunk?
Is Tom dead?
Is Tom dangerous?
Aren't you afraid?
Is Tom awake?
You are the very man I want to see.
Don't call Tom.
Don't call Tom.
If you don't play honestly, I will stop playing with you.
Tom finally left.
Tom expected more.
She called me the following day.
Tom didn't call.
Tom can't move.
Tom called you.
Tom called you.
Tom called us.
Tom called us.
Tom arrived late.
Someone called Tom.
Please call Tom.
Please call Tom.
Nobody believed Tom.
Let Tom try it.
Let Tom finish.
Let Tom finish.
Let Tom finish.
Let Tom decide.
Let Tom come.
I was hoping you could do it.
It's the only way.
If you think it's simple, then you have misunderstood the problem.
I will put this business through in a week.
There's no cure for this disease.
Nature always wears the colors of the spirit.
I honestly have no idea.
The price depends on the size.
He saw in her eyes that she still loved him and hope arose inside him.
She woke up naked on the floor.
Don't come in! I'm naked.
What's your name? "Tom." "What's the rest of your name?" "My name is Tom, just Tom."
I don't have a landline.
I'm not going to go back.
Does this dress make me look fat?
The guys all made fun of him.
Give the book back to me when you have done with it.
The car is bad.
Oslo is the largest city in Norway with a population of 629,313.
Winter is cold, but I like it.
I can't stand her any longer!
These are my sister's magazines.
That's a job of your own choosing, isn't it?
Try to remember.
Try to remember.
I'll meet them at six.
I have a dog and a cat.
Please take a look at the picture that I chose.
They don't talk about it.
They made him work from morning till night.
They were satisfied.
Be there by 2:30 for sure.
Do you know that for sure?
Draw a straight line through it.
I know a store where you can buy that.
I need some summer clothes.
I take my vodka straight.
I was supposed to leave yesterday.
I wonder what's in store for us.
It was the first thing that struck my eye.
It's good to see you among all these strange faces.
It's strange, but true.
Let's invite them over for tea Sunday afternoon.
Make sure of your facts before you write the paper.
Strange to say, I didn't notice it.
Suppose we go to the movies tonight instead of tomorrow?
Suppose you wait till tomorrow?
Tears won't do you any good.
That's the last straw!
The submarine finally came to the surface.
The sun just went down.
This color doesn't suit you.
This method is slow but sure.
This needs a steady hand.
Tom is sure to be back by 2:30.
Where can I phone you this evening?
You're supposed to do it yourself.
Stop it.
The letters q, w and x exist in English.
I want to watch TV.
In English, the first letter of country and language names are written big.
German cars are among the best.
Is that your idea?
He returned to the army camp.
When I met her the other day, she asked about my parents.
He came to school after a long absence.
Take this medicine between meals.
Tom is out to lunch.
If you don't want to stay alone, I can keep you company.
If you don't want to be alone, I can keep you company.
Stop smoking.
Stop smoking.
Stop smoking.
I saw a fly on the ceiling.
You are a good student.
That's not my style.
You look like a girl.
Do you have any doubts?
I'm going to call him right now.
We can't give you your job back.
Most of her friends are boys.
Most of his friends are girls.
I'll check again.
I'll get my keys.
I'm already rich.
I'm already rich.
I'm already rich.
I'm already rich.
Don't come in here, please!
Don't come in here, please!
Do you go by train or car?
Do you go by train or car?
What's your favorite joke?
What is the meaning of this joke?
I hope you all understand.
I hope you all understand.
It's very important to me.
I wonder if he'll come tonight.
I wonder if he'll come tonight.
You're giving me the same old line.
You're giving me the same old line.
He helped poor people all his life.
The pleasure is mine.
I was just about to go to bed when he phoned me.
Horses eat grass.
Come to Chile again!
You have changed a lot.
Is the snake alive or dead?
I just can't believe this.
I hope this isn't a dream.
I have to make some calls.
I was fifteen years old in this picture.
Where did you get your degree?
He stays in touch with her.
Seriously, stay in touch.
Were it not for music, the world would be a dull place.
Please remember to mail the letter.
I very much want to speak with you.
I really want to talk to you.
Tom stood up and walked into the kitchen.
We were rowing against the current.
When did life come into being?
You're not afraid of heights, are you?
What happened wasn't Tom's fault.
This car is my father's.
She handed him the key.
Tom has grown.
You've grown up.
You've grown up.
You got taller.
Believe me. I'll be a new man.
Men cry, too.
I would gladly help you, only I am too busy now.
You only have yourself to blame.
You only have yourself to blame.
This is your own fault.
We missed the deadline.
They missed the deadline.
She missed the deadline.
He missed the deadline.
Tom would like to speak with you.
Tom would like to speak with you.
I'm helping Tom.
The most important thing in life is to be yourself.
Tom met his wife while he was studying in France.
I saw this in a movie.
I saw this in a movie.
This is getting interesting.
This is getting interesting.
This is getting serious.
This is getting serious.
They're having fun.
I always take a bus.
He's not a bus driver, is he?
We always take a bus.
You're students, aren't you?
Why is the train so crowded today?
Why don't you think about it for a while before you make up your mind?
Who'll buy the theater tickets?
Who are those people you were talking to?
What're those things you're carrying there?
We go to the movies now and then.
Tom will go for days without smoking a cigarette.
Tom made several tries, but failed each time.
Tom is a true scientist.
Tom always sings out of tune.
The walls of my room are too thin.
The light was so bright that it hurt our eyes.
That's the painter whose picture you want to buy.
That really was a tough break.
Please send them my regards.
My father sent me abroad against my will.
Let's walk toward town.
Let's meet at the same place that we met last time.
Let's go to the movies.
Let them decide.
It's too hot to go for a walk.
Is it true that you got a new car?
I trust you slept well.
I hate to waste time on such a wild idea.
I don't want that much milk.
I don't remember the title of that movie.
How far's the top of the mountain?
Here, try my pen.
Do you like the theater?
Do you know their address?
Did they really do all that work by themselves?
Are you through with this book?
Wait. I can't walk that fast.
Wait. I can't walk that fast.
I thought you were finished.
I thought you were finished.
I thought you were finished.
I thought you were finished.
I thought you were finished.
I thought you were finished.
Don't smoke here, it's a hospital!
Don't smoke here, it's a hospital!
Is this really happening?
Turn left at the corner.
When he was 18, he married.
When he was 18, he married.
She didn't read the book.
He did not read the book.
I don't like scary movies!!!
I've never been abroad before.
We have something in common.
I can't stop smoking.
I eat meat.
I want to drink something cold.
What is this letter?
Do you like French literature?
What are you going to do with all those sentences?
You might at least have said, "Thank you", when someone helped you.
When's your birthday?
That man is on trial for the murder of a little girl.
Tom is on the baseball team.
I didn't have anything to say.
I had nothing to say to Tom.
I had nothing to do with that situation.
I had no one to talk to.
I had no one to talk to.
I didn't have a clue.
I had no idea you'd be here.
I had no idea you'd be here.
I had no idea what was happening.
Tom is older than he looks.
Why does this matter?
Do you love nature?
Do you love nature?
He permitted them to walk in the garden.
I'll do it tomorrow. I promise.
That's impossible. "I must disagree with you. It's very much possible."
Are you busy today?
The sun is setting.
Tom expected this to happen.
Tom expected this to happen.
It was a dangerous time.
I will do the best I can.
Try on that shirt.
Try on that shirt.
Both were seriously wounded.
Both were seriously wounded.
That was his personal opinion.
Most of us love our country.
Barney was wounded seriously.
Arthur was in his early fifties.
I was hoping to find you.
I was hoping to find you.
I was too drunk to drive.
I wasn't sure you'd come.
Drive cautiously.
You can't come in.
I expected more from you.
Children should only speak when they're spoken to.
They saw him enter the room.
This song is known to everyone.
My opinion has changed.
I like to talk.
We can't allow Tom to continue behaving that way.
We can't allow Tom to continue behaving that way.
He said that he takes a walk every day.
You probably shouldn't tell anybody about that.
She always lets her children do what they want to.
My tree looks sick. I wonder what's wrong with it.
This is the best way to die.
I don't see what's changed.
Did you lose something?
Did you lose something?
What've you lost?
How about something to drink?
I have something for you to do.
I have something for you to do.
You're forgetting something.
You're forgetting something.
I do hope you'll come again.
Please come back as soon as possible.
Please come back as soon as possible.
There's room inside.
Do you know by chance his name?
Do you know by chance her name?
Why are you leaving so soon?
Why are you leaving so soon?
He was wide awake.
I always get up at 6 o'clock in the morning.
But people have little hope.
Is there any hope whatsoever?
The book fell to the floor.
Take a look.
I have very good eyesight.
I've told you not to call me, Tom.
I've told you not to call me, Tom.
I've told you not to call me, Tom.
I've told you not to call me, Tom.
That's a crime.
Give it back.
Give it back.
Give it back.
Give it back.
It's difficult to understand why you want to go.
I have to keep it a secret.
You are our only hope.
You are our only hope.
I have to go pick up the kids.
The street runs along the river.
I have to give the money back to Tom.
I have to finish this.
I have to finish this first.
I have to admit I was worried about it.
I have to admit I enjoyed it.
I have to admit I enjoyed it.
I have three young kids.
I have three teenagers.
I have three sons.
I have three million dollars.
I have three kids.
I have the list.
I have the keys.
I'm the one who has the key.
I wonder what Tom is doing here.
You made the same mistake again.
You made the same mistake again.
You made the same mistake again.
They made the same mistake again.
I need to talk with you about something.
What did you eat for lunch yesterday?
What did you eat for lunch yesterday?
What did you eat for lunch yesterday?
I've seen you on TV.
I've seen you on TV.
I've seen this movie before.
I've seen this movie before.
I've seen this movie before.
I've run out of milk.
I've run out of milk.
I have no idea why.
I have no idea why.
I have no clue who you are.
I have no idea who Tom is.
I have no idea who that is.
I have no idea where Tom went.
I have no idea where Tom was last night.
I have no idea where Tom is.
I have no idea where Tom is now.
I have no idea what Tom will say.
I have no idea what Tom said.
I have no idea what this is.
I have no idea what that could be.
I have no idea what it means.
I have no idea how Tom was able to do that.
I have no idea how this happened.
I have no idea how this happened.
I've never seen you cry.
I've never seen you cry.
I've never seen you cry.
I've never seen Tom cry.
I've never seen Tom cry.
I haven't finished all my homework yet.
I haven't finished all my homework yet.
I've never been very good at French.
Most of the dogs are alive.
She thinks that she can sing.
She made me sell the dog.
When I'm with you, I'm happy.
When I'm with you, I'm happy.
Tom needs our advice.
My brother named his cat Hanako.
You can study here.
They had guns.
They had guns.
You don't know what is losing your entire family on a war.
It's strange that she came home so late at night.
I will talk about it with my horse.
I saw the old man two or three times a week.
Let go of my arm!
Let go of my hand.
Let go of my hand.
I'm sure of your success.
I've lost the will to live.
I've lost the will to live.
I lost my job.
I've heard about all your problems.
Give me a piece of chalk.
Whose military is in Crimea?
I wasn't sure it was you.
I wasn't sure it was you.
I can't bear the pain anymore.
You know I hate that.
These clothes make you look thinner.
Peter came in your absence.
How about going to the movie?
How about going to a movie?
How about going to a movie?
I wonder who she is.
What a pity I don't have a garden.
Many soldiers were killed in World War II.
The rich are not always happy.
Tom is as old as I am.
Are you in a good mood?
I was going to write to you, but I was too busy.
Two adult tickets, please.
Which comes first, your career or your family?
They saw a cat in the garden.
I didn't sing.
I didn't sing.
We don't know how Jesus really looked.
We don't know what Jesus looked like.
Tom raised his hand to get the teacher's attention.
Are you sure Tom can do this by himself?
What are you doing here so late at night?
What are you doing here so late at night?
I can't believe that you like that restaurant.
I already regret it.
I already know your secret.
I almost told Tom what you told me not to tell him.
Everything's changed.
Everybody wants to be happy.
Tatoeba has almost 3 million sentences!
It is quality, not quantity that counts.
I drank coffee.
I'm opening a box.
I didn't think you'd believe me.
I didn't think you'd believe me.
I had no notion that you were coming.
I had no notion that you were coming.
Melanie reached the next level on the game.
I didn't think Tom could run that fast.
Tom treated me badly.
Tom treated me badly.
Tom treated me badly.
You must meet with her.
You must meet with her.
You must meet with him.
You must meet with him.
Mind your mouth.
It's my first time here.
A Happy New Year! "I wish you the same!"
I'm back. "Welcome home."
You went too far in your joke.
When's Tom coming back?
Please give me a map of the town.
Happy hour is from six until eight.
How long do you think Tom has been watching us?
How long do you think Tom has been watching us?
How can you be sure Tom's telling the truth?
How can you be sure Tom's telling the truth?
Here, try my pen.
Asia is roughly four times the size of Europe.
Esperanto is an international language.
Screw the rules; I have money!
I can't believe Tom hasn't called.
Look out for cars in crossing the street.
I want to help you figure this out.
I want to help you figure this out.
I want to figure this out.
I want to be invited.
You're the last hope for humanity.
I know it's important to you.
I know it's important to you.
It's more important to me than to you.
I bet you know this.
Your opinion is very important to us.
Please bring it back tomorrow.
When will you return the money to me?
Wait at the entrance to this building.
Paper burns easily.
The boy was helped by me.
Bill Gates is the world's richest man.
Tom likes helping others.
Where are you going, Tom?
How could Tom do that to me?
I've lost his number.
I've lost her number.
Women like to talk.
My grandmother can't see very well.
He sold all his land.
That's Tom's house with the red roof.
She's not my type.
He married a very young girl.
It took all day.
We were starting to lose hope.
Are you students at this school?
The road was crowded with various vehicles.
You cannot catch a heavy box with one hand.
Where's the rest of our class?
I realize it's hard to believe.
Italy is a beautiful land.
Capri is one the most beautiful islands of Italy.
He died after a long illness.
She removed her sunglasses.
He removed his sunglasses.
They won't listen to you.
You remind me of myself when I was your age.
When I was your age, I had a girlfriend.
When I was your age, I had a boyfriend.
She ignored me.
It doesn't count.
Does that count?
Let me try.
Let me try.
Tom says it hurts.
She did it against her will.
This is the coffee shop I first met my wife in.
I hope we didn't keep you waiting too long.
We're serious.
I don't make mistakes.
We don't make mistakes.
How many days until my birthday?
How many days until my birthday?
I just don't feel like it.
The inhabitants of the island are tall and strong.
I didn't think it was important.
I didn't mean to disturb you.
I didn't mean to disturb you.
I didn't even know Tom had left.
It's time we talked.
Is this your opinion?
What an idiot!
What an idiot!
It wasn't that heavy.
That is no fault of Tom's.
Tom could've refused.
You shouldn't smoke.
Do you wear glasses?
Do you wear glasses?
I thought he was stupid.
I stared at the ceiling.
What's your favorite kind of fish?
What's your favorite kind of fish?
What would you like for lunch?
I feel that I make time to do various things.
He ran up the stairs panting.
Methinks my own soul must be a bright invisible green.
Never have I seen a more beautiful sight than this.
Tom lies to Mary all the time.
Jim goes to school by bus.
He has not become rich, but he had a certain measure of success.
This house has a red roof.
Which game did you choose?
He is contented with his lot.
Who does it belong to?
Who were you speaking to on the phone?
I watch the birds.
We'll make a list.
I didn't want to get up early.
She told me an interesting story.
She's going back to America.
The night is still young.
Please stop singing that song.
Please stop singing that song.
Please stop singing that song.
Please stop singing!
Please stop singing.
She can't sing.
She can't sing.
I've got to talk to you.
I've got to talk to you.
I've got to go back.
I've got to figure this out.
I don't have anything to say to Tom.
I've got nothing left to say.
I've got a train to catch.
I've got a meeting at 2:30.
I've got a knife.
I've got a birthday coming up.
I have good hearing.
How many black and white movies have you seen?
I've found the key.
I haven't figured that out yet.
I haven't figured it all out yet.
I've dreamed of this day.
I've dreamed about this for years.
Call Tom and ask him to come back.
Call Tom and ask him to come back.
You need to be more attentive in class.
I promise I'll explain everything later.
Perhaps you've made a mistake.
Perhaps you've made a mistake.
Stay together.
She was always different from other children.
He was always different from other children.
The telephone rang, but no one answered.
I always wondered whether you'd come back.
You're a bright boy.
Tom couldn't believe it.
He put all his money in the box.
They talked about culture.
They talked about culture.
No sooner had I got there than they started.
Tom, is there anything we need to talk about?
Please wait here.
Please wait here.
Don't come into my room.
Don't come into my room.
Don't come into my room.
Don't come into my room.
I'm not a hundred percent sure.
Tom had to leave.
He bought a dress for her.
Was that your idea?
I have no idea what this means.
She disappeared two days ago.
She disappeared two days ago.
I fell into a hole.
Why don't you wait till morning?
That's pretty weird.
I can't believe my ears.
I could not believe my ears.
The baby woke up in the middle of the night.
He gave me a good piece of advice.
He's watching me.
I'm not your teacher anymore.
I've decided to write a novel.
Who planted the tree?
The boss has a good opinion of your work.
When you are walking down the road, it is possible to meet lots of people.
That sounds weird, but it's true.
The poet wrote many poems.
Workers lost their jobs.
Workers lost their jobs.
I love spring.
I'm getting ready.
Tom is getting ready.
She lies to me all the time.
She lies to me all the time.
She lies to you all the time.
She lies to you all the time.
It was a fine sunny day.
You're serious, aren't you?
Tom wants to become rich and famous.
Fewer people came than we were expecting.
Thank you for inviting us to dinner.
Tom is coming back.
I was forced to do it.
We have a cold autumn this year.
Try to go slower.
Try to go slower.
Men don't cry.
We were not afraid.
They weren't afraid.
They were afraid.
I was afraid.
You're afraid.
We're afraid.
You're afraid.
They're afraid.
They're not afraid.
He has Alzheimer's.
I called her on the phone.
Tell me which one to choose.
Tell me which one to choose.
Tell me which one to choose.
She's a good spouse. She's faithful.
The bag wasn't mine.
Continue straight ahead.
Tom is probably not hungry right now.
We can go anywhere we want.
Please help me in the kitchen.
I'm used to getting up early.
I suggest you help us.
What do you suggest we do?
What would you want to drink?
How can I add tags to a sentence?
I'd like to add a new language in Tatoeba, what do I have to do?
How do I contribute audio in Tatoeba?
I look upon him as a fool.
He seems to be a student.
Would you like to stay for lunch?
Check this one out.
There is a pen on the desk.
I'm not sure if it's a boy or a girl.
During the night, everything looks different.
She's not paying any attention to me.
He's not paying any attention to me.
I want to be rich.
I want to be rich.
I owe my success to you.
I owe my success to you.
My wife hates cats.
Where's the noise coming from?
The sound is coming from over there.
The sound came from that direction.
I heard a noise behind me.
We could see some ducks on the lake.
There's nothing to see here.
Let me see your hands.
It all happened so suddenly.
You'll start a new lesson as soon as you've finished this one.
I bought this watch at the store.
I drink milk.
I'm getting back together with my ex-girlfriend.
Let me out.
Please, let me out! I will be good, I promise!
My father doesn't let me go out alone at night.
Are you a Japanese student?
I'll go with you as far as the bridge.
Are you a Japanese student?
I'm sure I have the right number.
I'm sure I have the right number.
This is a portrait of my late father.
Tom always looks happy.
I like stories.
Do you go to school by bus?
Strange rumors are going around.
This bridge is made of wood.
Do you regret the fact that you married me?
I can't understand the meaning of this word.
I'm scared of killing animals.
There's no milk left.
They're both artists.
It's no laughing matter.
Have you got the key? "Yes, I have it."
He wrote a lot of stories.
Take my horse.
Take my horse.
What's your cat's name?
Tom was a kind and gentle man, well loved by all who knew him.
I heard you were rich.
He has read War and Peace 15 times.
She has read War and Peace 15 times.
You are important.
I am to blame for it.
What are you doing here so early?
You are the only one who can save the world.
You are the only one who can save the world.
You are the only one who can save the world.
You are the only one who can save the world.
Tom got married at 26.
She says she likes flowers.
Take a look at this map.
My brother is a teacher.
I'm working on a big project.
Since early childhood, he dreamed of writing stories.
What a stupid question!
I told Tom not to come back.
I told Tom not to come back.
The one who has everything can lose everything.
Take your time with it.
Take your time with it.
Are you certain you've made the right decision?
Are you certain you've made the right decision?
I don't think you should call Tom.
I wouldn't bet on that horse if I were you.
What led you to this conclusion?
What led you to this conclusion?
The car turned left.
Are you certain you've made the right decision?
She did her best to rescue him.
Look at the blackboard.
Look at the blackboard.
I will explain the situation to you later on.
Mom, can I watch TV? "No, you can't Tom." "Dad, can I watch TV?"
I didn't know that Tom talked about me like that behind my back.
I left the key in the room.
Morning. You're early today. "You too. I thought you'd still be dead to the world."
This building is huge.
Tom is sleeping on the couch.
He runs as fast as you.
Your secretary seems to know the truth.
Tom doesn't eat meat.
I owe what I am today to you.
The population of the city is about 100,000.
In reality black is not a color; it is the absence of color.
This book is very interesting.
Does this ring a bell?
Does this ring a bell?
Does this ring a bell?
Does this ring a bell?
She removed her shirt.
He took off his shirt.
You don't need to hurry.
You don't need to hurry.
I'm almost through.
Stop pretending you don't know me.
I'll sleep on the couch.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
Its color is red.
When do I get there?
Our planet, Earth, is always in motion.
There were flowers here.
I'm not convinced that Tom is telling the truth.
I have no idea what that could be.
Now my daughter is afraid of me.
Do you have a daughter?
We were both drunk.
We were both drunk.
She disappeared in the dark.
The lights are out.
I want my money back.
I want my money back.
Do you know how to cook fish?
Tom seems really happy.
I don't want to be rich.
Tom glanced at the clock.
I think Tom believed me.
This tea is very hot.
How much is the commission?
The teacher and I sat face to face.
How much is the commission?
Tom didn't have anything to say.
I wouldn't want to work in a hospital.
I can run as fast.
Have my kids been annoying you?
Something very strange happened last night.
I saw how you saved Tom's life.
They made me wait for a long time.
The group tried to solve social problems.
Which movie would you like to see?
It's the first time I laugh this much.
It's the first time I laugh this much.
Whatever you do, don't cry.
Whatever you do, don't cry.
Tom isn't in the hospital.
The winter has been very cold.
We're going to the cinema. Come with us.
We're going to the cinema. Come with us.
Tom was a bad student.
I've read this book.
I've read this book.
This squirrel is afraid of heights.
I just met him.
I just met him.
I want a new dress.
I want a new dress.
The boy passed the time by flinging stones into the lake.
The horse is not white.
Most people are open books.
I found the building.
It's not like I'm completely happy right now.
I don't like being made a fool of.
I must learn seriously.
He saw the picture clearly.
How long have you studied?
I don't like the way Tom is acting.
There is no doubt that I would not have been able to do this without your help.
How can you stand the noise?
That was serious.
I'm finished here.
Which teachers were you talking to?
Tom bought a horse.
I've lost my ticket.
Were you busy yesterday?
I don't like the way she speaks to me.
They were both drunk.
They were both drunk.
They were both drunk.
They were both drunk.
He left the water running.
He must have left the water running.
Is the museum of art around here?
Tom was too drunk to drive home.
Tom wanted something cold to drink.
What kind of films do you prefer?
Tom is good and drunk.
Tom is old enough to drink.
Tom was good and drunk.
Tom was drunk and forgot where he'd parked his car.
You're a very interesting person.
You're a very interesting person.
Why do you want to study abroad?
Do the new neighbors have any kids?
Playing cards is fun.
I'm not lying to you.
There are a lot of parks in London.
I'm sure my parents won't let me go by myself.
I'm sure my parents won't let me go by myself.
A mustache grows on the upper lip.
The house was more expensive than I had expected.
Stop talking and start working!
I'm old enough.
I'm old enough.
I'll let you know when I'm done.
Kazakhstan is the largest country in Central Asia.
He was as drunk as a lord.
He was as drunk as a lord.
He was as drunk as a lord.
I think it's a good idea.
Can you come to the meeting tomorrow?
A fox is a wild animal.
Suddenly, there were gunshots.
Tom wears thick glasses.
Quit acting like a baby.
What languages do they speak in Belgium?
It will get you nowhere.
There are some things I want to talk to you about.
That man is a criminologist. Trust him!
The bus went over the cliff.
Tom didn't expect this at all.
This room is very warm.
Install Linux!
We all hope for peace.
We will go to watch TV.
Your life is so perfect.
Twenty is a beautiful age.
Careful! Watch out!
I don't think you understand the situation.
Sleep is necessary to good health.
I think Tom only speaks French.
You called us, didn't you?
We're in a bit of a hurry now.
I see a star.
It is probable that he is ill.
The lake is large and beautiful.
Tom is in a bad mood now.
It's a gift.
I can't believe Tom made such a mistake.
Please wait your turn.
It seems that he is rich.
He often goes to Tokyo.
One of them is lying.
Call me when you arrive at home.
It has nothing to do with real life.
Parents were hopeful about the future.
There has to be another way to do this.
There has to be another way to do this.
My life would probably have been quite different if I had been born a month later.
My life would probably have been quite different if I had been born a month later.
Stop avoiding me.
My camera is waterproof.
At the end of a working day, everybody is in a hurry to get home.
People are more important than money.
I'm too poor to buy a new suit.
All we want is for you to be happy.
Am I safe now?
Tom's wasting time.
I met him.
I didn't believe them.
What music do you listen to?
When did you finish the work?
When did you finish the work?
I am very busy.
I'm Helen Cartwright's daughter.
I usually go to school by bus.
I'm surprised to see you.
I didn't expect to see you.
I'm as tall as Tom.
You're not going to believe this.
You're not going to believe this.
I don't know where this came from.
What planet are you from?
He believes that he can prove it.
Tom might become famous.
He called her every other day.
Is there a garden in front of the house?
I'll be busy next week.
What kind of music do you usually listen to?
Please send an empty email message to info@example.com.
I've always wanted to meet your younger brother.
Don't you have something to do?
Why are you crying? It's just a movie!
How well she is singing!
What's our plan?
I hate milk.
Thanks for the good advice!
Friends are very important to her.
Death is permanent.
Are you no longer in pain?
Are you no longer in pain?
Do you enjoy studying?
Do you enjoy studying?
Do you like to study?
Please give me a glass of water.
Get out of bed.
We're talking to you, Tom.
We're talking to you, Tom.
I'm sorry, but I can't.
I came upon a friend of mine.
I came upon a friend of mine.
Why did you listen to them?
Why did you listen to them?
We're too busy.
We have no idea where he is.
We have no idea where he is.
Have you been crying?
Have you been crying?
Have you been crying?
Please don't smoke too much.
I made her my secretary.
These are tears of joy.
She likes the teacher.
I regret giving Tom my phone number.
I regret doing that.
We have to talk to you.
We have to talk to you.
She did it for her children.
That's no way to talk to your teacher.
Thanks for the beautiful music!
He is really a good worker.
Read this book at your leisure.
Look at your clothes!
I wanted to speak with you about this.
He's rich.
I did it for him.
I did it for her.
I did it for him.
I did it for her.
I did it for you.
I did it for you.
I did it for you.
I did it for you.
Seeing is believing.
I called him, but a girl answered the phone.
I called him, but a girl answered the phone.
Do you want to take a look?
Do you want to look at this?
Do you want to take a look?
When did you start smoking?
We went on talking about the matter.
Allen is a poet.
Can't you see we're talking?
Who the hell do you think you are?
Have you seen the new movie?
Who bought you this dress?
I can't prove it, you'll have to take my word for it.
It's your fault, not mine.
I cannot stand that noise anymore.
The bus will be here shortly. Please wait a bit.
I must finish my homework before dinner.
Tom pulled something out of his pocket and put it on his desk.
Give me the car key, please.
The boy left his homework half-finished.
His parents were too poor to send their son to college.
He drives without licence.
Taste buds are needed to taste food.
You're old enough now.
She treats me as if I were a baby.
He left home never to return.
I'll believe it when I see it.
Time to get married!
There are twenty seven pupils in my class.
You must be the new teacher.
I thought you might want to see this.
What do you think of the movie?
Tom picked up a pen and started to write.
As was to be expected, he took the first place.
Tom put his glasses in his shirt pocket.
Tom sensed somebody was watching him.
Today, everyone is dead.
Tom was obviously a rich man.
I also like to listen to music.
French is too hard, I don't want to learn it.
What did you say these are called?
Tom tucked his shirttail in.
Tom took one look at the teacher's face and he knew he was in trouble.
So what do you suggest?
For God sent not his Son into the world to condemn the world; but that the world through him might be saved.
I have neither seen nor heard of such a thing.
This is the fish he caught.
It's not always so easy to do the right thing.
Do you prefer the blue one or the red one?
My father cannot go without coffee even for a day.
Nagoya is famous for its castle.
I only know some words and phrases.
I hate her parents.
He doesn't want to speak, being afraid of making mistakes.
Don't judge others by the color of their skin.
I'll catch the next train.
Does it hurt?
You're welcome to stay as long as you want.
You are looking for your key.
I'll finish the work in a week, that is, on May 5th.
They are talking.
This tea smells good.
This tea smells nice.
We want to talk to you about a problem.
I'll pick you up in ten minutes.
We never talk.
I liked your speech.
I liked your speech.
The sofa takes up too much room.
The girl walking over there is my daughter.
How's your daughter?
I left my keys in the car!
Which one will they choose?
Which one will they choose?
Which one will they choose?
Which one will they choose?
Do you like to sing?
I was in London most of the summer.
She's up to her neck in debt.
Who are you to talk to me like that?
Who are you to talk to me like that?
He refused to shake my hand.
You made mistakes.
You cannot read this novel without crying.
Are you already drunk?
Are you already drunk?
Are you already drunk?
Tom told me he was thirty.
Tom told me you were busy.
Tom told me you were busy.
Tom told me you were busy.
Tom told us you were busy.
Tom told us you were busy.
Tom told us you were busy.
Tom told us you were busy.
You have made many mistakes.
You have made many mistakes.
He's still in poor health after his illness.
The teacher and the pupils are in the museum.
She's as busy as Tom.
It's too soon to tell whether it's a boy or a girl.
Go back home!
I'll let you stay one night.
I dream a lot.
This is the time you should get up.
Being very tired, I went to bed early.
His grandfather died of cancer last year.
I saw you working and I didn't bother you.
I didn't see you drunk.
I didn't see you drunk.
I didn't see you drunk.
I didn't see you drunk.
Tom grabbed his bag.
They won't be able to get up so early.
They won't be able to get up so early.
I hope to go to Canada next year.
I just wanted to tell you how much I wish this had never happened.
They asked us if we knew when the movie started.
I watched a movie.
Can you honestly tell me you didn't know this was going to happen?
Tom never told me why he had decided to become a teacher.
Tom wants to know when you're coming home.
She looked pleased with her new job.
My mother is well off.
Where does all that noise come from?
They were fainting.
Translate this text.
You should be able to read this book easily.
Translate this text.
She began to cry again.
She began to cry again.
When did your friend leave for America?
After he had found her phone number, he called her up.
Even the richest man cannot buy everything.
Do you think Tom has changed?
Why is that baby crying?
Call 911!
Tom is drunk again.
Tom is drunk again.
Tom often cries when he's drunk.
The two brothers died.
She suggested that he try it.
London developed into the general market of Europe.
We're really happy.
Choose whichever you like.
I'm not hungry at all.
This is the most interesting.
How can one stop smoking?
You're a great teacher!
She acted without thinking.
I have only one picture of my grandmother.
At last, the rain stopped.
He had just come home when I called.
He had just come home when I called.
My phone's ringing.
Maybe you're lying.
I'm still too weak.
I'm sure Tom is OK.
I'm not used to it.
Don't forget your bag.
That's a weird sentence.
That is a strange sentence.
Tom does not cry.
Wait until tomorrow.
I bought a new dress.
I bought a new dress.
Please call before you come.
Please call before you come.
Please call me before you come.
Please call me before you come.
Tom was smoking.
I liked that movie.
I must speak to her.
I've got to talk to you.
I must talk with you.
Are you sure you want this?
Are you sure you want this?
Are you sure you want this?
Why are you so cheerful?
I've got some dust in my eyes.
He doesn't even notice me.
I won't say it again.
He doesn't even notice me.
She doesn't even notice me.
Wait until tomorrow.
I should not have stayed up late yesterday.
I don't mind waiting.
My horse is white.
I can't stand that guy.
She's a middle-aged fat woman.
He does not have any relatives at all.
It is foggy.
There were no knives.
Please promise you'll never lie to me again.
They fell.
Tom thinks I'm stupid.
Don't leave your glasses on the floor.
Tom isn't lying.
Tom must be busy.
Pink is not just for girls.
Nowadays, almost every home has one or two televisions.
We're sinking.
He is not a teacher, much less a scholar.
Tom is afraid.
We're adults.
Tom is thirty.
Tom is 30 years old.
Tom's thirtyish.
Tom is around thirty.
Tom's thirtyish.
Tom is unconscious.
Animals run.
Don't take off your shoes!
I have nothing to say to him.
Tom is currently in danger.
The world is dangerous.
I'm not dangerous.
Tom isn't dangerous.
That is a ship.
I have a friend whose father is the captain of a big ship.
Life is never so bad that it can't get worse.
Would you mind translating this for me?
Tom doesn't watch TV.
Who lives in the house next door?
I'm the new teacher.
Tom didn't believe it for a second.
It's about five miles.
I want to execute the plan by all means.
We see with our eyes, we hear with our ears, we touch with our skin, we smell with our nose, and we taste with our tongue.
I'm glad I was able to help.
I was very glad to get a present from her.
Tom wants to speak with you.
He will telephone you immediately when he comes back.
Is he alive or dead? "He's alive."
How far did it go?
Tom was always different from the other kids.
You should be in a hospital.
You should be in a hospital.
This sentence is in the present tense.
It just doesn't count.
I couldn't breathe.
I couldn't breathe.
She put on dark glasses to protect her eyes from the sun.
Why don't you just believe me?
Tom is watching.
This is my favorite subject.
We waited.
So, what do you suggest?
We can make it.
You've got to pay attention.
We'll try.
You'll like it, believe me.
I've never been happier.
I'm happy to have you here, Tom.
I'm happy to have you here, Tom.
This is the same watch as I have lost.
Snakes are cold-blooded creatures.
I wonder if he's at home.
I got remarried.
I got married again.
This bed is cold.
I don't want to go back home.
I can't believe he did this to me.
I can't believe he did this to me.
Don't lie. Be honest.
Let's call for help.
What's that very tall building?
I didn't move.
I like his music.
I cannot put up with her behavior.
I'm afraid I took the wrong train.
Here's the book you wanted to read.
What's your favorite war movie?
What's your favourite animal?
They wanted me to finish by 2:30.
They wanted me to sell drugs for them, but I refused.
I took it as a joke and did not answer.
Where did I put my keys?
We have lots of bread, and as for butter, we have more than enough.
We found it difficult to walk in the deep snow.
It was so hot that we couldn't walk for long.
I am seeing a friend tomorrow.
Please tell him to wait.
Do you like this garden?
I love that movie.
This English book is too difficult for me to read.
I'll be there in fifteen minutes.
This is an important film.
I think you should read it yourself.
They're wearing expensive clothes.
They're wearing expensive clothes.
Honey, I'm still busy.
Why don't you watch TV?
Why don't you watch TV?
Today is a beautiful day.
He said that he gets up at 6 o'clock every day.
You don't look busy.
You don't look busy.
Tom thinks we should leave early.
Oh yes, that's right.
During hot weather, be sure to drink lots of water.
During hot weather, be sure to drink lots of water.
Do you see that ship near the island?
My mother wrote to me and asked after my health.
I wanted to go there with her, but I was too busy.
I will wait for a week.
You should quit smoking.
You'd better give up smoking.
You'd better give up smoking.
You should give up smoking.
On a clear day, you can see Mt. Fuji.
Is that a red pen?
It's going to happen sooner or later.
I read a newspaper while eating.
Get out of here and don't ever come back!
I believe her story.
Did you come here to help me or not?
I believe you have information that can help us.
He is small and weak.
I'm not scared.
Hard work has brought him success.
A poet looks at the world the way a man looks at a woman.
Please complete the sentences.
Even Tom wouldn't be stupid enough to do that.
Tom sold me his old car.
How long will it be?
Are we safe here?
Get out of here and don't ever come back!
Who is that guy?
I'm sorry I have to go.
Please excuse me, I have to leave.
They wrote that song together.
She accepted our offer notwithstanding.
What time will you get to the station?
Let's not go over that again.
I see.
Could you clarify the meaning of your sentence for me?
Nobody can save me.
It seems impossible that you're that old.
Tom is a bit drunk.
I have no idea what he's talking about.
I have no idea what he's talking about.
You won't believe what happened to me today.
I shouldn't have left you alone.
I shouldn't have left you alone.
I shouldn't have left you alone.
I shouldn't have left you alone.
I shouldn't have left you alone.
I'm not sure that Tom recognized me.
You remind me of my daughter.
You remind me of my daughter.
You remind me of my son.
You remind me of my son.
Please don't get up.
Please don't get up.
I have a rash on my neck.
He found himself in a tight spot.
Other companies will present their offers as well.
The bus is coming.
I know the girl you were talking to yesterday.
I know the girl you were talking to yesterday.
That's not the best example.
I have no idea where she is now.
I have no idea where he is now.
Are we free on Friday afternoon?
The man was acting strangely.
The older children helped the younger ones.
Experience is not what happens to you; it's what you do with what happens to you.
I had to see someone on business.
I had to see someone on business.
I wrote a letter to my teacher.
I called him up, but he wasn't there.
I met him by chance.
I don't want to go back alone.
It is a student's business to study.
They got into the train.
I think you're going to like it.
I'm almost finished reading this book.
You're as tall as I am.
You're as tall as I am.
I can't believe everything Tom says.
It's a bird.
Where's my shirt?
Where is my suitcase?
Where's the hospital?
Where's your daughter?
Where's your daughter?
Where's your gun?
Who authorized this?
Who built this?
Who called them?
Who called them?
Who called them?
Who called you?
Who called you?
Who called you?
Who called you?
Who called you?
Who called you?
I'm accustomed to this.
I'm not used to that.
I'm unaccustomed to this.
I'm unaccustomed to this.
I'm accustomed to this.
I'm accustomed to this.
Who's getting married?
When did he go?
At what time did he leave?
Read it to me.
Read it to me.
Read it to me.
Read it to me.
Allow me to introduce Mr Kato to you.
Tom and Mary often help each other.
I'm going to the bank.
Tom looks older.
As far as I am concerned, I don't think that's true.
Why aren't you dressed?
Why aren't you dressed?
Why aren't you dressed?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Get real.
Sit here.
Who fell?
I'm sure you're quite busy.
Tom has just started learning to read.
I could order you to stay.
Tom isn't going to like it.
Stop changing the subject.
Do you really think I'm stupid enough to believe that?
Tom did not want to wait.
All of us are happy.
Am I disturbing you?
Ann came downstairs.
Are you still happy?
Did Tom forgive you?
Do you like running?
Doesn't anyone care?
I'm mean.
My neck hurts.
Don't pay attention to her.
Here's to a long and happy life!
Doesn't it seem to you that German is a very difficult language? - "Yes, I think it is very difficult."
Don't get too near.
Don't go in my room.
Don't leave me, Tom.
Don't let Tom do that.
Don't take too long.
I am a teacher, not a student.
Get everyone inside.
Have you called Tom?
Hold your positions.
I almost called Tom.
I brought you lunch.
I can give it a try.
Back off.
Back off.
Read this.
Give it a shot.
Nice shot!
Be calm.
Be calm.
Be calm.
Come back.
Come back.
Be content.
Be content.
Be content.
Be serious.
Be serious.
Be serious.
Be serious.
Be serious.
I can't go anywhere.
I can't ignore that.
I can't permit this.
We're finished.
I leave that to you.
I leave that to you.
That's a hard question.
Everyone dreams.
Don't call anybody.
Don't call anybody.
Don't call anybody.
I don't have the key.
He talked about music.
I don't have any pens.
I don't have any pens.
I grew up around here.
I grew up around here.
I recognized the name.
Remain seated, please.
Remain seated, please.
This doesn't look good.
You have not changed at all.
You have not changed at all.
Tom won't believe it.
Tom won't believe it.
Tom won't believe us.
Tom would be pleased.
He sometimes loses hope.
I made a fool of myself.
I'm sorry, Tom, I've got to go.
My mother gets up early.
You or I will be chosen.
You or I will be chosen.
He walked in front of me.
Tom slept on the train.
You can't believe that.
You can't believe that.
I want coffee with milk.
I refused to believe it.
I'll come to your place.
I'll come to your place.
I want you to call Tom.
He ignored her advice.
You must make your parents happy.
I could lose my job.
I did something bad.
I didn't believe it.
I got you a present.
I guess I was lucky.
I think with my eyes and ears, my hands and feet and my mouth and nose.
She is at church right now.
I have a confession.
I heard Tom come in.
I hope Tom's right.
I hope Tom likes me.
I hope Tom says yes.
I hope it's not Tom.
I hope that happens.
I hope they like me.
I hope you can help.
I hope you got that.
I hope you like Tom.
I hope you're lucky.
Your idea differs entirely from mine.
I just want to talk.
I know you're happy.
I like your costume.
I loved high school.
I made a phone call.
I met him on the day I arrived here.
I don't see the point.
I require your advice.
There is no security on this earth; there is only opportunity.
I meant to call Tom.
I see you are awake.
I see you are awake.
I should've checked.
I sleep in the nude.
I suggest you leave.
You are not a student.
I want my desk back.
I want to go to bed.
I want to marry you.
I won't be a second.
You're always singing.
I'm not sure I'd want to live here.
Who got married?
We don't need a ladder.
Did you like that?
Oh, you'll get used to it soon!
Look back.
Keep this.
I'm going to quit smoking.
I hope everything's all right.
Get the book.
Would you like a taste?
Does it work?
Do I look normal?
Did Tom fall?
Come out now.
Can you wait?
Can you wait?
Can Tom sing?
May I try it?
That's absolutely correct.
Are you free?
Why is everybody crying?
I can't sell you that.
I can't sell you that.
I'm not over thirty years old.
You're needed at once.
Prices seem to be going down.
I regret saying that.
I regret saying that.
You are not a student.
It's an easy victory.
Let's meet on Sunday.
He sat in front of me.
I only have one suggestion.
I was singing.
I was singing.
I can't believe Tom left without saying goodbye.
You were busy last week.
My grandfather was a soldier in the war.
I only hope it is not too late.
Would you like to hear the new song I'm working on?
We've recently put a new roof on our house.
That was a new experience for me.
There's no new information yet.
After dinner, I did my homework.
The keys are on the table.
The year the war ended, I was born.
She is wearing a blue dress.
That's his opinion.
This is the coldest winter that we have had in thirty years.
You'll have to wait and see.
I'm not sure I can help you.
I'm not sure I can help you.
I can help you stop smoking.
I can help you stop smoking.
I hope Tom can help us.
Tom never married.
Who discovered the island?
I hope Tom knows what he's doing.
I had to get away from here.
I feel safe with you.
It's important that he hears this.
I'm absolutely sure.
I'm pretty sure.
I'm fully recovered.
I'm getting curious.
I'm going to scream.
I'm going to change.
I am in a bad mood.
Ask her to call me.
Ask them to call me.
I'm perfectly happy.
I'm sure Tom dreams.
I don't like loose ends.
I'm totally serious.
Tom tried to stay calm.
I eat here all the time.
Tom died at the age of 97.
I've already called.
I've already chosen.
I've been preparing.
I've been to church.
Tom was killed in the battle.
Tom died at the age of thirty.
Tom died two years ago in a plane crash.
Tom died happy.
I hear you very well.
You're not poor.
You're not poor.
You're not poor.
You're not poor.
You're not poor.
Isn't that possible?
It might rain today.
It'll cause trouble.
It was no one's fault.
It's non-refundable.
Are you sure you don't want to come?
Are you sure you don't want to come?
I want something hot to drink.
Tom can come and pick it up today.
It's quite pleasant.
It's that important.
All the schools are closed on that holiday.
He leveled his gun at me.
I have a sharp pain here.
I want the address.
The principal came in after the teacher.
I'm too sleepy to do my homework.
It looks like you've been crying.
It looks like you've been crying.
It looks like you've been crying.
My pen has run out of ink.
Come and see me any time you like.
I want to stay in bed all day and just watch TV.
He has blue eyes and blond hair.
I'm looking for a small suitcase.
Nothing bothers Tom.
Now watch carefully.
I'll be back after lunch.
I am rich.
I am rich.
I'm calling to thank you.
I'm calling to thank you.
I decided to study abroad.
If I knew her address, I would write to her.
I read a lot of magazines.
I read a lot of magazines.
I require your assistance.
I require your assistance.
I suppose you have a plan.
I suppose you have a plan.
What's your favorite holiday?
Both he and I were members of that club.
Is that a new dress?
Is that a new shirt?
It looks almost new.
It looks almost new.
It looks almost new.
Are you the new teacher?
Tom lost his new watch.
We need some new ideas.
We need some new ideas.
Are you the new secretary?
Are you the new secretary?
Tom showed me his new car.
We're under new management.
Let's come up with a new plan.
Tom didn't like the new plan.
You're new around here, aren't you?
At the meeting, we came up with a lot of new ideas.
Hold the line.
I have a much more serious problem.
Tom called her again.
I wouldn't be so sure about that.
Did Tom forgive you for what you did last week?
That sounds awesome.
This was unexpected.
He is poor.
I have a granddaughter about your age.
It's very strange.
That's what matters.
That's what's important.
That's what's weird.
The house is vacant.
There used to be a bank here, but it closed down a couple of years ago.
Are you a Japanese citizen?
It was Sunday, and shops were closed.
Don't walk out on me again.
Don't walk out on me again.
I have never been good at French.
I lost track of the time.
My younger sister is very good at singing.
She sings very well.
He sings very well.
You cannot be serious!
You cannot be serious!
I'll demonstrate.
She gave him something cold to drink.
I got this in the bag.
The car looked as good as new.
Are you allowed to go?
Are you allowed to go?
I felt a drop of rain.
I felt a drop of rain.
It's such a long time since he left school.
I don't understand and I'm not used to not understanding. Please explain it once more.
I was one of the best students in the class.
Are you through with the newspaper?
Tom wants to marry me.
Tom was anxious to meet you.
Tom left his bed unmade.
I never thought he was all that stubborn.
Tom almost died trying to save me.
There's no way to save everybody.
I've saved you a seat next to me.
I've saved you a seat next to me.
Nothing can save them now.
Are you pleased with the results?
You should take my advice.
You should take my advice.
You should take my advice.
You should take my advice.
They met with the Minister of Foreign Affairs yesterday.
I had a good teacher.
He decided to seek information elsewhere.
He added that he didn't believe it.
I figured you might know why Tom left early.
Don't tell me to calm down.
Don't tell me to calm down.
Don't tell me to calm down.
Don't tell me to calm down.
It is odd that he is so late.
It is odd that he is so late.
I have a right to be happy.
I have a right to be happy.
She turned around suddenly.
She turned around suddenly.
They watched me in silence.
They watched me in silence.
Tom got remarried recently.
Therapy didn't work.
Russia lost 20 million people during World War II.
When I returned home, my brother was doing his homework.
When I returned home, my brother was doing his homework.
We sang songs in chorus.
I hate winter.
This is so bizarre.
There's always hope.
Why don't you try this one?
We have much rain in summer but on the other hand we have little rain in winter.
Can we stop wasting time?
Come on, you're wasting time.
There isn't a second to waste.
We've already wasted enough time.
Look, we're wasting time.
Choose whichever you want.
He's now a college student.
Statistics show that the population of the world is increasing.
They are in the way.
The road follows the river.
Do as you please. It's up to you.
I want my key back.
I want my key back.
This crowd reminds me of the streets of Tokyo.
He's now a college student.
Look! The car is on fire!
I thought you'd like it.
I thought you'd like it.
May I sleep on the couch?
May I sleep on the couch?
My son would never do that.
I know we're a little early.
I know better than to do such a thing.
At least you have options.
I know better than to do such a thing.
Tom just sat there with his eyes closed.
Tom won't eat anything I cook for him.
I was dog tired when I got home last night.
I'll help you up.
He's shorter than his father.
Is Tom on the boat?
The milk froze and became solid.
What time does your first class start?
That is why all the students in the class agreed with him.
Last night, we looked at the stars from the rooftop.
Last night, we looked at the stars from the rooftop.
I invited my friends to dinner.
When we started out in the summer of 2010, there were only three of us in the band.
This is never going to end.
I brought my son with me.
I brought my son with me.
I brought my son with me.
You may smoke in that room, but you mustn't smoke in this room.
You may smoke in that room, but you mustn't smoke in this room.
I spent the whole evening trying to find my keys.
He never fails to call his mother on her birthday.
I don't want to hear any more of your stupid jokes.
I was conscripted into the army.
I'll come back for my suitcases this afternoon.
I will be busy tomorrow.
He is as busy as ever.
Do you think I'd be stupid enough to come here without a weapon?
Japan is very different from what it was fifty years ago.
Tom did something very stupid.
I feel happy.
I feel happy.
He goes with his mother to Russia every year.
What little free time he had was spent with the family.
She arrived home two and a half days later.
We're closed.
The soup's too hot, I can't eat it.
I can't eat meat.
Where can I get a ticket?
I don't see the relevance.
I left as soon as I could.
I need to talk to someone.
This is the only road to the next town.
I need to talk to someone.
He admitted that he was guilty.
She called him every other day.
Please take a seat and wait.
I'm not about to marry Suzie.
Tom seems to have lost his key.
Amy made an effort to stand up.
I'm faithful to my wife.
The reason for this is plain.
Don't be in such a hurry.
Don't be in such a hurry.
At what time did you hear the gunshot?
He is right who is happy.
They're almost done.
They're coming back.
You're such an idiot!
Are you stupid or what?
What the hell is going on here?
What the hell is going on here?
In God's name, what's going on here?
Most English words are unknown to most English speakers.
I like things done properly.
You've done your homework.
You've done your homework.
Where do you get your ideas from?
You can come visit me whenever you like.
Only a few students understood the matter.
My grandmother is very old.
I enjoy talking with you.
I enjoy talking with you.
The stream is not very swift.
They held hands.
He looked well.
I looked into the next room.
I heard screams.
Try this.
Are you up?
They'll like that.
Just don't stop.
I've seen worse.
Choose one.
Choose one.
Choose one.
Choose one.
Choose one.
Choose one.
I like to dream.
Let's get it over with.
Wake up.
Wake up.
Tom is beginning to lose his hearing.
You'll like Tom.
You'll like Tom.
We're too close.
We have checked.
Take a break.
Take a break.
We'll wait here.
It's all wet.
It's all wet.
I'll read it.
I'm safe now.
Is that fair?
Now I'm sure.
Now I'm sure.
The very last words she wrote were: "My heart is on fire."
Trolling is a art.
Trolling is a art.
You never know for sure.
The animals are treated well.
They screamed.
He heard a noise from the kitchen.
I have nothing else to give you.
I have nothing else to give you.
I suppose you want to go home.
Where did you first meet her?
I have the house all to myself.
You've failed.
You've failed.
I want to talk.
Is it that bad?
I lost everything I had.
I lost everything I had.
I have no reason to lie to you.
I have no reason to lie to you.
I expected this.
Today is my best friend's birthday.
Today is my best friend's birthday.
How you've grown!
Tom lies.
A fork fell off the table.
I read your book.
It must be nice to have friends in high places.
I'm going to sing.
If Kyosuke comes to visit, tell him I'm not in. I don't want to see him anymore.
We're a little busy right now.
Tom neither smokes nor drinks.
Tom doesn't smoke anymore.
Tom doesn't smoke anymore.
Right?
Watch closely.
Stay back.
The village is connected with our town by a bridge.
I hope the bus comes soon.
Look at that photo.
Look at this photo.
Look at the picture.
Look at the picture.
Memories of childhood still lie near her heart.
We are tired of being treated like children.
If you're not busy, could you please help me?
If you had helped me, I could have accomplished the work.
You can't do this to us.
You can't do this to us.
This is a love song.
How many horses are there in Sweden?
She allowed him to go alone.
I've met you before.
I've met you before.
Every man can't be an artist.
Every man can't be an artist.
Almost all German universities are public.
Almost all German universities are public.
The rich have many friends.
Tom had absolutely nothing to do with it.
Tom had absolutely nothing to do with it.
Love is stupid.
There was a church here once.
I set out early so as to catch the first train.
Products with GMO are dangerous to human life.
Tom was very happy.
Tom was very happy.
I'll take a look.
You told Tom not to talk to me, didn't you?
He runs well for his age.
I wish to speak to you.
I wish to speak to you.
Who took this picture?
I'll call them.
They are as different as day and night.
She was in a great hurry.
Illness made him give up his studies.
Illness made him give up his studies.
Do you want to drink coffee?
Is that a bird?
Don't move!
May I ask you for your name and address?
We will add new names to our list.
I'm getting married next Sunday.
You've saved all our lives.
She laid herself on the grass.
I've already watched this film on the telly.
I've already watched this film on the telly.
That is why I am angry with him.
I'm calling security.
I'm angry.
I thought it was a good idea.
Look out! There's a hole in the road.
I walk in the forest every day.
When will Earth meet its end?
Don't try that at home.
You may as well wait here.
You may as well wait here.
I don't need advice from anyone.
Tom's got nothing to lose.
Mike is waiting downstairs.
She told him once and for all that she would not go to the movies with him.
No ship is unsinkable.
This material is cheaper.
Kayak is an example of a palindrome.
If you don't stop, I'll tell mom.
Do you have a light beer?
Promise me you won't go.
Tom overheard our conversation.
Tom said that he wasn't ready to get married.
He rolled up his shirt sleeves.
What's your favorite non-electrical gadget?
May I invite you to dinner?
Don't laugh at her mistake.
Success depends mostly on effort.
Trying on the suit, Dima found it to be too big.
Everybody makes mistakes, don't they?
Enter the room at once.
Enter the room at once.
We must carry out the plan at once.
Please finish the work at once.
We sang for her.
He was tired, so he went to bed early.
My son believes in Santa Claus.
The street is wet.
The birds are red.
We have a white cat.
The glass is empty.
Ken must run fast.
That is the poet I met in Paris.
That is the poet I met in Paris.
The woman stopped and looked at him.
The teacher let him go home.
Melanie is studying right now.
It looked too simple.
Our class consists of fifty boys.
Odd, isn't it? We should have already arrived.
Get out here, fast!
There were many students in the room.
I'm the only one with a key to this room.
Up to my ears in debt.
She's their only daughter.
Tom was seated at the table wrapping presents.
How much was it?
You're not going to believe me.
We're back to square one.
We are very drunk.
I can't believe he's dead!
Whose camera is this?
Whose camera is this?
I'm seeing her this evening.
I speak seriously.
I tried to pretend that I didn't care.
Have you read the whole paper from beginning to end?
What is the planet called you live on?
What is the planet called you live on?
Which color do you prefer, blue or green?
He's on the train.
Tom took a picture.
Tatoeba: Better to make no sense than no sentence!
My dad is busy.
Can you spell it?
Most people think that people shouldn't eat people.
I asked him if he knew her address.
Is Tom about to sing?
I don't want to get married too early.
I can't put up with this cold.
Why are you singing?
You have a poor memory!
Ah, the coffee is really hot!
Three of my children died.
I called you three hours ago.
I barely managed to catch the train.
I barely made the train.
I lost my glasses.
I lost my glasses.
We've already lost three days.
What do you suggest we do?
What do you suggest we do?
I'm not going out because I have to do my homework.
I don't understand Dutch, because it's difficult.
This won't end well.
It's as clear as mud.
We need to try everything.
The problem is not that they do not talk about me, the problem is that they do not talk WITH me.
The cats are safe.
She's rich.
The children are safe.
She will join us later.
Do we have classes this Friday?
We love art.
His elder son is studying at college.
What a team!
School begins in the spring.
Where do babies come from?
At least, we finished the first part.
The grass was soft.
Listen, we've got to talk.
Listen, we've got to talk.
Tom is acting strange.
The boy went to bed with his socks on.
The girl was heard to sing a song.
We'll have to come back.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
I said that I didn't go shopping with her.
He did everything to become happy.
He did everything to become happy.
The woman they were due to call has left.
Is Ken busy? "Yes, he is."
He even wrote me poems.
He described his own experience.
It's a nice victory, but it's not over yet.
Would you like to come in?
The prices are going up higher and higher.
It is not as good as it looks.
The baby seemed to be in a deep sleep.
We can wait.
Tom won't believe a word you tell him.
You can choose whatever you like.
Tom is busy again.
Over ten percent of them can do the work.
Do you want something else?
The TV's on.
Here's my address.
Learning languages is interesting.
Tom told a joke.
Did you plant this yourself?
Did you plant this yourself?
Did you plant this yourself?
I like walking in the woods.
Tom started to unbutton his shirt.
Mary wants to become famous.
Do you like looking at yourself in the mirror?
Do you like looking at yourself in the mirror?
He would give you the shirt off his back.
He would give you the shirt off his back.
He would give you the shirt off his back.
He would give you the shirt off his back.
Was the movie interesting?
I hope Tom remembers us.
Tom doesn't think that's a good idea.
I think this is perfect.
He's certain to succeed.
It is too difficult to choose.
You're pretty rich, aren't you?
Oh, there you go. See? It happened exactly like I said it would. Now go call the ambulance.
This is the first time I've ever fallen down the stairs.
That is an internal affair of this country.
You don't want to pay more than you have to, right?
Tom looked old.
He read English Literature at Oxford University.
You're probably wondering who I am.
I go to Hiroshima three times a month.
Did you get the flowers that I sent you?
How is the first song called?
I'd like a seat over a wing.
Show me your homework.
Where are the glasses?
We finally found the key.
Tom rolled down the window.
She wants to meet him again.
This change will make your plan more interesting.
We have a real problem here.
It was very foggy.
This winter is warm.
She held out her hand.
She held out her hand.
I think we have a lot to talk about.
I can't believe Tom's getting married again.
I can't believe Tom's getting married again.
It is not my business.
This gift is for my friend.
Tom wants to become famous.
I wasted away to skin and bone.
I wasted away to skin and bone.
Being a family is much deeper than this.
Mathematics is Albert's favorite subject.
Tom shouted, "There's a fire!"
Would you please repeat what you just said?
Tom looks so happy.
Tom asked for something cold to drink.
He tried, and he did it.
I lost my bongos there.
Tom refused to listen.
Tom remembered where he put his keys.
Give me an example. I don't understand.
Please write down your name, address, and phone number here.
I'm losing my powers.
You're not serious.
You're not serious.
You're not serious.
I run, run, and run.
I need the keys.
Happiness is good health and a poor memory.
The smell of this flower calls up my childhood.
We live on planet Earth.
Hardly anybody's happy today.
Look at the woman over there!
She was raised in a wealthy family.
Today is the first day of spring.
Not a soul was to be seen in the village.
Your wife called.
Well, have you decided?
Black smoke came out of the chimney.
You'll be happy again.
You'll be happy again.
You'll be happy again.
You'll be happy again.
This train stops at every station.
I know the real reason you don't want go.
You're interesting.
You're interesting.
This was happening every winter.
The three richest people in the world control more wealth than the poorest 48 nations.
I offered Tom a gift.
We appointed him as our representative.
I'm not sure yet.
We should all be afraid.
Tom disappeared into the night.
I went to the university only to see my former French teacher again.
May I take a pen?
Tom wanted to be a teacher.
Tom asked me how tall I was.
I've heard that sound before.
Try your phone.
Don't you think that's significant?
I know how to use this.
Tom wants to speak to you.
It is important to understand that each country has its own culture.
I cook, but I don't do that with much pleasure.
He didn't want to be sent to Japan.
None of the programs look interesting to me.
Tom looks just like me.
It took me three hours to do my homework.
I had some work that needed to be finished.
They made me captain.
She spoke to the children in a gentle voice.
Tom looks OK.
They are the only people who know the fact.
How fast you run!
If you want to be happy, be it.
I thought you'd want to know.
I can't believe they slept together!
He isn't happy at all.
What's important is work.
I can't stand this cold.
This book belongs to you. It is not mine.
I have a desire to go to England.
Why is it impossible?
Couldn't Tom have been lying?
iPhones have capacitive touchscreens.
And what about a coffee?
Tom went straight to bed.
We were in the first year of middle school last year.
I got home, took my shoes off and went to bed.
We'll talk about it in a few days.
I'll do my homework.
Listen to me carefully, and you will understand what I really mean.
I was unaware of the problem.
Tom denied the rumor.
He is rich enough to buy a foreign car.
He set out for Paris last month.
There must be a way.
In a court of justice women are more often found guilty of perjury than men.
Tom just got out of jail.
Did Tom call while I was out?
We'll get in trouble if we get caught.
And is your noise Gaussian?
The dollar exchange rate has increased dramatically.
I like that dress better than this one.
I wonder whether man could live with only two hours' sleep a night.
I want a knife.
Tom wants to wait.
This train stops at all stations.
Do you wanna talk?
Can you translate this song for me?
A woman fell from a ship into the sea.
It's such a beautiful flower.
They're not talking.
My team has never advanced beyond the quarter-finals.
This is not a pipe.
I wasn't happy.
You can't use this.
You can't use this.
You should read this.
You should read this.
You wait and see.
I heard Tom talking on the phone.
You came in late.
I wanted to do the right thing.
You can't sell it.
That's what saved me.
I shouldn't have called.
I shouldn't have called.
I found this in your desk drawer.
I found this in your desk drawer.
They've forgiven me.
We lost sight of the man in the crowd.
They made me go there.
This horse is not white.
I love winter.
If they could eat every night in a restaurant, they would. They hate cooking.
I am a member of the firm.
Augustus is my most beloved son.
Do you want to save them?
We're inside.
How high is that mountain?
How high is this mountain?
We're poor.
We're wealthy.
We're safe now.
Tom is in a foul mood today.
Tom often sings in the shower.
Tom never dates older women.
I don't want to hear about all your ex-girlfriends.
Our baseball team is very strong.
Tom would like that.
They're not going to stop.
Are you helping Tom?
Are you helping Tom?
I wish you success.
Please don't cry.
He wants to marry me.
I only read the first three chapters.
Do you think I'm lying?
Long live the Soviet Union!
What's your horse's name?
My father neither smokes nor drinks.
He looks older than my brother.
We live in a society; not just in an economy.
Don't put that in the bag.
The church is in the middle of the village.
The police have caught him.
What's the horse's name?
What's the horse's name?
Not this shirt, the other one.
The coffee was too hot for me to drink.
I know you're not that stupid.
Tom wants to speak to you at 2:30.
Tom wants to speak to you at 2:30.
I came to save you.
I came to save you.
I came to save you.
I came to save you.
Why was I so stupid?
Tom grew up with me.
Why was I so stupid?
You may not remember me, but we met last summer.
We seek happiness.
This city is famous for its beautiful park.
This city is famous for its beautiful park.
You've made a mistake.
You've got sharp eyes.
Tom just told me that he doesn't plan to take French next year.
This is a picture of my mother.
You're rich.
Tom also speaks French.
Tom had a very important decision to make.
Tom sang off key.
Ajay is poor.
How often do you eat fish?
Jesus hates you.
Jesus hates you.
You've lost some blood.
Are you going to wait for me?
Do you know how to use it?
Do you know how to use it?
You've got two choices.
You have two options.
You have two options.
You've got two choices.
Tom probably should go home now.
Can you call him?
I bet you a dollar Tom doesn't show up.
It's up to you to decide the matter.
Which is your favorite team?
Tom bought a camera at a store not too far from here.
Look, there's a cat in the kitchen.
Grandpa always said there'd be days like this.
It's gradually getting colder.
It's gradually getting colder.
I can't find it. Are you sure it's here?
I can't find it. Are you sure it's here?
I can't find it. Are you sure it's here?
It's not a new idea.
I like flowers.
Japan is at peace with her neighbors.
Bush doesn't want to test new weapons.
They are of average height.
It doesn't have any significance.
Are you here for the first time? "No, I was here last year."
We're invited too.
I'm sure Tom won't be willing to pay that much.
We've got a lot to talk about.
Do you really expect me to give you money?
Are we all happy?
Smiles do not always indicate pleasure.
Are you famous?
The dog is red.
She was forced to confess.
Do you think it's important?
Do you want to get out of here?
Why aren't you helping us?
Why aren't you helping us?
The more books you read, the more you'll know.
You look afraid.
You look afraid.
There were hundreds of birds on the lake.
This book isn't interesting at all.
He died at a very old age.
Don't meddle in other people's affairs.
Tom knows I've been shot.
You will not believe your eyes.
Tom is smoking his pipe.
I know it's not impossible.
He raised his eyebrows.
It's a vicious cycle.
Tom admitted it was a stupid idea.
Tom was in a hurry so he left his bed unmade.
It doesn't hurt at all.
Animals cannot distinguish right from wrong.
You'll get used to the weather.
This is a problem you have to solve by yourself.
This is a problem you have to solve by yourself.
Do you own a pet?
He was operated on yesterday.
Could you translate this sentence into English?
She had a strange look on her face.
They slept under the stars.
The earth is one of the planets.
Someone called.
I like short poems.
These items are rather hard to obtain.
I'm not drunk.
The water there was so deep that I could not touch bottom.
I don't like riding the subway.
You've lost a lot of blood.
If I had time, I would go to the movies.
My hair is wet.
Dick had been dependent on his parents, but now he's independent of them.
She is a pleasant person.
Tom ran toward the house.
Tom suggested that Ann should sell the house.
Tom doesn't use steroids.
I suggested to my father that Kumiko study in China.
Seriously, many of them are not readable.
They do anything in order to win.
The worst thing about summer is the heat.
I really will have to study.
Keep in mind that you must die.
The high building can be seen from the window.
Please repeat the last three words.
I'm sure Tom will like this wine.
A rumor circulated through the city.
Turn at that corner there.
He smoked as if nothing had happened.
Who's your favorite song writer?
This city is hard to live in.
I wrote a song about Tatoeba.
When was this novel published?
Earth is a planet.
Earth, it is a planet, and not a planetoid.
You can go there in a boat.
Everyone in the church joined hands.
He has a deep voice.
When is the first day of spring?
She allowed me to leave.
Human beings are different from animals in that they can think and speak.
He got out his pen.
He got out his pen.
I hope there's still some bread left.
No one's in the bath.
City life suits me very well.
I hear someone singing.
Today is a national holiday in Iceland.
They sat in the shade of a tree.
Are you famous?
We went out in spite of the rain.
I often wrote to her when I was a student.
You know that's not possible.
A dog's sense of smell is much keener than a human's.
I live with my roommate.
I love to be in nature.
What made you decide to come here now?
You're running a fever.
I was a member of the soccer club when I was in junior high.
Take a look around.
I'm still not certain.
It's still very early.
We're always busy.
Show me her picture.
Let me open it by myself.
His car has no wheels.
Damn, where did I put my glasses?
Damn, where did I put my glasses?
Your uncle took these pictures, didn't he?
What's your favorite time of day?
I'm still not sure.
That explains everything.
I didn't expect to become this sort of adult...
I didn't expect to become this sort of adult...
Dang! I've lost my job!
We bought bread and milk.
I wanted to read them.
True, he was a very good teacher.
Send them to me.
Tom likes to look at pictures of cats.
I never leave my house unlocked.
Why do you need a new ladder?
She was crying in her room.
I'd like to drink some tea or coffee.
Is he seriously ill? "I hope not."
We're sure you'll be fine.
We are all naked underneath our clothes.
Where's your suitcase?
Songs and poems were written about him.
What do you think of modern art?
I caught three fish today.
Check it out.
I'm not jumpy.
Let’s join hands, friends!
He walks in the park every morning.
He was dressed in black.
The man claimed he didn't take the money.
Tom claimed that he came from a rich family.
Your car's ready.
The Earth is a planet, not a star.
He gave me back the money.
She rejected the money.
I study at the University of Hyogo.
It was the biggest mistake of my life.
The people are angry.
Because you smell bad, that's why.
I've already read that novel.
We don't have that long.
We're busy right now.
I have a daughter who's 13 years old.
I'm so happy for you both.
Quitting smoking is hard.
It's hard to stop smoking.
Most people think that quitting smoking is hard to do.
We had a mild winter last year.
Your pen is bad.
This suit is too good for me.
There are no classes in August.
She caught hold of my arm so she wouldn't fall.
The new designs are much better than the old ones.
He always speaks to me when he meets me on the street.
I'm almost certain that we have enough water.
The bar is closed.
Just let me finish.
Suicide is dangerous.
I could be there by 2:30.
I go shopping almost every day.
Tom is kind of standoffish.
I study abroad.
I'll treat you like an adult when you start acting like one.
Would you like to go shopping with me?
I don't have the strength to keep trying.
Wait in the waiting room.
You must not come in.
Are you meeting someone here?
There are thirty names on the list.
Tom told me that he was very busy.
Green leaves in a park are pleasing to the eye.
Tom is already inside.
Who phoned?
We have plans.
I don't want to have kids, but I want to get married.
You can't wear that. "Why not?"
You can't wear that.
Return the money to him at once.
The other students laughed.
The other students laughed.
If anyone calls for me, tell them I'm not here.
I could hear them laugh in the background.
I think I can learn from my mistakes.
I don't want to get married, but I want to have kids.
I knew that he was an artist, but I didn't know that he was good.
The best mirror is an old friend.
You did your best.
What kind of changes do you want us to make?
Does this thing actually work?
Is this a joke? "Of course it's a joke!"
That would be weird.
I'll never forgive you as long as I live.
We've just had our coldest August morning for twenty years.
Call Tom, but don't tell him what happened.
Women are often judged by their looks.
Tom slipped the money in his pocket.
What are you lining up for?
We have to call Tom.
My cat is sleeping on my bed.
You should stop. "I don't want to stop."
You closed your eyes.
He works in the university.
I don't feel like drinking today. "Come on, it's my birthday!"
Will we be safe here?
Will we be safe here?
Can you believe it? We're in France!
Can you believe it? We're in China!
Can you believe it? We're in Europe!
Can you believe it? We're in Japan!
Can you believe it? We’re in Cheboksary!
Is Tom famous?
Our country desires only peace.
May we speak with you?
The army is continuing its antiterrorist operation.
Why am I shooting these guys, tell me, what have they done?
I wasn't lucky.
It's not going to change.
How many rooms are there on the second floor of your house?
They both started laughing.
My tears are cold.
Tom was sitting in the dark.
You're sitting in my chair.
You're sitting in my chair.
We both know Tom isn't happy here.
You guys wait here.
If I were young, I would go abroad.
Yokohama is a city where more than three million people live.
I like your mirror.
I like your mirror.
I like your mirror.
Let's hope for the latter.
I am your only ticket out of here.
Do not go near them.
Are you not a teacher?
Tom is much taller than you.
Tom is much taller than you.
Tom said I smoked too much.
Tom will catch us.
She wasn't helping her mother.
Tom was crying last night.
Tom was really drunk last night.
Did you find any interesting information?
I would never have guessed that you could buy butter for such a low price.
Did you find any interesting information?
Tom can't give up now.
He became very dangerous.
He became very dangerous.
Tom is at church right now.
She decided to study abroad.
Tom is in the hospital now.
My father has been dead for ten years.
Please read this book.
Where there's smoke there's fire.
Tom went to the hospital.
The information is very important to us.
We've got a very serious problem.
You've made a big mistake.
Marika translated my book into German.
Tom didn't get the joke.
Please make the bed.
Tom gave me your address.
She was tall enough to touch the ceiling.
Mom’s goal was to graduate college but dad’s goal was mom.
Tom is not a happy person.
Tom isn't sure.
I know Tom isn't busy.
I want a hot shower before I go back to work.
Whose glass is this?
Just looking for someone to talk to.
I'm grown-up.
I'm an adult.
Where is Tom? "I don't know. Maybe he's dead."
Don't talk to the driver.
His daughter has grown out of all her old clothes.
The boy has grown out of all his old clothes.
I work at my friend's shop.
We must not lose hope.
You had a week to finish this.
Don't let us stop you.
Don't let us stop you.
The population of Japan is much larger than that of Australia.
I was the first to begin speaking.
Welcome to my life.
We already talked.
We already talked.
At work it’s like a holiday.
We all desire success.
He said that he was going home the following day.
I'm a wealthy man.
The poor are getting poorer.
The rich are getting richer.
We had a good time in the open air.
He never takes the train.
What does your aunt do?
He never takes the train.
It happend completely by accident.
Is Esperanto a joke, or a serious option?
There are a few shops next to my house.
You may not like what you discover.
What is more beautiful than the smile of a child?
Tom seems very scared.
May I escort you home?
I want to spend all my time with you.
Bring me the magazines.
Bring me the magazines.
I would like to read some books about Lincoln.
I sold the books.
We have a small table in the kitchen.
You told me that you were 30-years-old, and I believed you.
Were you expecting something different to happen?
Were you expecting something different to happen?
I usually wear a white shirt.
What mistake was that?
Tom was John's roommate.
She wondered how his lips would taste.
It is the photo of my new house.
It's a living being, so of course it shits.
When a woman is murdered, the husband or boyfriend is always the number one suspect.
You have a way with women.
You have a way with women.
Mankind must put an end to war, or otherwise war will put an end to mankind.
I don't want to lose you again.
It is a cat.
You always said you wanted to become a scientist. Why didn't you?
It's the fastest railroad in the world.
Tom looked under the car.
He is a Hongkonger.
Could you please tell me how tall you are and how much you weigh?
I told Tom to wait for me.
What a great idea!
The total bill for drinks came up to 7000 dollars.
Those are mine.
Did he have Parkinson's disease?
I did everything Tom told me to do.
I grew up in the mountains.
I grew up in the mountains.
London is famous for its fog.
London is famous for its fog.
What is he famous for?
I go to the movies once a month.
I don't know what that animal is called.
She sang better than him.
I love this sentence.
They'll try again.
I have to at least try.
I'm not healthy.
He knows how to use this weapon.
The jail is overcrowded.
He has been dead for ten years.
There is a map on the table.
I have been busy this week.
People should do their best.
Ten years have passed since he went to America.
Ten years have passed since he went to America.
Get in line.
Get in line.
You may choose whichever book you like.
You know that I love you so much, don't you?
Now get in.
Now get in.
I'm used to sleeping in a tent.
He likes smoking in the toilet.
Tom is waiting inside.
The teacher said that the earth is round.
I promised not to tell.
The teacher read the book.
My homework took longer than I expected.
What do you think of her poem?
It's obvious that she's sick.
Tom has changed a lot.
Does Tom cry a lot?
Tom is a lot smarter than I am.
This is the same type of car as my father has.
What does Tom eat when he's watching TV?
You should see the film.
If I weren't poor, I'd buy that car.
If I weren't poor, I'd buy that car.
I would buy the car, but I am poor.
I would buy the car, but I am poor.
Why didn't you get married?
Why are they not doing their homework?
When's dinner?
I don't want Tom to get into trouble.
Tom stabbed her.
In fact, he is sick.
You didn't tell a joke.
She crossed the street.
Tom likes reading English literature.
Please wait ten minutes.
Please wait ten minutes.
I want to drink tea.
Are you serious?
I love this photo.
You'll get used to it one day.
You must do what seems right to you.
They all watched.
You got here fast.
You got here early.
You should try it.
You should try it.
You made me do it.
You made me do it.
You look healthy.
You look healthy.
I know your secret.
They are taking a walk.
He used to go to the museum on Sunday.
Who else is on that list?
I like trains better than buses.
He didn't want to talk about it anymore.
You owe me three hundred dollars.
Do you like to look at yourself in the mirror?
Thank you so much for inviting me.
I have been working here for ten years.
You may be right about that.
I think you're sitting in my seat.
I think you're sitting in my seat.
We'll attempt to start the class soon.
Tom wasn't thirsty.
Try not to look so nervous.
She has forgiven him for everything.
I know it's one of your pet peeves.
The medicine only works on men.
He told the students to be quiet.
No sweet without sweat.
I'll call for you at eight tomorrow morning.
Hopefully, things are well with you.
Hopefully, things are well with you.
Hopefully, things are well with you.
She's done her homework.
Tom isn't helping.
What about Portugal?
Columbus believed that the Earth was round.
I lost my watch yesterday.
Tom wears glasses.
He passed among the crowd.
He passed among the crowd.
Don't come back.
I am fed up with it.
When she returned home from school, she began to help her mother in the kitchen.
When she returned home from school, she began to help her mother in the kitchen.
They're going crazy.
I dress lightly all the time.
Yes, it is nice, but I do not like the red color very much.
Yes, it is nice, but I do not like the red color very much.
I don't like the colour of this house.
For my part, I don't like this picture.
I know you're busy.
I know you're busy.
You are the last person I would have expected to see here.
That's what I expected of my daughter.
My cat died yesterday.
I remember the day when we first met.
How did you get them?
I'm listening to music, and you?
I'm listening to music, and you?
I'm listening to music, and you?
I want this letter registered.
The prices remain as they were.
The prices remain as they were.
Police shouldn't take bribes.
The toy store is closed.
I lay on my face.
The sand is yellow, and also the sun is yellow. The sand and the the sun are yellow.
Tom is wearing a uniform.
You're on the list.
We just finished.
We just finished.
Tom forgot my birthday again this year.
I have Japanese and Chinese friends who speak to each other in English since that is the only language they have in common.
They found this.
Don't move! You take a step and you die!
There's something on your neck.
You have a beautiful house.
There's something on your neck.
Don't expect any miracles.
I have to do my best.
I have to do my best.
The flowers smell good.
You got that right.
This machine makes 100 copies a minute.
It is strange that he is not here. He always comes at this time.
Tom is much better than you.
I'm sick of school.
You're on the list.
No one knows the reason.
I tear my clothes when I work in the garden.
The music is difficult for grownups to understand.
It turned out that we received a million dollars.
I want to read the book.
I want to speak with you.
I want to talk to you.
He retorted that it was all my fault.
He retorted that it was all my fault.
The loss amounted to 100 dollars.
She screamed with terror.
She screamed with terror.
Tadashi has a soft voice.
He exclaimed, "What a dirty face you have!"
Don't lie doesn't necessarily means "tell the truth".
Business before pleasure.
I overheard what you said.
It has been ten years since my uncle went to Canada.
We are to meet at five this evening.
I'm going to hurt you.
I've never seen so much blood.
Tom has always had a problem with authority figures.
We are going to deal with them once and for all.
We are going to root out the government.
Have you seen any movies recently?
They are neighbors.
I've got a visual on a hostile.
I don't know who sings this song.
She found us.
This is the perfect example.
Last night, we went to the theater.
Use the small one.
Use the small one.
Use the small one.
Use the small one.
Here's the magazine you were looking for.
Here's the magazine you were looking for.
Here's the magazine you were looking for.
Tom doesn't understand French at all.
Tom hasn't finished his homework yet.
80% of the world's computerized information is in English.
Much depends upon the result.
Steve will get married to Nancy next week.
Which side are you on?
Whose side are you on?
Which side are you on?
Whose side are you on?
Put this medicine where children can't get it.
This book is suitable for general readers.
What do you think is the best film that you have seen this year?
Don't smoke too much.
Don't smoke too much.
This house and this land is mine!
What's your favorite memory from childhood?
Follow the street and turn right passing by a bank.
She is making progress with her English.
Follow the street and turn right passing by a bank.
The red house is the one that Jack built.
We killed time playing cards.
We killed time playing cards.
You won't be safe anywhere.
Tom never stops.
The book consists of thirty chapters.
The book consists of thirty chapters.
Tom nodded quickly.
I get up at 6:30.
Don't let the kid play with knives.
Your new dress really looks good on you.
Speak the truth, even if your voice shakes.
I think it's a very interesting question.
Mary is my daughter's best friend.
Yesterday I saw an old acquaintance whom I hadn't seen in ten years.
I heard a little girl crying.
I don't think I should borrow any more money.
Where's the other half of the money?
You smell so good.
Your skin is so soft.
She's my daughter's best friend.
Did you like my apartment? "Yes, it is very comfortable."
All human beings have brains.
Use it or lose it.
Give me back the book after you have read it.
Give me back the book after you have read it.
Can we believe that?
Who are your neighbors?
Where's my grandfather?
Tom gets up early.
Tom seems very nervous.
Tom screamed in horror.
Tom says he's not busy.
Tom said you were busy.
I went to the supermarket with Leanne and bought chicken nuggets.
When did you start dating?
When did you two start dating?
I don't like it when Tom borrows money from me.
There is a television in this room.
Please take a look at this picture.
Please take a look at this picture.
They're in the garden.
I'll never forget my first experience.
I received the same advice as you.
I received the same advice as you.
I'm glad Tom invited you.
I'm glad Tom invited you.
I'm glad Tom invited you.
It's a great opportunity.
She took him to the lake.
She took him to the lake.
Tell me why she is crying.
The girl is reading with her grandfather.
The girl is reading with her grandfather.
I expect her back by six o'clock.
They called you.
They called you.
They called you.
Don't ever come back here again.
I'm lying on the grass.
Take his car keys.
I'm sorry, Jorge! I didn't see you!
You always were one of my best students.
Tom enjoys watching TV.
This rule applies to you, too.
Why has it taken so long?
You look like a boy.
She looks like a boy.
You look like a boy.
He looks like a girl.
You look like a girl.
We received a warm welcome.
I'm not very busy.
I'm not very busy.
I'll wait for you.
I can wait for you.
He took second place.
All of them speak French.
One of my bags is missing.
If it looks like a war, if it sounds like a war and if it kills like a war, then it actually is a war.
Did you call me up last night?
There's almost no milk left in the glass.
There's almost no milk in the glass.
We all strive for success.
The picture is hung upside down.
Don't come in.
Russian is considered to be a difficult language.
Thanks for saving me.
What I need is not money, but your advice.
Who gave the orders?
I wasn't too sure about it.
I wasn't too sure about it.
Where did you put my keys?
What did you do with my keys?
Let's go to the movies.
It must have cost you a fortune.
There is no life without music.
I hope it's enough.
The movie was interesting.
Nobody noticed that the picture had been hung upside down.
Never lose hope!
I wonder why.
Which is longer, this pen or that one?
I've invited all my friends.
He's about the same age as you.
He's about the same age as you.
He's about the same age as you.
He's about the same age as you.
He is about your age.
What about us?
She lost everything.
He lost everything.
You've lost everything.
I know what to study.
No star was seen that night.
I received your note.
I received your note.
I'll be watching you.
I'll be watching you.
I'll be watching you.
I'll be watching you.
Let's sit in the shade.
I will make him do it at once.
Tom has been talking to Mary about me.
I'm not saying it's impossible.
I can't go to work in these clothes.
Never lose hope!
The breathing becomes more and more hard.
Now my life will be better!
I hope you know what this is.
I hope you know what this is.
I hope you know what this is.
I was breathing.
I met my friends.
Tom came back early.
Call my husband.
I went out even though it was raining.
We bought a round table.
You had a week to finish this.
This knife isn't very sharp.
Why did she stop replying to me?
Don't open the box yet.
Don't open the box yet.
Don't open the box yet.
Don't open the box yet.
I don't want to marry you.
Tom runs faster than I do.
Will you sell your car to me?
Will you sell your car to me?
Where did you find the key?
Can I have a word with you alone?
He never loses hope.
He didn't come to the last meeting.
I have nothing more to say about him.
I have nothing more to say about him.
Why didn't I listen to you!
Why didn't I listen to you!
Why didn't I listen to you!
I wonder who has come.
She looked at the picture.
I tried to write with the left hand.
You will succeed some day.
Ignore what Tom said.
I hope it's true.
I hope so.
Are you sure they can do this?
Are you sure they can do this?
Are you sure they can do this?
Emily was listening to music.
Are you students? "Yes, we are."
The phone rang while I was taking a shower.
He likes reading English literature.
A home is more than a mere building.
This is going too far.
I've changed. I'm not the same man I used to be.
Pay attention to the road.
Watch the road.
No, replied Tom decisively.
I don't know what Tom did to the TV, but it's working now.
I've never seen so many sentences in my life!
I've never seen so many trees in my life.
It's just a figure of speech.
She called you.
She called you.
We don't do body counts.
Tom is not at all busy.
You must be very busy.
He's rich, but he's not happy.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
What colour is your hair?
We have hope.
We have room.
We heard gunshots.
They are happy about the result.
We lost everything.
We lost it.
We must check.
Tom is wearing the same clothes as he was yesterday.
She talks about everything with her parents.
You've always helped me.
Some believed his story, and others did not.
The truth shall be revealed to you.
I don't talk to them anymore.
Did you ring him yesterday?
Everyone's dead.
Can you repeat that?
Could you repeat that?
Could you repeat that?
I'll call her immediately.
Thanks for waiting for me.
He does not know what it is to be poor.
Tom arrived late as usual.
I saved you.
Tom wants to come over after work.
Tom wants to come over after work.
Tom called me today.
It's very improbable.
I tried to save you.
I tried to save you.
Tom knew he was being watched.
Tom lost three sons in the war.
Tom must've gone another way.
Tom made me go against my will.
I am now fairly certain.
What planet are you from?
The telephone is ringing, but nobody is answering.
I know the name of this animal.
Have you seen Paul today?
I'll scream.
Let's wait here.
Tom set the bird free.
He asked me to wait there until he came back.
Tom pointed to the map on the wall.
Let's leave her alone.
I couldn't believe my ears!
Tom is all ears.
I sometimes watch TV.
Many people in Africa speak French.
The limits of my language are the limits of my world.
Tom said he found his keys.
Tom said I could wait here until he got back.
Tom said he wasn't busy.
Tom said he'd stopped doing that.
Tom said he'd call tomorrow.
Tom said you hit him on the head.
Tom said he couldn't breathe.
Tom said he was very happy.
Tom said I could come over.
Tom said you hit him on the head.
What's Tom up to?
The child threw a stone at the cat.
It was Tom's idea.
This is how we've got to know each other.
My neck hurts.
That's right, said John.
I'm not as rich as I'd like to be.
I finally gave up smoking.
Everyone is in the living room watching TV.
Everyone is in the living room watching TV.
Tom knew where he had put his keys.
I don't want to end up like her.
I don't want to end up like him.
I don't want to end up like Tom.
I'm not an expert in this field.
Tom came early.
Tom was lying in bed, staring up at the ceiling.
I'm as free as a bird.
Do you want to talk about this?
Do you want to talk about this?
We've got thirty minutes.
We have no time to lose.
Tom made me take a shower.
I wonder where Tom studied French.
You're probably wondering who I am.
Tom may never get out of prison.
I'm afraid Tom is busy at the moment.
Tom's hardly likely to admit that he's wrong.
They made more powerful arms.
I've been expecting something like that.
I've been expecting you to show up.
Tom was sure that he would never see her again.
I don't want it to change.
I want to become a teacher.
Tom loves going to movies.
I'm scared too, so I'm not going to go.
I'm scared.
Do you have a boyfriend or a girlfriend? Where did you meet them?
I was away for five minutes.
I was away for five minutes.
I was away for five minutes.
He has no friends to advise him.
I was very impressed by his good behavior.
I was very impressed by his good behavior.
She has a cat. The cat is white.
It wasn't his idea.
It wasn't her idea.
This was my idea.
That wasn't my idea.
He lies to me all the time.
He lies to you all the time.
He lies to you all the time.
He lies to you all the time.
He lies to you all the time.
He lies to me all the time.
She lies to you all the time.
She lies to you all the time.
She approached him with a smile on her face.
I don't have a knife.
Only adults may watch that film.
My father never came back home before 9 or 10.
Tom is a true artist.
Why did they do this to you?
Why did they do this to you?
I can't believe that Tom is a grandfather.
I can't believe it happened.
I can't believe this is all happening.
I can't believe Tom bought that house.
I can't believe Tom did that.
I can't believe Tom has really gone.
I can't believe you bought this.
I can't believe you bought this.
I can't believe you did that by yourself.
I can't believe you did that by yourself.
I can't believe you did that by yourself.
I can't believe you did that by yourself.
Give me your car keys.
Give me your car keys.
I can't believe you'd do that.
I can't believe you'd do that.
I can't believe you're getting married.
I can't believe you're getting married.
I can't believe you're getting married.
I can't believe you're here.
I can't believe you're here.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
I can't believe your parents let you come here by yourself.
I can't call Tom at home.
I can't believe I did this.
I can't be treated like this.
I can't allow that to happen.
You're welcome to stay as long as you want.
Stop lying to me.
Stop lying to me.
Information is power.
Look! The car is on fire!
Tom would never do that.
I know where Tom went.
I suppose you don't know who Tom is.
Tom promised to take me away from here.
I know who we can get to help us.
I know who's on the list.
I know you can't forgive me.
I know you can't forgive me.
I'm sure you have many questions.
I'm sure you have many questions.
Winter is just around the corner.
It will be winter soon.
Tom lost all the money he had.
Tom lost what little money he had.
Tom lost all the money he had.
Tom lost all the money he had.
I know you have homework to do.
Please don't go in there.
Please don't go in there.
I have to return this book today.
I'll phone you when I arrive.
I'll phone you when I arrive.
I've got nothing to lose.
You have nothing to lose.
You have nothing to lose.
I think you've drunk enough.
Tom is one of my better students.
Tom is one of my better students.
Tom is much older than I thought.
Don't bother Tom.
Don't bother Tom.
Can you call Tom?
What's Tom look like?
I called Tom today.
I called Tom yesterday.
That's his horse.
I hope Tom knows.
I hope Tom knows.
There is no word for liberty in the Russian language.
It's Tom on the phone.
Tom wasn't surprised at all.
At least I'm still alive.
There's no cause for alarm.
Tom got married three years ago.
Tom almost fell down.
Tom hit me.
Tom goes to church every Sunday.
Luckily nobody died.
I don't know how to use this.
I don't want to call the police.
There's no bad weather, there's bad clothing.
She and I are about the same height.
I get up at seven every morning.
Ask the policeman where St. James Square is.
Ask the policeman where St. James Square is.
I'll go take a look.
Tom looks just like his father.
I checked it out and tagged it.
Which is the most difficult language in the world?
Let's now talk about all this.
I had nobody to ask for advice.
Unfortunately, an error has occurred.
What do you expect to find?
They need a sharp knife.
I tried to help my grandfather.
There's no happiness among things. It's in people's hearts who see and use those things.
That's a stupid question.
You'll never change.
You'll never change.
I'll never forget seeing her on the stage.
When did you last open the bag?
I was busy yesterday.
If I were younger, I would go abroad to study.
She doesn't know her neighbors.
Are you sure we have enough money to buy everything?
Music is a good way to fight silence.
In the beginning was the Word.
My job is just as important to me as your job is to you.
None were satisfied.
Where's your sword?
Tom says he wants to speak to you.
Tom and Mary can't stand each other.
I'm glad you called.
I'm glad you called.
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God.
Ten to one he will be elected chairman.
That sounds too good to be true.
She is neither in the kitchen nor in the living room.
I have no one to go to for advice.
Can my daughter go to school?
The cat is wet.
Do you think there is another answer to this difficult problem?
What would you do if you had a million dollars?
Tom was born premature.
I'm also taking this train.
Don't cry.
Tom fell from his horse.
Tom drives to work.
Tom goes to work by bus.
He refused to help me.
It all started with an idea.
As long as you are with him, you can't be happy.
Chuck Norris was born in the house he built.
I have a white cat.
Tom explained the situation to me.
I would be happy to do so.
Only fifty people came.
They asked for our advice.
Tom came in carrying a big suitcase.
You can only choose one.
This glass of beer is almost bigger than you.
Do you like to do homework?
We study together.
We stayed inside.
It seems to me that someone is calling you.
I tried to save him.
I tried to save him.
We must talk.
Ken looks happy.
Ken looks happy.
The meat is expensive.
The book was better than the movie.
You've got circles under your eyes.
I've got a job and I don't want to lose it.
Listen to the music.
I never thought I'd be this busy.
I met him just as he was coming out of school.
Tom woke up at 6:30.
Who's on the phone?
Bring it back when you're done.
The giraffe has a long neck.
Are you serious? "I'm absolutely serious."
Are you serious? "I'm absolutely serious."
Tom got a letter from Santa Claus.
That's a very good suggestion.
Tom still isn't happy.
In the future, cars will drive themselves.
It's a driverless car.
That's not possible anymore.
I didn't finish the job.
I haven't finished my work.
Can we talk about something else please?
We need to talk with you about something.
We need to talk with you about something.
Tom tried to say something, but couldn't.
Your birthday is the same as mine.
You'll never guess who I just met.
You'll never guess who I just met.
Why are you wearing those clothes?
What time, exactly, did Tom leave?
Tom will find out sooner or later.
Tom was one of my better students.
Tom was one of my better students.
Tom was my daughter's best friend.
Tom isn't very happy.
Tom liked working here.
Write your name and address.
I'm beginning to lose hope.
I was starting to lose hope.
He was starting to lose hope.
She was starting to lose hope.
Tom was starting to lose hope.
My father does nothing but watch TV on Sundays.
They were talking about me.
Tom glanced at the mirror.
Tom glanced at the rear-view mirror.
Do you have something to add, Tom?
If you will help me, we will soon finish.
If you will help me, we will soon finish.
Do you want to talk now?
Do you want to talk now?
We always have something to talk about.
Don't forget us.
Don't forget us.
She asked me to take a look at it.
Tom! Oh my God!
It was just an example.
Tom took charge of the situation.
He threw a stone into the lake.
She is rich, young, and beautiful.
It's only half the story.
Tom sat alone in the dark.
Tom is waiting for you inside.
Tom is waiting for you inside.
That ended better than I expected.
I hear the noise.
I've got a visual on a possible hostile.
I've got a visual on a hostile.
What are you trying to prove?
I've lost hope.
I've lost hope.
I'm losing visual contact with you.
It doesn't sound natural to me.
It doesn't sound natural to me.
Tom is an interesting person, isn't he?
Tom will never forgive me.
I did the right thing.
I hope we did the right thing.
I think I did the right thing.
We've done the right thing.
I know I did the right thing.
You know you did the right thing.
You know you did the right thing.
Tom did the right thing.
You did the right thing.
They've done the right thing.
Tell me I did the right thing.
Tell me I did the right thing.
Let's hope we did the right thing.
Oh my God, you're drunk.
Oh my God, you're drunk.
Oh my God, you're drunk.
Give me your keys.
Give me your keys.
Try to explain.
Try to explain.
They don't seem busy.
Either you go now or I will make you go.
Do you think we're going to be rescued?
Tom was satisfied with the results.
He had every reason for doing so.
It shouldn't surprise you to learn that I don't like you very much.
I love spending time with you.
I love that shirt.
I can't believe I'm really talking to you.
I can't believe I'm telling you this.
Tom stepped away from the ledge.
Tom will come sooner or later.
Don't stop.
Ladies first!
He ended up in jail.
Good evening. I'd like a glass of milk.
You got what you wanted, now leave me alone.
Are you sure this is OK?
She understands music.
I hope you're prepared for that.
That's my song!
Friday is the day when she is very busy.
She didn't notice me.
But that's impossible, professor.
Are you sure that's a good idea?
Are you sure that's a good idea?
Are you sure that's a good idea?
Read this right away.
I feel like going to the movies.
I'd like to go to the movies.
Madagascar is the largest island of Africa.
While there's life, there's hope.
I can't believe you gave Tom that much money.
I'm afraid Tom is dead.
My grandfather's house was on that street.
Singing is their thing.
I feel sorry for him.
It was a complicated question.
That was a stupid question.
It's a very serious issue.
We've got a long night ahead of us.
We've got fresh vegetables.
I lay in bed thinking about everything that had happened that day.
I lay in bed thinking about everything that had happened that day.
I never would've guessed.
I promise. I'll never do it again.
I thought you'd find that interesting.
I thought you'd find that interesting.
It seems that I have lost my keys.
They can't believe it.
I can't believe it's really you.
I can't believe it's that simple.
I can't believe this is real.
I can't believe that actually happened.
I can't believe that actually happened.
They grow up fast, so there's no telling the age at once.
There was nobody under 30 around.
I look younger than I am.
When will you leave?
I'm younger than I look.
I'm older than I look.
Tom is much younger than he looks.
Tom is much older than he looks.
I told you not to call me at work.
I told you not to call me on weekends.
Calm down, Tom. Take it easy.
It doesn't help.
The sooner you leave, the better.
I must buy some milk.
I told you not to call me on weekends.
Can you repeat that?
They have hope.
She told him she was interested.
Tom hit me first.
He was invited.
She was invited.
Hang on tight.
Hang on tight.
I'm pretty certain of that.
There is a lot to do.
Thanks, I understand now.
John ran to the station in order to catch the last train.
Please give me your picture so I don't forget how you look.
I wasn't invited.
I wasn't sure.
I'm sure Tom will forgive you.
I'm sure Tom will forgive you.
I promise I won't tell anyone who you are.
I promise I won't tell anyone who you are.
I promise I won't tell anyone where it is.
I haven't even told you the best part yet.
I haven't even told you the best part yet.
I don't need you telling me how to behave.
Many are afraid of darkness at night.
But nobody believed her.
Look at the blackboard, everyone.
Tom is still in jail.
Let's wait until it stops raining.
Tom asked me if I was happy or not.
Far be it from me to suggest you haven't checked your source.
Tom asked me to return the money I had borrowed.
Tom asked me to return the money I had borrowed.
Tom asked me to wait here until he came back.
There's nothing more to drink.
It's too early.
We have nothing to be afraid of.
Tom had nothing to say about it.
If something goes wrong, call me.
If something goes wrong, call me.
There's nothing for us to do here.
There's nothing for us to do here.
If I tell her the truth, she will never forgive me.
If I tell him the truth, she will never forgive me.
How many hours a day do you study French?
How many hours a day do you study French?
How many hours a day do you watch TV?
How many hours a day do you watch TV?
How many hours a day does Tom study French?
How many hours a day does Tom watch TV?
How many people are you planning on inviting?
How many people are you planning on inviting?
You have to get up.
You have to get up.
Tom usually goes to school by bus.
It's a necessary evil.
Give me a minute.
Her parents were horrified.
Evidently he does not want to speak to me.
Tom will arrive at around 2:30.
Tom won't be back till 2:30.
He's not breathing!
Try to prove that you are right!
Has Tom found his keys yet?
Tom was lying on the couch, reading a book.
I was hoping you'd come back.
I was hoping you'd come back.
We'll finish later.
Cat is puzzled.
I know what you were hoping for.
I know what you were hoping for.
I go to the cinema once a week.
Are you finished yet?
I want to speak to you.
I want to speak to you.
We saved your life.
She calmed down and returned home.
That only happens in the movies.
As soon as I received the cheque, I went to the bank.
Tom is here in this hospital.
Tom is getting ready for bed.
Tom asked us to arrive early.
Tom isn't as poor as most people think he is.
I drive to work.
This shouldn't take too long.
This is the captain speaking.
This is the captain speaking.
I'm trying to save your life.
I'm trying to save your life.
Thank you for calling me.
I'm sure Tom will understand.
Make your bed.
You're no longer my daughter.
I read his book.
I'm pretty certain I haven't made any mistakes.
I'm pretty certain I haven't made any mistakes.
I think Tom has been crying.
I think Tom has been crying.
Go back in your room.
She's in a bad mood.
I'm not like most people.
I'm just not in the mood.
I'm going to take a look.
I'm going to sell my car.
Tom didn't like that.
Tom didn't show up.
Tom doesn't wear suits.
Tom won't believe me.
Tom won't stop crying.
Tom already left.
Don't go anywhere without me.
Don't go anywhere without me.
What were you in prison for?
Tom says his left leg hurts.
I'm in the kitchen.
I'm not all that busy.
Tom said it was my fault.
Tom ran back to his room.
I'm sure that'll help.
I'm sure that was Tom.
I'm serious this time.
Did you know Tom was writing a novel?
Did you know Tom was writing a novel?
Put your hand up and step out of the vehicle.
This is a film all parents should watch.
To hell with them.
The new supermarket was opened last month.
Our class consists of 40 boys.
I hope it's not too late.
I'm so happy to see you.
I've never been happier.
Whose wine is this?
I think Tom might be dead.
Tom never killed anybody.
Money talks.
We did everything we could to save the boy.
Please come to see us at our new place.
Tom was really drunk last night.
Tom has been acting a little strange lately.
I'm sure it's around here somewhere.
It's clear to me that Tom doesn't want to be here.
The old man lost the will to live.
Tom was thirty when he died.
Can I ask what you're doing?
I hope you'll reconsider.
I hope you're enjoying this.
Tom stared at the picture of his daughter.
Tom isn't helping me.
I told you not to call me on weekends.
I thought this was important.
I know when your birthday is.
I tried to help her.
I tried to help him.
He doesn't even know that I exist.
She doesn't even know that I exist.
I think that's a mistake.
Looks like someone threw up their guts all over the walls.
I'll check.
It's an old picture.
Do you want to look into it?
I felt naked.
They need to study.
I haven't talked to him since.
I haven't talked to her since.
I think that's for Tom to decide.
I think there's somebody in the next room.
Did Tom call you?
Excuse me, are you Tom, by any chance?
Welcome to the USA.
I want to shake your hand.
I want to shake your hand.
Do you know his last name?
Do you know his last name?
I suppose you want to ask me who I was with last night.
I just want to save the planet.
I hate taking public transportation.
I hate taking public transportation.
Tom didn't believe a word.
Tom didn't answer the phone.
Tom claims he doesn't remember.
Treat her well.
Tom doesn't know I exist.
Tom doesn't like that idea.
Tom doesn't pay any attention.
Tom doesn't remember his grandfather.
Friday the 13th is an American horror movie.
The cat is not mine.
She's younger than your daughter!
She's younger than his daughter.
They won't believe me.
They won't believe us.
They won't catch me.
Tom didn't expect that.
He aspired to be a famous actor.
He aspired to be a famous actor.
It is healthier to climb the stairs.
Tom is wearing a women's dress.
I'm getting the hell outta here.
We're very close.
We're up early.
We're turning back.
You made the same mistake as last time.
Tom eventually calmed down.
She's dating my brother.
We don't have school tomorrow.
It's strange you say that.
Achoo. "Bless you." "Thanks."
I'm learning so much from you.
I'm learning so much from you.
He tried to stand up.
He tried to stand up.
Tom and Mary have nothing to eat.
She has a strong character.
I had to act quickly.
I had to act quickly.
That's up to you.
I leave it up to you.
Where are your keys, Tom?
That's up to you.
I leave it up to you.
I leave it up to you.
Yesterday we met with the Minister of Education.
Do you have an opinion?
Do you have an opinion?
Put the book on the top shelf.
If I had been rich, I would have given you some money.
Tom is almost thirty years old.
What a heavy bag!
I like your cat.
Little girls cry.
The little girls are crying.
Tom drank some milk.
It was good working with you.
They left without me.
It's obviously a bad example.
It's an obviously bad example.
Take a look around you.
Take a look around you.
That's why I called you.
That's why I called you.
I hope so, too.
What team does Tom play for?
What team do you play for?
What team do you play for?
Try to catch me.
Try to catch me.
Try to stop me.
Try to stop me.
The soup was too hot.
It was a good example.
It was a good example.
Take your hands out of your pockets.
Take your hands out of your pockets.
She put the book in the bag.
Nobody else showed up.
These gifts are for you.
I hope you'll forgive me.
I hope you'll forgive me.
I hope you're not afraid of the dark.
I hope you're not afraid of the dark.
I hope you're well.
I hope you're well.
I hope you're staying for dinner.
I hope you're staying for dinner.
I hope you're staying.
I hope you're staying.
My brother is not busy.
Tom asked for a glass of water.
This feature is deprecated. We advise you not to use it.
I don't want to be here when Tom wakes up.
Tom is my grandfather.
Are you satisfied now?
We were talking.
I'm not going to call Tom.
Do you know how to do it?
Do you know how to do it?
What kind of movies do you like?
What kind of movies do you like?
He hates shopping.
I hate shopping.
I tried everything.
She shook my hand.
The Mississippi River is deep and wide.
The Mississippi River is deep and wide.
I just want to be happy.
Do not drink the water in the dirty glass!
I came looking for you.
I was quite at a loss for words.
What time is it by your clock?
The wind calmed down.
I talked to everybody.
He wants her to go away and leave him in peace.
The rich are different from you and me.
The rich are different from you and me.
The rich are different from you and me.
The rich are different from you and me.
Every person is an artist.
It's a nice place, but I wouldn't live there.
We don't have to talk about this now.
Tom asked me if I had found the keys.
Tom asked me if I had found the keys.
Tom asked me if I had found the keys.
I guess you don't really care.
I wish my grass were emo, then it would cut itself.
I felt naked.
Everyone is entitled to his own opinion.
He is entitled to get the land; it was his father's.
I don't know what to do with that guy. No matter how mad I get at him he just takes it in stride and pays no attention.
My throat is scratchy.
I have to close the windows.
Don't fall off your chair.
You've been so kind.
You try and stop me.
You sound very sure.
The ship is about to set sail.
You are the last person I expected to see here.
Who came up with that idea in the first place?
Got milk?
I can see smoke.
Nobody has ever climbed that mountain.
People ask me that all the time.
People like Tom lie all the time.
Tom calls me all the time.
Tom comes over all the time.
Tom is busy all the time.
Tom is about to get married for the third time.
Could you help me translate this into French?
Could you help me translate this into French?
If you need him, call him.
I am an English teacher.
Tom made us do it.
Tom didn't know how to do it.
Tom doesn't know how to do it.
Tom has forgotten how to do that.
Tom says he still can't believe it.
Tom doesn't want to go to jail.
There's someone inside.
There's still hope.
Tom never showed.
Tom doesn't want to be disturbed.
We want to talk to you about that.
We want to talk to you about that.
What did he want to know about me?
We all had the same idea.
What is it you want to talk about?
What is it you want to talk about?
Well, do you get it now, Styopa? "Of course I do, now I know this. But, Professor... it's better, I dunno, if we never speak of it again." "Alright."
You have changed quite a lot.
You have changed quite a lot.
I've chosen her to be my wife.
Tom met his wife when he was studying in France.
Sit wherever you like.
Sit wherever you like.
So what are birds actually?
I make it a rule never to borrow money.
Tom always gets up early.
It was dark.
Tom didn't want to talk.
It's difficult to speak with him.
Police! Nobody move!
What sort of work do you do?
What sort of work do you do?
I don't want to talk to anyone.
I don't appreciate being lied to.
I don't answer stupid questions.
I'm sure she's right.
How about starting again from the very beginning?
Tom went to work at fifteen.
That was totally my fault.
He helped the lady into the car.
I promise.
The tree is burning.
Let's eat before our dinner gets cold.
Everybody has a right to his own opinion. However, sometimes it's better not to tell anybody what that opinion is.
Nobody has the right to judge you.
What is the name of the lady who must not be named?
What is the name of the lady who must not be named?
I usually get what I want.
You can call me at any time.
I got married when I was 19 years of age.
Let's eat before our dinner gets cold.
Everybody has a right to his own opinion. However, sometimes it's better not to tell anybody what that opinion is.
Nobody has the right to judge you.
What is the name of the lady who must not be named?
What is the name of the lady who must not be named?
I usually get what I want.
You can call me at any time.
I got married when I was 19 years of age.
Tom lost his money, his family and his friends.
You're lucky you're a girl.
You're lucky you're a boy.
God damn it!
I would like to drink a coffee.
Her life is in danger.
I had to climb over the wall.
I had to finish what I'd started.
I had to finish what I'd started.
Don't forget that she's a woman.
Poor tomcat.
Poor moggy.
Did you know that Tom had left town?
Did you know that Tom had left town?
I think Tom will listen to me.
I think Tom is dangerous.
I'll call you tomorrow, OK?
I'll call you tomorrow, OK?
John's gone to the shop.
I'm going to the cinema.
He disappeared again.
They don't talk to me anymore.
It is not necessarily so.
The reason is clear.
It's a very difficult question for me.
The phone keeps ringing today!
Thank you, I understand everything.
The sister of my father is my aunt.
My father's brother's wife is my aunt.
I want to buy my girlfriend a present.
You spend too much time with her.
You spend too much time with him.
You're too young to get married.
He punched her in the face.
She punched me in the face.
I punched him in the face.
Tom punched him in the face.
Tom punched her in the face.
Add my name to the list.
Did you get the gift I sent you?
Did you get the gift I sent you?
London is the capital of England.
Today was fun.
He is my neighbour.
I'm always losing things.
I can't stop thinking about him.
And what color do you want, white or black? "Black, of course."
And what color do you want, white or black? "Black, of course."
They talked on the phone every night.
That was the last drop! I don't want to see you again!
The island needs a hospital, not a bridge.
The air became warm.
The train will arrive soon.
It was the beginning of the end for them.
Repeat what I have just told you.
Please forgive me for not answering your letter.
You're forgetting one very important thing.
He promised to be here at 6.
What an idea!
How weird!
Her name wasn't on the list.
They argued about the sentence.
Is the milk from this deer really good?
You didn't seem certain.
This is the last piece of cake.
I have a proposition, Tom.
I hope that helped.
Are you sure Tom knows what he's doing?
Are you sure Tom knows what he's doing?
Are you sure you know what you're doing?
Are you sure you know what you're doing?
I haven't changed.
I'm sure that's none of my business.
Do you know what's in that box?
Do you know what's in that box?
Don't look down on him just because he's poor.
Without your help, I couldn't have finished the work.
Without your help, I couldn't have finished the work.
Am I to blame for what happened?
Tom isn't responsible for what happened.
Why do people go to the cinema?
Mr. Tanaka showed us many pictures of his newborn baby.
Stupid humans, said the squirrel.
There's nobody in the kitchen.
There are as many museums as there are churches.
Everyone says that he looks just like his father.
My knowledge of German is poor.
Will surgery help it?
What do you suggest then?
The mistake cost him his head.
I'm not going to lie to Tom.
See you in court.
I'm not sure I understand what you're trying to say.
I'm not sure I understand what you're trying to say.
You're going to like it.
You'll love this.
You're going to like it.
You're going to like it.
Tom decided to try.
Tom began to speak.
This is unexpected.
It's not a crime.
James Bond is not an actor.
Look in the mirror.
It's not that deep.
It's not that deep.
It's not that deep.
It's not an error.
It's not a disease.
This was on the list.
It was on the list.
It was on the list.
It was on the list.
Is Tom a scientist?
Is that your shirt?
Is that your shirt?
Is it that serious?
Are you still busy?
Are you still busy?
All of us are busy.
You could've died.
You could've died.
Wait, who told you?
Are you certain about this? Absolutely certain?
Are you certain about this? Absolutely certain?
Why did Tom leave?
When did Tom call?
What's in the bag?
We were very busy.
We were both busy.
We were both busy.
Tom tried to help.
What the hell does she know about that?
What the hell does he know about that?
What the hell do you know about that?
I'm not your daughter.
I'm not your daughter.
I just got a call from the police.
Give it back to him.
Give it back to her.
Give it back to him.
Give it back to her.
Give it back to him.
Give it back to her.
Give it back to him.
Give it back to her.
Look! A falling star!
The Dead Sea lies below sea level.
Have you called him?
Have you called him?
He did not go to college for nothing.
Why do you wear a watch?
Tom is my relative.
How much do you love me?
The cat is very beautiful.
Turn there. "Where?"
Turn there. "Where?"
You know why I left.
You know why I left.
You know why I left.
You know why I left.
I don't like warm winters.
Your team is better than ours.
I thought Tom would be hungry.
Oh, Tom, take me with you!
I hope he will come.
She went with him to the movies.
This hat's too small for you.
I'm happy.
Today is my aunt's birthday.
We are not on the earth forever, but only for a time.
I want you to meet my friend, Tom.
What would you do in a situation like this, Tom?
What would you do in a situation like this, Tom?
Would you like something to drink?
It's up to you to decide what to do.
I'll call you again.
I'll call you again.
I'm a bird!
Isn't it beautiful?
Isn't it beautiful?
Now you will die. Isn't it beautiful?
I've got the feeling I already met her somewhere.
I've got the feeling I already met her somewhere.
You know as well as I do that we will die here.
The phone was ringing, but there was no one to answer it.
The phone was ringing, but there was no one to answer it.
I don't think Tom is going to like that.
I want Tom to call every day.
I want you to leave me alone.
I want you to leave me alone.
I'd like to make a statement.
What do you think of when you look at this photo?
What do you think of when you look at this photo?
I tried, but I did not succeed.
Tom refused to go to the hospital.
Tom refused to go to the hospital.
How does Tom feel about that?
Size does matter.
Sometimes, size does matter.
Tom wants to go hunting.
Tom wants to go hunting.
His eyes were full of tears.
The animals are treated well.
It may save your life.
It may save your life.
It could save your life.
He didn't like school.
I am sure of his success.
There's a slight problem.
Tom lives in North Carolina.
Tom saved a seat for me.
Tom wishes he had gone to the theater last night.
This task can be completed effortlessly.
I have to buy flowers for my girlfriend.
Tom is a good worker.
If anyone has a problem, tell them to call me.
He sat in the chair.
Please do not smoke here.
I have so many ideas.
Sorry, I can't let you stay here.
Sorry, I can't let you stay here.
Sorry, I can't let you stay here.
Oh, it's you. Come in.
Oh, it's you. Come in.
You're not going to like what I'm about to say.
You're not going to like what I'm about to say.
Please be serious.
Please be serious.
Please be serious.
You won't believe what Tom told me!
You won't believe what Tom told me!
You won't believe what she told me!
You won't believe what she told me!
Tom quickly lost interest.
I haven't finished speaking yet.
I don't think I can, but I'll try.
I read the first page.
He pulled something out of his pocket.
My ears are going to freeze if I don't go in.
This was before John was put in prison.
She tried to stab me in the back.
She tried to stab me in the back.
They're all happy.
Why do our schools look like prisons?
I want to become a teacher of Japanese.
It's a figure of speech.
Is there a problem with your hearing?
Tom admitted that he was scared.
Thank Tom. It was his idea.
You're not going to like what I'm going to say.
Don't use your real name.
You're acting like a fool.
Yes, it hurts.
Okay, I'll tell my mom that you're coming over.
Okay, I'll tell my mom that you're coming over.
Tom wants to speak to you.
Suddenly, it rained.
You don't seem to be very hungry.
Today, many people worry about losing their jobs.
I don't think I can, but I'll try.
I've been given until tomorrow to finish this.
Don't leave me alone.
Don't leave me alone.
It's very late now.
They're young and healthy.
It is better to live rich, than to die rich.
I like your smile.
I like your smile.
I hope it stops raining.
How many keys? asked Pepperberg.
Tom is busy now, so he can't talk with you.
I sold the car.
I'm not an artist.
How am I supposed to sleep with all this noise?
Is it really such a big deal?
There are others capable of helping you. You don't need me specifically. "Sure I do!"
Didn't you read the book?
Didn't you read the book?
Please keep it a secret.
You can't be sure of that.
You can't be certain of that.
You can't be sure of that.
You can't be sure of that.
I left Africa forever.
Stand up straight when I'm talking to you!
Stand up straight when I'm talking to you!
You have to leave immediately.
You have to leave immediately.
You have to leave immediately.
You have to leave immediately.
He holds a high position at the company.
I'm feeling much better.
I've been poor.
We'll talk soon, Tom.
When I was reading a book, the telephone rang.
I hate when that happens.
He's helping me.
She's helping me.
Tom wants to get married.
This smells like cheese.
I hope that this isn't a mistake.
I could not believe what I saw.
This is for keeps.
I thought you'd changed.
I thought you'd changed.
Where the hell were you? Why didn't you call me?
Could you read this for me?
Could you read this for me?
Tom has to go to a hospital.
I couldn't sell the last one.
I studied around the clock.
Tom needs to go to the hospital.
Why can't you leave me alone?
I sold the car.
Tom, I'm serious.
We can't go anywhere today.
You've misspelled my name.
That's weird, isn't it?
Are you sure you're all right?
Why did you keep that a secret?
Why did you keep that a secret?
The baby grows.
Your wish is my command.
It was such a cold day that we decided not to go out.
I'll phone them tomorrow when I come home.
Tom didn't do his homework.
Tom popped into the supermarket on his way home to buy some milk.
Please make sure to put a period at the end of a sentence.
My favorite season is Fall.
I still cannot talk about it without crying.
Did you watch TV tonight?
Did you watch TV tonight?
Tom doesn't want to be rich.
I have never seen her help her father.
What contemporary authors do you like?
It rains in early autumn.
That's a good sign.
I lost my key somewhere around here.
I lost my key around here.
English is often considered an international language.
I met Yoko on my way to the theater.
What method did you use to give up smoking?
I'll give up smoking.
I've been in this situation before.
I don't think I'll be able to translate this document without your help.
We just barely made the train.
I gave up smoking six months ago.
It seems to me that he likes music.
Tom waited his turn.
On the contrary, you speak English very well, indeed!
Perhaps you can remember where you put the keys.
Tom is sleeping in the next room.
If I ask you, you tell me that you're busy, but when it's your girlfriend who asks, you're suddenly up for anything.
Ulaanbaatar is the capital of Mongolia.
They closed their eyes.
I closed my eyes.
I tried to listen to him carefully.
The ship is in Byzantium.
Tom waited in his car across the street from the bank.
Can you stop calling me that?
Our only daughter died of cancer.
He is six feet in height.
Let's get together and talk about old times.
He made up his mind to try again.
He made up his mind to try again.
You're being used.
Tom looked under the table.
You're in danger, Tom.
That sounded weird.
We're lucky to be alive.
It's half past one.
What's this sound?
This is the car that Linda was talking about yesterday.
There's something I'd like you to take a look at.
Turn toward me, please.
I met her in the store by accident.
Prior to your arrival, he left for London.
Tom said Mary was happy.
I've heard Jim rejected the proposal.
She has four daughters, and all four are pretty.
Don't you just have anything else to do?
A good idea occurred to me then.
This novel is so easy that even a child can read it.
This novel is so easy that even a child can read it.
I'm sure that's true.
I'm sure that's true.
I come home at 2:30.
They passed out.
I know how old you are.
He is a good man for the job.
The bullet pierced his arm.
Would you hand me the suitcase, please?
Please breathe through your nose.
Work doesn't always begin at nine.
He didn't notice the change.
Her father won't come, he is very busy.
I wonder whose car this is.
Is Tom suggesting that?
Are you from a planet on which only women live?
What has changed since then?
I wish tomorrow would never come.
We can talk later.
Will you come back tomorrow?
Will you come back tomorrow?
I repeated my name.
I don't want you to go back.
I don't want you to go back.
He gathered up his things and left.
He gathered up his things and left.
I want to be on this team.
What happens at 2:30?
Translate the word.
Are you sure she doesn't have a boyfriend?
Are you sure she doesn't have a boyfriend?
Are you sure she doesn't have a boyfriend?
Are you sure he doesn't have a girlfriend?
Are you sure he doesn't have a girlfriend?
Are you sure he doesn't have a girlfriend?
He told me not to smoke.
Of course our lifestyle is different from America.
We'll sing.
The baby has been crying for almost ten minutes.
The richer they got, the more confident they became.
He has never been abroad.
He stepped on a Lego.
You're way too late.
You almost hit me.
Tom was wearing a white T-shirt.
Tom was wearing a white T-shirt.
Tom did it very carefully.
He's certainly generous with his money.
Try to do better in the future.
From his point of view he's right.
He's a former student of mine.
He's a former student of mine.
Today you can get two for the price of one.
The situation is very serious.
We often associate black with death.
You could let us go.
You've hurt me a lot.
You look very nice.
You may be seated.
I wanted to talk to you first.
The horse is a domestic animal.
I hope Tom is happy.
I wanted to meet you.
I can talk about anything with my best friend.
It is very important to keep your word.
Tom is in the next room trying to get some sleep.
He put on his hat.
Do I really have to give a speech?
Do you think she will like my gift?
Do you think she will like my gift?
Do you think he will like my gift?
Do you think she will like that?
He lost both his parents at an early age.
She has lost both parents.
Many kinds of animals have vanished from the earth.
You've been high on drugs since you were born.
From here, I can't see it.
Tom already knows you want to talk to him.
Tom took something that didn't belong to him.
You do look tired.
You do look tired.
Tom killed my neighbor's cat.
How will it end?
We wanted to wait.
Does Tom go to church every Sunday?
He bought flowers.
Why are there stars in the sky?
I learned that when I was in kindergarten.
All of the books are good, but none as good as this one.
We expected better.
Do you think Tom will call?
I'm a quick learner.
I'm a little early.
You don't use it, do you?
You don't use it, do you?
You don't use it, do you?
You don't use it, do you?
You don't use it, do you?
How much do you weigh?
I don't know this song.
It would be better for you to speak to him.
I knew I couldn't do it, but I tried anyway.
Bring it home.
I've decided to become a scientist.
I think you're in danger.
I think you're in danger.
Tom came home crying.
Tom called the hotel.
They'll have to wait.
The phone is ringing.
Let me show you how to do it.
How do we get back home from here?
Tom gave me his address.
Tom gave me his address.
Tom nearly fell off his chair.
Tom must be around thirty.
Tom lost track of the time.
Tom knew it was impossible.
I think they were talking about me.
Your house is on fire.
You look different than your picture.
What am I supposed to do with this?
Neither of them are drivers.
Neither of them are drivers.
Neither of them are drivers.
Neither of them are drivers.
Did you catch the train?
Why's that important?
They passed away and left me.
There are many different types of German bread.
Tom won't be able to get up that early.
Cats have the ability to see in the dark.
He saw the bird in the tree.
You look older.
He lives like a king.
I'm pretty sure Tom's fat.
What's that big building ahead of us?
This fish has a lot of small bones in it.
I was sure to find you here.
I was sure to find you here.
I was sure to find you here.
I was sure to find you here.
I like to listen to good music.
You're old enough to understand.
The Russian corpus is growing quickly.
I want that bag.
Tom, what do you want to be when you grow up?
He walked across the garden.
They'll accept the gifts.
When are you returning to Italy?
When I look of this photo I remember my family.
Read it again and again.
Read it again and again.
Read it again and again.
Tom just wanted some peace and quiet.
Tom was satisfied with the result.
Who invited you guys?
Hand me my mug.
Can you verify that?
Read and reply.
Can you finish by then?
I'm not overweight.
He is working on a new novel.
I showed Tom the way.
I'm happy Tom liked it.
Are you sure that man's name is Tom?
Which planet is nearest to the Sun?
I'm not short.
I'm not rich.
I'm not poor.
I owe my life to Tom.
I'm middle class.
What's the closest planet to the sun?
You'll find a way.
You'll find a way.
You lead the way.
He lost a book.
Put the book on the bottom shelf.
Do you go to church?
Do you go to church?
Try again!
We can meet next week if you want.
We can meet next week if you want.
I hope Tom's right.
Thank you for the flowers.
It was impossible to find an answer.
We talked over the phone.
We stayed at a hotel by the lake.
Now that it has stopped raining, we can go home.
I can't seem to quit smoking.
Got milk?
Isn't it the other way around?
Can I ask why this is so important to you?
Can I ask why this is so important to you?
Why did you do that to him?
Why did you do that to him?
Why did you do that to her?
Why did you do that to her?
I lost my watch yesterday.
You aren't going to call my parents, are you?
You aren't going to call my parents, are you?
You aren't going to call my parents, are you?
It is better to give than to receive.
I feel like someone is watching me.
He has a beautiful daughter.
Can you please translate this for me?
I told him I was interested.
My father drives a very old car.
He is preparing for the test.
Don't run here.
Don't run here.
I have no friends to whom I could speak about such matters.
It'll stop raining before long.
We hope you will enjoy the show.
Whether we go or not depends on the weather.
We had less snow this winter than we had expected.
We walked on the banks of the Thames.
We go to school by bus.
We walked along the shore of the lake.
They saved us.
I have no time to see you.
I have no time to see you.
I'll watch TV.
It really hits the nail on the head.
This is a good suggestion.
I want to try.
What time did you go to bed yesterday?
What time did you go to bed yesterday?
What time did you go to bed yesterday?
Forgive him if you can. He is not guilty.
We have five English lessons a week.
Last summer we went to Hokkaido.
We must execute his orders.
Sooner or later, we'll know the truth.
We live near the border.
We're in trouble.
How did we get into this situation?
I think we should talk.
Can you prove that?
She goes to night school.
Try doing it once more.
Tom became famous.
Are we in danger?
She spent all afternoon cooking.
He was unconscious for several days.
I know a woman whose first and last names are the same as mine.
By whom was the island discovered?
Yesterday was my birthday.
I use it every day.
I use it every day.
I use it every day.
He has gone to Britain.
Please explain how to get there.
Aside from this, he was in good health.
Help him with French.
Help him with French.
After fall comes winter.
After fall comes winter.
I like to play in the garden.
The phone is busy.
Is that your own idea?
Is that your idea?
Is that your idea?
Is that your idea?
Can I meet you there?
Take a look at that.
Take a look at that.
Why is Tom dressed like that?
Are you absolutely sure of that?
Are you absolutely sure of that?
Where did you read that?
She doesn't like it when I talk to other girls.
I don't want to talk to her anymore.
I don't want to talk to him anymore.
Tom doesn't talk to me anymore.
Why don't you come over?
I promise I won't tell anyone that Tom is here.
Everything I've told you should be kept secret.
Everything I've told you should be kept secret.
She's still breathing.
It's still closed.
This is too hard.
Call Tom and tell him where we are.
Call Tom and tell him where we are.
Call Tom and tell him to come here.
Call Tom and tell him to come here.
Tom told me how to get to his house.
Tell Tom that I know where he lives.
Tell Tom that I know where he lives.
Have I told you how much I love you?
Are you telling me Tom doesn't know?
Are you telling me Tom doesn't know?
Tom told me that he'd lost his watch.
I don't give lessons.
Tom told me not to go into that room.
I hope so.
Tell Tom I'll pick him up on the way.
Tell Tom I'll pick him up on the way.
Tell Tom I'll be there in thirty minutes.
Do you promise you won't tell anybody?
Do you promise you won't tell anybody?
At least, that's what I've been told.
I'm going to propose to her.
Tom worked from early in the morning until late at night.
We're not poor.
Did Tom tell you where he put his keys?
Did Tom tell you where he put his keys?
Tom got up and walked out of the kitchen.
This shouldn't take more than 30 minutes.
I'm trying to figure out why it happened.
I'm trying to figure out how it happened.
I'm sorry, I don't know what else to say.
I'm sorry, I didn't know what else to do.
I like him. He's a nice guy.
I'm afraid the situation is very serious.
I'm afraid the situation is very serious.
Tom wrote something on the dirty window.
Here, drink this.
He picked up a mirror and examined his tongue.
He remains at liberty.
You were in danger.
You were in danger.
Is this the best you can do?
Is this the best you can do?
Don't get that close to the fire.
Don't get that close to the fire.
Don't get that close to the fire.
Don't get that close to the fire.
It's not possible, is it?
You should've phoned me right away.
You should've phoned me right away.
You should've stayed in the hospital.
You should've stayed in the hospital.
Tom should've listened to you.
Tom should've listened to you.
Tom should've said no.
This book belongs to me.
I should've quit smoking a long time ago.
I should've quit smoking a long time ago.
You should've called me.
It's not too late.
I'm going to church tonight.
French is a very interesting language.
I'm so happy to see you again.
I got married when I was 19 years old.
He obviously lied.
Tom's happy.
Why doesn't Tom help you?
Why doesn't Tom help you?
Who's helping you?
Who's helping you?
She agreed with my idea.
Did you try it?
The cat seems extremely happy.
He died a few days later.
Are they satisfied?
You can take the bus to the station.
I'm unable to translate this sentence.
I'm unable to translate this sentence.
Don't forget to call Tom.
You can choose one of them.
That flower has a strong smell.
We're going to help.
We're going to help Tom.
He's our English teacher.
People thought that she was dead.
I was on the phone.
He's so cute.
Why do you spend so much time watching TV?
I know how busy you are, so I'll get right to the point.
I know how dangerous Tom is.
I know how to use this.
My uncle is slim, but my aunt is fat.
You need a key to open the box.
My grandmother really likes watching TV a lot.
I don't eat as much meat as I used to.
The nearest star to our solar system is Proxima Centauri.
This sentence seems to be grammatically correct.
I want to know who called.
In France, a great amount of wine is consumed.
What made her do that?
I know I should've called first.
I'm not finished yet.
I know it for sure.
I know it sounds strange, but it's true.
The other day, I bought a camera.
I know that it's hard to believe.
I wish I'd met her.
I gave up on the idea of buying a house.
My wife beats me.
I am also happy.
I am also happy.
I know my keys are here somewhere.
I know that was a mistake.
I know that was a mistake.
I know that you're lying.
I know this song.
We're sorry we can't help you.
They stopped crying.
Tom is quite poor.
Tom asked me to keep it secret.
Do you know where Tom put his keys?
Do you know where Tom put his keys?
Do you know where Tom got this?
Don't help Tom.
Don't help Tom.
After I found out where Tom went, I went to look for him.
Tom said he wanted to talk to you. Is that why you're here now?
Tom said he wanted to talk to you. Is that why you're here now?
Is that why you came here?
Is that why you came here?
Is that why you called?
Is that why you called?
Is that why you called?
Is that why you called?
Is that why you called me?
Is that why you called me?
Is that why you called me?
Is that why you called me?
Is that why Tom wanted to talk to you?
Is that why Tom wanted to talk to you?
He says that he won't give up smoking.
I wouldn't be calling if it weren't important.
She didn't take part in our conversation.
She told us an interesting story.
She was a girl of about our age.
She came three minutes after I called.
I'm sure Tom will take that into consideration.
Which is more important, me or your job?
Have you spoken to him yet?
Have you talked to him yet?
Isn't that obvious?
That's important to know.
That's the most important thing in the world.
That's the only thing that's important.
That's the only thing that's important.
Tom asked his father if he could go to the movies.
He likes my jokes.
Can I take photographs here?
If you want, you can easily make it.
When are you going to return from Milan?
She went to the hospital by taxi.
I like Tom. He's a nice guy.
Tom is the one I want to meet.
He has strange ideas.
She lost her father when she was three years old.
She lost her father when she was three years old.
Tom had nothing to eat.
Fabien has a lot of good ideas.
Tom says that he never dreams.
Dick passed me the photo.
Tom told Mary his age.
I'm sure you understand why we can't do that.
I'm sure you understand why we can't do that.
I can show you the pictures.
I can show you the pictures.
You are absolutely right about his character.
You are absolutely right about his character.
Do you mind if I take my shirt off?
It was her idea.
It was his idea.
Was that your idea?
I bought a new suit.
I've bought a gift for Tom.
I brought you lunch.
I built it myself.
I called Tom from the hospital.
I called Tom from the police station.
I called Tom to thank him.
I called Tom's house, but nobody answered.
I called you three or four times, but you never answered your phone.
When did you quit smoking?
When did you quit smoking?
I don't usually eat red meat.
Show me the photos you took in Paris.
Are you happy with your weight?
Because he was tired, he went to bed early.
I think it's time for me to talk to the boss about this problem.
What's your favorite city in the United States?
How much time do you spend on Facebook?
You should spend more time outside and less time inside.
Tom is very happy.
I found the boy sound asleep.
The pen is on the table.
I think it's time for me to do my homework.
She heard him sing his favorite song.
She often goes to the movies with him.
Please sit on this chair and wait.
Carol's dress is long.
Which film did you see?
This tea tastes good.
Give some meat to the dog.
The water is lukewarm.
I bought a camera not long ago.
I like spring.
Do you know this lady?
She didn't go there yesterday.
The cat is under the chair.
This was very interesting.
He entered his room.
I called your office today, but you weren't in.
I came back early.
I've come to speak with you.
I've come to speak with you.
Tom, I'm talking to you.
Maybe Tom didn't like what he saw.
I want the facts.
I want you and me to be happy.
I can always tell when Tom is lying.
I can do it with my eyes closed.
I was so sure it was Tom.
I can hardly believe it myself.
I'm not in a mood to go out.
He was hit by a car and died instantly.
Tom drew a straight line on the paper.
Don't even say that as a joke.
He called me up from Tokyo.
The baby was naked.
Don't go near the fire.
He's busy, so he can't meet you.
When I read this book, I always find something new in it.
There are more important things in life.
He'll leave for Tokyo tomorrow.
I'll go to the hospital today.
He became a police officer.
You should meet him.
I saw a house with a red roof.
I'm not busy today.
You may meet him.
I'd like to spend more time with you.
Maybe he won't become famous.
The number of students in this class is limited to 15.
He drank a lot yesterday.
You're not allowed to smoke in this room.
Do I need surgery?
I wish I had the time to stay and talk with you.
Since he was very drunk, he couldn't drive his car home.
I live in this neighborhood.
I met her on the way to school.
Kate was forced to read the book.
She went to a movie the other day.
It's not that interesting.
It's not that strange.
It's not size that matters.
That's not important, is it?
That's not fair, is it?
That's not fair. He started it.
That's not how I see it.
It's not likely that he went there.
It's not necessary for you to do that.
You'll lose everything.
What's the reason that made you call me?
Let's hope Tom was right.
It's a matter of national security.
She showed him how to use the new software.
She sued him.
She told him all about her childhood.
She told him all about her childhood.
You were singing.
You were singing.
I wish I had married your sister instead of you.
He has a long neck.
You must be busy.
You must be busy.
Why did you call?
Why did you call?
Why did you call?
Why did you call?
Who has the keys?
Wait for us, Tom.
Wait for us here.
Wait for us here.
How do you explain it?
How do you know so much about it?
How do you know so much about it?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
How do you know what color it is?
You've got to wait.
You've got to wait.
How do you stand this cold?
How do you stand this cold?
When did you quit smoking?
When did you quit smoking?
It's a very good sign.
That's not for me to say.
That's all I can promise.
So late that it's already early.
That's what I was hoping to hear.
That's the one thing I'm sure of.
That's the one thing I'm sure of.
That's why I'm not getting married.
That's why I'm not getting married.
Your phone is ringing again.
Your phone is ringing again.
Your phone is ringing again.
This will take a lot of time.
This is a very bad idea.
I haven't been everywhere, but it's on my list.
I haven't been everywhere, but it's on my list.
Why is life so difficult?
Tom took my keys.
Tom smokes a lot.
We have all the information we need.
It's a good restaurant, but it's quite expensive.
Tom called to say he's on his way.
Tom hasn't been answering his phone.
Tom got in the car and drove away.
Tom didn't want to talk to his wife.
Tom came over while you were asleep.
Tom came over while you were asleep.
Haven't we met somewhere before? asked the student.
Trust me, he said.
Oh, my white pants! And they were new.
Poor is not the one who has too little, but the one who wants too much.
The other day I visited the museum.
Tom is still a student.
Jokes apart!
I'm sure she loves me.
She'll confess, sooner or later.
This will have to wait.
This has to wait until tomorrow.
This has to wait until tomorrow.
Whose house is across from yours?
Call her tomorrow.
My father must do the work.
She sat there silently with tears in her eyes.
She lay on a sofa with her eyes closed.
She's neither rich nor famous.
She's neither rich nor famous.
She picked flowers in the garden.
She was wearing an ugly dress.
She lost her new watch.
She may know the facts.
She saw herself in the mirror.
She has a strong personality.
She sent me a letter.
She sat beside me in church.
Is she a taxi driver?
She is able to sing very well.
Do you know what color she likes?
She got into the car and drove off.
She lost her only son in the traffic accident.
She will be back within a week.
I was happy to see her again.
I want to marry a girl like her.
They waited for their teacher.
They made her go.
I wish I had seen her.
They don't use chairs or tables.
They are on good terms with their neighbors.
He runs in the park every day.
He knows a lot about wild animals.
He is short, but strong.
Have you finished? "On the contrary, I have not even begun yet."
What time did Tom go to bed?
What time did Tom go to bed?
My father has decided to quit smoking.
He is as tall as her.
She has met someone.
Have you seen my keys?
Thanks for the flowers.
Thank you for the flowers.
Thank you for the beautiful flowers.
Thank you for the beautiful flowers.
I'm well aware of the situation.
You're not as smart as you think you are.
Don't let anyone in his room.
I wish I hadn't believed Tom.
He had a blue jacket on.
He is a born poet.
He went to bed.
He went to bed.
He went hunting in the woods.
He told me that his father was a teacher.
He showed me the way to the store.
I hope that he will help me.
He was accused of murder.
He uses the same dictionary as I do.
He was imprisoned.
He isn't as stupid as he looks.
He is watching TV now.
He doesn't have to go to school.
He's the chairman of the committee.
He is capable of teaching French.
He is making great progress in English.
He was no longer dependent on his parents.
He looked very happy.
He seems quite happy.
How fast does he run?
He went to London via Paris.
He is accustomed to the work.
He was able to read the book.
He runs very fast.
He showed me how to use this camera.
He does not have to do this.
He always takes sides with her.
I think he is from Australia, but I'm not sure.
His daughter grew to be a beautiful woman.
He had three sons.
I saw him enter the store.
I haven't met him.
He comes back from Sydney today.
I hope to see you the next time you are in Tokyo.
All at once, I heard a scream.
I was born and raised in the country.
Watanabe is my family name.
War doesn't make anybody happy.
My father takes a walk in the park.
My son is small for his age.
When I grow up, I want to be an English teacher.
Here comes our teacher.
He and I are childhood friends.
The teacher wrote English sentences on the blackboard.
The teacher allowed him to go home.
See you there.
Here's a picture of her.
Winter was long here and summer short.
Birds are singing in the trees.
The population of Shanghai is as large as that of Tokyo.
Do you often go to see plays?
Do you know this man in the picture?
School starts at 8:40.
School starts at 8:40.
Name and address, please.
I want my father to see the movie.
Next year I'll go abroad.
I was impressed by his music.
Tom died because of me.
Tom fell off the chair.
Ken didn't have the nerve to try it again.
I met her in the street.
I let the cat out of the house.
I was told to wait for a while.
I went to the movies with my brother.
I seem to have lost my purse.
I like meat better than fish.
I'd prefer meat to fish.
I hope to see you again before long.
I talked about music.
I was aware of that fact.
I'm shorter than you.
I made these boxes myself.
My mother doesn't like my watching TV.
I went to Nagasaki.
My hobby is listening to music.
My grandfather died when I was boy.
My grandmother lives in the country.
My camera is different from yours.
My sister goes to a university.
Give me a glass of milk!
My uncle gave him a present.
As for me, I am satisfied.
It was in Kyoto that I first met her.
We watched a new program on television.
Are you going to the theater tonight?
My wife looked surprised.
I'm too busy to talk to you now.
His behavior is very odd today.
His behavior is very odd today.
Fish is cheap today.
Keiko sings.
Kaoru has gone to America.
We are almost there.
Thank you for the advice.
Tom has stopped crying.
Tom is in the building.
Tom isn't always busy.
Tom isn't bothering me.
Tom isn't finished yet.
Tom said he was thirty.
Tom said you were busy.
Could you come over right now?
Could you come over right now?
Tom called to say he couldn't attend the meeting.
Tom called me almost every day.
I'm saying I'm not sure.
I never forgot that.
I never lie to you.
I never lied to Tom.
We're the same size.
Tom doesn't have anything to eat.
Tom lost hope.
Would you mind if I have a look?
Would you mind if I have a look?
It matters to me.
This word better fits here.
I'm sorry for calling so late. I just wanted to hear your voice.
What's your favorite television program?
It was a pleasure meeting you, Mr Tamori.
Let me see the pictures you took in Paris.
What did you do with your camera?
I wonder if you are truly happy.
That is the shop where I used to work.
American women didn't have the right to vote.
My uncle has a deep interest in art.
I'm sure she will turn up soon.
Glass is made from sand.
Carl looked very happy.
Coffee is Brazil's main product.
This soup tastes good.
This shirt is too small for me to wear.
I'm surprised to see you here.
How far is it from here to Hakata?
This bed looks solid.
This is good meat.
This is a picture of my grandmother.
I'd like to reserve a seat on this train.
Can you do this problem?
These are gifts for my friends.
This is a wooden comb.
Who does this suitcase here belong to?
This tastes like tea.
This is the best camera in the store.
Judy sent her children to bed.
Judy spends a lot of time looking in the mirror.
That coffee smells good.
Everybody laughed at the boy.
That baby does nothing but cry.
That student runs fast, doesn't he?
The new building is enormous.
My dad just called.
Is it very far from here?
Where's the museum?
Where's the museum?
He told his sons to help each other after his death.
I'm sorry for calling so late. I just wanted to hear your voice.
I'm sorry for calling so late. I just wanted to hear your voice.
And then something very strange happened.
My uncle is the only person who uses this word.
You can see the roof of the house from there.
It all depends on the weather.
Are you afraid of silence?
Are you afraid of silence?
What does silence sound like?
I have no experience.
They are the poorest of the poor.
If Tom is happy, I'm happy.
Are you positive it was Tom?
Tell Tom that I'll be calling him.
I'm sure Tom is going to like that.
I'm sure Tom is going to like that.
Do you think Tom knew you were lying to him?
Do you think Tom knew you were lying to him?
You're not stupid at all.
Tom left a gift for you.
You can be sure of that.
You don't even know the half of it!
You don't even know the half of it!
He was never content.
He was never content.
Mary's husband is rich.
I gave everything to Tom.
I don't remember where I put my car keys.
I don't feel like doing that right now.
How badly is Tom hurt?
The sun is a star.
This book is about education.
Hindsight is always twenty-twenty.
She is the woman I am marrying.
Please don't forget to post the letter.
Tom has just finished eating dinner.
I didn't expect to see you at a place like this.
Tom came home drunk last night.
That's good advice.
Finnish is a very interesting language.
I didn't know we weren't supposed to do that.
The man suddenly started shooting his gun.
The sick man's life is in danger.
The girl lifted the heavy box with one hand.
Few people live on the island.
It's a TV.
It may be that he will never be famous.
Why don't you give up smoking?
I'm just watching TV.
Tom is as tall as Jack.
Why did you choose that particular subject?
Naoki is as old as Kaori.
The bus stopped in every village.
There is a car in front of the building.
You talk as if you were the boss.
If he had stayed at home that day, he would not have met with disaster.
I was expecting you last night.
It stopped snowing an hour ago.
I called my mother up from the station.
Tom looked shocked.
Tom wants to marry Mary and John's daughter.
Child, why are you crying? Tell me.
Is it any warmer inside?
What is the theme of his latest novel?
They left me alone.
We're used to it.
We're used to that.
We're still a team.
We're getting married next spring.
Don't you realize what you've done?
Tom put his shirt on.
He just texted me.
Tom seems to be happy.
Tom seems to be having fun.
Tom seems to be in good health.
This is a knife.
Pretty soon you will stop thinking of her.
When did you get up?
What made her do so?
I wonder what happened.
Summer has come.
I have nothing particular to say.
Our team were wearing red shirts.
A student wants to see you.
What time does school begin?
You like it, huh?
I lost my wife last year.
Money doesn't grow on trees, you know.
What did you come here so early for?
I have three choices.
It belongs to us.
Tom is a little younger than your daughter.
Tom is a little younger than your daughter.
Tom closed his eyes and took a deep breath.
I'm no longer a teacher.
What impression do you have of China?
Tom wants us to wait.
This movie isn't that interesting, is it?
They won't start the meeting without us.
I'm not used to this kind of hard work.
I'm sorry that I can't help you today.
You'll soon get used to the noise.
I'm about the same age as you are.
I'm about your age.
I'm about the same age as you are.
I'm about your age.
I get paid thirty dollars an hour.
We're not speaking to each other.
I'm sure we have a lot in common.
I'm not going anywhere on Monday.
Can I have a look at your newspaper?
A guy named Tom called here yesterday.
The production of the automobile started in the 1980.
Don't forget about me!
Don't forget about me!
Don't forget about me!
Don't forget about me!
What was the happiest moment of your life?
What was the happiest moment of your life?
They're talking with each other.
What's the exchange rate today?
I shouldn't have gone anywhere.
Tom was always a quiet child.
Tom had nothing else to lose.
It's time for you to get up.
Tom will never believe that.
For more information, please visit our website.
Whose things are those?
Tom wasn't happy about it.
You're always happy.
I never thought I'd want to buy an iPad.
He confessed that he loved her.
Tom is throwing stones at birds.
I'll call you as soon as I know.
I get knowledge by reading books.
It's cheaper to go by train.
It's cheaper to go by train.
Did you really believe that?
Did you really believe that?
You must never forget that.
You must never forget that.
We must be absolutely sure.
You're on the wrong train.
You're on the wrong train.
You were absolutely right.
You were absolutely right.
Tom heard a strange noise.
I'm almost as tall as Tom.
You're a really bad liar.
Tom is young and healthy.
I won't be busy tomorrow.
Tom is certainly above thirty.
There's no school today.
I'm the same age as Tom.
I said I'd wait.
You'll be safe with me.
You forgot my birthday.
You forgot my birthday.
Let's just talk about you.
I told you it wouldn't take too long.
Who hit you?
They won't believe you.
They won't believe you.
How long did it take him to write this novel?
How long did it take him to write this novel?
It's not my birthday.
I'll be back by 2:30.
You were both drunk.
You were both drunk.
It's in the kitchen.
I'm free until 2:30.
Take your seats.
How much time does it take?
Tom is drunk again.
I can't lie to Tom.
I'm busy today.
I'm busy today.
You're early.
Thanks and good night!
Is the meeting today or tomorrow?
Everybody has their favorite drink.
I'll call you later today.
Where do you study?
Tom is about the same age as I am.
Is your daughter here?
Is your daughter here?
We'll give you a call.
We'll give you a call.
How old is that church?
Do you know who this belongs to?
She's lying.
That's perfectly natural.
But he's so cute!
I was busy with housework.
I was busy with housework.
We did our homework.
I understand everything now.
I wish you happiness.
I won't permit it.
Do you remember when her birthday is?
Do you remember when her birthday is?
It doesn't concern you.
It doesn't concern you.
It doesn't look good.
It doesn't matter much.
It doesn't matter much.
Try it yourself.
That doesn't matter now.
The rest doesn't matter.
They didn't like Tom.
I met my friends yesterday.
Tom can't believe it.
Tell me how it looks.
Are you trying to prove something?
Mum says that I speak too quietly.
She says he will not give up smoking.
We are too busy at the moment.
I work as a teacher.
This movie is for adults, not for children.
At least we have a roof over our heads.
Are you talking to yourself again?
Are you talking to yourself again?
Are you talking to yourself again?
You can wait for me here.
You can wait for me here.
Everyone was dressed in black.
What's your favorite weapon?
Do you know where the hospital is?
I can't believe Tom remembers me.
It's your birthday today, isn't it?
I think she'll succeed.
My garden is small.
What a fool I am to think that she loves me!
You never should've left your husband.
This is the first time I've seen a sun clock.
How many classes do you have on Monday?
How many classes do you have on Monday?
The Taj Mahal is one of the seven wonders of the world.
Tom invited me to stay overnight.
I'm your conscience.
He stopped reading newspapers.
I don't know whether he is dead or alive.
I don't know whether he is dead or alive.
You know that that was our duty.
Could you translate this sentence?
Could you translate this sentence?
I wonder if Tom can help us.
If only Tom would keep his big mouth shut!
We celebrated his birthday.
I saw tears in his eyes.
Millie is listening to music.
I like blue.
I like blue.
It's quite natural for him to think so.
It's quite natural for him to think so.
Without science, there is no future.
I'm sure Tom would've told me if he'd known.
You don't have to respond.
You don't have to respond.
Tom sat at the far end of the table.
You look a little green around the gills.
You look a little green around the gills.
You've drunk too much.
The third most frequent letter in Esperanto is "e".
The two laughed.
Tom has been singing all day.
Tom put his hands into his pockets.
My mother doesn't like to watch TV.
My mother hates to watch the television.
Has she read this article?
Has he read this article?
I'm the captain of this ship.
This place smells bad.
You're never going to believe what happened today.
Next time, don't come so early.
I like talking to you.
Don't open your books.
Tom just talked to me.
She can leave tomorrow.
He can leave tomorrow.
You can leave tomorrow.
I think you should talk to someone.
It's too early to leave.
I think you ought to listen.
Who else helped you?
Who else helped you?
Is today your birthday?
Is today her birthday?
Is today his birthday?
I think there's been some mistake.
I think there's been some mistake.
I reckon that's a good idea.
Buy a book and read it.
I saw you out here by yourself and thought you might like someone to talk to.
He's capable of doing it.
I know where we can get one.
I like my teachers.
The banks are closed today.
Why did you want to speak to me?
Why did you want to speak to me?
Why did you want to speak to me?
I found something I thought I'd lost.
I had no idea what I was doing.
I assumed you were happy.
What does this smell like?
I can't let you do this.
Who invited you here?
Who invited you here?
I hope you enjoyed your stay with us.
We should be dead by now.
We should be there in about thirty minutes.
Blue is my favourite colour.
We should be through soon.
The horse is black.
My mommy and daddy will love me no matter what.
I can't let you go.
I can't let you go.
Allow me to go.
Allow me to go.
I never go anywhere.
Now I'm used to it.
Now I'm used to it.
Everyone was busy.
You look better today.
You look better today.
You should've waited.
You should've waited.
What kind of fish is that?
It doesn't fit well here.
This table doesn't fit well here.
I'd like to know who took those pictures.
Tom looks a little pale.
You can't die if you're already dead.
Have you finished doing your homework yet?
This church is a very famous and beautiful place.
One of her three cars is blue and the others are white.
Come back to bed, Honey.
He was shorter than me.
Don't come so early next time.
We've got to leave early.
We've got to leave early.
Never forget that.
Why don't you talk to him?
That was your idea.
I hope you're not alone.
Why don't you talk to me now?
How many ways are there to do that?
I'd love to meet him.
Tom didn't tell anyone why he was late.
I waited for an important call all weekend.
Nobody here knows what Tom looks like.
Come back in an hour.
Are you saying you don't want to be a teacher anymore?
What a beautiful house!
Listen, he doesn't know what he's saying.
Are you happy, Tom?
What do you want me to do about it?
It isn't impossible.
Would you like to give it a try?
I wanted to talk about it.
I want to talk to all of them.
You can't always do what you want.
The proof is in the pudding.
He wanted to meet you.
Does he know how she feels about him?
Aren't you a little young?
I thought you'd be happy.
I don't expect you to be my friend.
I can't talk to girls.
I can't do this job without you.
They're here for me.
May I ask why it is that you don't want to talk about it?
I can't believe I listened to you.
I can't believe you're doing this.
No one wants to talk about books anymore.
No one uses that word anymore.
I already feel much better.
He told me to meet him at his house.
Did I make the team?
Did I make the team?
The tree grew very tall.
The tree grew very tall.
They climbed down the tree.
I'm sure you would've done the same for me.
I'm sure you would've done the same for me.
You're going to have to wait here.
They'll believe anything.
I've already read this book.
Would you like to see my new car?
I expected better of you.
I expected better of him.
I had no idea what I should do.
Do you really wanna talk about this now?
She's a fine young lady.
I have a pain in my neck.
Just leave me alone.
I'm trying to talk to you.
There are a lot of bridges in this city.
I can't live without my cat.
I can't believe this is happening.
I like to receive letters from friends.
They should have the right to decide for themselves.
Did you read it entirely?
When was the last time you left work early?
Men are better at this than women.
He tried it with a friend.
I am very pleased with my new house.
He seemed to know everything about me.
It's important to know one's limits.
English is not my maternal language and I realize that I still have a lot to learn.
Something seems to be bothering Tom.
Nature knows no boundaries.
Nobody believed him.
No one believed that.
Love knows no limits.
They had nothing to eat.
It's not spring yet.
It's not spring yet.
I don't like being treated this way.
Try and stop me.
Try and stop me.
Are you sure that's what you want?
Are you sure that's what you want?
Tom wanted to come with us.
When does Tom usually get up?
When did Tom wake up?
She isn't kind to him.
Tom likes popcorn with lots of butter.
I said turn right.
You said you wanted to be a teacher.
Do you like French wines?
I can do that if you let me.
Don't stop playing.
Keep trying.
Stay a while and listen.
Let's be best friends forever.
None of this is good.
I hope you don't do that.
You said you were happy.
The teacher speaks quietly.
You aren't as short as me.
How are we going to get there?
I can't find time to read the book.
Don't forget about me.
Tom wants to talk to all of us.
Somebody is watching me.
I have never seen such a thing.
Can we speak now?
He fell for it hook, line, and sinker.
People are more important than money.
Pink is for girls.
No one gave up hope.
He left here two or three days ago.
Tom found the test difficult.
Tom found the key he had been looking for.
This is just a rumor.
She's been acting odd lately.
He's been acting odd lately.
I think it's not a good idea.
I think it's not a good idea.
I think it's not a good idea.
I think it's not a good idea.
He lost a fortune in the stock market.
Have you decided on a name for the cat?
Tom wasn't busy.
One of Jesus' disciples was named Paul.
You're entitled to your opinion.
When was the box opened?
Have you heard any good jokes lately?
Do you really enjoy doing that kind of thing?
I heard laughter in the next room.
The school is keeping me occupied.
It's odd being in here after so long.
I've always been interested in science.
We can talk about this later.
Tom likes running.
Are you sure you're OK?
I don't feel safe here.
I still can't believe I did it.
I still can't believe I did that.
This word is difficult.
Tom sang a French song for us.
Tom sang a French song for us.
They said it was important.
You said it was important.
You said it was important.
You said it was important.
I wanted Tom to see me in this suit.
I wanted Tom to see me in this suit.
Tom acted alone.
Tom answered immediately.
Tom answered immediately.
He enjoys reading scientific articles.
I'll go see if Tom is busy.
Who do you want to win?
She was busy.
I have many friends I can talk to.
Tom wanted to talk about something else.
It's possible that Tom isn't telling the truth.
Now that you've decided to quit your job, you look happy.
I think I'd like to be a teacher.
Before I met you, I never felt this way.
There seems to be a mistake.
Will I still be able to do it?
We'll never make it.
This is also my first time.
It was a mistake to come here.
I hope that you aren't afraid.
All of them are good teachers.
Tom doesn't think this is such a good idea.
Tom is in.
Tom didn't like living in the city.
Tom made a few serious mistakes.
Tom left three days ago.
What kind of question is that? Do you really expect me to answer that?
Why don't we talk about something else?
I never felt this way before I met you.
Let me show you how to do that.
Let's hope that doesn't happen.
Tom is in front.
She wasn't able to meet him.
She wasn't able to talk to him.
She'd like him to leave right away.
I love her so much I would die for her.
Tom is downstairs.
She dumped him for a younger man.
She invited him in.
She didn't want him to go out with other women.
Tom is our neighbor.
Tom is in the hospital.
I'm sure I can find it.
They left early.
Your sister is beautiful as ever.
He should come right away!
What do you say to calling it a day?
How about calling it a day?
There's no mistake.
Tom is very busy now.
He told us that we should leave right away.
Hey everyone, please listen.
Are you sure that this man is called Tom?
She left here right away.
I asked him to leave at once.
I've nothing to give.
My parents let me go there.
This flower is the most beautiful of all flowers.
I met a student from America yesterday.
Walk ahead of me.
My father is always forgetting things.
She is not as young as she looks.
She seems to be in trouble. Tell her what to do.
She went from place to place in search of him.
I had almost finished my work when she came.
I know of her, but I have never met her.
What's your favorite cold weather drink?
I'm dead to love.
Can I see the wine list?
People are so stupid.
Let us tell you why we came.
The ladies' room is on the third floor.
I heard you lost your job.
Tom said he had been busy.
I am very interested in music.
Unfortunately, or perhaps fortunately, no.
I suddenly realized that everything in my life was not an accident.
Do you want to go back to the hospital?
Do you want to go back to the hospital?
Are you sure you have to leave?
Tom wants me to take his place.
What's your proposal?
As far as I am concerned, I have nothing to say.
We think it's a good idea.
You promised you wouldn't tell.
You promised you wouldn't tell.
All my friends and family are dead.
Millions of people lost their jobs.
They had to work all year round.
She came out of there.
Give her this letter when she comes.
He was about to speak.
Not all of them are happy.
There is little hope that they are alive.
He believed in the truth.
He is apt to forget people's name.
He has as many books as his father does.
He is popular with his men.
He himself tried it.
He knows this town inside out.
He would let me help him.
Have him come.
He has been waiting for an hour.
Either come in or go out.
Anyone can do it if they try.
The teacher asked me which book I liked.
Our teacher likes his new car.
This road is very narrow.
Go figure.
All the girls helped each other.
She had nothing else to drink.
I'm as tall as my father.
I made him do so.
I waited for her to speak.
I loved reading when I was a child.
I had been reading for an hour.
Are you willing to help me with that work?
The trouble is that my son does not want to go to school.
Are there any good films on this week?
You talk too much, he said.
I really need a drink now.
Is your father a teacher?
I'm very happy to make your acquaintance.
King, it is time you said my boy" again." "But I don't want to!"
Give this book to whoever wants it.
This book should help you a lot.
We'd better get a move on.
This is the biggest car in the world.
That's why I came back so soon.
Must I go there at once?
Show me how to do it.
He has the ability to do the work.
The nation ceased to exist.
Don't leave it open.
The teacher answers every question we ask.
A lot of people were waiting for him.
Women live longer than men in most countries.
I've never been spoken to like that.
Let me hear it.
What kind of work will you do?
It's a problem any way you look at it.
Would you like to go have a drink?
You will soon cease to think of her.
I'll give you as many as you like.
I expect you know all about it.
You may go at once.
You will soon come to like this town.
She heard a noise.
Are you aware of how much she loves you?
I should read that book.
How do you usually spend your weekends?
Your bag is on my desk.
She looks very sick.
She gave him all of her silver.
It's like a scene from a movie, isn't it?
Please read it once more.
Read it again, please.
You've got a nice smile.
The fitting room is occupied.
I like red meat.
I like red meat.
There is no hot water.
I couldn't believe what I was seeing.
I couldn't believe what I was seeing.
The rooms are all occupied.
Is the horse black?
Judging from his appearance, he is sick.
There are islands in the sea.
Do you want us to call you?
Do you want us to call you?
What does this remind you of?
What does this remind you of?
This program is broadcast biweekly.
I want to cry!
I want to cry!
This is a sign.
We all want to be happy.
It's not the first time I see this sentence.
It's not the first time I see this sentence.
Read this book.
Tom isn't a teacher anymore.
How do you like them apples?
No one will ever believe that. "Well, Tom believed me."
School was fun today.
This is apparently a good sentence.
Make your bed.
Whose bed is that?
But I wasn't afraid.
Tom wanted to cry.
Tom wanted to leave.
Tom wanted to leave.
Tom wanted to be rich.
Tom wanted to be rich.
Tom wanted to be sure.
Tom wanted to meet me.
Tom wanted to meet me.
Tom wanted to meet you.
Tom wanted to meet you.
Tom wanted to talk with you.
Tom wanted to talk with you.
Tom wanted to save the world.
My pen is old. I want a new one.
Tom wanted to leave, but he couldn't.
Tom and I are the same age.
Lake Geneva is the largest lake in Switzerland.
When there's a will, there's a way.
It rhymes, therefore it is true!
What's your favorite domestic beer?
The sons are loved by the parents.
Will you take this flower to Kate?
He's not always happy.
Today was a beautiful day.
I'd like to apply for a job.
I saw the queen.
She didn't get the joke.
He reminds me of somebody.
She reminds me of someone.
Trust me, I'm a doctor.
Tom looks confused.
My sister went to Italy to study.
The student raised his hand.
Her brother goes to school by bus.
Whether he comes or not is irrelevant.
The hotel has a pleasant atmosphere.
I handled it.
Tom made me come here.
Tom isn't always happy.
He did the work in two days.
I bought milk today.
I never really thought about it.
You know I don't have a car.
You know I don't have a car.
The urban population of America is increasing.
If you run into trouble, I'll help, and so will my father.
Children threw stones at him.
If there was no sun, all the animals would be dead.
To tell the truth, I've already seen that movie.
You should go to bed early.
I went to sleep as soon as I got home.
I haven't finished that job yet.
You look good in those clothes.
I was in the hospital a few days ago.
Seen from a distance, that rock looks like a human face.
Tom bought a present for his daughter.
I phoned.
Danger is my middle name.
My father always sleeps while watching the TV.
I really want to meet Kumiko.
When will your father arrive?
She talked to the chairperson.
The entire world desires peace.
That hotel has a homey atmosphere.
How will you go to Osaka?
I'm looking at that flower.
Isn't that what we were supposed to do?
That film's really interesting.
That film's really interesting.
The train is very fast.
Their lifestyle is different from ours.
It goes without saying that I love you.
Tom isn't poor.
You will be busy tomorrow.
You'll be busy tomorrow, won't you?
She should get to the school in an hour.
I want to see this movie.
I didn't like the result.
The telephone is ringing. If you want, I'll answer it.
I'll do any kind of work.
Do you want a glass? There is one on the table.
He is still having doubts.
Are you for or against the project?
Opinions are not facts.
I sang for two hours.
In August, I'm going to Japan with my friends.
How can I solve this problem?
Tom is poor.
Tom doesn't watch TV with you, does he?
I want to give him a present for his birthday.
We shall try to answer the following questions.
This soup needs a bit more salt.
What kind of fool do you think I am?
I just barely managed to pass the test.
Wow, that looks tasty.
Why didn't you read the magazine?
The blue car is expensive.
The weather is beautiful.
He went home yesterday.
I'm sorry, I've got to go.
There was no cat.
There weren't any cats.
When does No.4 bus arrive?
Please come into my home.
Please come into my home.
They went straight to bed.
I was in bed when you phoned.
I was in bed when you phoned.
I told Tom that I was busy.
I think you'll be pleased.
I bought a pen for your birthday present.
No matter what anyone says, I plan to go.
Please come to my house.
No matter what he may say, don't trust him.
Tom is still conscious.
Children grow up very quickly.
Do you know any French songs?
Do you know who has the key?
Do you know who has the key?
This is the very book that I wanted to read.
Her idea is better than yours.
The boy was searching for the key that he had lost.
I'm going to read the book.
There were soldiers on these ships.
Has Tom been crying?
The winters were bitterly cold.
I'll play with Naoko this afternoon.
What if I refuse?
This tree is older than that car.
This sentence has various meanings.
Wouldn't you like to drink some tea?
Everyone aspires to have a better life.
Where can we make a phone call?
I'm open to suggestions.
Any book will do provided it is interesting.
I told you it was a stupid plan.
I saw Tom talking on the phone.
He was watching television all day.
Do you think she will reach the top of the mountain?
Tom is a very gentle person.
Tom has already done his homework.
Tom has been acting strangely lately.
Tom is probably still doing his homework.
You have to help Tom with his homework.
Tom is starting to lose hope.
Tom's mind is clearly elsewhere.
You'll end up in the hospital.
How did Tom get away?
We'll meet in an hour.
This is the life that I chose.
I hope that you are good.
She seems excited.
Tom didn't like my idea.
We want to talk to you about a problem.
We want to talk to you about a problem.
I'm pretty sure I can find a job.
It started raining hard. Because of that, we played inside.
He brought me back in his car.
The car didn't stop.
Tom is having a bit of trouble with his new car.
She's wondering where the key is.
My brother is small but he has grown a lot recently.
He promises not to drink anymore.
He claimed he knew you well.
I can't decide if I'm happy or sad.
Why's Tom always here?
Why's Tom always here?
He got a nice job recently.
This is our main objective.
The more we learn, the more we know.
He looks old, but he hasn't reached 30 yet.
I'm not disturbing you, am I?
Why do you attach importance to this incident?
Why do you consider that incident important?
He thought up a new idea.
He went to the hospital yesterday.
I'm too busy to go.
I was invited by an old friend.
How long does it last?
These clothes suit you.
These clothes suit you.
I am no longer able to handle the chest pain.
I'm Paul, your roommate.
I'm your roommate Paul.
I am a Hyogo University student.
A person named Itoh wants to meet you.
The students ought to study more.
I never heard him lie.
I lost my trust in him.
In any case, it's always my fault.
I don't like that kind of music.
I can't find the address of my hotel.
He is trying to sing.
She can sing.
I liked a lot the article I read.
Where did you find his photo?
Where did you find her photo?
Where did you find his photo?
Where did you find her photo?
Where did you find his photo?
Where did you find her photo?
I don't like the dark.
I don't like the way you look.
I don't like the way you look.
We're aware of that.
He wants to spend time with his daughter.
She wants to spend time with her daughter.
He was struck off the list.
Tom doesn't want to go to the lake.
This base is now under our control.
This base is now under our control.
That was a good movie.
He was not the kind of man that people liked.
The students entered the classroom two by two.
The students entered the classroom two by two.
You're going to like working for me.
You're going to like working for me.
You're going to like working for me.
You're going to like working for me.
The horse is black.
Tom and the others left early.
I heard you have a beautiful voice.
I've done half the work, and now I can take a break.
I gave it back.
I gave it back.
I liked your story.
I got what you asked for.
I got what you asked for.
I got what you asked for.
I got what you asked for.
I got what you asked for.
I got what you asked for.
She lost her dog.
He spoke to the teacher.
Mt. Everest is the highest peak in the world.
Many had lost their arms or legs.
What is the good of doing it?
Tom built a wall around his house.
Is there a public toilet in this building?
Is there a public toilet in this building?
Tom said he would try.
Tom looked at the map.
Well, you know what they say.
Tom is about your age.
Tom is a poor student.
Tom is a little drunk.
Tom is a good teacher.
They're very capable.
Which movie did you watch today?
I'm offering you work.
I'm offering you work.
I'm not going to stop.
I'm lucky I'm alive.
Give me your gun.
No one showed up.
There's no knife.
There are no knives.
I lost the watch.
Almost no one believed him.
And where is the boss? - "At dinner".
You're lucky Tom is your friend.
I can see the stars in the sky.
I'm impressed with your French.
I'm impressed with your French.
Will you sell me your house?
Was her story true?
I hope that is not the case.
How many magazines are on the desk?
This student's books are new.
What's his teacher's name?
It's true that she's dead.
I don't feel like drinking vodka.
I don't feel like drinking vodka.
We met a writer.
The train was so crowded that I had to keep standing all the way.
What time do you get up every day?
What time do you get up every day?
I will return your book on Tuesday if I have finished it.
Tom said that he doesn't like this color.
Tom said that he doesn't like this color.
I'll call this evening at seven.
I'll ring you up at seven this evening.
I'll ring you up at seven this evening.
We're going hunting.
Tom phoned to say he couldn't come.
She hasn't phoned since she went to London.
Where do you speak Esperanto?
We don't have class today.
Spring has returned.
Have you seen my keys?
Do you know where my keys are?
Do you know where my keys are?
Do you know where my key is?
Do you know where my key is?
I phoned Mary, but the line was busy.
I phoned Mary, but the line was busy.
Is the lake deep?
I don't think you should quit your job.
Tom promised to be here by 2:30.
Father takes a walk every day.
My father is going to go abroad next week.
We've run out of paper for the photocopier.
Whose clock is it?
Give me another example.
It is in fact your fault.
It is in fact your fault.
Father named me after his aunt.
Am I safe here?
Many people were killed in the plane accident.
Miwako, I want you to meet Kenny.
She is not always happy.
She bought a new house the other day.
She is used to staying up all night.
She must have been rich in those days.
She went to Paris for the first time.
She must have finished the work yesterday.
She quickly went up the stairs.
She tried not to cry.
She bought this pen at that store.
She is out of danger.
The sun rises in the east and sets in the west.
What did he tell you about me?
Water is heavier than oil.
Wait for me there.
Look out! There's a car coming.
Another world is possible.
She's like my own daughter.
I treated her as my own daughter.
Save me a seat.
We left Africa forever.
How do you spend your time?
Esperanto belongs to everyone. Unfortunately, not everybody knows that.
I'm satisfied with everything.
You have to help her, but quickly.
He didn't look like a clever boy.
I believe he is coming tomorrow.
Nothing has no meaning.
He took the wrong train by mistake.
He repeated the same mistake.
It's impossible for me to believe what you are saying.
He was shown the photo by her.
He is good at mathematics.
He kept me waiting for a long time.
He is old enough to drink.
He saw there what he had dreamed about.
He is the last man that I want to talk with.
He smiled at us and got on the train.
He sent me a present.
He has built two houses so far.
He has been very busy this week.
He stopped smoking last year.
He has nothing to do.
He denied having said such a thing.
He had barely enough money to buy bread and milk.
He has gone to Switzerland.
He is on the point of leaving for Canada.
I was fortunate to make his acquaintance.
He did a very foolish thing.
Take your hand out of your pocket!
Take your hand out of your pocket!
I've never been abroad.
Tom said not to call.
Tom says he was busy.
You'd like Tom.
You'd like Tom.
We'll call Tom.
Who helped Tom?
Tom watched quietly.
I am not young enough to know everything.
You're impressed, aren't you?
When was the last time that you used this?
When was the last time that you used this?
I go to work by car every day.
Does this come in any other color?
Does this come in any other color?
Speak louder. Your grandfather's hearing isn't so good.
I heard you were rich.
Tom felt a pain in his side.
His brother goes to school by bus.
It's a crime the way he treats his children.
Will you sell your house to him?
How old might his grandfather be?
The museum is around the corner.
The box was open and empty.
I will come, weather permitting.
The earth is different from the other planets in that it has water.
Would after lunch be convenient for you?
Is there any coffee in the kitchen?
What are the measurements of the shelf?
The boat sank to the bottom.
A captain is in charge of his ship and its crew.
He makes most, if not all, of the important decisions for his company.
Students must not use this toilet.
You should not leave the baby alone.
The teacher told me study harder.
The teacher collected the papers.
The people came out of their houses to listen to his music.
We have no classes on Wednesday afternoons.
She was satisfied with the new dress.
I wouldn't bet on that if I were you.
You should think about your future.
Hold on a minute, please. I'll see if he is in.
Autumn is just around the corner.
You should work in the interests of humanity.
We are all eager to see the movie.
We have little opportunity to use English.
I'm killing time.
I like hot tea better than cold.
The higher we go up, the thinner the air becomes.
I called her up.
I have climbed Mt. Fuji three times.
I'm getting married in October.
People say I look about the same age as my sister.
May I call you tonight? "Sure."
The tree fell down by itself.
Butter and cheese are made from milk.
How did you come up with such a good idea?
How did you come up with such a good idea?
Tom was obviously happy.
Please send me a letter.
Tom isn't going to marry you.
I'll ring you up tonight.
He asked if she was rich.
Bring me my bag.
Bring me my bag.
Allow me to explain.
I get what I want.
I get what I want.
I met her for the first time in Kyoto.
Strange, isn't it?
It was a pleasure.
Nobody called you.
Nobody called you.
Nobody called him.
Nobody called Tom.
Nobody called her.
Nobody called us.
Nobody called them.
Is everyone happy?
I'm sorry I asked.
I'm on page three.
I'm not sure when I'll get home.
We'll lose everything.
I regret that I did that.
Where's your shirt?
Put some music on.
Tom cried a lot.
What kind of fish do you want?
Just tell Tom he'll have to wait another day.
The keys were in my bag.
If he doesn't go to school, I will not talk to him anymore.
That's why I think I'll be chosen.
The colour of Esperanto is green.
What does Tom eat for lunch?
Don't use my pen.
I want to be clear about that.
I would even simply leave the word "strangely".
Now it's too late.
Now it's too late.
This song is a love song.
You should've called Tom.
Do you want to leave?
Do you want to leave?
I wonder why he is so angry.
How long ago did the bus leave?
We've tried everything.
Tatoeba: We've got sentences older than you.
Tatoeba: We've got sentences older than you.
Tom doesn't speak to me.
Explain your idea more clearly.
What page?
I should have married your sister.
Be careful not to slip!
I left my key in my room.
I left my key in my room.
I hope Tom wins.
That will take hours.
That would be fair.
That would be interesting.
Did you get in trouble?
My father's job is interesting.
Tom didn't expect that answer.
I tried to save you.
I tried to save you.
They abandoned the hill to enemy forces.
Tom opened the window to get some fresh air.
What gives you the right to talk to me like that?
What gives you the right to talk to me like that?
How old were you when you stopped believing in Santa Claus?
How old were you when you stopped believing in Santa Claus?
Teacher, I will write it in pen.
I wouldn't go under any circumstances.
I don't know how to speak French properly.
I don't remember promising that.
He hit me in the eye.
He took advantage of the opportunity.
I don't think that Tom will want to go with us.
I don't think they'll allow you to do that.
I don't think they'll allow you to do that.
She says she will call you later.
He is one of my neighbors.
He wanted to be in the newspapers.
Apparently, the murder happened in a locked room.
She is both rich and very beautiful.
Who searches, finds.
We're practically brothers.
I can't lift this. It's too heavy.
Is it true that you closed the shop at nine?
Is it true that you closed the shop at nine?
I gave the milk to the cat.
If you don't behave, Santa won't come.
You just made a very big mistake.
I wasn't busy last week.
I'm up to my neck in work.
I intended to have finished the work.
I enjoyed reading about your dreams.
I know an English teacher who comes from Canada.
I have been busy for two days.
My mother is always busy.
My mother gets up early every morning.
I am forbidden to stay out after 10 o'clock.
I don't like the way he speaks to me.
My house is beyond that bridge.
We went to Rome, where we stayed a week.
We learned that English is an international language.
We managed to get some foreign stamps.
We met in front of the school.
In this apartment lives a wicked spirit.
I don't know how to handle children.
I recall less and less of my childhood.
Did you mail the letter yesterday or today?
I'll call you up this evening.
The trouble is that we have no money.
I hope everything will turn out well in the end.
I'll apply for the job today.
The higher you climb, the colder it becomes.
Nothing but a miracle can save her now.
Would two o'clock be all right?
It's odd being in here after so long.
I charge high rates.
You are way out of your league.
I thought you said you weren't interested.
Tom is lucky to still be alive.
I haven't smoked for ages.
I haven't smoked for ages.
Seven is believed to be a lucky number.
Let me introduce my mother to you.
Can you see the big white building over there?
When are you going to call me?
Look at that cat on the roof.
I need that information as soon as possible.
I need that information as soon as possible.
That white building is a hospital.
There are plenty of guests in the room.
We cannot finish it before Saturday even if everything goes well.
It is very hard to tell what country a person comes from.
My aunt sent me a birthday present.
It's a great honor to be able to meet you.
Where did you get those keys?
How far is it from here to the museum?
I wonder what this phrase means.
That dress seems to be very expensive.
This dress suits you well.
There is a military base near here.
This flower is very beautiful.
Could you send it to this address?
This rope is strong, isn't it?
This novel is more interesting than the one I read last week.
This room is used by teachers.
This is the end of my story.
This probably means war.
This train runs between Tokyo and Osaka.
I can't solve this problem.
This is a story about stars.
Why is dad in the kitchen?
I had no idea you were here.
Tom wants to learn.
This village belongs to the king of Sweden.
I'm poor.
I'm poor.
Tom's a nice guy. Everyone likes him.
I'll call you soon.
Did you notice that?
The soup is so hot I can't drink it.
John drank many bottles of wine.
John's grandmother passed away after a long illness.
Will you please let me go now?
The Smiths are our neighbors.
You'd better go to bed at once.
I'll put some salt in the soup.
Take my word for it.
That American movie was a great success.
How deep is that lake?
Workers at the company went on a strike.
The rumor may be true.
The boy did nothing but cry all day long.
The shop was crowded with young people.
The shop is just in front of the station.
The town fell into ruin.
The man is well-known all over the village.
You can't judge a person if you don't know him well.
Hand me that book, please.
It must be hard for you.
This is not your knife.
Put it where children can't get at it.
It is interesting that no one noticed that mistake.
It happened that the day was my birthday.
Get up as early as you can.
It will get warmer and warmer.
Tom arrived late at the station.
Tom says that he can read a French book.
It seems that Tom is unable to solve the problem.
Tom has been talking on the phone for an hour.
Experience counts in this job.
Experience counts in this job.
Can you deal with it?
Where's the noise coming from?
The horse is thirsty.
The horse is thirsty.
What's your favorite subject in school?
Hand me that book, please.
Do you know Professor Brown by any chance?
Here, I got us a bottle of white wine.
Your tea will get cold if you don't drink it now.
Which is the capital of the United States, Washington or New York?
I haven't met him even once.
He went out in spite of the rain.
The king was executed.
We've been waiting for hours for you to show up.
How many pens are there on the desk?
Strange things happened on her birthday.
Have you made up your mind where to go for the holidays?
I have no more time to talk with you.
I'm very happy you'll be visiting Tokyo next month.
Tom was spot on.
I cannot see the stars. It's cloudy.
I can't forget the scent of his hair.
It's not possible to know everything.
Get him talking.
I'm going to head home.
The more I hear, the more interesting it becomes.
She sat on a chair.
He has two cats, one is white and one is black.
I am sure of her success.
Tom told me it might take a while.
Tom told us a good joke.
Tom told me to get lost.
Tell Tom it's important.
Tell me what this means.
The population of Niue is only about 1,400.
May you be happy, Ricardo.
We have a lot of relatives.
You know everything about me.
You know everything about me.
I don't have time to help you right now.
We'll leave when it stops raining.
Does free will exist?
My health's very bad.
I won't go under any circumstances.
She used to go to the movies on Sundays.
It's obvious Tom doesn't know anything.
I hope to be a journalist.
I'll be glad to.
A sentence doesn't have to be long to be beautiful.
They tried.
I have to finish my book.
I haven't spoken to anybody.
Tom invited me to his birthday party.
I'm sure Tom doesn't want to be here.
I'm sure Tom doesn't want to be here.
I'm sure Tom doesn't want to be here.
I'm sure Tom doesn't want to be here.
What's the matter, Tom? Are you crying?
The building whose roof you can see over there is our church.
I was told not to sit in that chair.
This is really interesting.
Tom didn't go to the hospital.
You must be very busy now.
Tom died a happy man.
Tom isn't weak.
It was a miracle.
I'm learning how to write.
My father gave up smoking last year.
When was the box opened?
Her eyes were shut.
It seems impossible that you're that old.
Let's drop in on the Nakamoris'.
He is handsome as well as rich.
Does this mean you're not coming to help?
The question doesn't concern me.
The class start at ten.
The history course is interesting.
The sickness is taking its course.
Who is watching TV?
It was apparent that someone had taken the money by mistake.
We drove along the coast.
Tom is playing with his cat.
He caught me by the neck.
He took the pen and wrote the address.
This dress is too big for me.
Do you happen to know when Tom is coming back?
I shouldn't have eaten so much.
What kind of fish is that?
The phone is ringing. "I'll get it."
Did you show it to your parents?
Empty your pockets.
Tom wanted to wait for the next bus.
I didn't take it. You can check my pockets.
I didn't take it. You can check my pockets.
I didn't take it. You can check my pockets.
I didn't take it. You can check my pockets.
I don't want to grow up.
Let's drink to that.
Are you sure that's enough?
Are you sure that's enough?
You cannot smoke in this room.
And that's how my mom met my dad.
Let's hope he's all right.
Can't you see Tom is injured?
Let's hope she's all right.
I accept gifts.
This love will never end.
Tom doesn't know what it means.
Tom has asked why we haven't finished yet.
The captain is dead.
Since it was already late, I went to sleep.
Since it was already late, I went to sleep.
I just want to finish this and leave.
At first, I didn't believe him.
My left hand is numb.
Raise your left arm.
I'll phone her tonight.
Spring is late this year.
Freedom of speech is restricted in some countries.
You should've talked to me first.
You should've talked to me first.
What have you come to talk about?
What have you come to talk about?
Tom talks about you all the time.
It seems like Tom wants to talk to you.
It seems like Tom wants to talk to you.
Whose letter is this?
Singing is her thing.
What size do you think I take?
Tom said he wants to talk to you.
Tom said he wants to talk to you.
I could make her talk.
I heard you wanted to talk to me.
I heard you wanted to talk to me.
Summer is the season when women look most beautiful.
Did she show you the picture?
The first word of every sentence should be capitalized.
I'll call you if I hear anything.
Tom said you wanted to talk to me.
Tom said you wanted to talk to me.
Tom knows how to talk to children.
Tom knows how to talk to children.
Tom didn't want to talk to anyone.
What gifts did you ask Santa for?
What gifts did you ask Santa for?
Sometimes I forget to breathe.
When I was little, I believed in Santa.
You know everything about me.
You know everything about me.
You know everything about me.
You know everything about me.
Can we talk about this after lunch?
Tom never talks about his childhood.
You don't want to talk to me, do you?
You don't want to talk to me, do you?
It's hard for Tom to talk about that.
I'm not sure Tom wants to talk to me.
What if Tom doesn't want to talk to me?
I don't think Tom was talking about me.
Will you please stop talking about food?
Tom says he doesn't want to talk to you.
Tom says he doesn't want to talk to you.
Will you please stop talking about food?
Tom is busy now and can't talk with you.
Tom is busy now and can't talk with you.
Tom runs fast.
Tom has no idea what he's talking about.
The person I was just talking to is Tom.
Tell Tom to wait.
Tell Tom to wait.
I have no idea what Tom's talking about.
She went to bed early.
Tom didn't want to talk about his illness.
I have no idea what Tom was talking about.
Tom had no idea what he was talking about.
Tom was talking about me when I entered the room.
Don't forget to write.
Don't forget to write.
Tom was my boyfriend when I was in high school.
That color doesn't look good on me.
When I see this photo, I think of my family.
Everyone will be busy.
Tom gave the dog a piece of meat.
Have you given Tom the key?
Have you given Tom the key?
Did Tom give you back your pen?
Did Tom give you back your pen?
Give Tom the keys.
Give Tom the keys.
I neither walk nor run.
Give Tom my regards.
Give Tom my regards.
I told you Tom wouldn't help.
That's what Tom would've done.
What's Tom suggesting?
I am sure that she will never forgive me.
I've never seen so much blood in my life.
If only we had a daughter!
It's not too late to tell Tom that you love him.
It's not too late to tell him that you love him.
It's not too late to tell her that you love her.
It's not too late to tell him.
It's not too late to tell her.
I didn't know that you loved her so much.
The phone is ringing!
Don't wish anyone evil!
Don't wish anyone evil!
Are you happy with your body?
Are you happy with your body?
Are you happy with your body?
I have tried to talk to him.
I have tried to talk to her.
Which one would you choose?
Which one would you choose?
Which one would you choose?
Which one would you choose?
Which one would you choose?
Which one would you choose?
They hate the rules.
We've got to find the key.
We've got a serious problem here.
We've almost finished.
We've got to act fast.
Did you do your homework by yourself?
Did you do your homework by yourself?
What is inside there?
He's often mistaken for a student.
His spirit failed.
I lost interest.
I lost interest.
Rome is an ancient city.
He hit me by mistake.
She stabbed him in the back.
Almost three thousand people died.
The population of Tokyo is greater than that of London.
He spoke too quickly for the students.
These problems are important to me.
Today is my friend's birthday.
I hope that I can do it.
It was your mistake, not mine.
I wonder what Tom's doing.
Tom said he would stop smoking.
This is also important.
I'm calling the police.
I'm calling the police.
I'm sure Tom is just as scared as you are.
I have another good idea.
It's going to take some time.
It'll take about an hour.
It was so obvious.
Tom, your life's in danger.
How many flies did you kill?
Tom loves nature.
Light is quintessential. Light is life.
I'll wait for him for an hour.
A good sentence is not necessarily a good example sentence.
You're not in danger here.
You're not in danger here.
This was all Tom's idea.
Is Tom in the hospital?
What a shot!
It's prohibited in most countries.
I could barely stand the pain.
Tom will wait.
He sold his country for money.
Tom isn't breathing.
We don't use them anymore.
Am I so different from you?
You've all seen the photos, haven't you?
You should let us help you.
They're playing in the garden.
She sold her Opel and bought a BMW.
What you say is right.
What you say is right.
Why can't we talk now?
A boy is throwing a stone.
I don't like rich people.
I'd never been so afraid.
We will have to wait.
Tom has an eye for modern art.
Tom studies at Harvard.
I'm satisfied with what I have.
I am quite satisfied.
We can't save everyone.
Have you already met Mr Smith?
Tom didn't go to class.
Tom didn't notice any change.
Tom isn't a good liar.
Tom doesn't come here every day, but he comes quite often.
Tom doesn't carry much cash.
Tom does nothing but watch TV all day long.
I have a horse.
I have a horse.
I'm used to this cold weather.
You know almost everything about me.
I just wanted to be happy.
I just want to be happy.
I just wanted to be happy.
Do you have a cat?
Did you watch TV last week? "No, I didn't."
I would like to talk to him face to face.
Go up the stairs.
You call that music? To me it's no more than noise.
Tom may not survive the night.
I really like Jiro Akagawa's novels.
We'll succeed.
I knew you'd be happy.
I knew you'd be happy.
Guinness is my favorite beer.
This matter doesn't concern you.
We had a good conversation.
Tom is just watching television.
Unfortunately, I'll have to pass.
You're off the hook.
It's too soon to tell.
Let's cut right to the heart of the matter.
Rise and shine!
Rise and shine, Tom.
Let's toast to love!
The cops are keeping tabs on him.
I slipped the letter to him.
Tom showed us a picture of his mother.
Won't you meet me halfway?
Why are you wet? "I fell in the water."
Why are you wet? "I fell in the water."
Aha! You went, right?
Do you know Professor López, by any chance?
There are a lot of ways of doing it.
I want you to listen carefully.
I'm not interested in him.
Would you mind not smoking?
Tom looked very pleased.
I know you'll make the right decision.
It's not a horse.
I wonder if anything happened to him.
But that's not the last train, right?
Experience is important.
If I'd known what you were going to do, I'd've tried to stop you.
If I'd known what you were going to do, I'd've tried to stop you.
If I'd known what you were going to do, I'd've tried to stop you.
I don't believe a word you say.
I especially liked the way you sang the second song.
I especially liked the way you sang the second song.
I especially liked the way you sang the second song.
For people who like this sort of thing, this is the sort of thing they will like.
I'm reading an interesting book.
I'm pretty sure that Tom can do it.
Do you remember how to do this?
Do you remember how to do this?
We're from here.
Not knowing what to see, I asked him for advice.
Tom was not able to quit smoking.
Do you feel guilty?
Where can we meet?
The little boy has lost the money given to him by his father.
The little girl grew into a beautiful woman.
They planted these trees.
I can't marry you.
Whose plan is it?
The victory was won at the cost of many lives.
Winter is snow time.
I'm sure he mistook me for my sister.
I'm sure he mistook me for my sister.
That movie is ace.
Winter has gone. Spring has come.
Tom felt like taking a walk.
The soldier became a teacher.
Kimi smiled — I can't believe it!
Spring passed and summer began.
Set cooking time for 1 minute 45 seconds.
I know the sentence must start with a noun.
Father ran short of money and had to borrow some.
Did you sleep yesterday afternoon?
This shirt doesn't fit me anymore.
Study!
My father is exact in money matters.
Tom knows a lot more about that than I do.
She had to stand in the train.
This is a car and that is a bus.
Which one is your favorite?
Tom is probably still sleeping.
Tom is trying to quit smoking.
Tom is trying hard to quit smoking.
Egypt is called "Misr" in Arabic.
I suppose anything's possible.
It's so important to me.
Tom looked hot and tired.
Look at the stars.
Look at the stars.
He is still dependent on his parents.
He fell head-long into the river.
He is not altogether a fool.
How do you prove that?
They're just using you.
I didn't see that one coming!
It's so painful. Stop it!
You're the same age as my son.
Tom was right about that.
The two answers are both correct.
The leaves have changed colors.
I can't believe you remembered.
I can't believe you remembered.
I can't believe you remembered.
I can't believe you remembered.
Tom isn't very different from anybody else.
Everybody was very well dressed.
I'm not dressed.
She sleeps on her stomach.
We learn from our mistakes.
Tom thought Mary was happy.
I saw him crying.
I saw her crying.
I'm talking to you!
Tom thinks it's a good idea.
I want to spend more time with my family.
What does it matter?
What time did you close the store?
I always wondered what that noise was.
You should've let me help you.
Do you want me to try it?
We should've listened to you, Tom.
You should've called the cops.
You should've called the cops.
You should've called the cops.
I should have listened to you.
We should've brought lunch.
I can't believe Tom said yes.
I can't believe Tom said yes.
I can't believe Tom said yes.
This is the best pen.
This pen is the best.
I didn't expect you to be here.
I didn't expect you to be here.
Tell her she has to get up.
It's time to wake up now. Tom, wake up!
I can't believe Tom said yes.
We invited him and, lo and behold, he didn't come.
I can't believe he just said that.
What is that big new building?
Tom almost always goes to work by car.
Uther Pendragon was the father of King Arthur.
It was no accident.
Antibiotics were discovered at the beginning of the twentieth century.
Would you like to tea with us this afternoon?
Are you two happy?
Can we get out of here now, please?
Everything changed.
Love has no color!
I won't be coming back.
Nobody was busy except me.
Did you really expect me to help you?
The King's love for dinner knows no limits.
Why is the light on?
Could we talk for a moment?
We've already seen this material.
I should certainly buy you a drink.
Writing news stories is his job.
Do you want to discuss it?
The children are crying again.
Actually, I've never seen one.
Our victory is secure.
Tom asked me to drop by.
He finally resigned the presidency of the college.
Has he stayed here before?
Everything is black and white in my bedroom.
The man seized him by the neck.
You are safe here.
She has received a good education.
My daughter went to school.
Tom is still somewhere in the building, I think.
This is my big moment.
Tom is a fluent speaker of French.
Tom wasn't expecting me to help him.
I don't understand French.
What's the title of that book?
Maybe Tom wasn't busy.
I'm pretty sure about it.
All things considered, she is a fairly good wife.
I am deeply indebted to my friends for all their help.
We've got to tell Tom.
I must admit that it was my fault.
I can't stop laughing when I hear that story.
It was a little sudden.
I am good at speaking English.
I like being a teacher.
I've got a project for you.
How fast were you driving?
I'm going to have a beer.
They must be happy.
They must be happy.
I'm sure there's another way out.
I'm sure there's another way out.
He fell out of the tree.
After it rains the air is fresh.
I have really funny friends.
For Christ's sake, stop it!
It's obvious why your stomach hurts.
I don't think they're capable of doing that.
Oh how warm the water in the sea is!
Call Tom immediately.
It's just an expression.
Tom left his apartment at 2:30.
Tom helped me with my homework.
I'll put some salt on the meat.
They say red wine is better with meat than white.
She is speaking to herself.
When do you intend to quit smoking?
I'm not very eager to go.
Can this wait until next week?
This sentence already exists.
Tell her that I am looking for the keys.
The Jacksons are our neighbors.
I'm sure Tom will be back soon.
I'm sure Tom knows what to say.
I'm sure I told you about that.
I'm sure I told you about that.
I'm never going to get married.
I'm glad you accepted my offer.
I'm glad you accepted my offer.
I'm being treated like a child.
I'm afraid that's impossible.
I'll meet you there in an hour.
How many sentences can you translate per day?
Do you like the movie?
Your health is more important.
I feel guilty.
I felt guilty.
I felt guilty.
He saved the situation.
Classes start at eight in the morning.
Is she your only daughter?
Is she your only daughter?
How did you arrive at this conclusion?
You're always busy.
You're always busy.
Tom told me what you said.
Just wait!
Your way of looking at something depends on your situation.
Tom said he wanted to take some pictures of us.
This is a picture of my father and his first wife.
This doesn't burn.
What are you trying to prove?
She came home crying.
I'm too tired to talk.
I'm too tired to talk.
I'm not busy anymore.
It was a very beautiful flower.
I met Ken yesterday.
I thought you'd quit smoking.
I would love to write hundreds of sentences on Tatoeba, but I've got things to do.
On Sunday, I go to church.
Tom was in the garden.
Do you go by bus, by train, or by subway?
Suddenly, it started to rain.
What the hell is this?
I'm still not sure what to do.
She calls me often.
Is there a telephone in the kitchen?
Is it a recent picture?
What is that book about?
I think I understood everything, Tom said, "but I'm not absolutely sure."
Tom seems to be poor.
Tom seems to be poor.
Tom said he was poor.
Tom doesn't like scary movies.
Tom is still in a bad mood.
What else did Tom say about me?
Keep a low profile.
I think I understood everything, Tom said, "but I'm not absolutely sure."
Tom gave me thirty dollars.
Now you're safe.
Now you're safe.
That's a sign.
That was a sign.
That was a good sign.
That's always a good sign.
That's usually a good sign.
That's got to be a good sign.
Tom is a student, isn't he?
Tom is still in the hospital, isn't he?
I'm not sure if I'm going to be able to do that.
I'm not sure if I'm going to be able to do that.
I'm not sure if I'm going to be able to do that.
Tom never gets up early in the morning.
I don't believe one word of it.
How can you not like horses?
How can you not like horses?
He's using you.
I'm in the same boat as you.
I'm in the same boat as you.
It's up to us to help them out.
I can't believe Tom told you.
My daughter's your age.
My daughter's your age.
My daughter's your age.
My daughter's your age.
Will it stop raining soon? "I'm afraid not".
You're my age.
You're my age.
The world has changed.
It's likely that she'll succeed.
I don't know the meaning of the English word "gerund".
I'm not sure, but I think I know what to do.
I think I understood everything Tom said, but I'm not absolutely sure.
It would be better to talk of something else.
Stay in touch with the most important people in your life.
Short sentences are easier to read than long sentences.
Tom doesn't like fish.
It's better to be poor and in good health than rich and ill.
You're my only hope.
You're my only hope.
It was a silly mistake.
They don't want to use it.
They don't want to use it.
They don't want to use it.
I wonder what your friend Tom is doing now.
I like your dress.
I like your dress.
Where is Grandma? "She's sleeping on the couch."
I couldn't believe it.
I'll call Tom and tell him we won't be coming.
Tom won't talk to you.
The French word 'oiseau', meaning 'bird', is the shortest one to contain five different vowels.
I don't want Tom making the same mistakes I made.
I don't want Tom to make the same mistake I made.
I don't want you to make the same mistake I made.
I don't want you to make the same mistake I made.
I want you to leave my house and never come back.
I want you to leave my house and never come back.
I don't think your mother will like it.
It hurt, but I didn't cry.
The train doesn't stop at that station.
Would you leave your wife for me?
Would you leave your husband for me?
I woke up gasping for air.
I searched the drawer for the key.
I searched the drawer for the key.
I searched the drawer for the key.
I searched the drawer for the key.
Look what I found under the sofa! "I think that's one of my old socks."
He went to sleep and never woke up.
I feel like she is just using me.
I was wondering if you could help.
She thinks she can prove it.
I have to go to the bank this morning.
He sat right in front of me.
Tom is the only one who can save the world.
Allan Kardec is my favorite writer.
When I woke up, it was snowing.
Tom ran back to the village.
Who let the dogs out?
Tom let the dogs out of the house.
I hate it when people do that.
I hate it when that happens.
All of the men were dressed similarly to Tom.
I'm sure Tom knows what he's doing.
I don't want to help you.
I am showing my teeth.
Could you please bring me a clean knife?
You don't know how happy I am to see you.
Tom is taking a walk.
Tom asked us to wait so we waited.
The train was almost empty.
The train was almost empty.
Tom gasped.
It cost $30.
It cost $30.
Have Tom call me.
In Japan, people legally become adults at the age of twenty.
Tom is a member of a secret society.
I've heard that you shouldn't eat red meat more than once a day.
I will not be able to give you a lesson tomorrow.
What a miracle!
I don't want to help you.
I called on her.
I sat down on the couch.
Tom hung up the phone.
Tom is holding a knife.
Tom is in the other room drinking vodka.
Where's Tom? - "In the other room, packing his bags."
Someone called on her yesterday.
I often call on him.
He called on me yesterday.
Ken called on his teacher yesterday.
I will call on you again.
May I call on you today?
May I call on you today?
He will call on me tomorrow.
Will he call on me tomorrow?
I'll call on him tomorrow.
Someone called on you ten minutes ago.
Someone called on you ten minutes ago.
I'll call on you on Sunday.
I'll call on you on Sunday.
I intended to have called on you yesterday.
I intended to have called on you yesterday.
I am going to call on her tomorrow.
First of all, I have to call on Jim.
I should like to call on you this evening.
I should like to call on you this evening.
I'll call on you one of these days.
It was only yesterday that I called on him.
I couldn't bring myself to call on him.
He wasn't at home when I called on him.
If Tom calls, tell him we're on our way.
If Tom calls, tell him we're on our way.
When I called on him, he was talking on the phone.
We will have to call on our friends to help us.
We make our products as best quality as possible.
Tom is wearing headphones.
Tom is wearing clothes.
Tom is sitting on the couch.
Tom is still unconscious.
We can catch them.
We can catch them.
They asked him for advice.
I'm sure you'll like Tom.
She turned around when she heard his voice.
She turned around when she heard his voice.
I'll call on you, John.
She came back an hour later.
You said you were thirty and I believed you.
You said you were thirty and I believed you.
Tom liked this idea.
Tom liked the idea.
Please remember to mail this letter.
Tom looked in the mirror again.
Look at me in the eyes.
The gates were closed.
Do you go to school on Sundays?
Tom asked me to marry him.
Tom opened his suitcase.
Tom picked up the phone.
Tom has promised to help.
Tom took out his knife.
I wrote a song about you.
My glasses keep slipping down my nose.
Tom began laughing.
Tom thought quite highly of you.
Tom thought quite highly of you.
Tom told his son not to speak with his mouth full.
Tom told me he was happy.
Tom tried to save me.
Tom will come back. I'm sure he will.
Tom walked out of the movie.
I walked out of the movie.
We walked out of the movie.
Don't talk to your mother like that.
Don't talk to your mother like that.
I'm a student. And you?
I think Tom is going to like it here.
I'm only going to show you once.
He married her for her money.
She married him for his money.
Tom drank some water.
Tom drank his coffee.
Tom drank his coffee.
Tom crossed the road.
The dress does not make the fair.
I turned down the job.
He is a good scholar, and what is better, a good teacher.
Does the bus stop here?
Tom asked me out to dinner.
Tom has been crying all night.
Tom checked the oil level.
I'm busy tonight.
Tom closed the gate.
Tom comes here practically every day.
Tom confessed to the murder.
Tom could go to jail for this.
Tom decided not to go to the meeting.
Tom has decided to sell his car.
Tom decided to sell his car.
I'm not sure whether I really want that.
I'm not sure whether I really want that.
I'm not sure whether I really want that.
You would've liked Tom.
You would've liked Tom.
Tom didn't answer the phone.
Tom didn't answer the phone.
Tom didn't believe it at first.
Were the windows closed?
I want you to meet my family.
The bank is closed on Sunday.
Tom told me an interesting story.
Forgive her.
We learn by writing.
We learn by writing.
We learn by writing.
Can you reach the top shelf?
The teacher wrote something on the blackboard.
How many times did Tom call?
He refused to admit it.
I hope we can be good friends.
This company allows its workers to work from home.
Mother stood arms akimbo.
You look a little pale.
You look a little pale.
You look a little pale.
You look a little pale.
You look a little pale.
You look a little pale.
Tom wanted me to tell you he's busy.
I'm fully aware of that.
She refused to admit it.
I'm not completely sure.
Tom is naked.
I'll meet you downstairs.
I'll wait for you downstairs.
I'll wait for you downstairs.
I'll wait for you downstairs.
I have a stomach ache.
Labor created man.
I'm sure Tom means well.
I'm sure Tom will agree.
No one could believe it.
I had to go back.
We can talk after dinner.
There are too many bridges in this city.
I've come to talk with you.
I've come to talk with you.
I've come to talk with you.
I've come to talk with you.
This was my mistake.
No one can force you to do anything against your will.
I can check that for you.
Nice to meet you too.
May I add you on Facebook?
Tom was poor.
You can't go against the laws of nature.
Did you read them?
Did you read them?
Tom was very impressed.
Why does love make us so happy?
Hand it to Tom.
Hand it to Tom.
Do you want me to be happy?
Do you want me to be happy?
Do you want me to be happy?
Do you want me to be happy?
It made me think.
I don't think this is such a good idea.
We found all the boxes empty.
We found all the boxes empty.
I must admit that I've never heard of him.
This piece doesn't match.
I thrust my hand into my pocket.
They consider him unfit for the job.
Be careful. The knife is very sharp.
Is it here that the bus stops?
Does the bus stop here?
Does the bus stop here?
I'm sorry about the other day.
Excuse me, do you know what time it is?
Asia is much larger than Australia.
She's not from here. She was born abroad.
I thought you wanted to watch that movie.
Happy holidays.
She asked the police for protection.
I didn't call you stupid.
I didn't call you stupid.
I will never marry you again.
He will like it.
She drank a glass of milk.
Thomas is watching a movie.
I was just saying how happy you two must be.
Aren't you coming inside?
I have to sell them all today.
I'm being completely serious right now.
It was just a rumor.
Don't go in that building.
Don't go in that building.
Don't go in that building.
Don't go in that building.
How often does Tom take French lessons?
I want you to stop following me.
Tom said it was important.
She asked me if she could use the phone.
She asked me if she could use the phone.
We've been discovered.
What did you smoke?
What did you smoke?
Tom likes to listen to music while he's studying.
I won't marry anyone.
This is the boy who looks like a girl.
Tom is used to this kind of thing.
Aren't you coming inside?
He does not wear a hat.
Let me finish.
Let me finish.
How was the movie?
Pardon my French.
I'll pay you back next week.
Tom was always different.
Let's get away from here.
Tom sent me a present.
Wait for me outside.
Wait for me outside.
I don't have anything to say to any of you.
I have nothing to say to either of you.
Tom got married when he was thirty years old.
He got married when he was twenty-two years old.
He got married at 22.
Are you sure Tom is OK?
No one will believe Tom.
Am I to blame for everything?
Tom stopped singing.
Tom suddenly stopped.
I want to scream.
We'll meet again.
We'll meet again.
Write your name and address.
Let me add water.
Let me add water.
Let me add water.
I'll buy that back from you if that's what you want.
Tom slowly closed his eyes.
Marjane caught the cat.
Poor girl. She called me about ten times last night.
She left the last page blank.
I had never seen so many squirrels in my life.
I had never seen so many squirrels in my life.
I had never seen so many squirrels in my life.
I'll try again, thank you.
I must find a way to help Tom.
I must find a way to help Tom.
How far is it from here?
Do you want me to lose my job?
Do you want me to lose my job?
Do you have something to add?
I don't know what will become of you.
I'm talking on the phone.
Tom says he wants to talk to you.
Do you have a steady girlfriend?
Tom died in a plane crash three months ago.
He is good at driving.
My mother permitted me to go to the movies.
We'll fail.
Yesterday I heard you talking in your sleep.
Tell me where you were at the time of the murder.
Can you tell me where you were at the time of the murder?
When are you going to finish this?
When are you going to finish this?
When did you finish it?
When did you finish it?
You can't do that to me!
You can't do that to me!
I want to get married and I want to have kids.
We're busy, Tom.
Oh, seriously?
Cuzco is one of the most interesting places in the world.
Tom rides high with the ladies, but he doesn't ride them.
That's likely a misprint.
Don't you have something to do?
Don't you have something to do?
I told you to leave me alone.
Tom tried not to look frightened.
The box isn't empty.
I haven't heard that joke in a long time.
They are very important.
Let her wait!
One explains the other.
The bird is in the sky.
It is irrelevant what you think.
We're happy to see you.
Do you want to know what it means?
I wish I'd get back to my childhood again.
It's human nature.
They should go to hell!
I wonder when the movie's going to start.
I think we should stick together.
There is no hot water.
How much vodka does it take to kill you?
How much vodka does it take to kill you?
Tom has a very high opinion of you.
Tom seems to have disappeared.
Do not say "wait".
When did I ever lie to you?
Wouldn't you have spoken to me if you knew I was a man?
I don't think it's important.
I'd like to return a car.
Your hair really does look untidy.
Your name is Tom, isn't it?
Your name is Tom, isn't it?
Your name is Tom, isn't it?
Your name is Tom, isn't it?
It's always worth a try.
You must have lost them.
Where did you put your key?
Where did you put your key?
My grandfather likes reading books.
My grandfather likes reading books.
Tom was in the hospital for over a week.
Tom was in the hospital for over a week.
I read the article you told me about.
Can you stay till 2:30?
Did you choose those songs yourself?
What's a sentence?
Tom has lost his voice.
Tom lost all his money.
Is this pen yours?
Tom looked very happy.
Tom looked happy.
Tom looked at himself in the mirror.
Tom looked as if he hadn't eaten for days.
Tom listened to music in his room until late at night.
Nobody could've guessed it.
I'm too busy next week.
Tom let the cat out.
Tom left without saying goodbye.
Tom just got up and still isn't quite awake.
Tom just got out of the bath and his hair is still wet.
Tom is no fool.
Tom isn't as young as he looks.
Tom isn't fit for the job.
Tom should be able to stop this.
Tom sold his house three months ago.
Yesterday we went to the movies.
You're lucky nobody saw you do that.
You're lucky nobody saw you leave.
You're not going to hurt me again.
The father picks his socks scattered around the room.
Is your freezer still working?
That was a good sign.
He never appears before nine o'clock.
When was the first time you came here?
He was always hungry.
She was the first one to pay attention to him.
She was the first one to pay attention to him.
He's capable of anything.
Obviously, there's to be some kind of mistake.
I'm a grandfather.
He doesn't know his neighbors.
You won't believe what I found.
You won't believe what I found.
I feel like Tom is just using me.
He stopped crying.
Tell us everything you know about where Tom grew up.
I have three younger brothers.
Are you drunk?
Are you drunk?
Are you drunk?
Are you drunk?
You don't accept gifts.
Are you drunk?
You don't accept gifts.
You don't accept gifts.
Do you remember this song?
I feel more dead than alive.
I'm sure I never saw her before.
He's not from around here.
I'm pretty sure no one's talking about us.
Let's talk about why you're here.
Have I changed that much?
Tom thought this was a good idea.
This is a very mild coffee.
I thought you might want to talk about it.
I told Tom a few jokes.
All of my brothers died in the war.
What's this song about?
I've always dreamed of living abroad.
Tom said that you wanted to study abroad.
There's more to this than meets the eye.
Did you get the flowers that I sent you?
Tom is tipsy.
The meeting hasn't started yet.
The movie hasn't started yet.
My tree looks sick. I wonder what's wrong with it.
The credit is all his.
He barely speaks to me anymore.
You're not busy, are you?
My daughter won't listen to me.
I was forced to go.
You said you were happy.
You said you were happy.
You said you were happy.
You said you were happy.
Who are my new neighbors?
I can call Tom.
Leave her alone.
Did you choose those songs yourself?
It is a pleasure to watch a baseball game on TV.
You are so lucky to have such good friends.
It made me forget about my problems.
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure you can do that?
Are you sure he can do this?
Are you sure he can do this?
Are you sure she can do it?
Are you sure she can do this?
Are you sure she can do this?
Why don't you eat meat?
Why don't you eat meat?
There are many countries and many cultures on Earth.
I didn't tell you because I thought you weren't interested.
I like the cold.
I feel like I've already seen this movie.
This giant table occupies the entire room.
Can you get up to the roof?
I like your article.
Stop filming.
There's often a simple solution to what seems like a complicated problem.
There's often a simple solution to what seems like a complicated problem.
Give me back my book! "What book?"
She is quite satisfied with her new job.
I think something's burning.
I've decided to go by train.
They won't believe it.
Tom isn't able to do his job anymore.
I didn't expect you to answer.
Why are you always so angry?
How long was I unconscious?
Tom grew back his mustache.
When did you meet her?
When did you meet her?
When did you meet them?
Tom is a very dangerous man.
The soldier was wounded in the leg and couldn't move.
Tom wanted to be left alone.
You should leave me alone.
You should leave me alone.
At least I wasn't alone.
Tom asked to be left alone.
It's late already. Hurry up!
Whatever you say about me, say it to my face, not behind my back.
My mom gets up early every morning.
You wouldn't believe it.
You wouldn't believe it.
My uncle lives in the east of Spain.
This is my opinion, not his.
This is my opinion, not yours.
This is my opinion, not yours.
This is my opinion, not hers.
Close all the windows.
He writes articles for the local newspaper.
Have you read the book yet?
Have you read the book already?
My brother is a first-year student.
I told him to come visit us.
I told her to come visit us.
I will give you half of my ice cream.
There are a thousand meters in a kilometer.
What is your last name?
What is your last name?
He has an ear for music.
My brother has an ear for music.
They don't have an ear for music.
It's a pity that I have no ear for music.
I forgot to bring the map.
I have two gifts for friends.
Oh, that explains everything!
We met by chance at the supermarket.
Pinocchio says: "Now my nose will grow."
I hope to return to France.
Count me in!
Do you think this is a joke?
Do you think this is a joke?
I'll tell you an interesting story.
I'll tell you an interesting story.
Don't set off the alarm.
What is his shoe size?
What is her shoe size?
We're out of coffee.
I give my pledge that I will quit smoking.
Do you have a suggestion?
Do you have a suggestion?
I've promised to go.
I've promised to go.
Tom has refused to go.
I'm packed and ready to go.
Tom won't let us go.
My mom is a teacher, too.
He is not to be trifled with.
Whose child are you?
Whose child are you?
Are you sure you want that one?
Do you want to hear my opinion?
Do you want to hear my opinion?
Tom has been working here for over thirty years.
Tom made a wrong turn.
All I can do is try.
We have no idea how they came to that conclusion.
I'm old, but I'm not that old.
What is its price?
I'm not really busy.
I'm not busy either.
I think Tom is busy.
How is it different?
How can you be sure of that?
She smiled at me, whilst she sang.
He calls me often.
I require advice.
How about a rematch?
I think Tom is poor.
You should avoid making such a mistake.
But why is French so difficult?
My mom bought me this shirt.
Now I feel guilty.
You can't see my house from here.
If you don't know, ask the teacher.
If you don't know, ask the teacher.
I couldn't find the page I was looking for.
I know a way.
My watch says 2:30.
My watch says 2:30.
They now have three children.
Let's schedule it for some other time.
Call Tom and tell him you're here.
The boy put his hands in his pockets.
What's your favorite kind of movie to watch?
What does your car look like?
What does your car look like?
Tom treated me like a brother.
There was nothing to burn.
We live in this building.
Each of us should plant a tree.
Tom is somewhere in this building.
We plan to leave as soon as possible.
The fish was very fresh.
I'd very much like to know your opinion.
You've got bags under your eyes.
You've got bags under your eyes.
Can you touch the bottom?
Tom will try to stop you.
Tom will try to stop you.
I wonder why Tom didn't recognize you.
I wonder why Tom didn't recognize you.
She went to England about a year ago.
That blow on the head knocked him out cold.
What are you going to do with this car?
Tom does not like this color.
Who told you to tell Tom to come?
Yesterday, I met one of my former teachers.
She will catch us.
Something similar happened to me.
Tom wants to talk.
Why don't you just admit that you're wrong?
Human rights? Send human rights to hell, where they belong. That's what the neocons think about human rights.
Hong Kong is one of the wealthiest cities in the world.
Thousands of young soldiers are preparing for battle.
You are the fifth wheel on the wagon.
We'll be happy.
Tom is interested.
Do you see the garden?
Tom didn't cry that much.
I'm very short.
What was that noise?
I'd like a glass of beer.
Tom makes a lot of mistakes.
Your bag's open.
Tom lost both his parents when he was still very young.
They're being shot.
I don't want you to see my daughter anymore.
I don't want you to see my daughter anymore.
Eternal love doesn't exist.
I will call you tomorrow morning.
He gave me a letter in his last moments of life.
I have to be up by 6:30.
I forgot I was supposed to call Tom.
I'm supposed to be working this afternoon.
This movie is supposed to be very good.
She had tears in her eyes.
Is that supposed to cheer me up?
You're not supposed to do that.
Believe in science!
Believe in science!
When he came home, I was watching TV.
What will the neighbours think?
That was your idea.
Did you do your homework?
He is on another line.
Is this bag yours or his?
What do you mean by "dead"?
Where's my bag?
Have you lost your ticket?
Have you lost your ticket?
This was the coldest winter in twenty years.
There's nothing to eat.
When I called on him, he was not at home.
Cats can see in the dark.
I'll never make it.
I'll never make it.
I'll return your books as soon as possible.
That probably wouldn't be too hard to do.
Do you want my advice?
Do you want my advice?
Do you want my advice?
Do you want my advice?
Please let me stay.
Please let me stay.
Please let me stay.
I sent Tom my picture.
I sent Tom my picture.
Tom just stood there with his eyes closed.
Nice to meet you, Ken.
How does this concern you?
How does this concern you?
How does this concern you?
They were drinking dry white wine.
How does this concern you?
Tom forgot to do his homework.
None of them knows French.
Are you satisfied, Tom?
You must think I came down in the last shower to expect me to believe that.
Why was Tom in prison?
I'll do my homework today.
If Tom wanted to kill me, I'd already be dead.
Is your car black?
Did you like the movie we watched yesterday?
Almost everyone was dead.
They're probably already dead.
Neither of them looks happy.
You must come without fail.
You promised to help.
You promised to help.
Who were you calling?
Who were you calling?
Tom was talking to himself.
Tom is looking at the map.
Tom is looking closely at the map.
I am interested in this story.
Tom is related to me by marriage.
Tom is related to me by marriage.
Do you know what Tom was doing last night?
Tom is too young to get married.
Thank you for choosing us.
I don't think Tom believed us.
Keep us updated.
Keep us updated.
You'll understand when you grow up.
You'll understand when you grow up.
The result was unexpected.
There's nothing to understand.
Do you accept this card?
Let's not jump to conclusions, okay?
Let's not jump to conclusions, okay?
I couldn't find a cab last night.
French from Quebec is spoken by more than 7 million speakers.
You can't help now. It's too late.
Tom doesn't look his age.
It was Tom's idea to try it this way.
You must be terrified.
Give me a break!
Give me a break!
Give me a break!
Tom looked at his dog.
The movie's about to start.
Give me a break!
It was painful to watch.
Stop talking like that.
I'm going to call Tom later.
I bought these flowers for you.
I like to walk along the river.
I have always wanted to try it.
The sun rises in the east and sets in the west.
I didn't want Tom to think I was stupid.
That still doesn't solve the problem.
Whose newspapers are these? "They are my father's."
Tom has a heavy workload.
We must get there before her.
Each room has a private bathroom.
I'm planning to read as many books as I can this year.
I frequently go to the islands of Menorca and Ibiza.
Tom watches too much TV.
Tom could be dangerous.
Who's your favorite painter?
I have just three dollars left.
My grandfather built this house.
My neck hurts a little.
My family thinks I'm rich.
My grandfather was a hero.
My work is just beginning.
My work is very important.
Tom used to spend a lot of time with his grandmother.
Are you a new student?
Don't talk to your mother like that.
Don't talk to your mother like that.
Don't talk to your father like that.
Don't talk to your father like that.
Don't talk to your father like that.
Don't talk to your father like that.
There was a small box inside the big box.
There was a box inside the box.
There was a small box inside the big box.
There was a box inside the box.
I am not busy.
The story gave me goosebumps.
My older sister is good at singing.
I'm so stupid.
My list is quite long.
My list is quite long.
My name should be on that list.
My advice is to go home.
Don't you ever call me again.
Don't you ever call me again.
I feel like I've already seen this movie.
You have to try again.
You have to try again.
You have to try again.
You have to try again.
Don't use this bathroom.
It's time to get ready for bed.
My idea was much better.
He felt a sharp pain.
Where is my sentence?
Are you, by any chance, afraid of me?
Where is the market?
Did Tom look like he was busy?
Where is the butter?
That's why I called.
That's why I called.
Where's your bag?
That's the idea.
Hold your horses.
Hold your horses, Tom.
I think we're the only people on this island.
There's no point telling me "Hi, how are you?" if you have nothing else to say.
I told Tom that I wasn't busy.
I told Tom that I wasn't busy.
Take this, you bastard!
Guns don't kill people, people with guns do.
Where's the mistake?
He is the happiest man on earth.
My mother is in the hospital now.
Don't open this box.
Don't open this box.
Don't open this box.
Don't open this box.
I opened that box.
I opened that box.
Can I open this box?
Duty calls.
They are not a well-matched couple.
They promised.
I think I'll go to bed early.
Was the movie good?
You promised.
You promised.
Do you promise? "Yes."
Do you promise? "Yes."
We're calm.
It's hard to stay calm.
I've got to make some calls.
We'll find him sooner or later.
I'll find him sooner or later.
Do you really like this dress?
Let me help you.
Let me help you.
Don't lie to me!
Who gave you this information?
Is that your cat?
My life has been changed.
My situation has changed.
Tom is related to me.
I never found my keys.
I promise I won't drink.
I promise you that won't happen.
I want to buy a present for Tom.
That's very easy to do.
We have a very serious problem here.
Are you related to Tom?
Are you related to Tom?
Are you related to Tom?
Look at these photos.
Look at these photos.
Tom isn't answering his phone.
He isn't answering his phone.
She isn't answering her phone.
Promise not to tell anyone.
Promise not to tell anyone.
Promise not to tell anyone.
Promise not to tell anyone.
I'm old enough to be your grandfather.
I'm named after your grandfather.
I will never smoke.
She has more money than brains.
Give us two knives and four forks, please.
You have to disappear.
I'm trying to save Tom's life.
I think it's fair.
I think it's fair.
I fell.
I just love flowers.
I want to read it.
You'll soon be happy.
I want to be happy.
I want to be happy.
I'd like to read it.
We're not safe here.
Don't forget to do your homework.
It's close to my home.
I was invited to her birthday party.
I had a good opinion of her.
Tom takes private French lessons.
He has a sharp mind.
Tom works for a German company.
Tom works for an American company.
Tom started running towards the house.
Tom tried to get into the house.
I don't know how to talk to kids.
I don't know how to talk to kids.
I don't know French that well.
I don't know what Tom looks like now.
I'm not saying this is your fault.
I don't know when Tom left.
I called her to tell her that she had forgotten her phone at my house, but she didn't answer.
I confess I'm afraid to go by myself.
I confess I'm afraid to go by myself.
I consider it my duty to help my parents.
I consider the matter closed.
I consider this temporary.
We declared war.
We have to talk about this.
I cried so much that I just couldn't cry anymore.
That's why I came to talk to you.
Do you like doing homework?
I should read that book.
Tom wanted to quit smoking.
Tom says that he's busy.
Tom is acting weird.
Grass doesn't grow faster if you pull it.
Sooner or later, the police are going to catch you.
The police are going to eventually catch you.
Do you want to be famous?
Do you want to be famous?
Do you want to be famous?
Do you want to drink anything?
Do you want to stay for lunch?
Do you want to stay for lunch?
Do you want to stay for lunch?
Do you want to stay for lunch?
Do you want to go abroad?
Do you want to go abroad?
I'll get there before you.
I can't believe I'm doing this.
His eyes were full of tears.
Give me another example.
I want to be home early.
Where did you build them?
People want to feel safe.
Close the window before going to bed.
Close the window before going to bed.
Playing cards is a hobby.
How often do you call your parents?
Well, let's give it a try.
I'd like a room facing the garden.
Do men cry?
I'm so happy you're here.
Mark will sell the car.
Tom didn't have anything to say.
The sky was clear when I left home.
We had a very hot summer this year.
Tom went to bed early.
I don't have time to help Tom.
Never did I expect that I would see him there.
I won't make the same mistake next time.
Your friend is very lucky.
He wanted to meet me.
She wanted to meet you.
He wanted to meet me.
She wanted to meet you.
She wanted to meet you.
She wanted to meet you.
She wanted to meet me.
She wanted to meet me.
He wanted to meet you.
He wanted to meet you.
He wanted to meet you.
He wanted to meet you.
You can't go back there.
You can't go back there.
I can't go back there now.
I can't go back there now.
I can't go back there alone.
I can't go back there alone.
I can't go back there alone.
I can't go back there alone.
It's never too late to say no.
Found anything interesting?
Found anything interesting?
Found anything interesting?
Do you know what this means for us?
The store is open from nine to six.
The store is open from nine to six.
Tom knows the situation better than I do.
Aren't you dressed yet?
Aren't you dressed yet?
Aren't you dressed yet?
How much milk is there left?
Let's start at the third lesson.
The water was warm.
Tom says he's busy today.
The house was completely burnt down by a fire.
Put the money in the bag.
I can't stand this hot summer.
10 minutes remained until the end of the lesson.
She pasted a notice on the wall.
Nobody's trying to make you do anything.
She was leading her grandmother by the hand.
She lives quite close by.
He wants to save the planet.
I'm not going to help Tom.
Promise me that you'll come back.
My mother called me.
What is that huge building?
I see you've been shopping again.
Tom died at the age of ninety-nine.
It's not what you wear, it's how you wear it.
Tom didn't keep Mary waiting too long.
I want to study abroad, even if my parents are against it.
I just want to take a quick look.
Can't we wait a little bit longer?
I wish I had my camera with me right now.
Please let me out.
I've been sent to give you this.
Don't make any dinner plans.
You'll have to try one.
I wasn't quite sure about that.
Whose turn is it to make the coffee?
Tom caught a lot of fish yesterday.
I always expect trouble.
It's stopped raining.
It's stopped raining.
Can't this wait until tomorrow?
Can this wait till morning?
You can wait in this room.
You can wait in this room.
Obviously, there's a problem.
I will hope for the best.
I thought you wouldn't like Tom.
I thought you wouldn't like Tom.
I knew you wouldn't like Tom.
I knew you wouldn't like Tom.
We have to save him immediately.
We must help him immediately.
I was totally wrong.
This story has a happy ending.
She has a picture.
Tom picked up the phone.
Who answered the phone?
I have to answer the phone.
Answer the phone.
Pick up the phone.
Why should I lie?
Who composed this music?
Do you like modern music?
Do you like modern music?
I like country music.
I can't live without music.
Tom doesn't like loud music.
I know this joke.
Tom thinks he can save the world.
I got up very early this morning.
I got up very early this morning.
Tom got up early this morning.
We don't have a garden.
Both of them are busy.
Both of them are busy.
The bank is closed.
It was only a suggestion, not an order.
I got into Harvard.
I got into Harvard.
Some children are playing on the grass.
Did you lie to me?
Why were you keeping it a secret from me?
I knew you wouldn't want to do that.
I knew you wouldn't want to do that.
I knew Tom wouldn't want to do that.
Tom didn't want to do that.
There are no stupid questions.
We shook hands.
So, what did you want to talk to me about?
They made mistakes.
The dog chewed on the bone.
No student was able to answer the question.
Just you try!
Those who don't smoke or drink will die healthy.
Tom would've liked what you said.
You're old enough to understand.
Lie down on your left side.
Fish, please.
I will probably get up early tomorrow.
I'll go find a pen.
I'll go find a pen.
I'll go find a pen.
You are here in order to obey my commands.
I know you want to be rich.
Tom refused to pay.
I did my homework.
We're listening to music, and you?
I took the photo.
He was sent to a mental hospital.
Butter is made from cream.
Please pass me the butter.
I've been invited there, too.
I'm sure Tom would agree with me.
I'm happy with it.
I'm happy with it.
I'm happy with it.
I'm happy with it.
I'm happy with this.
I'm happy with that.
It's summer already.
I am not sure if I can do that but I will at least try.
I would like you to sing a song.
She refused to help me.
She refused to help me.
He refused to help me.
I hope you know that, Tom.
I figured that out.
I love to help others.
The truth will come out.
My mother was crying.
I think Tom is happy.
I finished work at six.
I finished my work at six o'clock.
You should've turned right.
How did Tom get rich?
I needed that money to buy a gift for Tom.
I'd never go out with a married woman!
Being rich isn't enough.
I sent some money to Tom.
I bought this dress at a low price.
They did their job.
Tom came to save me.
Tom came to save me.
His answer is different from mine.
Do you happen to know any Professor Braun?
Tom finds it much easier to speak French than English.
How many fingers am I holding up?
I'll do your homework for you.
I'll do your homework for you.
Careful! The knife is very sharp.
I know that sound.
I know that's important to you.
I know they're both happy.
I know they're both happy.
Tom is the brother of one of the victims.
She cried crocodile tears when he left.
What do you really think of me?
What do you really think of me?
The soldiers died.
I'm calm.
Who would wear that?
Where did you study?
Where did you study?
Where's the rest of the group?
Don't forget me.
I'm trying to help Tom, but he won't let me.
What was in the box?
She was in a hurry.
Tom said he thinks you're stupid.
I have too many bags.
Who found my bag?
Let's not forget the beer.
Let's not forget the beer.
Where can I put my bags?
Where can I put my bags?
We're hoping for the best.
I have a blue car.
You have only three options.
Klabaster and Gizmo are cats.
Tom said he read a lot of interesting books over the summer.
Tom said he read a lot of interesting books over the summer.
Tom left me the keys.
Tom sent me that.
Can we talk about something else?
What planet are you from?
What planet are you from?
She helped her friends.
I am a Polish journalist.
Tom is working in the garden.
Tom is helping him.
Tom is helping her.
He called me the following day.
I'm used to the dark.
I'm used to the dark.
How could I have been so stupid?
How could you have been so stupid?
How could you have been so stupid?
How could anyone be so stupid?
How could anyone be so stupid?
I hope you understand that.
I hope you understand that.
I think about that constantly.
Tom isn't good at French.
I wonder who.
How can you be sure of that?
How can you be sure of that?
How can you be sure of that?
How many words does this sentence have?
He didn't have enough money to ride home on the train.
Tom sold me his old car.
I'm sure you would do the same for me.
People like you are never happy.
Why did he leave so suddenly?
Why did he leave so suddenly?
Why did she leave so suddenly?
Why did she leave so suddenly?
He's the president of a large German company.
When did Tom get married?
She has changed a lot since then.
We were very happy.
The bread is fresh.
I'm busy today, otherwise I would accept.
I'm busy today, otherwise I would accept.
I'm busy today, otherwise I would accept.
I'm busy today, otherwise I would accept.
I would love a cold glass of beer.
She must be about 40.
Tom must be about thirty.
Tom must be nearly thirty.
Look at the price.
What did you read?
Tom doesn't like milk.
Tom wanted to talk.
Red and blue - which one do you like?
She had never traveled by subway.
Is it a crime to love someone?
Let me see the pictures.
Let me see the pictures.
They didn't like the film.
She has flowers in her hand.
I don't like silence.
Science will not solve all of our problems.
She doesn't want to get out of bed.
He doesn't want to get out of bed.
Tom doesn't want to get out of bed.
I don't want to get out of bed.
I don't want to get up.
He's not accustomed to it.
Have you given Tom the key?
I was hoping you'd be there.
Tom had to go to the hospital.
Let's talk about your problem.
The meat's gone bad.
Here's the key to my apartment.
We are three points ahead of their team.
They came even though it was raining.
The data was accurate.
Take them to the station.
Take them to the station.
Take him to the station.
Take him to the station.
Take her to the station.
Take her to the station.
If I knew her name and address, I could write to her.
Take them home.
Take them home.
Take him home.
Take him home.
Take her home.
Take her home.
How did you guess I was Tom?
How did you guess I was Tom?
My plan was adopted by them.
Even though Tom is sick, he's planning on going to school.
Am I talking to myself?
Am I talking to myself?
Please talk to me, Tom.
We can talk on the way.
We never talk about it.
I like to look at old pictures.
I know what Tom will want me to do.
Don't leave me alone, please.
You're quite an artist.
You're quite an artist.
She is fresh from college, so she has no experience.
What did you get hit with?
What did they hit you with?
What did they hit you with?
What did they hit you with?
What did they hit you with?
What did you get hit with?
What did you get hit with?
What did you get hit with?
Try to understand me.
Try to understand me.
Try to understand me.
Try to understand me.
Tom refused to go with me.
The book costs 4 dollars.
Where's the milk?
Tom made the right decision.
Tom promised to write every day.
I'll keep my eyes closed.
Tom looked up at the ceiling.
Tom glanced up at the ceiling.
Tom stared at the ceiling.
Tom left his keys in the car.
Tom left his keys in the car.
It had to happen sooner or later.
We all knew that it would happen sooner or later.
Tom mistook me for my younger brother.
Tom will get married.
Something very weird happened to me yesterday.
Something very weird happened to me yesterday.
Nobody noticed that the picture was hung upside down.
This is the project I will be working on.
Tom seems calm.
Be careful. That knife is sharp.
He could not believe his ears.
He could not believe his ears.
You thought about everything.
You thought about everything.
He thought about everything.
She thought about everything.
Your information was accurate.
Call me tomorrow afternoon.
You're in trouble.
He is our driver.
He is our driver.
Tom appealed to us for help.
I go to church.
I'm a US citizen.
I hope you're correct.
Everyone went crazy.
It's a very serious crime.
Is this your daughter?
Is this your daughter?
It's a bad disease.
You were definitely drugged.
We'll all soon be drunk.
We weren't drunk.
Prices are falling.
We've already finished.
The men are wearing short sleeve shirts.
She's my age.
Tom seems surprisingly calm.
Horses are dangerous animals.
What is this? This is a car.
I don't think that's why Tom left.
Tom writes left-handed.
Tom walked out of the kitchen.
Tom said that was a good idea.
Friends should be helped.
I am a colonel.
Tom shows us the city.
Greece is an old country.
It's OK to cry.
Is there any doubt?
Do you want to go to the movies?
The enemy suffered many casualties.
Who wrote this sentence?
Please delete this sentence.
This is my sentence.
I'd like to get married to someone like you.
I'd like to get married to someone like you.
Take that!
Take that!
He died a happy man.
Would you like that?
We're all angry.
We're all angry.
He doesn't seem to be breathing...
You'll never guess what we saw.
You'll never guess what we saw.
You'll never guess what we saw.
You'll never guess what we saw.
You can wear anything you want.
You can wear anything you want.
The medicine made me sleepy.
We all laughed.
Tom still isn't totally persuaded.
Tom said that he was very busy.
Tom put the knife on the table.
Tom packed his things and left.
Tom packed his things and left.
Tom is watching TV in his room.
Tom is watching TV in his room.
Tom has agreed to meet with us.
His parents were horrified.
Is the island sinking?
The island is sinking.
Do we really have to sing?
Is this a bad sign?
Do you think it's a sign?
This music makes me sick.
It's a small shop.
That's my favorite shirt.
That's very serious.
People think that I'm serious.
What do you want to sell?
What movie did you see?
What movie do you want to see?
What movie do you want to see?
We need a new secretary.
You need a secretary.
Two adult tickets and three children's tickets to London, please.
Tatoeba is easy to use.
In most cases, his answers are right.
I don't want him to come.
Tom brought us each a gift.
I sold one.
I'm happy because you're here.
He sometimes watches TV.
Grandma likes watching TV.
Tom was watching TV.
Tom sat watching TV.
She watches TV constantly.
You are watching TV all the time.
We're watching TV.
Tom likes to watch TV.
Did you watch TV yesterday?
Did you watch TV yesterday?
May I watch TV tonight?
He watches TV every day.
They're all watching TV.
I'm watching TV now.
Tom is watching TV now.
You watch too much TV.
You watch too much TV.
Tom isn't watching TV now.
Did you watch TV last night?
Did you watch TV last night?
You can watch TV after supper.
You can watch TV after supper.
You can watch television after dinner.
You can watch TV after supper.
My older brother is watching TV.
I'm going to watch TV.
We watched TV for a while.
Tom is watching something on TV.
I don't really watch TV.
How often do you watch TV?
How often do you watch TV?
I spent all day watching TV.
Do you want to watch TV?
Do you want to watch TV?
Tom was watching TV last night.
I was watching TV when Yumi came.
Tom often watches TV while eating dinner.
I watched TV for two hours yesterday.
Tom does nothing but watch TV.
He is watching TV in his room.
He is watching TV in his room.
Tom was lying in bed watching TV.
Many families eat dinner while watching TV.
Many families eat dinner while watching TV.
I was watching TV when she called.
We watch TV together almost every evening.
Can I stay here and watch TV?
Tom spends too much time watching TV.
When I came home, he was watching TV.
She was watching TV when I came home.
When I came home, she was watching TV.
Tom is lying on the sofa watching TV.
Tom is way busier than I am.
Tom did nothing but watch TV all day long.
She was sitting in a chair, watching TV.
You're spending too much time watching TV.
You're spending too much time watching TV.
He's spending too much time watching TV.
She's spending too much time watching TV.
Tom watches TV with the kids every evening.
I spend a lot of time watching TV.
Do you watch the TV in the morning?
Do you watch the TV in the morning?
Tom was watching TV when I came home.
Tom is in the living room watching TV.
He does nothing but watch TV all day long.
Tom said he wanted to watch a little TV.
Tom spends most of his free time watching TV.
I'm going to stay here and watch TV.
I am so busy that I don't watch TV.
Do you mind if I watch TV for a while?
Tom asked me if he could watch TV with me.
Many people think that children spend too much time watching TV.
Why don't you go watch TV while I cook dinner?
Why don't you go watch TV while I cook dinner?
I don't like you spending so much time watching TV.
I don't like you spending so much time watching TV.
I hope that's a joke.
The goldfinch is a very interesting bird.
Tom doesn't like fish.
Tom caught three fish.
Tom served us coffee.
Tom held on to the rope as long as he could.
Tom gave his dog a bone.
Tom is going to pay me back what he owes me on Monday.
Tom is busy and can't meet with you right now.
Tom had to sell his house.
Tom doesn't make many mistakes.
Tom had to sell his car.
Tom turned himself in to the police.
Tom probably didn't do the work himself.
Tom saved the last bullet for himself.
I like listening to Beethoven music.
Turn left here.
Turn left here.
Father is busy, so I will go instead.
What the hell was he thinking?
My aunt gave me flowers.
We hope you enjoyed your stay.
We hope you'll enjoy your stay.
We needn't have called the doctor.
He's out for a walk.
We have to wait for him.
Throw down your weapons.
I figured it was easier to do it this way.
I crossed the road after looking both ways.
Tom was thirsty, so he drank a glass of water.
They charged me five dollars for the bag.
You might as well wait until Tuesday.
I want to wait until college.
We'll wait until 2:30.
I'm pretty sure Tom's serious.
We will hold out until the end.
I'll wait until six o'clock.
Don't stop until I tell you.
We won't know until we try.
I suggest you wait until 2:30.
Tom didn't come until 2:30.
Wait until I get back.
Wait until I get back.
Pull up a chair.
Let's wait here until he comes back.
We're friends, and friends help each other.
You opened the wrong box.
You opened the wrong box.
She texted me.
Maybe you should send Tom something.
Don't talk that way.
Don't talk that way.
Don't talk that way.
Don't talk that way.
I have been very busy lately.
I have been very busy lately.
I didn't get home until 2:30.
Are you sure Tom isn't busy?
Are you sure Tom isn't busy?
The bluebird carries the sky on his back.
Tom can ride a horse.
It's just an idea.
Tom would never forgive us.
Did I just say something stupid?
You owe me for that.
I accept your offer.
To be what we are, and to become what we are capable of becoming, is the only end of life.
Do you think he'll come? "I hope not."
Do you think she'll come? "I hope not."
Do you think she'll come? "I hope not."
That doesn't solve the problem.
That doesn't solve the problem.
I've been ordered to kill you.
No matter what he says, I'll never believe him again.
No matter what you say, I will never believe you.
No matter what you say, I will never believe you.
We'll wait for you.
You'll enjoy working here.
You'll enjoy working here.
Tom gets up at six.
I'll come back. I promise.
That was one of the biggest mistakes in my life.
Tom was really drunk.
Tom didn't meet anyone.
The snow stopped falling.
The snow stopped falling.
You're our neighbor.
You're our neighbor.
I don't want them to help me.
I don't want him to help me.
I don't want her to help me.
I don't want you to go to jail.
I don't want you to go to jail.
I don't want you to go to jail.
I don't want them to go to jail.
I don't want him to go to jail.
I don't want her to go to jail.
I don't want her to come.
I don't want them to come.
I don't want you to come.
I don't want you to come.
I don't want you to come.
Tom wore glasses.
Did Tom call you?
Tom married young.
I want you to call every day.
I want you to call every day.
I want you to call every day.
I want them to call every day.
I want him to call every day.
I want her to call every day.
I want them to be happy.
I want him to be happy.
I want her to be happy.
I want them out of my life.
I want him out of my life.
I want her out of my life.
I want them out of here.
We all want them to be happy.
We all want him to be happy.
We all want her to be happy.
You will not believe your eyes.
You will not believe your eyes.
When did they leave? "They left twenty minutes ago."
Why were you helping Tom?
Why were you helping Tom?
Don't take it so hard!
I'm not a teacher and don't want to become one.
Into the fog!
I called them.
We'd sure like to help Tom.
What is your favourite word?
My favorite color is blue.
Tom laughs at his own jokes.
It's my job to help Tom.
What is your favorite color?
Tom is a lot taller than me.
Tom is just about as old as I am.
Tom is almost six feet tall.
Tom is usually busier than I am.
You have to be very calm.
We're not going to help Tom.
We don't have time to help Tom.
I think it's a bad idea.
Tom wanted to talk to me about something.
Tom is always reading.
I think it's time to start helping Tom a bit more.
I wonder what your plans are.
We should try to help Tom.
She speaks Japanese to some extent.
I should try to help Tom.
Write your address here.
Let's try to find a way to help Tom.
Write your address here.
My brother is rich enough to buy a car.
Do you feel like a drink?
You won't believe what Tom told me.
I can't believe you're talking to me like this.
I can't believe you're talking to me like this.
Somebody's watching us.
We all cried when we watched the movie.
You think of everything.
Tom doesn't want to speak to you.
We tried to stop him.
We tried to stop her.
We've got to try and stop them.
We've got to try and stop him.
We've got to try and stop her.
I've never had that kind of problem.
It's good to know that Dan no longer dates Linda.
It's good to know that Dan no longer dates Linda.
This joke was long overdue to be translated.
What he says makes no sense at all.
I still say it wasn't a good idea.
I'm inclined to think that you're right.
That, of course, does not mean that they are right.
I still say it wasn't a good idea.
Doesn't Tom remind you of John?
I'll give him a piece of advice.
Hi, come on in.
I'm so happy for you two.
You'll be safe here.
His good health enabled him to work till the age of seventy-five.
You probably don't remember me.
My friend is eating fish.
At what age do you want to get married?
It was your mistake.
It was your mistake.
Just talk to me.
We won't say a word.
She bought a book at the shop.
I'm looking for a present for my mother.
I usually went to the movies on Sunday.
My boyfriend was crying.
They look very happy together.
Are you rich?
There's nothing to be afraid of anymore.
I didn't say you were going to enjoy it.
I had no idea what you were looking for.
Promise me you won't tell anybody.
I promised I'd tell you the truth.
I can't tell you how pleased I am.
Now listen to me.
You'll be safe now.
We need your key.
I know Tom is happy.
Your house is beautiful.
You've always helped me.
You wouldn't believe me.
You wouldn't believe me.
You wouldn't believe it.
You wouldn't believe it.
Can we talk here?
We met last year.
We saw you on TV.
What time is the meeting?
I'll play it safe.
Here are the keys.
I'm just obeying orders.
Tom wouldn't talk to me.
Your thirty minutes are up.
You were busy, weren't you?
Why are you always so busy?
Now, please leave me alone.
You look uglier than usual.
They cannot be saved.
They cannot be saved.
He cannot be saved.
He cannot be saved.
She cannot be saved.
She cannot be saved.
We have to leave immediately.
We'll talk at dinner tonight.
Let's talk about your career.
You wouldn't hit me, would you?
Tom ran to the bathroom.
Tom put on his raincoat.
Tom knows the situation.
Don't come in! I'm naked.
Don't come in! I'm naked.
I'm in my fourth month.
Tom doesn't know how to handle children.
Tom doesn't help me.
There is no time to explain.
Could you speak to them?
Could you speak to them?
Could you speak to him?
Could you speak to him?
Could you speak to her?
Could you speak to her?
We wish to speak to you.
We wish to speak to you.
We wish to speak to them.
We wish to speak to him.
We wish to speak to her.
Could we speak to you?
Could we speak to you?
Could we speak to you?
Could we speak to you?
Could we speak to them?
Could we speak to them?
Could we speak to him?
Could we speak to him?
Could we speak to her?
Could we speak to her?
We need to speak to you again.
We need to speak to you again.
We need to speak to them again.
We need to speak to him again.
We need to speak to her again.
I'm going to speak to them.
I'm going to speak to him.
I'm going to speak to her.
I wish to speak to them.
I wish to speak to him.
I wish to speak to her.
I'd like to speak to them again.
I'd like to speak to him again.
I'd like to speak to her again.
I want to speak to them.
We wish to speak to you.
We wish to speak to you.
We wish to speak to them.
We wish to speak to him.
We wish to speak to her.
When will you be back? "It all depends on the weather."
It's really serious.
Tell him to wait.
I just wanted to speak to them.
I just wanted to speak to him.
I just wanted to speak to her.
We won't speak to them.
Tom won't speak to us.
Tom won't speak to them.
Tom won't speak to me.
They won't speak to you.
They won't speak to you.
They won't speak to you.
They won't speak to you.
They won't speak to him.
They won't speak to him.
They won't speak to her.
They won't speak to her.
I won't speak to them.
I won't speak to them.
I don't speak to them.
I don't speak to him.
I don't speak to her.
Would you please speak to them?
Would you please speak to them?
Would you please speak to him?
Would you please speak to him?
Would you please speak to her?
Would you please speak to her?
I must speak to them.
Let me speak to them.
Let me speak to them.
Let me speak to them.
Let me speak to them.
Let me speak to him.
Let me speak to him.
Let me speak to him.
Let me speak to him.
Let me speak to her.
Let me speak to her.
Let me speak to her.
Let me speak to her.
Let me speak to you first.
Let me speak to you first.
Let me speak to you first.
Let me speak to them first.
Let me speak to them first.
Let me speak to them first.
Let me speak to him first.
Let me speak to him first.
Let me speak to him first.
Let me speak to her first.
Let me speak to her first.
Let me speak to her first.
We'll speak to you later.
We'll speak to you later.
We'll speak to them later.
We'll speak to him later.
We'll speak to her later.
We'll speak to you later.
We'll speak to you later.
We'll speak to them later.
We'll speak to him later.
We'll speak to her later.
I'll speak to them.
I'll speak to him.
I'll speak to her.
Venus is the closest planet to Earth.
Venus and Earth are almost the same size.
I have nothing to say to them.
I had nothing to say to them.
I had nothing to say to him.
I had nothing to say to her.
Are you related to us?
Are you related to us?
Are you related to them?
Are you related to them?
Are you related to me?
Are you related to me?
Are you related to her?
Are you related to her?
Are you related to us?
Are you related to us?
Are you related to them?
Are you related to them?
Are you related to me?
Are you related to me?
Are you related to her?
Are you related to her?
I'm not related to you.
I'm not related to you.
I'm not related to them.
I'm not related to him.
I'm not related to her.
I'm related to you.
I'm related to them.
I'm related to him.
I'm related to her.
I'm related to them.
I'm related to him.
I'm related to her.
Give my regards to him.
Give my regards to him.
Give my regards to her.
Give my regards to your parents.
Give my regards to your parents.
They went to bed late.
Was he in the army?
This was a big mistake.
I'll give it a whirl.
Unfortunately, she didn't come.
Unfortunately, I don't have any money with me now.
Don't you have a pen?
When I kiss you, I forget the world around us.
I'm not that cynical.
I have three more pages to go.
Keep it together, Tom.
Hold on, Tom.
Do you have a problem with this plan?
You'd be surprised what people think.
Everything can be used.
You're not the only one who's afraid.
We have an obligation to do our best.
I haven't quite figured that out yet.
You guys won't believe what happened.
I don't think we're going to make it.
We've been together for thirty years.
It's nice to see you haven't changed.
It's nice to see you haven't changed.
You're not really a teacher, are you?
It's not always easy to stay healthy.
I'd never let anything happen to you.
Do you have any idea what's happened?
Do you think I'm stupid or something?
Can you tell me who sold them to you?
Soon I will be very rich.
Don't talk to me like I'm a child.
Don't talk to me like I'm a child.
Tom is afraid of showing his feelings.
He immediately called the White House.
I'm afraid you're wasting your time.
I'm afraid you're wasting your time.
I hope I'm not disturbing you.
Come over any time.
Here's the milk.
You can call me.
You can call me.
Does it look OK?
I wasn't safe.
Do I look old?
Do I look old?
Please let go.
I let them talk.
Why don't you come shopping with me?
I guess they really weren't so busy.
I'll talk with you about that later.
Let me explain why.
I think it's too late.
I saw you-know-who at the market today.
Do you carry weapons?
Do you carry a weapon?
Tom asked if I'd found my key.
The boy put his hand in his pocket.
He put his hands in his pockets.
John took a key from his pocket.
John took a key out of his pocket.
She put the key in her pocket.
He tucked the handkerchief in his pocket.
We've been dating three years.
The price has gone up.
Go buy a case of beer.
The job is up for grabs, now.
I don't want to come back here ever again.
We're not guilty.
We need the ladder.
Try to be strong.
Keep it a secret.
Where are my car keys?
Why did I read this?
Why did I read this?
Why did I read this?
Why did I read this?
It may indeed be strange, but that's the way it is.
We kept it secret.
Am I on that list?
Hand me the knife.
I'm going hunting.
You're wrong not to trust Tom.
You are losing blood.
I lost my house keys.
I lost my house keys.
You'll be safe there.
You'll be safe there.
He seems to have left the country.
There are dumb people like Dan everywhere.
Stop talking about the game.
They look very busy.
I should be studying English, but I want to watch a movie.
It's pretty clear we have a problem.
Tom is talking to someone.
Nobody's going to believe that.
I feel like you are laughing at us.
What is inside the box?
I'm sorry. I can't tell you.
This offer is available for a limited time only.
Tom wanted to buy those sunglasses, but they were too expensive.
Tom is helping his mother with dinner.
You're not obligated to answer that question.
Do you help your wife at home?
Do you help your wife at home?
Give me your shirt.
Give me your shirt.
I'm trying to get my children back.
Was that your idea?
Look at it closely.
That's much worse.
You were so busy then, weren't you?
They live in tents.
Do you have the key?
Come to the meeting.
Are you really busy?
Are these your keys?
I don't have to use that right now.
Sorry I couldn't save you.
Have you read the book already?
Have you read the book already?
Have you read the book yet?
Water the plants.
There's a problem I have to talk to you about.
We'll save you a place.
Please save a seat for me.
Are you sure Tom can do that?
Have you come to save me?
Write her a note.
Write her a note.
Write him a note.
Write him a note.
I could write her a note if it would help.
I could write him a note if it would help.
There is no TV in my room.
Why are you showing me this?
The flowers in the garden are very beautiful.
It's a sunny day.
We'll meet up with him later.
We'll meet up with you later.
I'm surprised to see you.
I didn't expect to see you.
He wasn't expecting to see you.
He wasn't expecting to see you.
I can be there in 30 minutes.
I can be there in 30 minutes.
You must believe me.
You must believe me.
What was the time of death?
Can I take it home?
Can I take it home?
Can I take it home?
How many times have you seen this movie?
How many times have you seen this movie?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Did you buy them on the black market?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Did you buy them on the black market?
Did you buy it on the black market?
Tom had no idea who you were.
Tom had no idea who you were.
I suggest we reschedule a time.
At least, I think so.
I'll phone you when I arrive.
It was a fair price.
Tom doesn't always come home this late.
Tom comes here every day at about 2:30.
Tom bought this house thirty years ago.
I'm sure you heard about what happened.
I'm sure you heard about what happened.
I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.
I'm not sure Tom knows what he's doing.
I'm afraid I have a confession to make.
Tom is good at singing.
I thought you were going to wait for me.
Tom threw a piece of chalk at me.
They're shooting at me.
I hope Tom has a good time.
I hope they have a good time.
I haven't been happy for a long time.
Tom finally got here around lunch time.
Perhaps we can talk about this at another time.
I'm happy just to be near you.
We may as well just go on home.
Thank you for your guidance.
I have a clear conscience.
England and Scotland are neighbours.
There was silence.
There was total silence.
I think we'd better stay inside.
I don't know how many years ago it was, but it was certainly more than three.
You're perfectly safe.
You're perfectly safe.
I still think we're safe.
Try it and see.
My car is older than this tree.
My car is older than this tree.
Tom reminds me of myself when I was his age.
I got out my knife.
It was very weird.
Please come back home as soon as you can.
Are you always that busy?
Shake hands with him.
I often go downtown on Sunday.
Would you care to try?
Why not let Tom try?
I'm going back to America.
Is that a fact?
Come and see my garden tomorrow.
I have an urge to buy something.
The project was a great success.
You need a drink.
You need a drink.
I suppose you've already bought a ticket.
I suppose you've already bought a ticket.
I suppose you've already bought a ticket.
This is an easy sentence.
I studied in Beijing for three months.
Do I look beautiful in this dress?
Tom is wet.
He didn't believe it at first.
He was very poor.
He's drunk.
I'm loaded.
I'm loaded.
He was drunk with joy.
She is drunk with happiness.
I'm a bit drunk.
I'm a bit drunk.
She's a bit drunk.
You can't give me orders.
He watches at least one movie a day.
Do you want to have some coffee?
The dog is peeing on the sofa.
Do you want to meet tomorrow?
Do you want to meet tomorrow?
Do you want to join me for lunch?
Do you want to wait in the bar?
Do you want to sing?
We didn't have school today.
Do you want me to check again?
Do you want to hear the new song I'm working on?
Do you want to hear my new song?
That was our idea.
What does that thing do?
It seems like you don't know what to do.
It seems like you don't know what to do.
It looks like you don't really know what to do.
I recently learned about what Tom did.
If you want, you can phone me.
If you want, you can phone me.
I took it for granted that you would come.
I took it for granted that you would come.
I speak French very well.
Your ideas are weird.
Tom likes to stay at home alone on weekends.
I want to speak in German with Arnold Schwarzenegger.
I'm pretty sure Tom doesn't believe us.
Tom turned and walked away.
Now look here.
Now look here.
We'll be done in a second.
What's so important?
I have a serious skin problem.
Tom's not from around here.
Tom knew it was too late to call, but he called anyway.
We meet every Monday night.
We were having a good time.
I can't believe that I'm really here.
When you're good enough to join the team, we'll let you join.
What a stupid joke!
What a stupid joke!
Would all the mothers please wait here?
Would all the mothers please wait here?
I can smell it from here.
Tom still isn't used to the way things work here.
You'll never guess why I'm here.
You sound like my grandmother.
You will learn more about me than you'd like to know.
Tom promised not to tell anyone how much we bought our house for.
Do you really like this kind of food?
Tom has lost his keys.
Give me back my money!
Your wife is a very lucky woman.
I'll still love you no matter what.
I knew it was a joke.
I'm sorry, Tom. I can't do it.
I'm sorry, Tom. I can't do it.
You don't have a key, do you?
I've just come from there.
I don't care how you look.
Are you seeing someone else?
You look a little young.
Why would I hurt you?
Why did I ever marry you?
Why did I ever marry you?
You're early, aren't you?
You're early, aren't you?
You're old enough to drink, aren't you?
Why not let Tom help you?
Why not let Tom help you?
Why would we lie to you?
Who's been watching you?
Was someone helping you?
I have difficulty learning languages.
Finally I can go to bed.
I don't want to marry her.
I'm not going to marry you.
I'm not going to marry you.
I'm not going to marry her.
I've decided to marry her.
He pays no attention to others' feelings.
I've checked.
Have you finished writing your reports yet?
Didn't I tell you Tom wouldn't like it?
Carol often watches horror films.
I just got a call from your school.
I just got a call from your school.
I promise I'll be there tomorrow.
Why can't animals talk?
Excuse us for a moment.
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
Get out of here!
The answer is clear.
Everything around me reminds me of you.
Everything around me reminds me of you.
I saw my friend to the station.
I saw my friend to the station.
Are there any other suggestions?
Tom turned to me.
Tom nodded to me.
It was fun yesterday.
The surgery was yesterday.
Show us what you're capable of.
Show us what you're capable of.
Show me what you're capable of.
Show me what you're capable of.
Show him what you're capable of.
Show him what you're capable of.
Show her what you're capable of.
Pick a card.
We're almost out of food... "She's gone to the store." "Who's she? The cat's mother?"
I got married yesterday.
We got lucky.
Where are my cigarettes?
I'll be your roommate.
I've already lost too much time.
You've still got thirty minutes.
I wish I could be as happy as you.
These flowers aren't for you.
These flowers aren't for you.
Here's the money I borrowed from you.
They'll try to kill you.
They'll try to kill you.
Don't let anyone stop you.
Don't let anyone stop you.
Don't let anyone stop you.
Although she is rich, she is not happy.
I'll find a way to get the money to you.
Let Tom do that for you.
I wonder who killed her.
I wonder who killed him.
I wonder who killed them.
It was Tom who showed me how to do this.
She is losing blood.
His death made me wonder.
I wonder whether you understand.
I wonder what it is.
I wonder who's next.
I wonder who took it.
I wonder what Tom saw.
I wonder what's wrong.
Love is wonderful!
I wonder who to invite.
I just wanted to look at you.
What a wonderful world!
I had to set an example.
I wonder who made all this.
I wonder who Tom talked to.
I wonder whose idea this was.
I wonder whose idea this was.
I wonder what Tom thinks.
I wonder where this road goes.
I wonder who named this ship.
I wonder who named this ship.
I was wondering what that was.
Tom won't like this.
Did I show you this?
I'm thirty years older than you.
I wonder if that's her.
I wonder if it's true.
I wonder what it could be.
I wonder how Tom did that.
Tom didn't bring a camera.
I know when I'm being lied to.
I wonder where Tom parked his car.
I wonder why everybody left so early.
He watched from away.
You think this is all some kind of joke?
We already talked to police.
Tom loves talking about art.
Tom came over to talk to me.
Look at that tall building.
Thank you for talking to me.
Perhaps we could talk later.
Is there any milk left?
Can I talk to you privately?
Am I just talking to myself?
I wonder if that is Tom.
It's 3:10.
I'll go shopping.
Tom was leaning against the church wall.
Tom is sitting on the sofa, reading a magazine.
Tom was obviously angry.
Tom was obviously not expecting us to be here.
Tom was probably drunk when he did that.
Tom was probably the shortest person in the room.
Tom was satisfied with how things turned out.
Tom likes fish.
I saw you talking on the phone.
I saw him talking on the phone.
I saw her talking on the phone.
I saw him take your keys.
I saw her take your keys.
I hope they liked me.
I hope they were listening.
I hope this isn't a mistake.
I hope Tom agrees.
I saw them smoking cigarettes.
I saw him smoking a cigarette.
I saw her smoking a cigarette.
I want to take her home.
I want to take him home.
I want to take them home.
There was nothing to say.
I saw her smile.
I always wondered what that smell was.
I wonder why Tom is so busy.
I wonder why Tom isn't busy.
I wonder why Tom is so hungry.
I wonder who Tom is waiting for.
Please take a seat!
I'm pretty sure Tom's rich.
We were all wondering where you went.
I'll count up to three and if you won't give it to me willingly, I will take it from you.
I was wondering why you came early.
She is not the victim.
I wonder why no one has bought this yet.
I wonder why Tom hasn't shown up yet.
It's a wonder that she's still alive.
I wonder if I should tell him the truth.
I wonder if I should tell her the truth.
I wonder if I should tell Tom the truth.
Do you really think you can be here by 2:30?
We should be able to be there by 2:30.
I'll do my best to be there by 2:30.
Why don't we meet at 2:30?
I told Tom to come here tomorrow at 2:30.
Why do it the hard way?
Has Tom finished already?
I'll send you the list.
I'll send you the list.
You're not on my list.
You're not on my list.
Who's the next person on your list?
Who's the next person on your list?
The movie was too long.
The movie was too long.
The fire was on the first floor.
Why did we have to wait so long?
Why did you wait so long?
Why did you wait so long?
Thank you very much for everything. "You are welcome."
Thank you very much for everything. "You are welcome."
You are welcome!
You are welcome!
Why do you think I'm lying?
Is he alive or dead? "He's dead."
Is he alive or dead? "He's alive."
Tom is a dangerous man.
You're a rich man.
You're a rich man.
I'm a very, very happy man.
Tom made it very clear that he didn't want to get married.
You must save me.
You must save me.
Save me.
Save me.
Just call the police.
You can't save me.
My favorite subject is math.
My mother called me.
You could've invited me.
You could've invited me.
You could've invited me.
I don't think this is a very good idea.
Maybe they'll believe me.
Thank you for calling me.
Don't try to catch me.
Don't try to catch me.
Tom wasn't moving.
Tom said he wanted to talk to me.
Write them a note.
Write them a note.
He silently went out of the room.
This is important to me.
Tom tried to help me.
Tom didn't want to help me.
Tom didn't want to help me.
Tom didn't want to help me.
Look, you've got to help me.
Look, you've got to help me.
Tom didn't help me.
My sister didn't help me.
You obviously don't remember me.
Tom waited for me.
These pants are too big for me.
These pants are too small for me.
You can't save me.
Tom managed to save me.
I hope Tom helps me.
You weren't invited.
You weren't invited.
They weren't invited.
You aren't guilty.
That's not your fault.
That's not your fault.
You aren't guilty.
Tell her it was a mistake.
Tell her it was a mistake.
Tell her it was a mistake.
Tell her it was a mistake.
Tell him it was a mistake.
Tell him it was a mistake.
Tell him it was a mistake.
Tell him it was a mistake.
Tell them it was a mistake.
Tell them it was a mistake.
Tell them it was a mistake.
Tell them it was a mistake.
Tell her it's important.
Tell her it's important.
Tell him it's important.
Tell him it's important.
Tell them it's important.
Tell them it's important.
Tell her it's not her fault.
Tell her it's not her fault.
Tell her it's not my fault.
Tell her it's not my fault.
Tell her it's not your fault.
Tell her it's not your fault.
I'll be glad to help you.
I'd like to speak to you.
Our ship is badly damaged.
Dan is here forever.
Dan is for the freedom of expression.
Dan is for the freedom of expression.
There were traces of blood inside Dan's car.
I should've declined.
It's time to decide.
It's time to decide.
Tom reminds me of you.
You remind me of myself.
It reminds me of my childhood.
This photo reminds me of Scotland.
She's my girlfriend and I'll marry her one day.
Don't tell me that Dan is talking to that crow.
Tell him it's not his fault.
Tell him it's not his fault.
Tell him it's not my fault.
Tell him it's not my fault.
Tell him it's not your fault.
Tell him it's not your fault.
Tell them it's not my fault.
Tell them it's not my fault.
Tell them it's not their fault.
Tell them it's not their fault.
Tell them it's not your fault.
Tell them it's not your fault.
Tell her not to talk to anyone.
Tell her not to talk to anyone.
Tell him not to talk to anyone.
Tell him not to talk to anyone.
Tell them not to talk to anyone.
Tell them not to talk to anyone.
Don't write in red ink.
Don't write in red ink.
Call me if you have any problems.
Call me if you have any problems.
You'll fall down.
You remind me of your brother.
You remind me of her.
You remind me of him.
He hasn't called.
He said that it was important.
There's a mistake here.
Silence in the court!
Tell her to be here by 2:30.
Tell her to be here by 2:30.
Tell him to be here by 2:30.
Tell him to be here by 2:30.
Tell them to be here by 2:30.
Tell them to be here by 2:30.
Smoking is prohibited here.
That reminds me of you.
You hurt me, Tom.
Tom never helps me.
Tom kept me waiting.
I can explain it to you if you let me.
I'll tell them you called.
I'll tell them you called.
I'll tell him you called.
I'll tell him you called.
I'll tell her you called.
I'll tell her you called.
I'll tell them you called.
I'll tell them you called.
I'll tell him you called.
I'll tell him you called.
I'll tell her you called.
I'll tell her you called.
We can talk.
We can talk.
We can meet.
We can try.
We can't leave.
We can leave.
We could try.
Have you got the key? "Yes, I have it."
We didn't talk.
We don't lie.
We know that.
We met before.
We must act.
We must leave.
You'll feel better after a good night's sleep.
It's too late for that.
I am learning to speak Filipino.
Tell us about your childhood.
Tell us about your childhood.
There's nothing left to tell.
Where's my horse?
That's a delicate point.
The situation is very bad.
What's the matter, Tom? Are you going to cry?
God created me.
God created you.
The beginning is half the whole.
Don't lie to me! You're the one who did it.
Tom was brought up in Australia.
Don't you forget that.
They're still inside.
Don't you ever let me hear you talking to your mother like that again.
I think I can show you how to do that.
Women have beauty, but do books not also have beauty?
Let's go for a drink.
Tom gave me some advice.
Tom told me I was cute.
Tom wants to meet with me.
Tom told me it was his fault.
We'll put you on the list.
We'll get you out of here.
We lost track of the time.
I'm sorry I didn't tell you.
Tell Tom it's not his fault.
Tell Tom it's not his fault.
Tom told me it was my fault.
Tom told me not to help you.
Tom told me not to help you.
Tom wants to take you home.
Tom wants to take you home.
Tell me about your project.
Tell me about your project.
Tell Tom I've got his keys.
Tell Tom I've got his keys.
Tell Tom I've got his keys.
Tell Tom I've got his keys.
Tell Tom it's not my fault.
Tell Tom it's not my fault.
Tell Tom who you met today.
Tell Tom who you met today.
Tom told me not to open it.
Tom told me not to open it.
Tom told me you were happy.
Tom told me you were happy.
You still haven't told me how to do it.
You still haven't told me how to do it.
Have you told Tom who to give that to?
Have you told Tom who to give that to?
I told Tom what I thought of his idea.
I told Tom I wouldn't allow him to go.
Why would someone kill them?
Why would someone kill him?
Why would someone kill her?
I didn't kill them.
I didn't kill him.
I didn't kill her.
We didn't kill her.
We didn't kill him.
We didn't kill them.
We know you didn't kill her.
We know you didn't kill him.
We know you didn't kill them.
We know you didn't kill her.
We know you didn't kill him.
We know you didn't kill them.
We can't let them kill her.
We can't let them kill him.
We can't let them kill them.
You have no idea what true love is.
You look beautiful.
Why did you turn me in?
Are you talking about me?
Are you sure you remember everything?
Are you sure you remember everything?
I know how busy Tom has been.
Why don't you go sit down at the table?
I saw Tom smoking a cigarette.
Which foreign language are you learning?
We are closing the store.
What can be seen in this picture?
Tom says you're lying.
The box was so heavy that I couldn't lift it.
You're thirty, right?
This place gives me the creeps.
Tom took out his false teeth.
I forgot to give you what Tom gave me to give you.
Everyone was surprised when I went into the room.
There's only one pretty child in the world, and every mother has it.
I can't go to the movies.
Tom is a really good driver.
He's reading a novel now.
I wrote the four millionth sentence in Tatoeba.
I do not like wearing anybody else's clothes.
I do not like wearing anybody else's clothes.
I decided to study abroad.
You are very busy.
You are very busy.
You're very busy.
May I call you tomorrow?
Tom said you wanted to talk to me.
Tom said you wanted to talk to me.
I want to go to the store Tom went to yesterday.
Tom tells me you're better at French than he is.
I'm sure they're working on solving the problem.
Tom felt something crawling up his leg.
I hope you'll be very happy together.
I hope you'll both be happy together.
I hope you're happy together.
Don't dare to talk to my girlfriend.
Tom grew a mustache.
I'm going to leave one night early.
I want to leave Paris.
His advice didn't help much.
The small island came into sight.
The small island came into sight.
You take after your mother. You remind me of her.
If he had not died so young, he would have become a great scientist.
Don't eat hard foods.
I'm not trying to make you feel guilty.
I think you and I need to have a talk.
I'll be there in about 30 minutes.
I'll be downstairs if you need me.
I'll be downstairs if you need me.
The man helped me when I was in trouble.
Could we meet again?
He will come sooner or later.
I wouldn't have made that mistake.
They did everything they could to foster good relations.
Whoever translates this sentence is a fool.
Are you two dating each other?
I was hoping you and I could talk.
I was hoping you and I could talk.
Since I didn't receive a reply, I wrote to her again.
I was beginning to have my doubts.
Tom lives on the third floor of this apartment building.
To understand someone is to love someone.
I can't repeat what Tom said.
What's the most important part of a good education?
Tom stopped breathing.
I told you never to call me again.
I told you never to call me again.
I told you never to call me again.
I told you never to call me again.
What you say is impossible.
When there's nothing left to do, what do you do?
This room doesn't get a lot of sun.
I shall return the books to him even though he doesn't need them.
That picture brought back a lot of memories.
The old man served the king for many years.
The cat is black.
There are two ways to live: you can live as if nothing is a miracle; you can live as if everything is a miracle.
My brother married his friend's sister last year.
Tom hasn't ever been outside of Australia.
So, where's the problem?
I'll pay for lunch.
Nobody is interested in my country.
We'll meet at the usual place.
Is this store open on Sundays?
Is this store open on Sundays?
We think we've found a way to help you.
We think we've found a way to help you.
Tom can't remember where he put his sunglasses.
Tom can't remember where he put his sunglasses.
I can't remember what Tom looks like.
I can't remember what Tom looks like.
Tom shook my hand.
What do you look like?
I remember my mother when I see this.
I can't remember what this is called.
She's very important to me.
She's very important to me.
I can't remember how long it took.
I've forgotten how to do that.
I know Tom isn't stupid.
They regarded the man as a danger to society.
The blue flower is small.
This tree was planted by my grandfather.
Who are you to judge me?
Who are you to judge me?
Who are you to judge me?
I also have doubts about that.
Tom is in a good mood today.
Are you sure your parents will allow you to go?
Are you sure your parents will allow you to go?
Are you sure your parents will allow you to go?
Are you sure your parents will allow you to go?
Tom told me that you're famous.
Tom told me he's never met you.
Tell Tom I don't have his keys.
You've been acting weird today.
You've been acting weird today.
Who do they belong to?
Who does it belong to?
Who does it belong to?
I've got a meeting to go to.
Tom doesn't like the music I listen to.
We don't even know who Tom got married to.
I don't know who to give this to.
Tom has no one to turn to.
You don't have to help if you don't want to.
You don't have to help if you don't want to.
I'm on the list.
Tom is having a good time.
I'll ask them to wait.
I'll ask him to wait.
I'll ask her to wait.
I just want Tom to leave me alone.
I guess they really weren't happy.
Last night, we heard sounds of gunshots and screaming on the street outside our window.
Don't you want something to drink?
I'm sure they're talking about us.
Tom died three weeks later.
Tom came home very late.
I'm really scared.
I'm really scared.
She helped us with pleasure.
Tom works at the corner store.
Tom won't talk to me about it.
In my opinion, Esperanto is very important.
Does he have a pet?
Does she have a pet?
Do you have a pet?
Don't smoke.
Tom always wanted to be rich and famous.
I have some books that you might like to read.
Tom often talks to himself.
I was also invited.
Dan and Linda stopped talking to each other.
They ran.
Return it when you are done.
It was a very pleasant afternoon.
Can you complete the job in two days?
Can you complete the job in two days?
Can you complete the job in two days?
I'm not so sure it was him who did it.
I'm not so sure it was her who did it.
I'm not so sure it was her who did it.
I'm not so sure it was him who did it.
I'm not so sure it was them who did it.
I'm not so sure it was them who did it.
I'm sure that was her.
I'm sure that was her.
I'm sure that was him.
I'm sure that was him.
I can't be sure of anything anymore.
Tom will save us.
I was very impressed.
Stop doing that, Tom.
Tom did his homework.
Tom did his homework.
I told Tom he wouldn't like it here.
I told you before that's impossible.
I told you before that's impossible.
All the children started crying.
It's hard to tell whether Tom is laughing or crying.
How long has Tom been crying?
Are you sure you did everything you could?
Are you sure you did everything you could?
Didn't you talk to them?
Didn't you talk to them?
Didn't you talk to them?
Didn't you talk to them?
Didn't you talk to him?
Didn't you talk to him?
Didn't you talk to him?
Didn't you talk to him?
Didn't you talk to her?
Didn't you talk to her?
Didn't you talk to her?
Didn't you talk to her?
Did you talk to them?
Have you spoken to them?
Did you talk to them?
Have you spoken to them?
Did you talk to him?
Have you spoken to him?
Did you talk to him?
Did you talk to him?
Did you talk to her?
Have you spoken to her?
Did you talk to her?
Did you talk to her?
Did you talk to them today?
Did you talk to them today?
Did you talk to him today?
Did you talk to him today?
Did you talk to her today?
Did you talk to her today?
Did you talk to them on Monday?
Did you talk to them on Monday?
Did you talk to him on Monday?
Did you talk to him on Monday?
Did you talk to her on Monday?
Did you talk to her on Monday?
I was going to talk to you about it.
Tom showed me some photos yesterday.
I've done my duty.
Can you talk to them?
Can you talk to them?
Can you talk to him?
Can you talk to him?
Can you talk to her?
Can you talk to her?
Call me after you talk to them.
Call me after you talk to them.
Call me after you talk to him.
Call me after you talk to him.
Call me after you talk to her.
Call me after you talk to her.
Can we talk to them?
Can we talk to him?
Can we talk to her?
Can we talk to you now?
Can we talk to you now?
Can we talk to them now?
Can we talk to him now?
Can we talk to her now?
Let's talk to them.
Let's talk to him.
Let's talk to her.
You have to talk to them.
You have to talk to them.
You have to talk to him.
You have to talk to him.
You have to talk to her.
You have to talk to her.
You'll have to talk to them.
You'll have to talk to them.
You'll have to talk to him.
You'll have to talk to him.
You'll have to talk to her.
You'll have to talk to her.
You've got to talk to me.
You've got to talk to me.
You've got to talk to us.
You've got to talk to us.
You might want to talk to them.
You might want to talk to them.
You might want to talk to him.
You might want to talk to him.
You might want to talk to her.
You might want to talk to her.
Why do you want to talk to us?
Why do you want to talk to us?
Why do you want to talk to them?
Why do you want to talk to them?
Why do you want to talk to him?
Why do you want to talk to him?
Why do you want to talk to her?
Why do you want to talk to her?
Why do I have to talk to them?
Why do I have to talk to him?
Why do I have to talk to her?
Why do I have to talk to them?
Why do I have to talk to him?
Why do I have to talk to her?
Were you able to talk to them?
Were you able to talk to them?
Were you able to talk to them?
Were you able to talk to them?
Were you able to talk to him?
Were you able to talk to him?
Were you able to talk to him?
Were you able to talk to him?
Were you able to talk to her?
Were you able to talk to her?
Were you able to talk to her?
Were you able to talk to her?
We wanted to talk to you.
We wanted to talk to you.
We wanted to talk to them.
We wanted to talk to him.
We wanted to talk to her.
We really need to talk to you.
We really need to talk to you.
We really need to talk to them.
We really need to talk to him.
We really need to talk to her.
We just want to talk to you.
We just want to talk to you.
We just want to talk to them.
We just want to talk to him.
We just want to talk to her.
We should talk to them.
We have to talk to him.
We should talk to her.
Tom wants me to talk to them.
They want me to talk to you.
They want me to talk to you.
They want me to talk to him.
They want me to talk to her.
Somebody's got to talk to them.
Somebody's got to talk to him.
Somebody ought to talk to her.
Somebody's got to talk to them.
Somebody's got to talk to him.
Somebody's got to talk to her.
Let me try to talk to them.
Let me try to talk to him.
Let me try to talk to her.
I should talk to them.
I'm not going to talk to them.
I'm not going to talk to him.
I'm not going to talk to her.
I'm going to talk to him.
I'm going to talk to her.
I'm not going to talk to him.
I'm not going to talk to her.
I'm going to talk to him.
I'm going to talk to her.
I'd like you to talk to them.
I'd like you to talk to them.
I'd like you to talk to him.
I'd like you to talk to him.
I'd like you to talk to her.
I'd like you to talk to her.
I'd like to talk to them myself.
I'd like to talk to them myself.
I'd like to talk to him myself.
I'd like to talk to him myself.
I'd like to talk to her myself.
I'd like to talk to her myself.
I'd like to talk to you again.
I'd like to talk to you again.
I went to talk to them.
I went to talk to him.
I went to talk to her.
I want you to talk to us.
I want you to talk to us.
I want you to talk to them.
I want you to talk to them.
I want you to talk to him.
I want you to talk to him.
I want you to talk to her.
I want you to talk to her.
I want to talk to you first.
I want to talk to you first.
I want to talk to them first.
I want to talk to him first.
I want to talk to her first.
I tried to talk to them.
I tried to talk to them.
I tried to talk to him.
I tried to talk to him.
I tried to talk to her.
I tried to talk to her.
I told you not to talk to them.
I told you not to talk to them.
I told you not to talk to him.
I told you not to talk to him.
I told you not to talk to her.
I told you not to talk to her.
I really want to talk to you.
I really want to talk to you.
I really want to talk to you.
I really want to talk to them.
I really want to talk to them.
I really want to talk to them.
I really want to talk to him.
I really want to talk to him.
I really want to talk to him.
I really want to talk to her.
I really want to talk to her.
I really want to talk to her.
I only wanted to talk to you.
I only wanted to talk to you.
I only wanted to talk to them.
I only wanted to talk to him.
I only wanted to talk to her.
I never got to talk to them.
I never got to talk to him.
I never got to talk to her.
I know you want to talk to us.
I know you want to talk to them.
I know you want to talk to me.
I know you want to talk to him.
I know you want to talk to her.
I know you want to talk to us.
I know you want to talk to them.
I know you want to talk to me.
I know you want to talk to him.
I know you want to talk to her.
I don't want to talk to them.
I don't want to talk to him.
I don't want to talk to her.
I came to talk to them.
I came to talk to him.
I came to talk to her.
I came here to talk to you.
I came here to talk to you.
I came to talk to them.
I came to talk to him.
I came to talk to her.
I came here to talk to you.
I came here to talk to you.
I came here to talk to them.
I came here to talk to them.
I came here to talk to him.
I came here to talk to him.
I came here to talk to her.
I came here to talk to her.
Don't you want to talk to us?
Don't you want to talk to us?
Don't you want to talk to them?
Don't you want to talk to them?
Don't you want to talk to him?
Don't you want to talk to him?
Don't you want to talk to her?
Don't you want to talk to her?
Do you want to talk to them?
Do you want to talk to them?
Do you want to talk to me?
Do you want to talk to me?
Do you want to talk to him?
Do you want to talk to him?
Do you want to talk to her?
Do you want to talk to her?
Do you want to talk to them?
Do you want to talk to them?
Do you want to talk to me?
Do you want to talk to me?
Do you want to talk to him?
Do you want to talk to him?
Do you want to talk to her?
Do you want to talk to her?
Do you want me to talk to them?
Do you want me to talk to them?
Do you want me to talk to them?
Do you want me to talk to them?
Do you want me to talk to him?
Do you want me to talk to him?
Do you want me to talk to him?
Do you want me to talk to him?
Do you want me to talk to her?
Do you want me to talk to her?
Do you want me to talk to her?
Do you want me to talk to her?
Did you try to talk to them?
Did you try to talk to them?
Did you try to talk to him?
Did you try to talk to him?
Did you try to talk to her?
Did you try to talk to her?
Don't talk to us.
Don't talk to us.
Don't talk to them.
Don't talk to them.
Don't talk to him.
Don't talk to him.
Don't talk to her.
Don't talk to her.
Don't talk to us like that.
Don't talk to us like that.
Don't talk to them like that.
Don't talk to them like that.
Don't talk to him like that.
Don't talk to him like that.
Don't talk to her like that.
Don't talk to her like that.
Can I please talk to them?
Can I please talk to him?
I'd like to make you a proposal.
I'd like to make you a proposal.
Let's see what's on TV.
I'm talking to her on Facebook.
Can I please talk to her?
I'll only talk to them.
I'll only talk to him.
I'll only talk to her.
I'll never talk to you again.
I'll never talk to you again.
I'll never talk to them again.
I'll never talk to him again.
I'll never talk to her again.
You must talk to them.
You must talk to them.
You must talk to him.
You must talk to him.
You must talk to her.
You must talk to her.
I might talk to them.
I might talk to him.
I might talk to her.
You have to let me talk to them.
You have to let me talk to them.
You have to let me talk to him.
You have to let me talk to him.
You have to let me talk to her.
You have to let me talk to her.
Please let me talk to them.
Please let me talk to them.
Please let me talk to them.
Please let me talk to them.
Please let me talk to him.
Please let me talk to him.
Please let me talk to him.
Please let me talk to him.
Please let me talk to her.
Please let me talk to her.
Please let me talk to her.
Please let me talk to her.
Let me talk to them.
Let me talk to them.
Let me talk to them.
Let me talk to them.
Let me talk to him.
Let me talk to him.
Let me talk to him.
Let me talk to him.
Let me talk to her.
Let me talk to her.
I want you brought to justice.
Let me talk to her.
Let me talk to her.
I want them brought to justice.
I want him brought to justice.
I want her brought to justice.
Let me talk to them first.
Let me talk to them first.
Let me talk to them first.
Let me talk to him first.
Let me talk to him first.
Let me talk to him first.
Let me talk to her first.
Let me talk to her first.
Let me talk to her first.
I want her left alone.
I want him left alone.
I want them left alone.
I want her on my team.
I want him on my team.
I want them on my team.
I want you on my team.
I want you on my team.
I want you on my team.
I want her put in prison.
I want him put in prison.
I want them put in prison.
We'll talk to them.
We'll talk to him.
We'll talk to her.
I like the way you smell.
I'll talk to them tomorrow.
I'll talk to him tomorrow.
I'll talk to her tomorrow.
I'll talk to them later.
I'll talk to him later.
I'll talk to her later.
I'll talk to them about it.
I'll talk to him about it.
I'll talk to her about it.
I think I'll talk to them.
I think I'll talk to him.
I think I'll talk to her.
When did you last talk to them?
When did you last talk to them?
When did you last talk to him?
When did you last talk to him?
When did you last talk to her?
When did you last talk to her?
Why don't you just talk to them?
Why don't you just talk to them?
Why don't you just talk to him?
Why don't you just talk to him?
Why don't you just talk to her?
Why don't you just talk to her?
Why don't I just talk to them?
Why don't I just talk to him?
Why don't I just talk to her?
Can't you just talk to them?
Can't you just talk to them?
Can't you just talk to him?
Can't you just talk to him?
Can't you just talk to her?
Can't you just talk to her?
Should I talk to them?
Should I talk to him?
Should I talk to her?
May I talk to them?
May I talk to him?
May I talk to her?
I talk to them all the time.
I talk to them all the time.
I talk to him all the time.
I talk to him all the time.
I talk to her all the time.
I talk to her all the time.
Can I talk to them?
Can I talk to him?
Can I talk to her?
Can I talk to them?
Can I talk to him?
Can I talk to her?
Go talk to them.
Go talk to them.
Go talk to them.
Go talk to them.
Go talk to him.
Go talk to him.
Go talk to him.
Go talk to him.
Go talk to her.
Go talk to her.
Go talk to her.
Go talk to her.
You have to go talk to them.
You have to go talk to them.
You have to go talk to him.
You have to go talk to him.
You have to go talk to her.
You have to go talk to her.
Why not go talk to them?
Why not go talk to him?
Why not go talk to her?
Why don't you go talk to them?
Why don't you go talk to them?
We'll go talk to them.
We'll go talk to him.
We'll go talk to her.
We should go talk to them.
We should go talk to them.
We should go talk to him.
We should go talk to him.
We should go talk to her.
We should go talk to her.
Should I go talk to them?
Should I go talk to him?
Should I go talk to her?
Maybe I should go talk to them.
Maybe I should go talk to him.
Maybe I should go talk to her.
Let's go talk to them.
Let's go talk to them.
Let's go talk to them.
Let's go talk to him.
Let's go talk to him.
Let's go talk to him.
Let's go talk to her.
Let's go talk to her.
Let's go talk to her.
He wrote many phrases in Esperanto.
Let me just go talk to them.
Let me just go talk to him.
Let me just go talk to her.
Let me go talk to them.
Let me go talk to him.
Let me go talk to her.
Just go talk to them.
Just go talk to them.
Just go talk to them.
Just go talk to them.
Just go talk to him.
Just go talk to him.
Just go talk to him.
Just go talk to him.
Just go talk to her.
Just go talk to her.
Just go talk to her.
Just go talk to her.
I'm going to go talk to them.
I'm going to go talk to him.
I'm going to go talk to her.
I'll go talk to them.
I'll go talk to him.
I'll go talk to her.
I'll go talk to them right now.
I'll go talk to him right now.
I'll go talk to her right now.
I'll go talk to them now.
I'll go talk to him now.
I'll go talk to her now.
I'd better go talk to them.
I'd better go talk to him.
I'd better go talk to her.
I want to go talk to them.
I want to go talk to him.
I want to go talk to her.
I think I'll go talk to them.
I think I'll go talk to him.
I think I'll go talk to her.
I should go talk to them.
I should go talk to them.
I should go talk to him.
I should go talk to him.
I should go talk to her.
I should go talk to her.
I have to go talk to them.
I have to go talk to him.
I have to go talk to her.
I frequently talk to them.
I frequently talk to him.
I frequently talk to her.
Do you ever talk to them?
Do you ever talk to them?
Do you ever talk to him?
Do you ever talk to him?
Do you ever talk to her?
Do you ever talk to her?
I want to be more than friends.
Don't even talk to them.
Don't even talk to them.
Don't even talk to him.
Don't even talk to him.
Don't even talk to her.
You're completely healthy.
Don't even talk to her.
You're completely healthy.
You're completely healthy.
You're completely healthy.
You're completely healthy.
You're completely healthy.
Whose beer is this?
You could talk to us.
You could talk to us.
You could talk to us.
You could talk to us.
You could talk to them.
You could talk to them.
You could talk to them.
You could talk to them.
You could talk to me.
You could talk to me.
You could talk to him.
You could talk to him.
You could talk to him.
You could talk to him.
You could talk to her.
You could talk to her.
You could talk to her.
You could talk to her.
I am remembering their addresses.
You could talk to me.
You could talk to me.
Money isn't the only thing that matters.
You can talk to us.
You can talk to us.
You can talk to them.
You can talk to them.
You can talk to him.
You can talk to him.
You can talk to her.
You can talk to her.
You can talk to them.
You can talk to them.
You can talk to him.
You can talk to him.
You can talk to her.
You can talk to her.
We can talk to them.
We can talk to him.
We can talk to her.
He read the book yesterday.
I'd better talk to them.
I'd better talk to him.
I'd better talk to her.
I'll go and talk to them.
I'll go and talk to him.
I'll go and talk to her.
Go and talk to them.
Go and talk to them.
Go and talk to him.
Go and talk to him.
Go and talk to her.
Go and talk to her.
Did you actually talk to them?
Did you actually talk to them?
Did you actually talk to him?
Did you actually talk to him?
Did you actually talk to her?
Did you actually talk to her?
Have you spoken to him?
Have you spoken to her?
Have you spoken to them yet?
Have you spoken to them yet?
Have you spoken to him yet?
Have you spoken to her yet?
Have you spoken to her yet?
I've spoken to them about it.
I've spoken to him about it.
I've spoken to her about it.
I haven't spoken to them.
I haven't spoken to him.
I haven't spoken to her.
I haven't spoken to them yet.
I haven't spoken to him yet.
I haven't spoken to her yet.
We'd better go pick up her.
I've already spoken to them.
I've already spoken to him.
I've already spoken to her.
That isn't very important.
Don't go anywhere without us.
Don't go anywhere without us.
Don't go anywhere without them.
Don't go anywhere without them.
Don't go anywhere without him.
Don't go anywhere without him.
Don't go anywhere without her.
Don't go anywhere without her.
I wonder what's wrong with them.
I wonder what's wrong with him.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
I enjoyed working with you.
I enjoyed working with them.
I enjoyed working with him.
I enjoyed working with her.
I spent a lot of time with them.
I spent a lot of time with him.
I spent a lot of time with her.
We'll talk with you on Monday.
We'll talk with you on Monday.
We'll talk with them on Monday.
We'll talk with him on Monday.
We'll talk with her on Monday.
I'll talk with them.
Just talk with them.
Just talk with them.
Just talk with him.
Just talk with him.
Just talk with her.
Just talk with her.
That's not such a bad idea.
Do you still remember how to do it?
Tom wasn't expecting to see you.
Tom wasn't expecting to see you.
Tom wasn't expecting to see you.
Tom wasn't expecting to see you.
Everybody rushed towards them.
Everybody rushed towards us.
Istanbul is the city she likes the most.
What are you expecting to find here?
What are you expecting to find here?
What are you expecting to find here?
What are you expecting to find here?
She isn't as stupid as she looks.
Today's dinner is fish.
How is your summer going?
It's on page 3.
You should eat less red meat.
There's probably somebody in that old house.
I want this television.
I have to borrow some money.
Tom works at a local hospital.
Is Tom still in the hospital?
This is probably a bad idea.
Photography is an expensive hobby.
Maybe that's a good idea.
It's difficult but not impossible.
Do you really think it's impossible?
Why wasn't I invited?
Is that supposed to be a joke?
There's a phone in the kitchen.
Tom reads almost no books at all.
How stupid he is!
I think it's time for us to start getting ready.
How long do horses live?
How long do horses live?
Tom wasn't asleep when I dropped by.
Tom has left.
Tom doesn't remember his first French teacher's name.
Tom doesn't remember his first French teacher's name.
You'd better take it easy now.
I'm very busy right now.
Tom is probably pretty rich by now.
I'm not sure I want to give this to Tom.
Please allow me.
We need to speak to them again.
I don't think Tom is the only one who had to go to the hospital.
I live across the hall.
I told them I was busy.
I told them I was busy.
I told him you were busy.
I told him you were busy.
I told him you were busy.
I told him you were busy.
I told her you were busy.
I told her you were busy.
I told her you were busy.
I told her you were busy.
We walked slowly towards them.
I made a promise to him.
Here, use my key.
Here, use my key.
Maybe it's not too late.
Maybe it's not too late.
It's still not too late.
I'm sure Tom would enjoy that movie.
I told her I wasn't interested.
I told her I wasn't interested.
I told him I wasn't interested.
I told him I wasn't interested.
Do you think you'll be happy here?
Do you think you'll be happy here?
Do you think you'll be happy here?
Your parents are here to pick you up.
He dropped to his knees.
Is there room in your car for me?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
Are you busy tomorrow afternoon?
I appeared on television once.
I remember my childhood clearly.
There is no eternal love.
Please don't leave me with them.
Please don't leave me with them.
Please don't leave me with him.
Please don't leave me with him.
Please don't leave me with her.
Please don't leave me with her.
I'm ready to forgive them.
Tom obviously is very angry.
Do you come from another planet?
Do you come from another planet?
Go away. I'm busy.
Go away. I'm busy.
Sorry, I was busy.
Sorry, I was busy.
Sorry, I was busy.
Sorry, I was busy.
Tell Tom that I'm busy.
Tell Tom that I'm busy.
Tell Tom that I'm busy.
Tell Tom that I'm busy.
Let me go with them.
Let me go with them.
Let me go with him.
Let me go with him.
Let me go with her.
Let me go with her.
I told them they shouldn't move.
I woke up thirty minutes ago.
Tom wants to be happy again.
Syria is called "Suriyah" in Arabic.
These shoes belong to him.
Does that belong to her?
Does that belong to him?
Does that belong to them?
This book belongs to her.
This book belongs to him.
Of course, I told Tom.
Of course, I told Tom.
Of course, I told Tom.
Of course, I told Tom.
That used to belong to her.
That used to belong to him.
That used to belong to me.
That used to belong to them.
You cannot hit your sister.
When I am finished with what I am doing, I will come.
The stars come out at night.
Good afternoon, Professor Pérez.
There are many holidays in Brazil.
I ran downstairs.
I ran downstairs.
Tell them I'm busy.
If I'm able to meet you I'll do it.
Tell them we're busy.
Tell her who you met today.
Tell him who you met today.
Tell them who you met today.
Tell them who you met today.
The tea is too strong. Add some water.
She looks half her age.
Tell her we're busy.
Tell her we're busy.
Tell him we're busy.
Tell him we're busy.
You look exactly like your brother.
I was very happy.
I'm not done with them.
I'm not done with him.
I'm not done with her.
I'm not done with them yet.
I'm not done with him yet.
I'm not done with her yet.
I'm not done with you.
I'm not done with you.
I'm not done with you yet.
You can't give orders around here.
Where shall we go now? To the theatre or cinema?
Where shall we go now? To the theatre or cinema?
How is your progress?
How is your progress?
I have to agree with them.
I have to agree with him.
I have to agree with her.
I have to agree with you.
I have to agree with you.
I was watching you.
I was watching you.
I was watching them.
I was watching him.
I was watching her.
Tom is on the third floor.
I'm going to take you home.
That's so true.
That's very true.
Did you show her your pictures?
Did you show her your pictures?
Are you going to the movies?
He stopped laughing.
She stopped laughing.
They stopped laughing.
I stopped laughing.
I stopped laughing.
I feel like the happiest person in the world.
He died in prison.
The sky was blue.
That's up to Tom, not me.
I want you all to know that I'll never change.
Someone is watching them.
Someone is watching them.
Someone is watching him.
Someone is watching him.
Someone is watching her.
Someone is watching her.
I didn't know you were rich.
I didn't know you were rich.
I didn't know you were rich.
I didn't know you couldn't sing.
I didn't know you couldn't sing.
I didn't know you collected stamps.
I didn't know why Tom left.
I didn't ask for your advice.
I didn't know Tom was rich.
I didn't know I was invited.
I didn't feel like calling Tom.
I didn't expect to meet you.
I didn't expect to meet you.
I didn't expect a warm welcome.
I didn't even know you knew.
I didn't even know you knew.
I didn't bring any warm clothes.
I didn't ask for your opinion.
I didn't help Tom escape.
Tell Tom it was a mistake.
Tell Tom it was a mistake.
Tell Tom I'm in a meeting.
Tell Tom I'm in a meeting.
Tell Tom he has to get up.
Tell Tom he has to get up.
Tell Tom to take his time.
Tell Tom to take his time.
Tom told me he called you.
Tom told me he called you.
Are you sure you don't want us to go with you?
Are you sure you don't want us to go with you?
I thought you didn't want to talk about this.
I thought you didn't want to talk about this.
Did you think about me at all?
Did you think about me at all?
I'm sure that was them.
I'm sure that was them.
We must leave early.
Do you want them to wait?
Do you want them to wait?
Do you want him to wait?
Do you want him to wait?
Do you want her to wait?
Do you want her to wait?
Do you want them to wait?
Do you want them to wait?
Do you want him to wait?
Do you want him to wait?
Do you want her to wait?
Do you want her to wait?
Why did you want us to leave?
Why did you want us to leave?
Why did you want them to leave?
Why did you want them to leave?
Why did you want me to leave?
Why did you want me to leave?
Why did you want me to leave?
Why did you want him to leave?
Why did you want him to leave?
Why did you want her to leave?
Why did you want her to leave?
We don't want them back.
Tom doesn't want them back.
They don't want you back.
They don't want you back.
They don't want him back.
They don't want her back.
They don't want you back.
I don't want them back.
I don't want you to go back.
I'm much stronger.
I want to talk to you about tomorrow.
I want to talk to you about tomorrow.
He receives the keys.
Let me tell her what I know.
Let me tell her what I know.
Let me tell you what I know.
Let me tell her.
Let me tell her.
Let me tell him.
Let me tell them.
I promise I'll never tell her.
I promise I'll never tell him.
I promise I'll never tell them.
Please tell her it's important.
Please tell her it's important.
Please tell him it's important.
Please tell him it's important.
Please tell them it's important.
Please tell them it's important.
Please tell her that I called.
Please tell her that I called.
Please tell him that I called.
Please tell him that I called.
Please tell them that I called.
Please tell them that I called.
I should tell her, right?
I should tell him, right?
I should tell him, right?
I should tell them, right?
I should tell them, right?
At least tell them how you feel.
At least tell them how you feel.
At least tell him how you feel.
At least tell her how you feel.
Just tell her I called.
Just tell her I called.
Just tell him I called.
Just tell him I called.
Just tell them I called.
Just tell them I called.
Tom forgot my birthday.
Tom felt a sharp pain in his chest.
Tom goes abroad almost every year.
She's young and healthy.
They soon became friends.
You may wait outside.
You can wait outside.
When will we meet?
I met my boyfriend there.
I want to make things clear. Tom is NOT my boyfriend.
Regrettably, I cannot agree with you.
Regrettably, I cannot agree with you.
I had a son who died in the war.
I'll tell her you came by.
I'll tell her you came by.
I'll tell her you came by.
I'll tell him you came by.
I'll tell him you came by.
I'll tell him you came by.
I'll tell them you came by.
I'll tell them you came by.
I'll tell them you came by.
I want to know what this is called.
I don't want to show it to Tom yet.
He bought me a drink.
I don't want to show it to Tom yet.
I don't want to show it to Tom yet.
Tom wanted you to think he'd died.
Tom wanted you to think he'd died.
Tom wanted you to think he'd died.
Tom wanted you to think he'd died.
How late can I ring?
Until what time can I call you on the phone?
I want to know what's in this box.
Are you sure there's no solution?
Are you sure there's no solution?
Are you sure there's no solution?
In the long run, prices will rise.
Tom got up late this morning.
What do they want to talk about?
What did you want to talk about?
What did you want to talk about?
I want to be on the other team.
I want to be on the other team.
I know who you want to talk to.
I know who you want to talk to.
Do you want me to call Tom?
Do you want me to call Tom?
Do you want me to call Tom?
Do you want me to call Tom?
Should I call Tom?
I want them to stop.
I want him to stop.
I want her to stop.
I want them to meet you.
I want them to meet you.
I want them to meet you.
I want them to meet you.
I want him to meet you.
I want him to meet you.
I want him to meet you.
I want him to meet you.
I want her to meet you.
I want her to meet you.
I want her to meet you.
I want her to meet you.
I want them to like you.
I want them to like you.
I want him to like you.
I want him to like you.
I want her to like you.
I want her to like you.
I want them to like you.
I want him to like you.
I want her to like you.
I want you put in prison.
I want you put in prison.
Everybody rushed towards me.
Everybody rushed towards him.
Everybody rushed towards her.
I don't want to play cards.
Just be happy.
I don't want to tempt fate.
Tom refused to tell us what had happened.
Tom refused to tell us what had happened.
I hope you told them that.
I hope you told him that.
I hope you told her that.
I hope you told them that.
I hope you told him that.
I hope you told her that.
I can't believe you told them.
I can't believe you told him.
I can't believe you told her.
I can't believe you told them.
I can't believe you told him.
I can't believe you told her.
Retrace your steps and maybe you'll find your keys.
I'm not going to explain it to you again.
You're wearing my shirt, Tom.
You're wearing my shirt, Tom.
Tom called again.
Tom got up from his chair.
I see you two have met.
Tom's very weak.
It's too soon to tell.
It's not just a pen.
We met that night.
I saw her on the stairs.
I saw him on the stairs.
I saw them on the stairs.
I saw her on TV.
She wrote 5 novels in 5 years.
I saw him fall.
I saw her fall.
I saw him on TV.
I saw them on TV.
I saw him crying.
Tom told me to tell you he's fine.
Tom only wears black clothes.
Tom only wears black clothes.
I saw them a short time ago.
I saw her a short time ago.
There were thirty people present at the meeting.
Tom didn't show up for work yesterday.
I want to be as rich as Tom.
I don't want to lose my job.
I want to talk to you, Tom.
Tom lost control of his car.
This house needs a feminine touch.
This house needs a feminine touch.
The company where Tom works is losing money.
Sorry, I have to study.
That was to be expected.
This is an impossible task.
Why did we have to come so early?
Tom forced himself to speak.
I don't want to kill you.
Excuse me, please. I didn't understand that. Can you maybe translate it into one of the following languages?
Tom was a member of a secret society.
I don't want to kill you.
I want you to stop.
Tom was too weak.
He has left already.
He has already gone to bed.
I didn't even notice what Tom was wearing.
I didn't even notice what Tom was wearing.
I had no idea Tom was a doctor.
I took him at his word.
Tom promised me he wouldn't come here again.
Are you sure this is the right address?
Are you sure this is the right address?
Are you sure you have the right address?
Are you sure you have the right address?
Tom wants to talk to you about what happened.
Tom wants to talk to you about what happened.
I have always wanted to read War and Peace.
A doctor tried to remove the bullet from the president's head.
You've grown up, Tom.
I'll finish what I started.
I wonder where everyone is.
Sorry for calling you at this hour.
I was hoping you'd tell me.
I was hoping you'd tell me.
I was hoping you'd do that.
I was hoping you'd do that.
I was hoping we could talk.
I told you we'd meet again.
I told you we'd meet again.
I touched the bottom.
I touched the bottom.
I touched the bottom.
I hope Tom doesn't show up.
In America cars drive on the right side of the road.
It's not something you forget.
Why do I have to help Tom?
She finally read War and Peace.
Did he ask you about me?
The song is well-known to all.
He went too far.
You went too far!
Why can't you forgive me?
Why can't you forgive me?
Are you all talking about me?
What do you want to know about me?
What do you want to know about me?
I completely forgot about the meeting.
Tom completely forgot about the meeting.
I didn't know about the meeting.
Put the ladder against the wall.
Children can play without danger here.
What if I get caught?
What gave me away?
I like milk.
Tom was able to solve the problem in three minutes.
Do you think you'll be back by 2:30?
Do you think you'll be back by 2:30?
Tom said that he was planning to be here by 2:30.
Tom went downtown this afternoon.
You've given up smoking.
I realized it was a mistake.
I realized it was a mistake.
Tom didn't know it was a mistake.
I think this is a big mistake.
Sometimes I make mistakes.
I made very few mistakes.
We're closed on Mondays.
I'm doing it for the money.
I was in a bad mood.
I was in a bad mood.
I expected more.
Two people say they heard a gunshot.
We heard the sound of gunshots.
We heard the sound of gunshots.
Where were you yesterday at 2:30?
We didn't reach any conclusions.
Tom kept his illness a secret.
I saw Tom take your keys.
I saw Tom take your keys.
I saw Tom take your keys.
I saw Tom take your keys.
Wait for me downstairs.
Wait for me downstairs.
I know Tom isn't guilty.
Thanks for inviting us.
I thought Tom wouldn't want to go with us.
I thought you wouldn't want to go with us.
I thought you wouldn't want to go with us.
I knew you wouldn't want to go with us.
I knew you wouldn't want to go with us.
Tom won't want to go with us.
Tom won't want to go with us.
I knew you wouldn't want to go with us.
I knew you wouldn't want to go with us.
I thought you wouldn't want to go with us.
I thought you wouldn't want to go with us.
I thought Tom wouldn't want to go with us.
This building belongs to us.
Tom has promised to help us.
I know you don't have time to help us.
I know you don't have time to help us.
Tom made it clear that he didn't want to help us.
I knew you wouldn't help us.
I knew you wouldn't help us.
It depends on the circumstances.
She asked him to call her later, but he forgot to.
I thought you wanted to talk to me.
I thought you wanted to talk to me.
He had a strong stance on the subject.
What do you usually eat for lunch?
When are you coming back home?
When are you coming back home?
I didn't open any of the boxes.
I didn't open any of the boxes.
I know whose car this is.
I'm going to figure out who did this.
I'm sure Tom had nothing to do with this.
Why are you in such a bad mood this evening?
Phew, that was a long sentence!
Tom tried to tell me something.
This kind of thing happens all the time.
Let me explain to you how this works.
His grandmother can't walk, can she?
His grandmother can't walk, can she?
I am playing with my daughter.
My father drives to work.
Who first reached the summit of Mt. Everest?
Tom started shaking.
I'm sorry I had to leave you alone.
I'm sorry I had to leave you alone.
Tom told me that book is interesting.
Why are you in such a good mood?
Why are you in such a bad mood?
She's about my age.
That sounds easy enough.
It's a pity that he can't get married to her.
Let's meet in front of the hotel.
Let's meet in front of the hotel.
She went to school in spite of the pain in her right leg.
It's time to talk.
Tom would forgive you.
Tom would forgive you.
Do you know what this car cost?
Tom never drinks milk.
Give me back my book.
Give me back my book.
Give me back my book.
Give me back my book.
Tom said that he was happy.
Tom refused to answer.
Tom is probably very busy.
Tom must be very busy.
Tom has left the building.
Tom is always so busy.
Tom wants to work in a hospital.
Tom got married again.
Tom fought in Vietnam.
I remember your grandfather well.
I shouldn't have eaten so much ice cream.
Somalia is called "as-Sumal" in Arabic.
Are you sure you have enough money?
Are you sure you have enough money?
Are you sure you have enough money?
Are you sure you have enough money?
Are you sure you have enough money?
Are you sure you have enough money?
I think I can help Tom with his homework.
Don't cry, Tom.
You have to see this film.
The TV was on all night.
The TV was on all night.
Tom registered for gender reassignment surgery.
I've never met someone that I love as much as I love you.
I thought you'd never call.
Tom was wearing a black turtleneck.
Tell Tom I'll be there in thirty minutes.
You have no idea what that means, do you?
Dan came home very drunk.
Tom wanted to see me right away.
She can't even speak her native language without making mistakes.
I heard her singing.
I heard her singing.
He sent me a letter.
I wonder why Tom wanted me to be here today.
My brother likes cars.
I forgot to tell you what time the meeting's going to start.
I forgot to tell you what time the meeting's going to start.
What time does the movie start?
There's a lot you don't know about me.
There's a lot you don't know about me.
I know you're thinking about me.
I thought you'd like me.
I'd like her to be happy.
I'm sure you'll like him.
Tom reserved a seat.
When is the museum open?
Please don't forget me.
Please don't forget me.
Tom doesn't like to be called a fool.
Tom is an absolute fool.
That was so much fun.
Yeah, something like that.
There's a price on his head.
Are you still dating the same girl?
How did the meeting go?
Tom looks like his grandfather.
Tom is lying on the grass.
Tears poured from her eyes.
I almost cried.
There was blood on the knife.
Tom removed his shirt.
This is my best shirt.
Tom didn't have to take off his shirt.
Tom didn't take off his shirt.
Tom should have been ready at least an hour ago.
Tom should've finished at least an hour ago.
You have a bright future.
You have a bright future.
I'm the last person on your list, aren't I?
Tom learns pretty fast.
It's going to take three weeks.
Tom was seriously wounded.
Tom is wearing a very expensive watch.
Will you get me a glass of water?
Why aren't you dressed yet?
How does this thing work?
Don't forget to do your homework, okay?
You must quit drinking.
You must quit drinking.
Are you sure Tom is the person you saw?
Where did Tom call from?
What time did Tom call?
Tom gave me his key.
Are you sure you really want to be here?
Tom gave me that idea.
You must try.
You must try.
I think you'd better talk to him.
On Sundays, the museum is not open.
You are happy about the result.
You are happy about the result.
Raise your left hand.
I only read the first four chapters.
I only smoke when I drink.
I only want what is rightfully mine.
We're not going anywhere.
I wonder which one of you is lying.
Picasso was a famous painter.
Help! Rescue me!
What kinds of movies do you like to watch?
Don't you have school today?
Tom is in danger.
This is Julia's pen.
Tom is working on another novel.
The film started at 2 o'clock.
I'll give you thirty minutes.
You don't have to tell me again.
Cathy has a temper.
The company has branches in all large cities.
I was the first to read the letter.
Though he was poor, he was happy.
It seemed too good to be true.
I can't make you happy.
She asked him to come into her house, but he refused.
I cannot help thinking that my son is still alive.
What kind of music do you like to listen to when you're driving?
When do I get my car back?
Do you know how busy I've been?
Do you know how busy I've been?
Do you know how busy I've been?
Do you know how busy I've been?
There is no hope.
A capital letter is used at the beginning of a sentence.
What percentage of our bodies is water?
Tom spends too much time at work.
I'll be busy until four.
I have to admit that you're right.
I can't stand all this noise.
My daughter is still at work.
This building belongs to my family.
I found the key I had been looking for.
One is a teacher, another is a doctor, and the other is a journalist.
I'd never hit a woman.
Let's not waste any more time.
Let's not waste any more time.
Thanks a lot for the advice.
Tom says he doesn't know when the meeting starts.
Where did you take these photos?
What did that prove?
I didn't go anywhere yesterday.
The joke fell flat.
The joke fell flat.
I can't finish this today.
You can't force us to go.
You can't force us to go.
You can't keep this a secret.
You can't keep this a secret.
You can't know that for sure.
Please don't call me anymore.
No running around.
No running around.
This is just my opinion.
Why don't you help Tom?
It's about the last film of Andrei Tarkovsky.
Tom came home earlier than I expected.
The movie was more interesting than I expected it to be.
The movie was longer than I expected it to be.
Why's it so hot in here?
She went out when she finished her work.
It's not my car.
Tom tried solving the problem.
Tom said he heard three gunshots that night.
Tom put his keys in his pocket.
Tom went to prison for murder.
Among wild ducks, it seems there are homosexual necrophiliacs.
There is nothing more to say!
It was totally random.
I still love him very much.
There is hope for everybody.
Never forget this, please.
Tom hopes that it doesn't snow tomorrow.
We have a relationship.
Tom calls every night.
Tom calls every night.
I am not guilty and I am not a bad person.
Do you care what they think?
She read the book in one day.
Are we in trouble?
I'm not sure if it's love.
I'm not sure if it's love.
Are you capable of that?
Are you capable of that?
Who'll believe that?
This is very painful.
My grandfather used to say that.
I was just asking a question. "Mind your own business."
You should write a song about that.
You should write a song about that.
Whose turn is it to take out the garbage?
Whose turn is it to make dinner tonight?
What's your last name, Tom?
Tom wants to change.
Do you want to end up like them?
Do you want to end up like them?
Do you want to end up like him?
Do you want to end up like him?
Do you want to end up like her?
Do you want to end up like her?
He is dead and buried now.
My life has changed since I met her.
Tom bought presents for his children.
I'd heard you'd changed.
When was the last time you helped your wife?
He looked at me with a strange expression.
We are all happy to help.
This is the best method to solve that problem.
Do you want me to repeat the question?
Do you want me to repeat the question?
I have three brothers; one lives in Japan, and the others abroad.
I still have some doubts.
He said he wanted to be a scientist.
The French word 'chat' means 'cat'.
Are you rich?
I have pictures of San Francisco.
This blackboard is not black, but green.
Tom calls me almost every day.
Tom isn't a Japanese citizen.
What do horses eat?
What would you do in this situation?
What would you do in this situation?
Tom isn't as stupid as he looks.
Tom is always busy.
Tom is a scientist.
Tom is a good student.
Tom was crying like a baby.
Sometimes, questions provide us with more information than answers.
He was in the shop.
It's one thing to make plans, but quite another to carry them out.
I know you think this is a stupid thing to do, but I plan to do it anyway.
I liked that song. Sing us another one like it.
Tom shouted for help.
Tom isn't my type.
I'm not a child. Don't talk to me like I am.
Does Tom live far from here?
Success! Soon, anybody can start learning Klingon!
Tom wants to get married again.
He could not forsake his friend in trouble.
I'm a little scared.
Is she still working as a teacher?
They were lucky.
Half of them are students.
That's simply not possible.
Tom fell to the ground.
He said he was busy.
These politicians want to build a bridge to nowhere.
I'm getting on the bus.
You said you were done.
You said you were done.
You said you were done.
Tom said he was afraid.
I know why Tom is busy.
I was trying to prove something.
Give me thirty seconds.
Why are you all so busy?
That wasn't on the list.
Thanks for your opinion.
Thanks for the tip, Tom.
I thought you were busy.
Who gave you that shirt?
I already gave you half.
I'm looking for my cat.
Tom refused to pay his bills.
My little brother and I are the same height.
My brother is as tall as me.
How tall is your little brother?
How tall is your brother?
You have a healthy baby boy.
Are you saying that this is my fault?
Are you saying that this is my fault?
He bought her flowers.
I don't care who you are, I care about what you do.
You're taller than I expected.
Do you like the taste of beer?
Do you like the taste of beer?
Do you like horror movies?
Do you like horror movies?
You're drunk, Tom.
He has a wife and three children.
Tom, please leave me alone.
You have to choose.
You must choose.
You have to choose.
You must choose.
You are to start at once.
You must forgive me.
He parked his car in front of the building.
A car drew up in front of my house.
There is a lake in front of my house.
You must get up a little earlier.
I didn't want to cry in front of him.
Tom is good at cards.
Tom went to answer the door.
Why doesn't Tom open the door?
Another step, and you would have fallen down the stairs.
Who'd you invite?
Who'd you invite?
Why is this knife not in the drawer?
You'll never believe what happened!
You'll never believe what happened!
You'll never believe what happened!
You'll never believe what happened!
They're very busy.
I don't feel like playing cards.
I thought Tom had stopped dating Mary.
I'm not used to be treated like that.
Tom is not a very good driver.
Tom is a taxi driver.
Tom is dead drunk.
Tom wakes up early.
Tom usually gets up early.
Tom used to get up early.
He used to get up early.
She's accustomed to getting up early.
The drawer is empty.
The drawer is empty.
Tom is full of energy.
The night is young.
Tom is almost as tall as you are.
You're bothering me.
Yes, I'm a student too.
I can't believe Tom said that.
Tom wants to know when you're coming.
We'll send somebody.
We'll talk tomorrow.
We'll try again.
Either this man is dead or my watch has stopped.
When should we tell him?
How large is the population of this city?
Tom has lost the will to live.
Are you sure you're ready to go?
Why did you become a teacher?
Tom teaches his friends French.
Tom is better looking than you.
It's likely that Tom will come.
I'm not sure, but Tom may come.
I'm getting married next month.
I'll meet you at 2:30 tomorrow.
Everything seems normal enough.
We hurried, so we didn't miss the last bus.
I thought it was about time we all met.
I'm trying not to cry.
I'd like to give you the key, but I can't.
I'd like to give you the key, but I can't.
Tom is wearing the same clothes he wore yesterday.
Tom is clearly not happy.
I have no feeling in my left leg.
I'll be happy to explain.
We've never been happier.
You won't be happy there.
You won't be happy there.
You don't look all that busy.
What if it's too late?
What if it's too late?
Do you think there's a hope?
Do you think there's a hope?
It doesn't taste as good as it looks.
It looks good on paper.
I must object.
She sat and smoked.
Tom knows wines.
If you want, I can show you how to do that.
It was everything she hoped for.
He did nothing but cry.
You're a grown woman now.
Can you arrange it?
Let's face it, it's impossible. We're never gonna make it.
Much depends upon the result.
The only way to have a friend is to be a friend.
Tom is the best singer in our class.
Tom said he was busy.
Tom was dressed in black.
Where shall we go now? To the theatre or cinema?
I felt completely happy.
Who's the party for?
Look, I'm really busy.
Tom was my teacher.
Are the shops open on Saturday?
It was her idea. She made me do it.
It was his idea. He made me do it.
Our guests will arrive in a few minutes.
I haven't finished reading this book.
I knew they were lying!
Tom has changed a lot since high school.
This is a sentence that I don't know how to translate.
I've never been to Spain. However, I have been in Italy.
A Mr. Jones came while you were out.
Please let me go home.
Please let me go home.
I only have a single daughter.
Buy the dress you want.
It must mean something.
You have to talk to me.
We could talk about it.
We can talk on the bus.
Can I just talk to you?
You can try.
I just want to make you happy.
God, what's wrong with me today?
I don't understand this sentence.
I see I'm wasting my time.
Did you call an ambulance?
Did you call an ambulance?
You're a good journalist.
Tom, what happened? Why are you crying?
Tom will definitely help me.
I ate fish yesterday.
They believed your story.
It hangs on your decision.
Tom is too drunk to drive home.
I know exactly who Tom would like to meet.
We only use 10% of our brain.
That's the first option.
That's the first option.
He has a painting of Jesus Christ in the living room.
We're all adults here.
I'll wait another five minutes.
You made me very happy.
A cat sleeps on a chair.
The girl trembled with fear.
What does it actually mean?
What does it actually mean?
Look, there's a cat in the kitchen.
It's a drop in the bucket.
I enjoy spending time with her.
Give us a call when you arrive.
The soup is hot.
The escalator suddenly stopped.
I believed him.
She had long blond hair.
Why are you lying to me? "I'm not lying."
He was impatient to see his daughter.
It was important to me.
Let me explain how this works.
I think I can see our house from here.
Does this medicine really work?
Are you sure I can't help?
Are you sure I can't help?
Some snakes are dangerous.
Stop looking at me.
Where did you put the keys?
That's not entirely correct.
I thought that Tom was happy.
I'm not going to get married.
I'm roughly the same age as you.
Now, get me a drink.
Look, just call me.
That's why I left.
That's why I left.
Don't you think you should call Tom?
Don't you think you should call Tom?
Don't you think you should call Tom?
Don't you think you should call Tom?
Tom never forgave me.
It is worth it to read the novel.
He probably has a girlfriend already.
Tom cries every time he hears this song.
Tom cries every time he hears this song.
Our apartment is on the third floor.
It was a bad film.
How much does this bag cost?
Is this book worth reading?
I think that I came too early.
I cannot lift such a heavy car.
I'd love to meet you.
The sentence is OK.
Who built this place?
We can't lie to them.
We can't lie to him.
We can't lie to her.
Why don't you give me a few suggestions?
This is a narrow street.
It's time for you to go to bed.
The bird has not returned.
The situation is disastrous.
There is no pleasure without pain.
The teacher told us that Columbus discovered America in 1492.
We're on the wrong floor.
I stepped on Tom's dog's tail.
My cat loves milk.
Give me my money back.
Tom sells cars.
Tom sold his house.
Send them to me.
How many planets are there in the solar system?
I'm still not sure I can do that.
Who found them?
My daughter is coming home.
I'm not going to explain it to you.
Land prices are very high in Japan.
The bus has just left.
Which woman’s son is sick?
Tom can barely breathe.
Tom appeared calm.
Tom is busy now.
Talk to us, Tom.
You're a good journalist.
Call a doctor immediately.
I know you aren't stupid enough to believe that.
Tom told me you hit him.
Talk to me, Tom.
I'm not as stupid as people think.
I'm not as stupid as people think.
I should've married your sister instead of you.
I'll be busy until 2:30.
I asked him to send us the book.
I get up at 6 o'clock every morning.
I can't tell you how happy I am.
I drank a glass of milk.
You cannot hit your brother.
We've got to stick together.
Almost all humans wear clothes.
Hit me.
Don't call me up after ten o'clock.
Tom is too old to be doing this kind of thing.
Tom is good at this kind of thing.
Tom isn't in the mood for this.
Tom is the only one who can handle this.
Tom is going to want to read this.
Tom isn't sure he wants to do this.
Tom isn't sure who he should give the document to.
Why do we have to decide this today?
Why don't you listen?
I wore a beautiful dress.
I wore a beautiful dress.
Why don't you give up smoking?
We're not dating.
We all just want to be loved.
I thought he was rich.
Let's hope not.
Can I have something hot to drink?
My husband and I are both teachers.
Give me that knife.
Tom didn't know that Mary was already dead.
Pedophilia is probably more common than people think.
I don't eat poultry.
I have to go to the bank now.
I'm not a scientist.
I have no information on him.
Tom is getting married on Monday.
Tom asked for my advice.
You had a cat.
What's the fastest way to get there from here?
He looked at him in the mirror.
He looked at him in the mirror.
It's a crime against nature.
Tom lost his parents in a traffic accident.
I wasn't talking.
I wasn't talking.
I'd be happy to help.
What kind of gifts did you get?
Let's talk about death.
Let's hope Tom is home.
We'll find another way.
We'll be happy to help.
We'll have to act fast.
Are you done? she said, as I had but started.
I just got up. Give me a few minutes to get ready.
I will talk about it with my horse.
You'll like them.
You'll like them.
You'll like him.
You'll like him.
You'll like her.
You'll like her.
I don't want anybody writing about me.
The store is closed Mondays.
Tom looks a bit embarrassed.
You're giving me the creeps.
I thought you were in prison.
I thought you were in prison.
Summer seems to have come at last.
Do you think Tom believed what you told him?
Do you think Tom believed what you told him?
Tom realized that Mary wasn't paying attention to what he was saying.
Someone stepped on my foot.
Someone stepped on my foot.
I wonder if Tom would really do something like that.
You're looking better.
May I introduce you to Dr. Johnson?
I'm not sure you're going to understand this.
I've got nothing to give you.
I don't have anything to give you.
I didn't expect this from you.
I didn't expect this from you.
I didn't expect this from you.
I didn't expect this from you.
I'm sorry, but I can't help you.
I've got nothing to offer you.
I've got nothing to offer you.
There's a call for you.
There's a call for you.
Tom never opens that window.
We'd better wait until tomorrow.
Bring me a glass of water.
Tom seems stupid.
Prices rose drastically as a result of this policy.
We have to talk right now.
I would never do that to you.
Look, I'm being serious.
She wants to live close to nature.
I gave all my money away.
Tom, may I speak with you?
Try telling Tom that.
Try telling Tom that.
We must've been followed.
We should stick together.
Why should I talk to you?
We've got to talk to you.
We can talk on the train.
We can talk in the study.
He's an accomplished artist.
How old is this TV?
In an instant, everything changed.
I don't know what to do about this situation.
Tom looked a bit nervous.
They believed us.
You're not from here, are you?
Tom knows how much I love him.
Tom is going to ask me to marry him.
Tom is hoping you'll help him.
Tom is hoping you'll help him.
Tom knows you'll never forgive him.
Tom is dating someone at the hospital.
Tom has got to get to a hospital.
Tom came three minutes after I called him.
Tom might just as well go home.
I hear you studied at Harvard.
I hear you studied at Harvard.
I hear you studied at Harvard.
I hear you studied at Harvard.
Tom hasn't called you, has he?
Tom hasn't called you, has he?
Tom is now looking very happy.
Tom said that he was happy.
Tom just wanted to be happy.
Tom just wants to be happy.
Do you really think Tom is happy?
Are you sure Tom is happy?
Are you sure Tom is happy?
Are you sure Tom is happy?
Tom is accustomed to working hard.
Tom lacks experience, doesn't he?
My children are all in perfect health.
We're going to have to wait and see what happens.
Tom is a pretty capable guy.
Tom is beginning to lose his hair.
Now I wish to go to sleep.
We'll be safe here.
Have a safe flight.
We're not speaking.
We just met tonight.
Tom tried to lift the box.
Tom tried to lift the box.
I think the box has something in it.
Tom wants a watch for his birthday.
I got up early today.
I'm much better today than I was yesterday.
Suddenly Tom began to cry.
You need surgery.
You need surgery.
I know whose bag this is.
You must not forget that she is as young as you.
What else was in the box?
If you could be a colour, what would you be?
I should've studied more.
Who's your favorite Beatle?
How long does it take to go to Madrid?
That should've been expected.
Do you think Tom is wealthy?
We just can't stand each other.
I'm in perfect health.
Is this a mistake?
You've made us wait.
Why don't you give it up?
We can't be sure.
It's just impossible to live with you!
She is a good liar.
Some people don't eat meat.
It gave me an idea.
They left after they finished lunch.
Tell Tom we're busy.
You're safe with us.
We'll be safe there.
Men never cry.
She opens her legs for everyone.
Tom uses Windows 7.
I didn't have my keys with me.
I promise I won't tell anyone where you are.
I promise I won't tell anyone where you are.
I promise I won't tell anyone where you are.
He came back many years later.
He told her something sweet.
I hope I find someone who can help us.
Tom is usually drunk by this time of day.
It was very late at night.
This song is beautiful when you sing it.
Tom is part of the team too!
We were probably followed.
I saw Professor Gómez yesterday.
I don't like the sound of this.
Their romance was the talk of the town.
We're just friends. Seriously!
Do you go to church every Sunday?
Do you go to church every Sunday?
They aren't dating... yet.
They aren't dating, are they?
What do you want me to tell Tom? "The truth." "That's a bad idea."
What do you want me to tell Tom? "The truth." "That's a bad idea."
They aren't dating.
Tom and John were in the army together.
Here are some pictures.
I like it spicy, but I don't like it too spicy.
She refused to talk to me.
He refused to talk to me.
He refused to talk to me.
She refused to talk to me.
We'll do our best to work as quickly as possible.
We're a team!
We're a team!
We're a team!
We're a team!
You need to be a team player.
Who gave the command?
Now give me the keys.
Let me give it a try.
Just give Tom a call.
Give me the car keys.
We're in big trouble.
We're going by train.
We're your last hope.
Tom sang pretty well.
I'm not even sure I like him.
Tom got into trouble.
I wouldn't allow that.
Tom is my best worker.
Tom fired three shots.
You're a little early.
You picked a bad time.
I hope Tom comes soon.
I guess it was a joke.
I'm not even sure I like her.
He can't be all bad.
I really like the way your hair looks.
You have a nice laugh.
He put me in a good mood.
Tom said he was at home on the night of the murder.
I'll call you after lunch.
You've never had a boyfriend, have you?
I'm not sure that's a good thing.
Tom was sitting on the couch alone.
Tom was wearing flip-flops and a Hawaiian shirt.
I don't know how to translate that sentence correctly.
Tom is a journalist.
I prefer to text than to talk on the phone.
Tom wore black pants.
You have to try this.
A baby deer can stand as soon as it is born.
We went to the same church.
I admit that I was a little drunk.
I used to play alone when I was a child.
My father told me I couldn't go abroad alone.
Can we save the planet?
Who are you to decide?
Who are you to decide?
Tom didn't like French class very much.
Tom isn't awake yet.
A fool's bolt is soon shot.
Mr. Sato practices archery on weekends.
The horse trotted down the road.
A very beautiful picture is hanging on the wall.
They really are at loggerheads.
The general ordered the massacre of all war prisoners.
I'm very glad to finally meet you.
I'm very glad to finally meet you.
Leave my room immediately.
Leave my room immediately.
Your letter has arrived too late.
I'm sure Tom told you the truth.
I'm sure Tom told you the truth.
I'll be busy all week.
Tom knew that that was a bad idea.
I was studying English when you called yesterday.
Love is a beautiful thing.
Tom has just finished writing a letter to Mary.
I gave Tom all my money.
Tom told you I was coming, didn't he?
Tell Tom you're too busy to help him.
Tell Tom we're doing the best we can.
Tom had to admit that he was wrong.
His speech is worth listening to.
Tom does like you. I'm sure of it.
Do you have any other suggestions?
I'm glad to have a roof over my head.
I deal with people like that all the time.
Tom usually helps me with this kind of thing.
You could try.
You could try.
You haven't changed.
You haven't changed.
You look bad.
You look bad.
Do you live in this building?
She killed an hour looking around the stores.
I'm done for today.
That's a very beautiful dress.
You are teachers.
We used to spend hours there.
I think this is the best way to do it.
There's something I want to talk to you about.
They sat in silence.
If you're looking for a job, call me.
If Tom's not happy, I'm not happy.
When is Cheryl’s birthday?
We're going back to the ship.
She was horrified.
We're friends, right?
Think before you open your mouth.
Think before you open your mouth.
Thank you for inviting me here.
Thank you for inviting me here.
Thank you for inviting me here.
She doesn't talk to me about anything anymore.
I think you're going to like Tom.
I think you're going to like Tom.
I think you're going to like this movie.
I think you're going to like this movie.
You talk in your sleep.
I'd like to talk to you about what happened.
I can't do anything for him.
It doesn't sound too serious.
Tom is too weak to lift himself.
He still writes poems.
She still writes poems.
He speaks Berber to his teachers.
She was in the hospital for six weeks because she was sick.
I'm not sure I understand.
She's a modern girl.
Have you seen my car keys?
Have you seen my car keys?
Have you seen my car keys?
Do you know any good German movies?
He asked me to go to a movie with him.
Do I look fat?
Tom gave orders.
Tom doesn't want to go to the hospital.
We're safer here than we would be in a city.
All of my students call me by my first name.
All of my students call me by my first name.
Get me some paper.
Don't call the police.
Don't call the police.
I'm happy you're here.
I lost sight of them.
I lost sight of her.
Judging from the look of the sky, it is going to snow.
She put the money in the bank.
Do you have any suggestions?
You may leave if you wish.
I'd like to try to do this on my own.
He is mad about music.
I think it's time to get out of here.
You're not going to help me, are you?
Do you eat fish?
Do you eat fish?
I hope you are hungry.
Judging from the sky, it will rain soon.
Tom did it just for fun.
This is a lot of fun, isn't it?
He has begun to enjoy country life.
I'm going to the country for the weekend.
Can we talk tomorrow?
Who's Tom speaking to?
Let's talk about food.
Don't point at others.
Did you talk about me?
The teacher pointed to the blackboard.
Is this a sign?
Were you talking to me?
Were you talking to me?
We can talk over lunch.
We can talk over lunch.
Tom pointed toward the ceiling.
Please turn right at the next intersection.
Do you know what that thing was?
Tom looks absolutely horrified.
Tom looked vaguely embarrassed.
I don't know who else to turn to.
Now that I have a girlfriend, I'm happy.
They were really happy.
The guests are in the kitchen.
You two look busy.
Tom actually believed you.
She knew a lot of songs, too.
People who will lie for you, will lie to you.
There's no time to talk.
Sit down and talk to me.
You'd make a good grandfather.
Who do you suggest we talk to?
Can you force them to do that?
I have to set my watch back. It's very fast.
Thank you very much for your gift.
There were three men in the room.
Tom rented a room.
I promise to come back early.
I promise to come back early.
Coffee comes after the meal.
According to his opinion, yes.
She would probably do the same as he.
He will travel abroad next year.
She cannot have forgotten my address.
This is the very book that I have long wanted to read.
She added milk to the coffee.
You must act under the leadership of your supervisor.
They saw us as they were getting off the train.
They saw us as they were getting off the train.
I'm in a bad mood today.
Today, I'm in a bad mood.
This is the first time I've ever run in order to catch the train.
Give us the keys.
Give us the keys.
Tony started dating Angela five months ago.
I've only used it once.
I hope I can get my old job back.
I hope I can get my old job back.
He is also returning late today.
It's still too early to talk about this now.
Tom traveled back in time.
How are your grandparents?
I could be away for some time.
We don't know any songs.
Fire is always dangerous.
We agreed to his suggestions.
The bullet found its mark.
Tom used up all his bullets.
The bullet entered above the knee.
The bullet entered above the knee.
There's only one bullet left.
We were afraid that we might be hit by a bullet, so we ran downstairs.
Talk to her.
Tom doesn't know whether Mary is busy or not.
The cat is lying under the table.
We are confident of victory.
They gained a victory.
What size are you?
Did you see the knife?
The room is light.
I was greatly impressed by the speech.
I'm not the only one who thinks you're stupid.
Who's next on the list?
Who's next on the list?
Are you sure you want to do this right now?
Are you sure this is the best way to do this?
How did you know Tom wasn't going to like it?
How did you know Tom wasn't going to like it?
I'm not as old as most people think I am.
Why did you sell it?
I'd like you to accompany me.
I have a proposition for you.
I've got a lot of good ideas.
Here's the list Tom gave me.
How did you guess that?
How did you guess that?
How did you guess that?
How did you guess that?
You know Tom is lying.
You have to let me go.
Tom is a quiet person.
Tom enjoyed the movie.
Tom seems quite happy.
It's a surprise to me.
Didn't you get my note?
They listened intently.
Tom looked in a mirror.
Tom is playing it safe.
Tom heard a loud sound.
I know of a city whose inhabitants never smoked.
My phone is about to die.
They eat meat.
The bus stops right in front of my house.
They won't speak to Tom.
You know too much about me.
You guys need to calm down.
Pay attention to this problem.
Did you open all the boxes?
I need new glasses.
I hope we have enough time.
I just came in for a drink.
Are you sure you can't help us?
Are you sure you can't help us?
Do you think Tom would help us?
Do you think Tom would help us?
I hope you're all having a good time.
I don't think Tom is capable of that.
I don't know how long this will take.
I should tell Tom, right?
I suggest we get started.
I suggest you find a job.
I suggest you try harder.
I think Tom is contented.
Tom admitted his guilt.
We're trying to rescue you.
I'm really glad you called.
I'm sure Tom told you that.
I got you a little present.
I have a good idea for you.
Listen closely.
For your own safety, never ride in a car with a drunk driver.
Why isn't Tom helping us?
Who owns that house?
What's in these boxes?
I cried a lot.
I cried a lot.
Tom was fussy.
Come on in, Tom.
I squeezed Tom's hand.
I've been busy lately.
I'm sure it's personal.
I'm sure you mean that.
You look good in white.
You should talk to us.
Just don't leave me.
Just don't leave me.
Just don't leave me.
Just don't leave me.
Tom always dresses in black.
These are beautiful flowers.
Nobody believed you.
Can you lend me a little money?
Please give me back my money.
No one expected Tom to win.
No one expected him to win.
No one expected her to win.
You have to spend more time with your son.
Tell me your address.
Are you real sure about that?
I really wish I knew why Tom didn't like me.
I grew up in that house.
We listened to music yesterday.
These are technical documents and they are very difficult to translate.
Tom said he didn't like the taste of beer.
Thanks for agreeing to meet me here.
When I see him, I think of my grandfather.
The story had a happy ending.
I don't like to eat fish with many bones.
I know you're doing your best.
Tom's very dangerous.
Tom can advise you.
Tom can advise you.
Tom told me it was none of my business.
Tom pulled out his iPhone.
Wait a second here.
Tom just wanted to be left alone.
Tom just wanted to be left alone.
Tom didn't like the taste.
She's going to buy them that as a gift.
Tom started crying again.
Let's wait and see how things go.
Let's wait and hear what Tom thinks.
Tom is accustomed to hard work.
You can be sure of that.
That red-roofed house is my uncle's.
Tom said he was an artist.
Tom says it was your idea.
Tom sleeps on his stomach.
You're going to be famous.
You're practically family.
I did the best I could do.
I'll bet my bottom dollar he'll succeed.
I just bet you were thinking something perverse just now.
I have a nice camera.
I can't breathe.
He made me go.
Who sent this?
Tom made me go.
Who sent the flowers?
He made me go there.
He made me go against my will.
Tom sent flowers to his mother.
They sent us the results.
Where was your daughter?
It's been a long time since I've heard that song.
I can't believe Tom.
Does Tom ever write letters in French?
Washington's army has captured Trenton.
We are trying a completely new method.
Tom did what he said he would do.
We'll soon be busy, won't we?
I live kilometers away from the nearest station.
You two will work as a team.
I can't get work as a teacher.
It was really overpriced.
Tom was nervous and scared.
My father works at the factory as an engineer.
He took out a piece of chalk.
He took out a piece of chalk.
He took out a piece of chalk.
He took out a piece of chalk.
Give me three pieces of chalk.
Tom will try to finish the work as early as possible.
He went to Mexico to work as a teacher of English.
What's in those boxes?
Tom bought a condominium near the lake.
Whose sentences are these? "They are Amastan's."
Do you like my clothes?
Who's calling at this hour?
Tom had a pistol.
Tom recognized the sound.
Tom said it was up to us.
Tom slept with his clothes on.
Tom's not missing, is he?
We get a lot of requests.
This movie was very interesting.
You told Tom yes, I hope.
You'd better check again.
You'll never change, Tom.
Are you wearing that dress for the first time?
Can you come over tonight?
Consider yourselves lucky.
Could I talk to you a sec?
You want Tom to be safe, don't you?
Tom didn't want to go to jail.
Have you looked in the bottom drawer?
Are you sure you don't remember?
Are you sure you don't remember?
What kind of ranch did you grow up on?
Tom drove away.
Tom moved away from the window.
He soon walked away.
He got into the car and drove off.
Tom got into his car and drove away.
Tom got into his car and quickly drove off.
She was very rich.
I have a present for you.
I have a present for you.
I have a friend waiting downstairs.
She was not invited.
I have a brief statement.
It looks delicious.
Isn't it obvious?
I stand for freedom of speech for everyone.
I drank a lot of beer.
There was a Persian cat sleeping on the table.
I always wanted to be a teacher.
Who did that belong to?
I'll go crying to bed.
Who was Tom talking to?
Mother gets up earliest in my family.
Tom invited us to lunch.
It really is a good price.
It was your grandfather's.
Why do we have to help Tom?
The bag was too heavy to carry.
The bag was too heavy for me to move.
The bag was big, and moreover, it was heavy.
The bag was too heavy for me to carry by myself.
Why did Tom want Mary killed?
Don't sit down on the sofa.
Is thirty dollars enough?
Tom is the night janitor.
Tom isn't going anywhere.
We succeeded in finishing the project.
What should I do in order to spare time?
Did you bring what you promised you'd bring?
Did you bring what you promised you'd bring?
Did you bring what you promised you'd bring?
Did you bring what you promised you'd bring?
Would you please send this letter by airmail?
Would you mind sending this letter for me?
Tom struggled to climb to the top.
I'm glad you could come. Please make yourself at home.
I'm naked.
What did John sing on the stage?
Tom goes to work by train.
Tom never forgave himself.
We were both very busy.
Can we talk about it later?
I knew Tom wasn't dead.
I knew Tom wasn't dead.
I knew Tom would forgive me.
I knew Tom would forgive me.
I knew Tom would forgive me.
I knew Tom would forgive me.
No one should desert his friends.
No one should desert his friends.
Since we had no school today, I stayed home and watched TV all day.
I've got a mate who works there.
It took less than five minutes.
We're hoping Tom's still alive.
It happened that I sat next to her at a meeting.
It happened that I sat next to her at a meeting.
Thank you for the advice.
I don't want to go anywhere today.
We don't have classes today.
There are no classes today.
We don't have classes today.
Tom watched television yesterday.
I hope Tom is feeling OK.
I know they're both busy.
My husband passed on two years ago, an elderly lady said.
I hear you just got married.
Tom is looking for his keys.
The victory is yours.
Tom has left the country.
For me, it is important.
Do you want to call Tom?
Do you want to call Tom?
He repeated it again.
They seem so happy.
The cat is safe.
Perhaps we'll have better luck tomorrow.
It'll have to wait till tomorrow.
I've got inside information.
They were collecting information.
I can't remember the last time I was this happy.
Tom proceeded to the next question.
Tom has been quite busy recently.
Tom always arrives early.
I think you need to figure this out on your own.
I think everybody should try to calm down.
I think everybody should try to calm down.
This is not my key.
Tom said that he lost his key.
I think it's time to start getting ready.
It's better to be thought a fool than to open your mouth and prove it.
Tom tried to run.
Tom tried to run.
My neighbor is nice.
That's a big mistake.
This is exactly the type that we need.
What...for real?
I hope you have fun.
I hope you have fun.
All of them wanted to know my secret.
She's grown up to be a beautiful woman.
The level of education of contemporary people is far higher than it has been in the past.
Can't you take a joke?
Do you really expect me to believe this?
Do you really expect me to believe this?
Do you really expect me to believe this?
Tom took a book off the shelf.
I think we're finished here.
It's probably a mistake.
It's time we had a talk.
Tom called out for help.
Tom nodded again.
Why not wait until tomorrow?
Tom hasn't called yet.
Are you sure that's Tom?
Are you sure that's Tom?
That's a stupid question!
I just finished.
My cat is running around the room.
My cat is running around the room.
It is said that the price of wine may go up at any time now.
It is said that the price of wine may go up at any time now.
He married a local girl.
I assume you've heard about what happened here yesterday.
Why didn't you wait for us?
Why didn't you wait for us?
Tom didn't want to help us.
Tom didn't want to help us.
I appreciate your position.
I know Tom will forgive us.
I thought Tom had got lost.
I'll give you a call later.
I'll give you a good price.
I'm occupied at the moment.
Don't lie.
Don't lie.
We're not as stupid as you thought, right?
Why do you want to leave?
It might've taken longer if Tom hadn't helped us.
I forgot to tell Tom what time to meet us.
Do you really think Tom will want to go with us?
Tom doesn't talk to us anymore.
You shouldn't be out of bed.
Do you really think Tom will want to go with us?
Tom said you told him to wait.
Tom says he won't get married.
Tom couldn't find his hometown on the map.
The teacher has never made fun of the students' mistakes.
I feel indebted to you for your help during my illness.
Perhaps Tom will leave.
I wrote to Tom a while ago, but he hasn't replied yet.
She turned to the left at the corner.
Let me give you my address.
Tell Tom I'll see him soon.
Thanks for letting me stay.
It's OK to cry.
That's probably a misprint.
Tom kept the window closed.
Search; find; discover!
Tom sat on the sofa.
Can we move on?
I thought everyone was busy.
Tom will forgive you eventually.
I haven't found my keys yet.
Never go anywhere alone.
You can't go anywhere.
You can't go anywhere.
You can't go anywhere.
You can't go anywhere.
I'm the youngest child.
You've lost too much blood.
You've lost too much blood.
Do you want to watch a movie?
Do you want to watch a movie?
I didn't want to go to the reception.
I'm not a big letter writer.
That's why we have to leave.
That's why we need to leave.
Tom wouldn't murder anybody.
Do you think Tom is still up?
Do you think Tom is still up?
Do you know what's in here?
Do you know what's in here?
I'm young, but I'm not that young.
I'm not sure how long this will take.
You don't know how much I love you.
Where on earth were you, all this time?
I'm glad I don't have anywhere to go.
I'm afraid that's no longer possible.
I'll try to find out where Tom lives.
That's a big mistake, isn't it?
It could be the biggest mistake you ever make.
I was hoping this would never happen.
Can we have a word with you?
They won't even talk to me.
You don't know all the facts.
We should leave immediately.
We understand you perfectly.
Tom says it's important.
Are you dressed?
Are you dressed?
Are you dressed?
What do they look like?
What colours do you like?
What colours do you like?
The price of meat dropped.
Who else was at the meeting?
I think Tom doesn't eat meat.
I thought we'd be safer here.
Tom lies to you all the time.
Tom wouldn't even talk to me.
Did you buy flowers?
You will never guess who I met in the city today! "Maria?" "What? How do you know that?"
What time does school begin?
What time does school begin?
He likes to observe birds.
I'm not dating him.
It was almost 2:30 when Tom finally got home.
Tom was the victim of a homicide.
It's solid as a rock.
Tom has gone to the store to buy some milk.
Here's your milk.
Here's your milk.
This jacket fits pretty well.
You look really pale. Are you all right?
Tom was unconscious for three days.
Tom was wearing clothes similar to John's.
Why are girls so complicated?
Tom jumped out of his car.
Tom would never let me drive his car.
Why did you sell your car?
Why did you sell your car?
Why did you sell your car?
Get back in your car.
I want to study abroad.
I don't like this store.
I'd like to talk about that.
I'd prefer to be left alone.
I'll get right to the point.
I'll give you some examples.
We aren't done yet.
I'm sure they're wrong.
I'm sure they're right.
I'm here about the job.
I'll put on some music.
The more I spoke, the wider her grin became.
Tom made it quite clear why we had to have the job finished by 2:30.
I'm sure I've seen that guy somewhere before.
We'll wait thirty more minutes.
How much do you leave for a tip in Spain?
Do you have a map?
I can't take his behaviour.
Tom lost his wife.
I wanted to call you.
I can prove that I am right.
I'll soon register for a course in German.
Please let me help you.
Please let us help you.
I can't read this.
Where did you find the keys?
Where did you find the keys?
I think you're in my seat.
Choose between this and that.
Choose between this and that.
Helping them was a mistake.
Helping him was a mistake.
Helping her was a mistake.
Flowers do not talk.
Why aren't you helping them?
Why aren't you helping them?
Why aren't you helping me?
Why aren't you helping me?
Why aren't you helping him?
Why aren't you helping him?
Why aren't you helping her?
Why aren't you helping her?
Why aren't we helping them?
Are you helping them?
Are you helping him?
Are you helping him?
Are you helping them?
Are you helping her?
Are you helping her?
Why are you helping us?
Why are you helping us?
Why are you helping them?
Why are you helping them?
Why are you helping him?
Why are you helping him?
Why are you helping her?
Why are you helping her?
He likes to wear socks with sandals.
Tom likes wearing white socks with his sandals.
Why are we helping them?
Can we talk about this inside?
I guess you don't remember me.
I'm hoping Tom will call soon.
We were one big happy family.
Let's talk about the Jacksons.
Give me my bag.
I'm not allowed to talk to you.
I'm not sure about anything.
When did you buy this building?
Why didn't you just talk to me?
I'll give you each thirty dollars.
They were so happy together.
Tom knows how much you love him.
I'm kind of scared.
I can't believe Tom just said that.
I have it completely under control.
I'm sure Tom told you I was coming.
Tom turned to his friends for help.
Tom doesn't want to talk about it here.
I definitely want Tom to be here by 2:30.
I don't know why Tom wants to talk to me.
Tom said he found something under the couch.
Tom, don't walk away when I'm talking to you.
Give me a chance to prove it to you.
Give me a chance to prove it to you.
I don't know how to address you.
I don't know how to address you.
Let's not jump to conclusions.
We're still not allowed to enter.
I need to know who I have to give this to.
Tom liked what he saw.
Tom went and shut the window.
Do you take me for a fool?
I want you to wait for me.
I want you to wait for me.
I want to finish what I started.
Don't lose heart, Tom.
Tom is absolutely calm.
Tom is absolutely correct.
Tom is almost done.
Tom is already dead.
Tom is already up.
Tom always lies.
Tom is always lying.
Tom is always serious.
Tom is always talking.
Tom is always working.
Tom is an artist.
Tom is an employee.
Tom is an engineer.
Tom doesn't look frightened.
Tom doesn't look old.
Tom doesn't look sick.
Tom doesn't pay dues.
Tom doesn't tell jokes.
How many more classes do you have today?
How many more classes do you have today?
How many names were on the list?
How many offers did you get?
The food didn't go to waste.
Tom knows how to get there.
How many people are on the list now?
Are you wearing perfume?
Can I take a look at it?
You may invite anyone you like.
You may invite anyone you like.
Write Tom a note.
I hope Tom is safe.
I've tried that already.
Just tell Tom I called.
We'll take the stairs.
We're almost finished here.
Someone's calling.
I'll talk.
He has both experience and knowledge.
Tom forgot one important thing.
This problem is much bigger than we thought.
We're safe here for the moment.
Do you know who wrote this poem?
Tom believed everything I told him.
I hope you can help Tom.
I hope you can help Tom.
Allow me to contradict you.
Tom recently got out of prison.
Tom hasn't yet done what he promised he would do.
I know that I am a good teacher.
Please don't stop.
It is physically impossible.
No one moved.
These are beautiful horses.
She's wearing red.
She's wearing sunglasses.
He's wearing sunglasses.
He's wearing sunglasses.
She's wearing sunglasses.
It's the highest building in this city.
She had nothing else to say.
Tom is still in the kitchen.
Am I going the right way?
You need to stop living in the past.
We will all die, sooner or later.
I'm afraid we're wasting our time.
You look like you haven't slept in days.
I'll find out when the meeting is.
Take deep breaths.
Take my car.
Take my car.
Take your place.
Take your place.
Take your positions.
Take your positions.
Talk to us.
Talk to us.
Thanks for lunch.
Thanks for trying.
That didn't hurt.
That looks bad.
That really hurts.
I spent the weekend with my grandma.
When I asked him if he knew where she was he just shrugged his shoulders.
She installed a security camera.
She let a student leave.
She let a student leave.
I've been dreaming about this.
It's a question of will power.
You didn't tell me Tom was busy.
You didn't tell me Tom was busy.
Tom has no idea what's happening.
Tom hasn't done his homework yet.
Don't you have an opinion?
I don't regret it at all.
We weren't busy.
I'm glad you showed me how to do it.
The novel takes place in Victorian England.
We're not sure Tom is coming.
What are you suggesting then?
What did you do with my keys?
Tom will call you soon.
Tom will call you soon.
We've got to be ready in thirty minutes.
Water is a source of life.
We hope you enjoy the movie.
She's angry at the world.
The crowd was silent.
I was treated like a child by them.
Do you know what it's called?
Do you know what it's called?
They had no idea what to do.
Tom asked me to give you this.
She confessed everything.
It's an art more than a science.
It's all your fault.
It's all your fault.
I'll talk with her tonight.
I'll talk with him tonight.
Where did I put that box?
Where did I put that box?
Please listen very carefully.
Please listen very carefully.
Where did I put my keys?
Where did I put my keys?
The French word "soleil" means "sun".
I hope to return soon.
I hope to return soon.
This isn't what Tom expected.
The show will begin soon.
I hope to finish soon.
Tom said he had something important to do.
Tom said he had something important to do.
Tom could've killed you if he'd wanted to.
Tom could've killed you if he'd wanted to.
I'm glad we met.
I'm glad we met.
Do you regret what you did?
It's the right decision.
Have I made the right decision?
Tom didn't like our decision.
I don't know whether I should laugh or cry.
It's going to take a few days.
What is art?
What is art?
Thanks for the milk.
Take your time, Tom.
Take your time, Tom.
It reminds me of a certain someone...
To his credit he knows what he's talking about.
Tom just shrugged.
What's the difference between a star and a planet?
I forgave you a long time ago.
I forgave you a long time ago.
I forgave you a long time ago.
Shall I close the window?
Calm down. What's the problem?
How old are you and how much do you weigh?
Men want to feel important.
Tom wanted to have a bigger house than his neighbor.
I wouldn't ask this of you if it weren't important.
I wouldn't ask this of you if it weren't important.
I have to sell my house.
I just met a boy named Tom.
You tell us interesting stories.
Are you satisfied with the political situation in your country?
I'm sure you meant well.
Tell Tom to meet me here right away.
Tell me what you really think of me.
We returned the money.
Please just leave me alone. I want to think.
Tom told you to say that, didn't he?
I told you Tom wouldn't want to go.
Tell Tom to meet us at the station.
In fact, Tom told me you were dead.
Tom told me what you said about me.
Tom told me what you said about me.
Tom has been watching TV all day.
I told Tom I'd like to talk to him.
I can't even believe I'm doing this.
Tom stopped me from entering the bank.
Will I be allowed to tell my story?
Don't make the same mistakes I made.
Don't make the same mistakes I made.
It is you that is to blame for it.
It is you that is to blame for it.
Tom isn't old enough to go there by himself.
I don't understand this song.
The teacher can see you.
I just hope no one saw me.
Do I look fat in this?
Young men such as you are needed for this work.
Tom has paid back what he owes us.
Tom knows I'll call you.
Tom knows I'll call you.
Tom allowed me to go.
Tom refused to do what we asked him to do.
Tom is getting married next month.
Tom is too busy.
Tom is a good shot.
Tom likes to hunt.
Tom is fond of hunting.
Tom is dating my sister.
Tom is really a good worker.
Tom bought a car.
Tom is writing a novel.
Tom isn't the right man for this job.
I have to get some food.
My friends are very important to me.
I have no idea what you mean.
Your dress is very nice.
I went to the bank.
Which cat is yours?
Everyone laughed, including Tom.
I didn't expect you to turn up here.
We both cried.
You can see a lot of stars in the sky.
Not a star was to be seen in the sky.
I want a few empty glasses.
How late is the bank open?
I can't find my keys.
I listened to music.
I wish I were rich.
I hope to see you soon.
Tom took a taxi to the hospital.
We're coming back tonight.
Is Tom really that stupid?
My husband notices everything.
Tom made three errors.
I'm the chief engineer.
I left too early.
Tom has finished eating.
Tom was dead drunk.
Everyone is drunk.
They weren't drunk.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
I can't help you because I'm busy.
Calm down and tell me what happened.
Where can I get a vuvuzela?
I'm sure of my sentence.
I'm sure of my sentence.
I don't feel like going out.
I just didn't feel like getting up.
I'm not asking you to lie.
He doesn't want to talk to me now, and I don't know why.
Would after lunch be convenient for you?
Tom didn't cry.
The sky is blue.
Say it again.
Ring the bell.
Ring the bell.
Return at once.
Return at once.
Tom will do anything we want him to do.
Tom will do anything we want him to do.
You're not good at this.
You're out of luck, Tom.
Tom made me get out of bed.
Are they students?
Tom was pale.
Tom never wears pink.
Tom has probably already forgotten about you.
Tom is too short to reach the top shelf.
Tom was very rich.
Tom sung a song.
Tom used to give me advice.
We'll have to try again.
Look under the bed.
Tom was always busy.
What time did you call?
What time did you call?
What time did you call?
What time did you call?
Let me make a few calls.
Let me make a few calls.
Let me make a few calls.
Let me make a few calls.
Tom is waiting for us in the car.
This is our car.
I knew you'd be caught.
I knew you'd be caught.
I knew you'd be caught.
I knew you'd be caught.
Tom wants to drink champagne.
Wait a few more days.
Wait a few more days.
Why do I have to decide?
Why do I have to decide?
Whose turn is it to pay?
Did you call the doctor?
None of them would admit their guilt.
I never had any doubts.
Since I wasn't invited, I'll stay home.
Since I wasn't invited, I'll stay home.
It's not too early.
You weren't elected.
You weren't elected.
Tom notices everything.
Tom arrived a day earlier than we expected.
Everything went as expected.
Why did we fail?
It probably is my fault.
Tom loves spicy food.
I met a girl.
I met a girl.
I feel very guilty.
Tom is a dangerous guy.
Tom isn't rich, but he's happy.
What ideas do you have?
What ideas do you have?
Is Mary in the garden?
Are you afraid of horror movies?
Are you afraid of horror movies?
Call me tonight.
Call me tonight.
Somebody stepped on his foot.
I have no clue what you're talking about.
I have no clue what you're talking about.
They say that he's very rich.
I hear that he's very rich.
He didn't give a precise answer.
I can't believe you didn't recognize your own brother.
I can't believe you didn't recognize your own brother.
They're treating me like a child.
How often do you use your phone?
Jews are a people chosen by God.
Translate this into English, please.
Welcome to Wikipedia.
I wake up late on Sundays, and I wake up early from Monday to Saturday.
That has to change.
The glass is clean.
Tom must've taken the wrong train.
Guess what Tom said.
Guess what Tom said.
Am I too early?
He has a will of steel.
I wonder what Tom is doing now.
I wonder what Tom is doing.
How did you arrive at that conclusion?
How did you arrive at that conclusion?
How did you spend your summer?
How did you spend your summer?
Tom raised his eyebrows.
Tom seemed to like that.
Tom used to write poems.
Tom was obviously drunk.
Tom was obviously tired.
Tom doesn't wear glasses.
I think Tom should ask for his money back.
You'll be quite safe here.
You'll be quite safe here.
I lost my driver's license.
Tom acted without thinking.
Tom didn't want get caught.
Tom had nothing else to do.
Tom looks good for his age.
Tom won't live much longer.
Tom asked me to take a look at it.
Tom finally spoke.
Tom has a very high opinion of you.
You're not the first to suggest that.
Tom was very pleased with the results.
Tom said yesterday was the happiest day of his life.
Tom looked into the room and saw that nobody was there.
There is no hope of his being alive.
It happened suddenly.
Tom grabbed my hand.
Why did you choose me?
Why did you choose me?
Your bag's open.
I took this photo.
Do you like French wine?
Didn't you see her by chance yesterday?
I hope we're not too late.
Tom thought he was in big trouble.
He returned the shirt because it was too small.
It really doesn't matter.
We've got a million things to do.
I don't like people talking about me.
With relatives like him, who needs enemies?
She nodded in response to my question.
Tom is making a list.
Tom is making a list.
I think that was a mistake.
I know that Tom isn't busy.
Did you find your car keys?
Why does it have to be me?
Who was that on the phone?
What's that on your shirt?
What's that in your mouth?
We'll meet you downstairs.
We have the same birthday.
We have the same birthday.
We have so much in common.
Tom wasn't even surprised.
Tom says it was your idea.
Tom is now in the kitchen.
Is Tom your first or last name?
I didn't do it for money.
The bridge is low.
You don't realize how lucky you are.
I don't want to go to the bank.
What's your favorite historical movie?
What I think doesn't matter.
Tom refused to talk to me.
Do you happen to know where Tom went?
Do you happen to know where Tom went?
I'm sure Tom would be happy to show you around.
Maybe Tom thought you wouldn't want to see him.
Tom is the worst student in the class.
You've got to face facts.
Are you sure Tom is dead?
Are you sure Tom is dead?
I'm not sure, but perhaps Tom is already dead.
The island was completely deserted.
Tom was shivering with cold.
I just don't want to marry you.
Tom says he has nothing to do.
I'm not very good at giving advice.
I'm not sure I'm ready for that.
I'm not sure I'm ready for that.
I'm not sure if I'm ready for that.
I'm not sure if I'm ready for that.
You were lucky to find it.
You were lucky to find it.
You were lucky to find it.
You were lucky to find it.
You were lucky to find it.
You were lucky to find it.
I fear that he may fall.
The result is all that matters.
I married my daughter.
I believe you know her.
We all know you don't eat meat.
We all know you don't eat meat.
This land belongs to Tom.
The first sentence is the most important sentence of the book.
You said that Tom was busy.
We don't know for sure.
I just learned six new facts about wombats.
It's obvious that you're no longer interested.
I'm very sorry, but we can't let you out.
The house looks empty since they left.
You said you wanted to talk to me.
You said you wanted to talk to me.
You said you wanted to talk to me.
He died suddenly.
There's somebody I want to talk to first.
His father worked on the railway.
This song reminds me of my hometown.
I'll pick him up in an hour.
I'll pick her up in an hour.
I saw the pictures Tom took last weekend.
I accept this proposal.
Stay in your cars.
Never wish anyone harm!
Even though he is 38, he still depends on his parents.
At the moment, I'm reading an interesting book.
Tom is a chauffeur.
Tom is a civilian.
I heard you were getting married.
I heard you were getting married.
I know you are rich.
I know that you are rich.
The shop was closed.
I'm not at all afraid.
They all left.
Do you have a TV?
Do you have a TV?
Tom forgave you.
Tom forgave you.
It was a good try.
Who can I talk to?
What other options do we have?
I'm sure that was the reason.
I would like to buy a sofa.
I think this is a mistake.
I told Tom you were happy.
What is the purpose of education?
What options do I have left?
Ted likes playing the trumpet.
I don't like the way you're talking to me.
We'll try this later.
I didn't believe you.
I didn't believe you.
Tom screamed loudly.
He was unaware of the situation.
There was a bridge across each river.
Where have you been all afternoon?
We have thirty employees.
We just want to be loved.
We lost all our money.
It's 3:10.
Give that back to me.
Can I talk to you for a minute?
I'm sorry, I can't hear you.
I'm sure it's all a mistake.
I'm sure we'll be safe here.
What did you sing?
What did you sing?
The movie was interesting.
When did you meet?
Who are you calling?
Who are you calling?
I wouldn't be surprised.
I wouldn't be surprised.
Long live the Belarus!
You can talk here.
You haven't even tried.
You haven't even tried.
I don't think people use that word anymore.
I'll check the list.
Your future begins today.
Your future begins today.
I'm calm now.
We talked about various topics.
You just got lucky.
You just got lucky.
I'm afraid of wild animals.
I think it's highly unlikely that Tom was not aware that he wouldn't be allowed to enter the museum without his parents.
There's no doubt about that.
You won't believe who called me today.
Tom doesn't know what's in this box.
I want you out of my life.
I want you out of my life.
I must buy a new suit for my son.
He had no idea why his wife left him.
If you'd listen a little more carefully to what the teacher says, you'd probably be able to understand.
Does this suitcase bother you?
When will you be able to finish that job?
I have no clue what Tom is talking about.
It would be better if you didn't drink so much coffee late at night.
Our teacher is going to the USA next month.
I had never been abroad before, so everything seemed strange to me.
Are you seriously thinking about getting married again at your age?
Tom is a fighter.
Tom is a fool.
Tom usually does his homework before dinner.
I'm sorry, I don't understand.
I think we should call Tom.
They finished the work after a week.
Never lose faith in yourself. You can do everything you want to do.
A joke is a serious matter.
The trouble is that I have no money on me now.
My sister has made up her mind to be a teacher.
When I saw her recently, she looked very happy.
Are you sure Tom won't remember anything?
Tom looked at his cards.
Tom looks just like you.
Is there life on other planets?
Tom was really busy.
It was like something out of a movie.
I hope we find her.
I hope we find her.
Welcome to the club.
We expect that he'll help us.
I only used it once.
I eat a lot of meat.
Can I buy you lunch?
Tom gave us the key.
I know lots of songs.
Why did you bring me here?
Thanks for meeting me here.
It smells like a toilet in here.
Who wouldn't be happy here?
I live near here.
The hospital is near here.
I hear Tom is getting married.
The hospital is near here.
These colors are beautiful.
These flowers are beautiful.
These photos are beautiful.
She sang better than usual.
I told Tom that wasn't a good idea.
I wasn't expecting that.
Tom never goes to church.
Ask him for advice.
Ask her for advice.
Ask him for advice.
Ask her for advice.
I liked the present a lot!
I had to wait for Tom wake up.
Tom wants to be a policeman when he grows up.
Tom loves that song.
I've met them.
Maybe you ought to talk to them.
If he calls, tell him I am busy.
We have planted the garden.
It was apparent to everybody that our team was stronger.
I thought that was already obvious.
I'm sorry, I know what I said earlier, but forget it.
I can't save you.
I can't save you.
Tom was playing the trumpet.
Please stop looking at me.
Of course this sentence is only used by the older ones.
Are you sure you don't need my help?
Tom wants to sell his car.
I have a train to catch.
Just give me my money.
Just give me your gun.
A widow had three daughters.
A widow had three daughters.
This is exactly what I was hoping to hear.
If you're interested, let me know and I'll give you his number.
Isn't that a girl's name?
Tom is away on business.
This has gone too far.
It's important to Tom.
When I grow up, I want to be a teacher.
How high is Mount Everest?
Rosemary's Baby is a film by Roman Polanski.
What time does class begin?
I don't cry when I am happy.
Am I disturbing anything?
Sometimes she goes by bus, and sometimes by car.
It's mustard after the meal.
I'm sure I've never heard of him.
I'm sure I've never heard of him.
I bought the same shirt as yours.
What time do you go to the market?
We're in the same trouble that Tom is in.
I was unconscious for more than thirty hours.
There is a serious problem.
There was nothing else to do.
Tom won't allow himself to be caught.
If I were rich, I'd pass my time in travelling.
I heard you just got married.
I'll either write to you or phone you next week.
They don't say that it's prohibited there. In fact, they say that it's mandatory.
I intend to phone Tom tomorrow and ask him to help.
I don't want to leave them.
I feel safe here.
Two adults, please.
Tom is only going to tell you what he thinks you want to hear.
I will be busy until four o'clock.
You remind me of myself at a young age.
If something goes wrong, call Tom.
You don't have to talk to me if you don't want to.
I just wanted to talk to you.
I'll meet you Monday night.
I didn't catch even one fish.
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Are you sure that man is a doctor?
Call me if there's any change.
Stop telling everyone you're my brother.
It's strange that we've never met before.
She hasn't done her homework yet.
I think Tom is suggesting that we should leave.
Please tell me it's a joke.
Please tell me it's a joke.
Can you wait outside?
Can you wait outside?
I'm drunk right now.
I suppose that's possible.
Today I found that there's a movie called "The Russians Are Coming! The Russians Are Coming!"
I eat only fresh vegetables.
We'll straighten everything out.
That hurts! Stop it!
Thousands of people lost their jobs.
I hope it was as much fun for you as it was for me.
At least, that's what he said.
Tom was in the garden when it happened.
I came home late.
Don't look at the camera.
Today I discovered that there's a movie called "The Russians are coming! The Russians are coming!"
Not only Tom has to study, but I have to study, too.
He saw at a glance that his daughter had been crying.
My father will be back at the beginning of next month.
It could take weeks, even months.
Tom drank three bottles of wine by himself last night.
As soon as the child saw his mother, he stopped crying.
Tom decided to give up city life and live in the country.
Is that your first name or your last name?
That isn't really necessary.
We're not as dumb as you think.
We're not as dumb as you think.
We're wasting our time.
They have three children.
That sea is blue.
Dan is no angel.
What should we do about this situation?
What would you do with millions of dollars?
What would you do with millions of dollars?
Tom is always making me angry.
When are you getting out of prison?
Tom is talking to his parrot.
When did you get out of the hospital?
Who does Tom remind you of?
Who does Tom remind you of?
Let's face facts.
Kazan is the capital of Tatarstan.
I shit in your milk.
Tom isn't that young.
Tom isn't a good singer.
He's never satisfied.
She's never satisfied.
I got up earlier than usual to catch the first train.
I've seen that movie many times, but I'd like to see it again.
She says she's not dating anyone now, but I don't believe her.
Tom heard a noise and went outside to see what it was.
He brought her flowers.
I'm not like everybody else.
I am planning to take my relationship with you to the next level.
I am still searching for the truth.
Tom put the card face down on the table.
I went to bed a little earlier than usual.
This isn't your cup of tea.
Step away from the car and put your hands on your head.
She doesn't talk to us anymore.
My whole body was shaking.
They don't talk to us anymore.
I acted without thinking.
He acted without thinking.
She acted without thinking.
I hope this solves all your problems.
I didn't murder anyone.
Don't come in here.
Don't come in here.
Don't come out here.
Don't come out here.
She's not my grandmother. She's my mother.
I think autumn is the most beautiful season of the year.
I wonder where Tom is.
I told you I wasn't going to call Tom.
When was the last time you withdrew money?
Can you please close that window?
They rushed to his aid.
They saw us as they were getting off the train.
This suit is too big for me.
We spent three hours in the open air.
We talked with the owner of the house.
What country are you a citizen of?
What country are you a citizen of?
This newspaper costs a dollar.
What do you think of me now?
What do you think of me now?
What do you think of me now?
I want to know when your birthday is.
Who do you think will be chosen?
Who do you think will be chosen?
Don't ever forget that.
Don't ever forget that.
You suck at writing code.
I don't understand what you're doing.
She likes blue dresses.
We met at the church.
Do you have doubts?
Do you have doubts?
My mother's sister is my aunt.
Add it to the list.
Add it to the list.
Add it to the list.
Add it to the list.
Add it to the list.
Add it to the list.
How many employees at your company?
I wonder how that happened.
Well, that's a difficult question.
You probably think this is stupid.
They entered cautiously.
I don't want to lie to you.
I don't want to lie to you.
Why is the store closed?
Do you know how much that cost?
It could take a couple of days.
I'm afraid Tom had to leave.
I'm always the last to know.
Peel off for product code.
I'm going back to my office.
I'm hoping Tom will help us.
I'm not certain Tom is here.
I'm not going to waste time.
I'm not in a very good mood.
I'm not in a very good mood.
I'm not sure you'll like it.
I'm not sure you'll like it.
I'm not sure you'll like it.
I'm not sure you'll like it.
I'm not talking to you, Tom.
I'm not too sure about this.
I'm sorry, but we're closed.
The grass is green.
This isn't the way to do it.
Tom had nothing else to say.
The cat is in the bag.
The cat is in the bag.
Tom took his dog for a walk.
Sure, gladly.
The flower is yellow.
She shouted, but nobody heard her.
Each person has various reasons for going on a trip abroad.
I haven't used French in a long time and I've forgotten a lot of words.
My brother has never climbed Fuji mountain.
I often lie about my age.
When did you travel to Rome?
This does not make me happy.
Every summer, we go camping.
I'm sure you have a lot of questions.
I'm sure you have a lot of questions.
I'm sure you have a lot of questions.
I'm sure you have a lot of questions.
I'm sure Tom will want to go with us.
I'm sure Tom will want to go with us.
We are not quite satisfied with the result.
Does Tom understand the situation?
He went slowly up the stairs.
I saw you crying.
I saw you crying.
Aren't you too young to smoke?
It's like putting Dracula in charge of the blood bank.
He had a silly smile on his face the whole evening.
Meat or fish?
I don't think she is fit for the job.
I can't bear to see him cry like that.
Don't forget to drink plenty of water.
Why didn't you tell Tom you were busy?
Try it yourself.
I think that you won't be able to do it.
I thought I told you to stay in the car.
I thought I told you to stay in the car.
If you wouldn't mind, I could use a hand.
If you wouldn't mind, I could use a hand.
Check again.
Check again.
Check everyone.
Check everyone.
Give me a gun.
Let us out of here.
Let us out of here.
Try to explain this.
Come on out of there.
Now listen carefully.
Now listen carefully.
Put your weapon down.
Don't leave that here.
Don't get overconfident.
Put the bags over there.
Put the bags over there.
Let me stay for a night.
Just stay out of my business.
Give Tom everything we've got.
Don't let anyone into the room.
Stop feeling sorry for yourself.
Just grab your bag and follow me.
I have to meet him.
That shouldn't be any problem.
I know they've got big problems.
The problem was difficult to solve.
The only problem is Tom didn't leave.
Tom has no idea what my problems are.
Tell Tom I'll be there in three hours.
Tom will be able to solve the problem.
We're not yet sure what the problem is.
Tom seems to be very rich.
Tom loves flowers.
Tom forced us to leave.
Is Tom coming back?
What kind of assistance do you need?
Tom can barely move.
What does it all mean?
It's all work-related.
She goes to market every day.
You and I should talk.
It is absolutely impossible.
You three are very lucky.
Which party do you belong to?
Which party do you belong to?
Tom is probably at home now.
He got up early so he'd be in time for the train.
Has it stopped raining?
The cause of death is unknown.
Oh, I got it.
Tom told me he wasn't busy.
She's probably very busy.
Were you shot at?
Were you shot at?
What's the title of the book you're reading?
The men drew their swords from their scabbards.
A child is missing.
It is 7:30.
I really hope you can come.
I really hope you can come.
I made a list.
Do you have any pictures of your great grandparents?
I opened all my suitcases.
You run very fast.
You run very fast.
I wonder what Tom is going to do with all that money.
Her adoptive parents are much kinder to her than her birth parents ever were.
Don't even think of asking me to let you date my daughter.
Drink some coffee. It tastes very good, I think.
Stay down or you might get hit by a stray bullet.
Have a listen and let me know your thoughts.
Just give me what you owe me and I'll leave.
Give me the knife and let me slice the bread.
Let me know immediately if you have a problem.
Let me know immediately if you have a problem.
Don't let the children play on the street.
Don't let the children play on the street.
Just stay in your room like I told you to.
Just stay in your room like I told you to.
Leave me alone and I'll leave you alone.
Put this list in alphabetical order.
Put this list in alphabetical order.
Give me an example of what you mean.
Don't you think if there were a problem, Tom would call us and let us know?
The only problem is there's no one here who can translate these documents.
We can solve these problems more easily if we work on them together.
You waited for me? Thanks!
I'm afraid I can't let you leave.
To my surprise, he had a beautiful voice.
You said you were busy.
You said you were busy.
Tom wrote poems when he was in high school.
When do I have to return the car?
Tom is old enough to know better.
Where did my driver go?
Choose us!
Choose us!
That team has never played as well as they played today.
Bring it back when you're done.
Bring it back when you're done.
Bring it back when you're done.
Bring it back when you're done.
Who would you like to speak to?
Who would you like to speak to?
Don't forget to call your parents.
Don't forget to call your parents.
His jokes really slay me.
Don't let her talk to anyone.
I have seen him once on the train.
Check it out, Tom.
Check on the baby.
They elected him President of the USA.
Come and sit down.
Come on up, Tom.
Whose glasses are these?
Come talk to me.
Why is it so important to you?
Why is it so important to you?
Do you want to go to the movies or to the theater?
Could you read it?
Could you read it?
Could you read it?
Could you read it?
Could you read it?
I'm not done with it yet.
I suppose I was too busy.
Would he like that?
I've got so much more to do.
I must hurry.
I must hurry.
He's talking on the telephone.
I really don't want to sit in the back of the bus.
I think you want this more than you want to admit.
He looked into the sky and at the stars.
The strange thing is that I did not feel pain.
Say that again if you are a man!
Tell Tom I'm going to drop by his house this afternoon.
Can you tell me how to get to the town centre?
What time does this train reach Yokohama?
I'm not sure I'm ready to do this.
I'm not sure I'm ready to do this.
I'm not sure I'm ready to do this.
I'm not sure I'm ready to do this.
I don't consider this to be important.
A group of languages related via a common ancestor, or proto-language, is referred to as a language family.
Tom doesn't seem to mind that his daughter is dating John.
Tom said he wanted something cold to drink.
Why don't you take a look at this data?
Why don't you take a look at this data?
I usually get what I want.
Nobody wants to help you.
Give her the keys.
We met in college.
She has quite a lot of clothes.
I am watching an old film.
Did I invite you?
Man is a social animal.
Did she like it?
Did they hurt you?
Did Tom believe it?
Why did Tom call you?
Are those your bags?
That black bag is yours?
We've lost faith in humanity.
Success means much money, doesn't it?
Who else is on that list?
That's obvious, you don't need to explain it.
Why are you protesting against the government?
We've never met.
You have to go to the hospital.
Which floor does he live on?
Which floor do you live on?
Which floor do you live on?
Are you watching me now?
My friend almost went abroad.
Welcome to our 1st French class.
She calmed down.
Winter in New York can be very cold.
If I had known your telephone number, I would've called you.
Tom rolled up his shirt sleeves.
Sorry for calling you at this hour.
I don't think he is fit for the job.
No one will believe him.
They didn't pay attention.
Tom doesn't know where his keys are.
Tom said he'd stay there till 2:30.
I'm not sure anyone can help.
I'm not one of your students.
Don't you think that's a bit weird?
Don't you think that's a bit weird?
I just got married.
Don't talk to him that way.
Don't talk to her that way.
Don't talk to him that way.
Don't talk to her that way.
Do I have to pay you back?
We will catch you.
We will catch you.
We will catch you.
We will catch you.
You look very beautiful.
We all need to work together. We're on the same team.
You don't have to be so strong.
He has a daughter who is very beautiful.
They're interested.
They're impressed.
Why aren't you doing your homework?
Are you doing your homework?
Our team is ready.
Give me a glass of milk!
You built that all by yourself?
You built that all by yourself?
Didn't you wear that same shirt yesterday?
I went to the cinema, but I didn't enjoy the film much.
That's a nice suit.
I didn't expect this question.
How am I writing without a pen?
How am I writing without a pen?
Tom is wearing a trench coat.
A sane mind is in a sound body.
I invited her to go to the movies.
Who's fasting?
Please call him.
I know you want to make me happy.
You are about my age.
I'm not sure what to do.
Good night, sweetheart.
You look very happy.
You look very happy.
You look very happy.
You look very happy.
You look very happy.
Did Tom ask about me?
I never lied to you.
I never lied to you.
Let him leave.
Let him leave.
In fact, I am happy.
I don't think Tom is busy.
Tell me what movies you guys have seen.
I remember meeting you somewhere.
What's your grandfather's name?
Tom said he was going to try to help us.
Eating with you is a pleasure.
Tom didn't give me a chance to talk to him.
Don't be too dependent on others.
It's our one hope.
I had one last hope.
You're shivering. Are you cold?
Do you think Tom will like that?
Did you get married?
Did you pass out?
Did you pass out?
Did you pass out?
Why did you shoot me?
Why did you shoot me?
Why did you shoot me?
Did you send them?
Did you send them?
Did you send them?
Did you use it?
Why did you buy a German car?
Why did you buy a German car?
Why did you buy a German car?
I bought this as a gift for my girlfriend.
Could you take a look?
Tom never sings in public.
You can't make us leave.
We don't have any tea any more.
Don't believe him. He lies left and right!
I read your book.
Go back to your seats.
You have neither written, nor phoned.
You have neither written, nor phoned.
How could you be so sure?
Now give me back my key.
OK, I'll give it a shot.
This city is 1,600 meters above sea level.
You should meet him.
You should meet him.
I don't like sand.
We are drilling the roof.
The boys played cops and robbers.
I understand perfectly.
Don't forget to call your mom.
Don't forget to call your mom.
Dan had a strong faith in God.
His name is not on the list.
Do you have an address?
She made the same mistake again.
She cried all night.
It's a matter of principle.
We have to finish this.
We met a few weeks ago.
I don't talk to people of your kind.
Tom won't come. He's too busy.
Tom won't come. He's very busy.
Tom told some dirty jokes.
I heard a woman scream.
Dan was stopped at a checkpoint.
They seem serious.
I've got some new information.
Who was that you were just talking to?
Can you ride a horse?
Can you ride a horse?
There is a fly in the coffee.
Call Tom and tell him where we are.
I had arrived in Italy without difficulty.
Earth is the third planet from the sun.
Tom is eager to speak to you.
It was a friend of mine who called.
I went to the bank to take out money.
I found a dollar in the street.
If mankind does not put an end to war, war will put an end to mankind.
Just wait there.
No one looks busy.
Listen, we have a problem.
We waited, but he didn't come.
She has as many books again as he.
Stand up!
Stand up!
We've talked to them.
We've talked to him.
We've talked to her.
I don't like being shot at.
Tom is loyal.
Where did you meet each other?
It's sand.
Their company created forty new jobs.
The children were listening to the teacher.
We're your neighbors.
I suppose you could say that.
I'm not too late, am I?
Tom looked appalled.
Tom looked stunned.
She has no shame.
I didn't think you'd want to see me again.
Do I look stupid?
I had a call from James out of the blue.
My ex-boyfriend just called me out of the blue.
Yesterday, I got a call out of the blue from Tom.
Death to the king!
He promised me to come at four.
My father doesn't just smoke, he drinks too.
We don't have a daughter.
Have you called him yet?
Have you called him yet?
Have you called him yet?
Have you called him yet?
Shops are open from Monday to Saturday.
Shops are open from Monday to Saturday.
Stop reading.
Tom whispered.
I think both of them are right.
She gave him everything she owned.
Two months have passed since he left for France.
I never really thought I'd get married.
Tom died in jail.
Is Tom on this ship?
Let them know we're happy.
Let them know we're happy.
Would you like this?
Would you like this?
You saved us all.
He died at 83 years old.
Tom lied to the cops.
You must take their ideas into account.
Didn't you see my keys?
He gives me a phone call every now and then.
Tom showed me a picture of his grandmother.
He looked at me, with a tear in his eye.
Mt. Fuji, the highest mountain in Japan, is 3,776 meters high.
The children are talking.
I'm sorry, but I don't feel like going out today.
Marilyn Monroe's success did not make her happy.
I brought these flowers for you.
We derive a lot of pleasure from books.
So I can go, right?
So I can go, right?
It's not important what you say, it's important what people understand.
Let's get some coffee.
Just ignore it.
Just ignore it.
That bag is mine.
Who told you to write with your left hand?
Are you busy right now? "One moment, I am coming immediately."
This is a killing machine.
This is a desert flower.
That's a very big bite.
I'll be waiting to see you on television.
I'll be waiting to read about you in newspapers.
The policeman discovered counterevidence.
Don't put the knife in your mouth.
He came home soon.
It's good to see that our efforts were not in vain.
I dream about going to Tunisia in a few years.
Woman observes, man decides.
Would you like to be famous?
Squirrels are quick learners.
They were drunk.
They were drunk.
Everyone was drunk.
Everyone was drunk.
We were drunk.
We were drunk.
They're drunk.
They're drunk.
He helps the poor.
I often receive letters from her.
I'm sorry for everything I've done to you.
I'm sorry for everything I've done to you.
There were no railroads.
I need nine hours of sleep.
I need nine hours of sleep.
I'm still too weak.
I hope you guys are cool with this.
Let us speak.
What did you do with my keys?
Tom doesn't have the will power to quit smoking.
Would you have time to help me with something?
Would you have time to help me with something?
I'm sorry I didn't believe you.
I'm sorry I didn't believe you.
It was cheaper than I thought.
She's a good liar.
I hope he will wait for me.
He has phoned me.
Her husband is in prison.
Leave immediately!
I just wanted to talk to him.
Nobody thinks this is a joke.
She's cute, and more importantly, has class.
The bathtub overflowed while she was talking on the phone.
I stepped in the mud.
I stepped in the mud.
We sold our souls for money.
We elected him president.
I have no idea what's going on.
He gave me an example.
A crowd was gathering around him.
Don't remind me.
Don't remind me.
Don't remind me.
Don't remind me.
When you come back, I'll be gone.
Has it stopped raining?
We felt the house shake.
I never eat meat.
I stepped on something weird.
Tom may be the only one who can solve this problem.
Tom may be under thirty.
Tom may choose whichever color he likes.
Tom must be over thirty by now.
Tom must be thirty or so.
I'm too tired to help.
I'm too tired to help.
Tom belongs in prison.
Say, I seek refuge in the Lord of mankind.
I didn't get even one letter from her.
Autumn is just around the corner.
Tom called to ask if we needed any help.
I am in deep water.
Tom is quite dangerous.
The scent of earth after rain is called petrichor.
Where's the nearest pizzeria?
If you get sleepy, tell me.
What do you think of his new novel?
Do you want to take a look at it?
Do you want to take a look at it?
That's absolutely right.
Mary's grandmother doesn't have any teeth.
Mary's grandmother doesn't have any teeth.
We'll figure this out.
I don't want to talk to you today.
We will add new names to our list.
I'm sure we'll find a solution.
I am sure that we will find a solution.
I think you know that's impossible.
There is a dog on the bridge.
Tom never forgets a name or a face.
How long will it take for the mistake to be noticed?
Be careful not to step in the mud puddle.
Be careful not to step in the mud puddle.
This is the magazine I spoke to you about.
People are generally stupid.
That's an order, Tom.
It's a miracle.
Tom clearly doesn't understand French very well.
Which theater is that?
This book can't go into the bag.
A good idea occurred to him.
Tom went down the stairs.
Please leave my things alone.
Please leave my things alone.
It is half past midnight.
Is she dead?
Leave the poor girl alone.
Leave the poor girl alone.
Leave the poor boy alone.
Leave the poor boy alone.
Do you want some milk?
That's dry information.
It's not so strange.
I'm Nana. I'm Hideki Yamauchi's daughter.
I was hoping Tom knew what we were supposed to do.
Am I so different?
Tom is still crying.
Tom is fast asleep.
Did you phone Tom?
Are we there yet?
Are we done here?
Are we done with this job?
I can't save you this time.
I can't save you this time.
They have good relations with neighbouring countries.
Maybe Tom is dead.
I have but one wish.
We could wait.
I like the way this flower smells.
He works for an American company.
Nothing is impossible to a willing heart.
Tell me who I have to talk to.
Tell me who I have to talk to.
Let's talk about that tonight.
I'd like to talk about it now.
He always wears a blue shirt.
He always wears blue shirts.
Look at this place.
Listen to the rain.
Do you want something cold to drink?
I can't believe what I just saw.
I wanted to cry.
I wanted to cry.
I couldn't tell whether Tom was asleep or not.
I guess Tom didn't want you to know the truth.
I'm not totally convinced of that.
I'm still trying to figure it out.
Tom wouldn't have lied.
We'll watch that movie another day.
Doesn't that go without saying?
I'll check in on you tomorrow.
I'll get you a glass of water.
What were you hoping to see?
That's probably a mistake.
There's something burning.
I'm sure you'll find a way.
I'm sure you'll understand.
What Tom did was a mistake.
In this store they speak in Esperanto.
Tom wouldn't have anything to do with me.
Then we went to the theater.
The store is around the corner.
I'm the happiest man in the world.
Male chauvinists believe themselves to be superior to any woman.
I can't believe I'm writing this sentence.
I can't believe that I'm working on a Sunday.
This shouldn't take long.
What made you say that?
Brown is our English teacher.
I hope he comes tomorrow.
This was a gift.
Tom jumped out of the car.
We can talk about this at home.
Can you make a doubly-linked list and sort it?
Please give that back to me.
I know you'll like Tom.
Do I look thirty?
Do you think I'm a fool?
I don't want to watch TV.
I'm a happy man.
How much are they offering?
This can't have been an accident.
Do you give lessons?
Do you give lessons?
Well, why don't we get started?
I heard a woman scream.
Come back home.
If I want, they will kill you.
If I want, they will kill her.
I don't like the idea of working on the weekends.
Many trees fell down.
What's your favorite language?
What's your favorite language?
I have another person on the line.
Tell me the reason why you married her.
Tell me the reason why you married her.
I have nothing else to study.
Give me a break!
Where do you use it?
It's a phone call from a Mr Brown.
I'd like to talk to Mr Smith. "This is Smith speaking."
Does it hurt much?
Does it hurt much?
I like his new house, but I had not expected it to be so small.
I like his new house, but I had not expected it to be so small.
As a result of the war, many people died.
Does it please you?
Does it really hurt?
Does this thing work?
He has blond hair.
Drop the knife, Tom.
What else I can lose?
The cat is in the box.
You'd better watch what you say.
The boys will be happy.
The dog looked at his master with anxiety.
The dog looked at his master with anxiety.
They're boys.
I'm pretty sure Tom's prepared for what's about to happen.
Tom bought me a drink.
It's a very stressful job.
Let's hope Tom is right.
How far can you go?
I want to read as many English books as possible this year.
She hates the rules.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
The price is high.
Tom was interested in that.
We all cried a lot.
I don't care where we eat dinner. It's entirely up to you.
I suppose you think I'm rich.
They did not fulfill the conditions.
My cat is happy.
Rome wasn't built in a day.
You must study five pages per day.
You must study five pages per day.
If he's a journalist, I'm a star.
I did it many times.
Who did you give it to?
The children will be happy.
I just can't get used to this.
You know I don't eat meat.
I hope you won't sing.
I hope you won't sing.
I hope you won't sing.
Tom often helps me in the garden.
Good night, everybody.
Can it wait a little bit?
Last night I arrived late.
You need to see someone.
Tom is important, isn't he?
He would still be alive had he refused to go to the battlefield then.
I sold it for ten dollars.
I sold it for ten dollars.
How did you reach such an interesting conclusion?
How did you reach such an interesting conclusion?
People of all ages like this song.
People of all ages like this song.
Tom ordered the dog to sit.
Smoke appeared.
Does she sing?
They wanted protection.
Production fell rapidly.
The theater is empty.
Many scientists knew him.
They have known each other since their childhood.
Tom wears bi-focals.
We'll live like kings.
What's the product's code?
Your daughter will tell me.
What colour was Henri IV's white horse?
My favorite color is blue.
What colour is this fish?
Every colour has a meaning.
I thought you were dating him.
I thought you were dating her.
Are you still dating him?
Are you still dating her?
I started dating him.
I started dating her.
You're dating him, aren't you?
You're dating her, aren't you?
I'm not dating her.
The path is direct.
Stop pretending that everything's okay. It's not.
I gave the boy a book.
I gave the boy a book.
Suit yourself.
Suit yourself.
Suit yourself.
Both of us want to see the movie.
Perhaps we'll meet again.
I don't want to make the same mistakes again.
I've started smoking again.
We have plenty to talk about.
The scientist is famous both at home and abroad.
How soon can I meet them?
Their price is below ours.
I don't want to go to Tom's birthday party.
Tom did better than I expected.
Which direction will he choose?
You're not very busy, are you?
I want to leave early.
Can I give you a bit of advice?
They are all very happy.
Tom can lift heavy weights.
I love jokes about animals.
I have a sharp knife.
Can you add these numbers?
Can you add these numbers?
Tom likes to observe birds.
All the apartments are occupied.
The soldiers occupied the building.
The forest is very thick.
They were put in prison.
They would call for help.
They even listened to music.
He asked for their advice.
He accepted gifts from them.
He wanted even more territory.
I'm sure Tom was here yesterday.
Can I talk to you?
Can I talk to you?
She's sure to succeed.
He was responsible for the car accident.
Can you give me another example?
Can you give me another example?
You know what they say: long nose, long cock.
You're stupid to trust him.
Please don't open the window.
The house has been easily sold.
He did all he could to protect his son.
Do both sentences really say the same thing?
His voice is pleasant to listen to.
Her voice is pleasant to listen to.
Everybody down!
Tom is certainly above thirty.
You have changed since I saw you last year.
You have to go to the hospital.
You have to go to the hospital.
I guess we've got a problem.
I will have been to Paris five times when I go there again.
My friend was luckier than me.
I've told him where to meet us.
I should check on that.
He shoved the letter into his pocket.
We will rescue them.
Get up.
The museum isn't open on Sundays.
You look like a little girl in that dress.
You look like a little girl in that dress.
I really am getting married.
Tom turned on the hot water.
Tell Tom to let the dog out.
To hell with the facts.
Tom cried when his dog died.
Tom doesn't look rich to me.
I'm so happy you stopped by.
I'm sorry, but you're wrong.
I'd be happy to go with you.
Did you get the flowers?
The team needs me.
Don't forget to call her.
I won't allow my daughter to go out with you.
Tom liked the film a lot.
His clothes are out of fashion.
They rushed towards their mother.
You're not for me. I know that very well.
You're not for me. I know that very well.
Five days later, President Taylor died.
Now, listen to me carefully.
The government in Baghdad had fallen.
She called her children into the room.
John isn't well enough to go to school today.
His mother died four years later.
I must remember to mail this letter.
A huge crowd of people waited.
His mother died four years later.
The snow was still too deep.
Many American planes were shot down.
Many American planes were shot down.
Prices have dropped recently.
I thought I'd lost you.
Unfortunately he has already left.
Did you hear that sound?
He fumbled with the keys before finding the right one.
I was born the year my grandfather died.
Haven't you returned those books yet?
The population of New York is smaller than that of Tokyo.
They're all lying.
They were singing.
Enter the room.
Let's get in the house.
Let's get in the house.
I'd have waited for you.
I'd have waited for you.
I'd have waited for you.
Come into the room.
Come into the room.
This is for your own safety.
Tom is a Canadian citizen.
This is a car for young people.
I went twice.
What was her answer to your proposal?
What was her answer to your proposal?
I'd love to be your age.
This offer is available for five days.
I love talking to people.
She must be very happy.
She must be very happy.
He must be very happy.
His proposal isn't very important.
You said it was important.
You said it was important.
He said it was important.
She said it was important.
She said that it was important.
Wilson probably was correct about this.
Millions of men lost their jobs.
He had almost no formal education.
He had to find another way.
He was a poet and writer.
It's way too heavy.
Are you sure it was me?
Are you sure it was me?
Are you sure it was me?
Why is Tom in the hospital?
Should I tell them to call you?
Should I tell them to call you?
Should I tell him to call you?
Should I tell him to call you?
Should I tell her to call you?
Should I tell her to call you?
This man is drunk.
I hate that movie.
I've never seen so many sentences in my life!
None of that matters.
There was no sign of life in the house.
I won't go anywhere without you.
I am sure of her success.
Pristina is the capital of Kosovo.
That suit looks expensive.
That's a crime against humanity!
There is a garden in front of the house.
You were lucky that you didn't get caught in the rain.
Fear is scary.
Danger is dangerous.
Will we be in time for the train?
Tell us what's on your mind.
You fainted.
You fainted.
You fainted.
Were you happy?
I wouldn't ask you if it wasn't important.
Close your eyes and tell me what you hear.
Where should I pick the tickets up?
I suppose I'd do the same thing if I were you.
He did what his conscience dictated.
I'm sure Tom will agree to help.
I'm sure Tom will figure it out.
There are twenty seven pupils in my class.
We need to talk privately.
We should talk about this.
We'll do fine without you.
I've already read this book.
I've already read this book.
Your birthday is coming soon.
Your birthday is coming soon.
He won't forgive me so easily.
She's afraid to sing.
I still have a lot to learn.
I will hit Mary.
How many people are there in the store?
Don't go in the kitchen.
Don't go in the kitchen.
Leave us alone and we'll leave you alone.
Please keep it a secret.
Can you leave me alone?
Can you leave me alone?
I bear no grudge against you.
The boy was admitted to the school.
Look Tom, it's stopped raining!
Are you happy now? "Yes, I am."
My phone is ringing!
There are one hundred marae in this area.
I'm fairly certain that we're being watched.
I'm not sure where Tom will go.
We're both out of luck.
I can't walk away from this.
He is a very serious person.
Tremble, you sentences!
It's too late to help me.
It's too late to help me.
We have great hopes for you.
We've already made an offer.
We've done fine without you.
I've made a list of things I'd like to buy.
Tom is certainly above thirty.
I was happy with you.
I was happy with you.
If I were you, I would ignore it.
They asked his older brother to help them do their homework.
They asked his brother to help them with their homework.
Tom is poor, but he's happy.
I forgot to phone her today.
I forgot to telephone him today.
I'm the one who called you guys.
Unfortunately, it's raining today.
May I have a glass of milk, please?
Where is she? She is in the kitchen.
I can't tell for sure.
Have you read any interesting books recently?
Are you breathing?
If I were in your position I wouldn't do that job.
You can use Tatoeba to test yourself.
There's not much to say.
The kind of music one listens to is a matter of preference.
My first impression of him proved to be correct.
I just want them both to be happy.
I just want them both to be happy.
Do you run every day?
You don't date, do you?
We were all so happy there.
We were ordered to do that.
They sat around the table playing cards.
I know you're not that stupid.
I never murdered anybody.
I never murdered anybody.
Tom crossed the bridge.
I know a million jokes.
I changed my shirt.
You didn't invite me.
You didn't invite me.
You didn't invite me.
Don't blame the victim.
Don't shoot!
This is a great victory.
This is a great victory.
I'm afraid the rumor is true.
Are your eyes bad?
I don't understand what the teacher is saying.
She'll never forgive me.
We're going to be rich.
We've always been poor.
Night is when most people sleep.
There are two ways of doing this.
What a sentence!
I am happy to meet you.
It's a pleasure to make your acquaintance.
I read the entire book.
I read a lot of novels.
What happens if we fail?
Allende is a woman's name and a last name.
I gave away the table because it does not fit in the living room.
I gave away the table because it does not fit in the living room.
How much does the shirt cost?
I'm going to finish what I started.
I heard strange noises coming from his bedroom.
It's late already. Go home.
He's afraid of making mistakes.
I do not know where I left the keys.
I couldn't get him to leave me alone.
The cat meowed.
I will never forget their warm hands.
We should've brought lunch.
You haven't heard the half of it yet.
You haven't heard the half of it yet.
Tom loves humanity.
Tom isn't a Jew.
You were told to stay on the ship.
You were told to stay on the ship.
We were told to stay on the ship.
They were told to stay on the ship.
You were told to stay on the ship.
You were told to stay on the ship.
I remember when I first saw you.
I refused to pay.
I like the way that smells.
I don't want to cry.
Hand it to me.
We were just friends.
The white horse is taller than the black one.
The white horse is taller than the black one.
She is eager to live in Australia.
My girlfriend is crying.
My uncle went to Mexico in 1983 and never came back.
Wait, there's more.
Wait, there's more.
Is this sentence correct?
Do you know that song?
The boy caught a large fish.
I'm in constant danger.
The murder happened between 3 a.m. and 5 a.m.
He wanted to go to sea.
I want you to listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
Could you stop, please?
Could you stop, please?
We all enjoyed the movie.
There were many children in the square.
Did you choose an interesting book for your son?
Tom showed me his picture.
I'd like a glass of water.
I'd like a glass of water.
Have fun this summer!
If we work together, we should be able to finish this much more quickly.
Will you be ready by 2:30?
That's only my personal opinion.
Is there anything you want us to send you from home?
The trees were full of birds.
I would never hurt Tom.
We could get caught.
We could get caught.
It's not every day you get a building named after you.
It's getting late.
Welcome to the first German class.
Tom doesn't like being criticized.
We'd better leave him alone.
You can't be thirty years old.
You can't be thirty years old.
Why don't we talk about something else?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
I enjoyed it.
Tom shut his eyes again.
I'll be back in an hour to check on you again.
Look, I can explain.
I don't think we have anything to explain.
I really hate to see you in such pain.
I borrowed money from them.
Tom rubbed his leg in obvious pain.
Tom bought some land to build a house on.
We value your opinion.
Tom is also a Jew.
Tom didn't think he needed protection.
You're under my protection.
That's hardly an option.
Tom nodded in response to my question.
They've both been released from prison.
They've both been released from prison.
Tom was obviously lying.
Can you give me a sign?
Tom doesn't use it.
I won't bother you again.
I won't bother you again.
I know that you aren't stupid.
Aren't you too young to smoke?
I never lied to you.
I haven't lied to you.
I heard you got married.
I heard you got married.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
I have a present for you.
I have no idea where she lives.
Where do you think I met her?
You and me are the same age.
Our teacher told us that we should do our best.
Where do you think I met her?
Where do you think I met her?
I'm glad you accepted my offer.
Please forgive me for not answering your letter.
I believe you have information that can help us.
You were there, right?
Maybe Tom was unlucky.
It was all a mistake.
I wanted to be a journalist.
They were sitting on the grass.
Are you sure we've never met before?
Are you sure we've never met before?
If you try, you'll succeed.
You said you'd be here by 2:30.
You said you'd be here by 2:30.
You said you'd be here by 2:30.
We'll be watching you.
We'll be watching you.
Who helped you? "Tom did."
Who helped you? "Tom did."
Show me where it hurts.
When do you usually get up?
How old is your daughter?
I'll pick you up after school.
I'll pick you up after school.
I don't know for what I'm guilty.
Do you really think this is a good idea?
My older sister goes jogging every day.
Tom takes a bus to work.
I'm in no mood for games.
Are they important to you?
Tom only eats white meat.
You are very pretty in those clothes.
You can invite other people.
My mother is certain to say no.
They had no idea what needed to be done.
That happens to be true.
We hope to see you soon.
We should talk about it.
You made a wrong turn.
Tom vanished.
Tom vanished.
She disappeared.
She disappeared.
Mama cried.
Everyone screamed.
Tom has finished.
They disappeared.
They refused.
They called.
Some people write books for money, others for pleasure.
Tom is volunteering to help.
I don't think I've ever been this happy.
King, stop calling me your boy. I'm thirty-two, for God's sake!
I have no idea who it was.
They regarded him as a great scholar.
Where do I need to turn?
It was a stupid joke.
You've already explained that.
Please be quiet and don't hamper my work.
I'll give her a call.
He sat on a small rock and looked out to sea.
Tom died at 65.
She hasn't translated the sentences in French.
The situation remains unchanged.
The situation remains unchanged.
They gathered around the campfire.
Fall begins in October.
I'm not that Jewish.
Where is spring?
How could you do this to them?
How could you do this to them?
It's a pity most RPGs do not have any stoat characters.
There are many tall buildings downtown.
I wrote a song about what happened here last year.
I became very sleepy after a bit of reading.
Since I stayed up late, I'm very sleepy.
When did you get married?
When did you get married?
Let's hope you're right.
May I take a look at it?
Maybe you were followed.
Nobody's going anywhere.
There's nothing to lose.
All I know is that she left last week.
I know nothing except that she left last week.
My phone is ringing!
You used to be so much fun.
I think you've got to work this out on your own.
The laughter died down.
I think Tom has calmed down.
I have a lot of gardening to do.
We can give it one more try.
How could Tom do this to me?
How's Tom been treating you?
I don't have any clothes on.
Do you think I enjoyed that?
Do you want to learn or not?
I'll be happy to work with you.
I'll be happy to work with you.
I'll be happy to work with you.
I'll be happy to work with you.
Do you consider them dangerous?
Do you consider them dangerous?
Water transmits sound better than air.
That's why we need to talk.
You have changed a lot.
He sang and sang.
Are you watching your weight?
It is said that he is wealthy.
We can't talk here.
What time did you close the store last night?
What time did you close the store last night?
The house where I live belongs to my parents.
You can't treat me like that.
This is a beautiful country.
He turned a blind eye.
I saw it on TV.
Do you have this in another color?
Do you have this in another color?
Do you have this in another color?
We're going to the hospital.
You can't let Tom stay here.
You haven't lifted a finger.
You're wealthy, aren't you?
Your secret's safe with me.
You look beautiful tonight.
Where do you suggest we go?
He was bedazzled by her beauty.
He was happy in the bosom of his family.
This is the first time I've caught such a big fish!
This is the first time I've caught such a big fish!
You are on the wrong train.
Please sing a song.
He asked me if I wanted to go abroad.
As soon as I've finished doing that, I'll help you.
I could hardly believe my eyes.
Don't leave the window open.
Nobody will believe you.
Mein Kampf is a book by Adolf Hitler.
You knew that when you married me.
Tom called.
Tom called.
Their lips met.
She tweezed her eyebrows.
Sit down, Kate.
Ann wrote something on the blackboard.
I forgot my pen.
We all suspect him of murder.
How time flies!
I can't leave now.
Was the book interesting?
The movie was so good I'd like to see it again.
One million is a seven digit number.
Who made the sun?
Tom has nobody to turn to for help.
Can you save them?
You should get your eyes examined.
You should get your eyes examined.
Why are you climbing this tree?
I used to do that as a kid.
Allow me to show you to your room.
Tell me where you were last night at the time of the murder.
That horse is very expensive.
We're trying to close the box.
We're trying to close the box.
Forgive me for being dressed like this.
Forgive me for being dressed like this.
Forgive me for being dressed like this.
Forgive me for being dressed like this.
I had to leave.
Please try again.
This place gives me the creeps.
He's a bit shorter than me.
Tom is obviously in trouble.
Return immediately.
Keep back.
I translate only articles, not books.
Who will believe this?
Be confident.
Be confident.
It helps.
Tom phoned.
Tom hopes to see you there.
Tom tried.
Breathe normally.
Breathe normally.
Tom is a strange person.
I wasn't even driving that fast.
I wasn't even driving that fast.
Repeat after me.
His car looks as good as new.
Do you think he'll like it?
Mary closed her eyes.
Ow! This coffee is hot!
Ow! This coffee is hot!
I didn't feel like calling him.
How could something like this happen?
We're all sure of that.
I wonder where Tom is and who he's with.
I don't ever want Tom to write to my daughter again.
Teacher, could you please repeat that? I didn't understand.
There is no bus service to the village.
Did I touch a nerve?
The grandfather is on his deathbed.
I told her not to come back.
As for me, I can't agree to his offer.
I have a clear memory of my childhood.
I don't think this is any of your business.
I think it's kinda weird, he said.
He may have read the letter.
What's Tom carrying?
What's Tom wearing?
Tom has a special place in my heart.
A large crowd of people gathered.
Tom bought a newspaper and read it on the train.
Tom almost looks like a girl.
To your health!
He never takes into account the fact that I am very busy.
You learn something new every day.
This I have done.
This coffee is quite strong.
I will choose one of them.
I will choose one of them.
I will choose one of them.
We'll have to talk later.
I have finally reached my limit.
You have an infectious disease.
How old was he in the first photo?
How old was she in the first photo?
Happiness is always unexpected.
I can see the top of the mountain.
That smells nice.
I had to go to the hospital.
I'm glad that the rain has stopped.
I'm glad that the rain has stopped.
I'm not very good at French.
He does not like the music I listen to.
I have an eight-year-old daughter.
Tom lives in a poor neighborhood.
I don't know where else to turn.
Lots of people get married on Saturdays.
I'm ready to forgive her.
Where are your suitcases?
Whenever Googling, I always love finding what I am not looking for.
This is strictly a private matter.
When can we meet again?
Kiss me, you fool!
That might not be as hard as you think it's going to be.
That might not be as hard as you think it's going to be.
How about a drink?
That's how I got to know her.
That's how I got to know her.
This task is difficult.
Don't forget to call Tom.
Forgive us.
Finish this.
I screamed.
Stop shouting.
Love your neighbors.
Love your neighbors.
We like music.
He went abroad.
My English is at intermediate level.
I could not believe what I saw.
They continue to call.
Knowing what will happen is more important than knowing what has happened.
A boy your age ought to behave well.
They have already proven it!
It'll take longer than ten minutes.
A good neighbor is better than a bad relative.
Today I visited a museum.
Today I visited a museum.
Would you let me go?
Would you let me go?
They would never believe us.
Pleasure is the source of pain.
You called the police.
You called the police.
You called the police.
This building is blue.
You had better wait until the police come.
You had better wait until the police come.
Let us go, please.
Stay drunk!
Stay drunk!
Stay drunk!
I don't have a picture of you.
This would be a lot easier if you would help.
I want to confess.
Do you want to sell them?
You're making progress.
The bullet went through his body.
Get up early.
What an experience!
I am rich.
It doesn't hurt so much.
Give me my sword.
Did you watch this movie?
These are old photos.
Power is the great aphrodisiac.
She was content with her life.
What a fool I was!
You're so stupid.
Where did you sell them?
Do you want to go out and get something to drink?
You're not in bed yet?
You're not in bed yet?
You're not in bed yet?
Where did you lose them?
I don't feel safe here anymore.
If you lie down with dogs, you will get up with fleas.
Are you in a bad mood?
What has that got to do with anything?
You are comparing apples and oranges.
This bread is hard as a rock.
Wait for me, I am coming.
I tried to explain to him that we were not responsible for his mistake, but he refused to listen.
He won't like that.
Which pen do you see?
Do you see a queen?
I got up earlier than usual to catch the first train.
What a cute baby!
After a while he found out the answer.
I've finalized my work.
Let's watch a movie.
I'll call you as soon as I get to Chicago.
Add the onion.
Do you know how fast you were going?
Do you know how fast you were going?
That's what I wanted to talk to you about.
Someone is singing.
Aren't you cold in short sleeves?
If this happens again, call me.
If this happens again, call me.
Let's talk about what happened.
You're dangerous.
My native language is a foreign language for someone else.
I just can't believe Tom is gone.
I want you to grow up.
I lost a lot of money.
Don't repeat that.
You're too weak.
Tom fell and hurt his hand.
Are there stars with other forms of life on them?
Hurry up, the summer is almost over...
He has enough willpower.
The doctor said it'll be necessary to operate.
The morning was clear.
The morning was clear.
The noise was a nuisance.
I was hoping you could tell me where Tom is.
I don't drink vodka!
Wait for me. I'll be back.
Wait for me. I'll be back.
Parents should be role models for their children.
I'm studying French.
Are you sure this is OK?
I don't want to shoot.
The voice on the phone was unfamiliar to me.
Did they give you any information?
Why is that so hard to believe?
I'll wait in the car.
Tom hasn't called me.
Mum said the same thing. But, so what? It's got nothing to do with me.
She's stupid, but honest.
She will notice sooner or later.
He's tall, famous, and rich.
Tom says that the three of you are his brothers.
Do you think I care what you think of me?
Is this store open on Sundays?
The restaurant is next door to the theater.
The sun rises earlier in the summer.
Tom just got back from the hospital.
You look very handsome.
My father was an engineer.
There are going to be a lot of questions.
There are always a lot of questions.
Kelly, watch the stars!
Watch your mouth, Tom.
Tom used to drink a lot before he met Mary.
I'm sure Tom hasn't forgotten about the meeting.
I'm sure Tom hasn't forgotten about the meeting.
Fish were falling out of the clear blue sky!
I'm not sure what size she wears.
I'm not sure what size she wears.
I'm not sure what size she wears.
I was in the hospital last week.
She was watching TV with tears in her eyes.
Just where do you think you're going?
I almost cried too!
Are you sure we have enough beer?
That will take hours.
Let me have a look at the picture.
We all liked you.
We all liked you.
We all liked you.
Everybody liked you.
Everybody liked you.
Everybody liked you.
Everybody liked us.
Everybody liked them.
Everybody liked me.
Everybody liked me.
Everybody liked her.
We all liked them.
We all liked him.
We all liked her.
Tom is coming tomorrow.
Tom did it for money.
We are a lot stronger than you thought.
We are a lot stronger than you thought.
Is Ken busy? "Yes, he is busy."
Tom said no.
It's difficult being rich.
Will you sing me a Beatles' song?
That won't work!
The castle is beautiful.
He believed the Earth round.
He believed the Earth round.
I'll pay by Visa.
The enemy approaches the town.
Tom has nothing to do.
She is independent of her parents.
Tom told me his car was in the shop.
We can use it.
Tom knows a lot of songs.
Please send me a picture of yourself.
Please send me a picture of yourself.
Tom often talks to his parents on Skype.
We are a lot stronger than you thought.
She was named Alice after her aunt.
That leaves no room for doubt.
I hope that was what you wanted.
I didn't know it would be like this.
I'm sure you're going to like this.
I'm sure you're not going to like this.
I didn't expect to see you again so soon.
How often do you go there?
Tom has a lot of brains.
There are no other alternatives.
You look as your father looked thirty years ago.
I go to school every day by bus.
Sometimes a flower should be enough to smile.
I have forgotten her last name.
It was hard at first.
Next Monday and Tuesday are holidays.
Yeah, there was some sort of reply from them.
Not knowing what to do, I telephoned the police.
Please bring me a glass of water.
We use "present tense" for this kind of case.
She didn't give me back my money.
I never thought I'd get that lucky.
I never thought I'd get that lucky.
Please give up smoking.
Please give up smoking.
Hand me the letter.
Hand me the letter.
Call me this afternoon.
Call me this afternoon.
What's your favorite music?
Give me the map.
Why did you listen to them?
Why did you listen to them?
You're busy now, aren't you?
You're busy now, aren't you?
I'm not busy right now.
I'm a teacher, not a student.
Tom is a very quiet neighbor.
You're about my age, I think.
You're about my age, I think.
I'll keep your advice in mind.
I'm about the same age as you.
I'm about the same age as you.
I'm about the same age as you.
You're about my age, I think.
You're about my age, I think.
We're not certain of that yet.
We're on the same team, right?
I'm just watching.
They're not stupid.
Make an effort.
I didn't invite her.
I didn't invite him.
I didn't invite them.
I didn't invite you.
Who would want to kill her?
Who would want to kill him?
Who would want to kill them?
Who would want to kill us?
I'm fed up with your stories!
I wish she'd stop smoking.
Let's talk seriously.
I go to university.
The leaves are yellow.
I love to collect stamps.
Today I woke up early.
Tom has written three novels.
Samsung is a big company.
Who had this idea?
We have to turn back.
Are you going to use that?
Are you going to use that?
Not knowing what to do, we telephoned the police.
I remember giving him the key.
I lost my keys somewhere yesterday.
I don't know when Tom got married, but I do know he got married.
Now it is half past three, but we booked a place at the restaurant at 8 o'clock
Tom was alone in the kitchen.
Are you almost finished?
You’re bound to recognize her by her voice.
I don't know when the husband has called.
I don't know when the husband called.
There are about forty students in her class.
Walking along the street, I met an old friend.
Walking along the street, I met an old friend.
Tom is in prison for murder.
Prepare to die!
I'm willing to help him.
The dress is green.
Tom appeared to be bewildered.
I don't know when the husband called.
It is starting to rain.
I heard strange noises.
It never occurred to me that Tom might say no.
Venus is the second planet from the Sun.
How many meters are there in a kilometer?
They were three and they were all armed.
This is a very complex problem.
He possessed a good memory.
Did you see a bag here?
Tom stepped on his glasses.
What are you suggesting to me?
What are you suggesting to me?
I saw my name on the list.
I am fully satisfied with my new house.
I love peace and quiet.
Open up.
Every person is an individual.
I can't go out today as I've been told to house sit.
Where was I supposed to go?
When I want your opinion, I'll ask you for it.
When I want your opinion, I'll ask you for it.
A big bridge was built over the river.
Writing French is more difficult than speaking it.
Do you have their address?
May I call you tomorrow?
I want to hear your story. Go on, please.
One book is thin, and the other is thick.
I want him to think well of me.
We'll let Tom try.
Forgive me, Brother.
Can you explain the exact meaning of this word?
Can you explain the exact meaning of this word?
Tom is a poet.
Tom is happy now.
Tom is happy now.
Absolutely!
We don't have time to help them.
I don't have time to help you.
I don't have time to help you.
I don't have time to help them.
I don't have time to help him.
Don't you ever question anything?
His conscience suddenly awoke in him.
Jim is in my black book.
I cannot do without this book.
Your dress is very nice.
You are very rich.
You are very rich.
You are very rich.
You are very rich.
I'd love to marry you, but my family won't let me.
I regret having told you.
We were busy with housework.
Is this common?
You would like it.
You would like it.
What a long bridge it is!
Men would gladly give women the last word if they could be sure that it really was the last.
Last night, we watched television together.
Let’s drink wine or beer.
The car turned right.
Who knows Hu Jintao's birthday?
Tom had open heart surgery.
Now that I see these pictures, I remember.
Are you going out together?
I just couldn't let that happen.
Tom stopped talking.
You must hurry up.
Not much money is required.
Tickets aren't required.
Three people were rescued.
Start from here.
Show me another example.
I tried to save her.
I tried to save her.
I was trying to rescue her.
I was trying to rescue her.
Breathe, damn you!
You may choose any of them.
You may choose any of them.
Everything depends upon the results.
You should marry someone you love.
You have to believe us.
She lost it.
She lost it.
Everything depends on money.
Another problem has developed.
We'll talk about that soon.
We are building a bridge.
Tom was diagnosed with acute myeloid leukemia in 2013.
This is strictly forbidden.
One person here has already died from this disease.
I hope you stay in prison until you die.
Three soldiers died protecting us.
I was naked.
Are we being watched?
Are we being watched?
What were they wearing?
Tom usually wears glasses.
Wait till next year.
This can't wait until tomorrow.
We used to be neighbors.
Everyone uses Google.
Is it splendid, this world?
How would you translate it?
How would you translate it?
I was made to go against my will.
Tom asked me why I didn't eat meat.
Have you called Lucy yet?
Have you called Lucy yet?
May I call you tomorrow?
May I call you tomorrow?
What a beautiful garden you have!
He is studying.
Where do you study?
Mother is in the kitchen.
That's our train.
You're so beautiful in that dress.
Close your eyes when you listen to music.
He picked up the phone.
She picked up the phone.
Is there hot water?
The word "physics" comes from Greek, meaning nature.
We help him.
We help her.
We help them.
I hope you know what you're doing.
He has just as many books as his father does.
Select action for Chris.
The store is closed.
Aren't you interested?
I don't want Tom to see me naked.
Is that the train I have to take?
Let's move on to the next item.
I finished the work by myself.
I guess I'm not the first to tell you that.
I prefer English to music.
I prefer English to music.
He let Tom go.
Murders are very common in big cities.
That's just awesome.
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
I thought you'd want to help me.
I thought you'd want to help me.
Tom wrote a sentence about death.
He fell from the horse.
This is the house in which I was born and brought up.
Where did you grow up?
Look back and you'll see a black cat.
I've got goose bumps.
Keep out of this.
We cannot sleep well on summer nights.
In the end, he landed in jail.
It's time to get moving!
Did you buy it on the black market?
I read a most interesting novel yesterday.
He'll call me around six.
Oh, look! There's a big snake over there!
I always have my own way. I don't listen to those who love me and who have more brains than I.
I want to be a teacher when I grow up.
That photo was taken in my childhood.
Tom is dressed.
That black bag is yours?
I get along well with my neighbors.
We'll have to sit at the back of the train.
The springtime of life is short.
She calls me all the time.
Please, calm down!
Please, calm down!
It's all right. I can wait.
Are the train tickets expensive?
We've all read that one.
What can I use?
My friend George is coming to Japan this spring.
Beautiful poppies were growing beside the road.
He suddenly rose from the chair.
I felt tears come into my eyes.
They began to run when they saw the police.
How can I sell myself?
I never thought I would get married.
That is called true love.
My uncle gave me some good advice when I was in trouble.
It is better to act than to talk.
Is that agreeable?
His letter says he'll arrive next Sunday.
It happened that I was not in London at that time.
Mr. Norton is pleasant to work with.
It doesn't matter what I believe.
Tom didn't buy a new car yesterday, did he?
I'm not sure whether Tom heard it or not.
I like art.
I told him that I wasn't busy.
I told her that I wasn't busy.
I told her that I wasn't busy.
I told him that I wasn't busy.
Look at this picture again.
Lida was from Colombia. I met her when I was in Madrid.
It's not natural.
Late autumn in Scotland is rather cold.
The daffodil is the national flower of Wales.
Dublin is the capital of Ireland.
Is it true that you added a million examples to Tatoeba?
I'm grown up now.
I'm an adult now.
By chance I met my ex-girlfriend in Portugal.
By chance I met my ex-girlfriend in Portugal.
I rang the bell six times.
You're the new secretary, aren't you?
He had to stay in hospital for a week.
My father died in Vietnam.
Where's your black suit?
They say that I'm an old woman.
This is a crime against humanity.
Tom lost his ticket.
In Kyoto, you can see both old and modern buildings.
I have a short-sleeved shirt.
Tom doesn't eat much meat.
You built that all by yourself?
You built that all by yourself?
You built that all by yourself?
I don't like the taste of okra.
Tom goes to school by bus.
She showed her my photograph.
Let me know your address.
Let me know your address.
Those three are his daughters.
You have no right to tell me who I can or can't date.
John is walking in the direction of the station.
I know your mom doesn't want you to talk to me.
I was captivated by her beauty.
They are all very busy.
Tom never talks to Mary.
She never talks to him.
My tail hurts!
I like trains.
What's the horse's name?
I wonder why people always want to know the truth.
You don't look that good.
You don't look that good.
Is it summer yet?
Is that too late?
We met in winter.
Men always walk in front of women in this country.
I won't kill you.
I won't kill you.
Perhaps we should've tried helping Tom.
If you don't behave, Santa won't come.
Tom was busy yesterday.
Tom couldn't breathe.
Are you filming?
Are you taking pictures?
Keep your pants on.
The king is coming.
What's the name of that station?
What's the name of this place?
We often play cards on Sunday.
Call me up when you get there.
I don't know. It depends on the price.
I want to talk in Lojban.
I want to speak with him.
I want to talk about them.
I want you to talk to me.
I want you to talk to me.
I want you to talk to me.
Why don't you get into the water?
She awoke in the middle of the night.
What planet do you live on?
Good lunch.
I wonder whether a person can live on only two hours of sleep a night.
Please come back home.
Please come back home.
When are you coming back home?
I go for a walk with my dog.
Somebody is lying here.
The bus driver was drunk.
Never be afraid to make mistakes.
Never be afraid to make mistakes.
Add meat.
Nice costume.
Thinking hurts.
Don't forget who you are.
They called.
The dog walked across the street.
The dog walked across the street.
I didn't leave.
I was very drunk.
I was very drunk.
I was very drunk.
I was very drunk.
You're always singing.
He went to the store.
Has Tom calmed down?
Are you really sure that this is what you want to do?
Today's my grandmother's birthday.
Today's my grandmother's birthday.
Eat while it's warm.
Eat while it's warm.
The French Revolution took place in 1789.
When was the last time you sang?
Mathematics is a difficult subject.
Are you sure it was her?
Are you sure it was her?
Are you sure it was her?
He's scared to talk to me.
Mom, I don't want to wear this.
I'll call you as soon as I've finished.
I'll call you as soon as I've finished.
I'll call you as soon as I've finished.
Has Tom called yet?
Who's the girl in a yellow raincoat?
Who's the girl in a yellow raincoat?
Am I bothering you?
Am I bothering you?
She left.
I nearly passed out.
I almost passed out.
Where can I speak with you?
I hate it when there are a lot of people.
Who did you talk to?
Who was that you were just talking to?
Who was that you were just talking to?
Who was that you were just talking to?
She just left.
He just left.
I don't have to put up with this.
They named their cats Tom and Jerry.
Tom often talks on the phone.
I hate doing this.
I have no idea. That's why I'm asking.
Are you for or against the project?
Buy a book and read it.
The sand was warm.
The sand was warm.
Why aren't the people in Australia upside down?
On a clear, dark night, our eyes can see about 6,000 or so stars in the sky.
Tom didn't call.
Tom still hasn't called.
She was alone in the dark.
Is it true that the world will end in 2012?
Both were naked.
Both were naked.
Both were naked.
Both were naked.
I didn't tell him. He found out by himself.
I didn't tell him. He found out by himself.
Are you going to the theater tonight?
I told them they shouldn't move.
Is the horse black?
What time do you usually get up?
Be careful. The cat is inside the box.
I don't like the poor, they think only of money.
He and I have been friends since childhood.
Do you still remember the scenes of that war?
Did you go to the market yesterday?
Did you go to the market yesterday?
He has a liking for modern music.
It might be too late.
It is worthwhile to read this novel.
Tom looked both ways before crossing the street.
You're always wearing the same clothes.
Is this lake deep?
Tom isn't a student.
Scottish Gaelic is very interesting, isn’t it?
The teacher was angry with me.
I'm writing a novel.
She would often go to the theater when she was in London.
First I'll go to the bank, and then I'll buy the tickets.
He told me that I had a nice smile.
That rings a bell.
The white spots on Saturn are believed to be powerful storms.
Let's wait until six o'clock.
Tom is already on the list.
They chose John as the captain of the team.
Choose the one you like.
Choose the one you like.
Choose the one you like.
Choose the one you like.
Choose the one you like.
He was poor, so he couldn't go to college.
Children love to sing.
You took the words right out of my mouth, pal.
Whether you get married or not, you'll regret it either way.
You took the words right out of my mouth, pal.
Does everyone in Sweden have blonde hair and blue eyes?
I can't believe I'm actually seeing this.
I can't believe I'm actually seeing this.
Tom was in the hospital for three weeks.
Why are you dressed like that?
Why are you dressed like that?
Why are you dressed like that?
We met at two in the afternoon.
I sent you a letter.
The parents want to give their son the best education.
This is the mistake of the student.
The key has to be here somewhere.
How do you know I'm not from here?
How do you know I'm not from here? "It's obvious."
How do I know you're not lying to me right now?
We've found a dead dog in the garden.
Don't throw bones to the dog!
Sunlight is no less necessary to good health than fresh air.
I only use biodegradable bags.
Where the hell were you?
Where the hell were you?
Where the hell were you?
I don't know whether it's important to you, but it's very important to me.
I don't know whether it's important to you, but it's very important to me.
Don't talk while you're eating.
Math is hard.
Stop playing Minecraft.
Science is fun.
She started laughing.
Last month we went to Manila.
It's a very serious problem.
What colour do you like?
You're the engineer.
You're the engineer.
Is this the train for London?
I know how happy you are.
Promise you won't tell them.
Promise you won't tell them.
Promise you won't tell him.
Promise you won't tell him.
Promise you won't tell her.
Promise you won't tell her.
I'm not in the mood for this.
I'm not going to talk to you anymore.
I'm not going to talk to you anymore.
I'm not gonna lie to you.
I'm not going to lie to you.
I'm not going to lie to you.
I'm not going to lie to you.
I'm absolutely certain that Tom is wrong.
I'll buy a gift for Tom.
I cannot read this magazine. It's for women.
I went to Tom for advice.
I want to buy a shirt.
Small children like to be carried.
My dad loses his keys at least once a week.
The horses make dust as they run.
Tom is approximately Mary's age.
It's very important to us.
Let him try.
I should've called a doctor.
It's too narrow.
It's too narrow.
It's too narrow.
They found the room empty.
How long did you stay abroad?
How long did you stay abroad?
How long did you stay abroad?
Thank you for your warm words.
Thank you for your warm words.
He died a few days later.
I was a little afraid.
Don't make the same mistake again.
Don't make the same mistake again.
How long does it take from here to your house?
He left for Manila last week.
I'm going to give it a go.
I'm going to give it a go.
What's so complicated about that?
How many classes do you have on Monday?
Mom, Tom's hitting me!
What are they suggesting?
Beavers must always wear down their teeth by chewing on trees.
There's a garden in front of our house.
I saw the pictures.
We have a garden in front of our house.
We have some rose bushes in front of our house.
We have three trees in our backyard.
This animal is the size of a beaver.
Tom believes in the existence of the soul.
I left earlier than my sister.
I want to talk to you about something.
I want to talk to you about something.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
They're awake.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Don't help me. I want to do this by myself.
Tom's very unpredictable when he's been drinking.
Do you know how busy I've been?
Do you know how busy I've been?
That guy got married and started a family.
It hurts!
Do you have it by any chance?
Do you have it by any chance?
Do you have it by any chance?
Do you have it by any chance?
He barely spoke to me.
I'm going to show you the photo.
Read it one more time, please.
Read it one more time, please.
Read it one more time, please.
That's the friend I gave the key to.
That's the friend I gave the key to.
That's the friend I gave the key to.
That's the friend I gave the key to.
One thing should not be forgotten: a program cannot think.
You forgot to tell Tom where to meet us, didn't you?
I'm going to my grandmother's.
I'm going to my grandmother's.
Has something changed?
I’ll do my homework later.
She was ready to give him back all his money.
Put the book back where it was.
Put the book back where it was.
The soup is thick.
Lunch is included.
Fire is dangerous.
Family is important.
Everything is closed.
Is everyone busy?
This is unexpected.
I never wear suits.
I help her almost every day.
Where do I need to turn?
I let the dog out.
So, what did you want to talk about?
So, what did you want to talk about?
They walked toward the bridge.
It's up to you to decide what to do.
Listen.
Listen.
We rented an apartment when we lived in New York.
My boyfriend still hasn't met my parents.
This flower is found in different parts of Hokkaido.
Stay out of my business.
Stay out of my business.
Get out of my kitchen.
Get out of my kitchen.
The driver of the bus was injured.
Have you read the "Liaisons Dangereuses"?
I'm aware of that.
She was very worried about her husband's health.
I think that song sounds better in French.
You told me that you were busy.
I was aware of that.
I was aware of that.
You told me that you were busy.
You told me that you were busy.
Of course, I feel guilty.
Of course, I feel guilty.
Tom had to hurry.
They were crying.
Take a look, Tom.
It wasn't a joke.
Tom quickly opened the drawer and pulled out a gun.
If my boy had not been killed in the traffic accident, he would be a college student now.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I thought you were serious.
I'm going to make him an offer he can't refuse.
He's a wealthy man.
You remind me of your brother.
You remind me of your brother.
You remind me of your father.
How many churches are there in Lisbon?
Don't let them eat this.
Don't let them eat this.
Don't let them eat this.
Don't let them eat this.
You're as guilty as him.
You're as guilty as him.
You're as guilty as him.
Do you like your teachers?
My girlfriend doesn't like scary movies.
I think you'll enjoy this movie.
Tom pulled out a map.
I've never hit anyone.
He is looking at a photo of his friend.
Finally, the bell rang.
Tom won't talk to anyone.
Tom won't talk to anyone.
Let me finish, OK?
Let me finish, OK?
Would you like to come in?
Stop trying.
Stop dreaming.
When will we get there?
That's a separate question.
Send me there.
He left immediately.
She is easygoing.
She seems rich.
I shouldn't have eaten so much.
Tom is short.
He opens the window.
He eats around the clock.
Which way did you choose?
Which way did you choose?
You shouldn't smoke.
You shouldn't smoke.
You shouldn't smoke.
It was hard to believe.
Let's go to the movies.
The policeman lifted the box carefully.
The policeman lifted the box carefully.
I gave Tom a direct order, but he ignored it.
This sentence is very easy to translate.
My dog has large paws.
Thank you for helping me.
Thank you for helping me.
Now give it back.
Now give it back.
Now give it back.
Now give it back.
The tree is green all year round.
I tell you, this can't end well.
Are you sure you're not tired?
Are you sure you're not tired?
She asked him how to get to the station.
I'm not sure of anything.
Can you help me get to the hospital?
In the kitchen.
Check, please.
Check, please.
He made three mistakes in as many lines.
Did Tom hit you?
I want a new kitchen.
There's a mirror.
Tom worked indoors.
That happened almost thirty years ago.
Let them go home.
Let them go home.
Forget about me.
When can I call you?
When can I call you?
There are fifty families in this village.
She's at most 20 years old.
I have never heard him crying like this.
I'm sorry I have kept you waiting so long.
I'm sorry I have kept you waiting so long.
I am sorry to have kept you waiting so long.
I am sorry to have kept you waiting so long.
Can we talk later?
Can we talk later?
You always repeat the same thing.
You always repeat the same thing.
It smells good!
Don't repeat the same mistake!
Don't repeat the same mistake!
Don't repeat the same mistake!
Energy will go wherever we direct it.
You should talk to a specialist.
Is it true that you added a million examples to Tatoeba?
Birds drink water.
Wait, what is this?
Wait, what is this?
What did you want to talk to me about?
Tom hasn't talked to me about his personal life.
I'm glad you enjoyed it.
You wouldn't like it.
I was just talking to him. "Talking to him about what?" "That's none of your business."
Thanks for coming by.
Thanks for coming by.
There's only one road on the island.
This is one of the busiest bridges in the city.
x does not belong to the set B because it belongs to the set A.
You look younger than him.
You look younger than him.
You look younger than him.
You look younger than him.
You're on the home page.
I'm not sure I have enough time.
Exactly how much money did you lose?
Ann likes music very much.
I'm very happy with the result.
I'm very happy with the result.
Don't leave your glasses on the table.
You're the most important person in my life.
Every drop is important.
I want to become a journalist.
I'll make that bird sing, you'll see!
I'll make that bird sing, you'll see!
I promise I'll try.
I gave the boy what little money I had.
It's up to you to decide whether we'll go there or not.
It's up to you to decide whether we'll go there or not.
It's up to you to decide whether we'll go there or not.
It's up to you to decide whether we'll go there or not.
It took a month.
There were hundreds of people there.
I sang a song.
Three soldiers were wounded.
Can I give you a piece of advice?
Health is more important than money.
Tom has recently been learning how to sing a lot of new songs.
The policeman took the knife from the boy.
You'll call me, won't you?
You'll call me, won't you?
You'll call me, won't you?
You'll call me, won't you?
Delete that picture.
You're ignoring me.
You're ignoring me.
Tom has been seriously wounded.
This is an island in the Caribbean Sea.
We will let him try.
This case is complex.
They were very poor.
My neighbor called the fire department.
Imagine yourself on a mountaintop.
Imagine yourself on a mountaintop.
A rash broke out on her neck.
I will finish the entire book in four days.
The stars are beautiful.
Stars are beautiful.
I cannot phone Marika. She lives in Finland!
I like Russian food.
The eagle is the queen of the winds.
He was only a shadow of his former self.
I can't add anything to that.
I can't stop thinking about what they did to me.
A police officer is talking to her.
I'm surprised you called.
Just tell me who to call.
Tom thought you'd prefer a blue one.
I'm sorry Tom had to leave so early.
I'm sure Tom didn't know about that.
I'm sure Tom would be happy to help.
She was the last person I expected to see there.
She was the last person I expected to see in such a place.
Who's going to believe me?
The falcon has keen eyes.
Tom is a very good teacher, isn't he?
Sooner or later, it's going to happen again.
They have treated her well.
Dan left a good job in London to live with Linda in Glasgow.
Did you meet in Seoul?
Did you meet in Seoul?
Was it fun?
It was very fun.
She felt a sharp pain in the chest.
Tom, look what I found under the sofa.
Return to the ship.
I caught a fish!
I caught a fish!
As all other animals, human being has a chest and a belly.
I'm shorter than him.
I'm shorter than him.
The population of this country is smaller than that of the United States.
Is he sure?
Those are happy, who forget everything.
Show him the magazine.
Show him the magazine.
That's an interesting idea.
Shut the gate.
I want to marry Heather.
Do you have anything to add?
A googol is ten to the power of one hundred.
I remember the first time I listened to this song.
One magazine is for boys, and another for girls.
Tom doesn't usually show his feelings.
She wears designer clothes.
This mountain has an altitude of 3,000 meters.
This mountain has an altitude of 3,000 meters.
Why did you buy a French car?
Why did you buy a French car?
She is about as tall as me.
She is about as tall as me.
She is as tall as I.
I hope that's true.
He can't be a poet.
He can't be a poet.
Tom wasted a lot of time.
The earth is not a star, but a planet.
Summer has come.
Summer has come.
His son disappeared seven years ago.
Cranes are big beautiful birds.
She had nothing else to lose.
Tom never listens to what the teacher says.
Maybe this was a mistake.
Tom called the neighbors.
Tom was barely able to breathe.
Tom worked at a hospital.
It's time for you to start getting ready for school.
There is a picture on the wall.
The bed is on fire!
Tom walked across the field.
He's a leading authority in his field.
Learn from others' mistakes.
Many scientists are working in this field.
We cannot see our own faces without a mirror.
Yesterday I read an interesting story.
Tom is a member of my crew.
My favourite movie is Fellini's Satyricon.
I looked at the animal and the animal looked at me.
She hates running.
Tom has been in prison.
I'm sorry, I forgot your name.
I'm sorry, I forgot your name.
I'm sorry, I forgot your name.
I'm sorry, I forgot your name.
I gave the beggar all the money I had.
I love spending time with her.
I don't understand how the human brain works.
I don't understand how the human brain works.
I was young and stupid.
I was young and stupid.
I was young and stupid.
I was young and stupid.
I was young and stupid.
I was young and stupid.
It doesn't belong to you.
It doesn't belong to you.
It doesn't belong to you.
Are you really going to wear that?
How did you get that idea?
She is as guilty as Tom.
It didn't take long.
Please don't shoot.
We eat a fresh, green salad every day.
This bus doesn't stop here.
I met Mihaela at the subway station.
I'll call them tomorrow.
The situation is worse than I thought.
I don't like watching TV.
Too much is at stake.
Freedom has a cost.
Freedom has a cost.
His father lost his job recently.
For the first time in my life, I found myself all alone in an unknown city.
Obviously, Tom didn't want to go.
How many aunts and uncles do you have?
Come back in a week.
It's fair.
I didn't enjoy that.
Don't drink so much beer.
Don't drink so much beer.
I will try next week.
You're wet.
We're on the right floor.
We're on the wrong train.
What do you suggest I do?
You haven't changed much.
You made me buy you that.
You really are something.
You're in serious danger.
You're lucky, aren't you?
Beautiful night, isn't it?
Did you have a good summer?
My brother likes watching scary movies.
I'm so glad you called.
I hope you find her.
I hope you find her.
I hope you find him.
I hope you find him.
I hope you find them.
I hope you find them.
Call me if you find her.
Call me if you find her.
Call me if you find him.
Call me if you find him.
Call me if you find them.
Call me if you find them.
I hope we find them.
I hope we find him.
I hope we find her.
We'll have to try it again.
We'll have to try it again.
I've got to try to find them.
I've got to try to find him.
I've got to try to find her.
I'm hoping to find them.
I'm hoping to find him.
I'm hoping to find her.
I told you to leave her alone.
I told you to leave her alone.
I told you to leave her alone.
I told you to leave her alone.
We had no idea what we should do.
We had no idea what we should do.
There needs to be a full stop at the end of a sentence.
We slept in a very small tent.
Sorry, but Mary's right.
We'll wait for you.
We'll wait for them.
We'll wait for him.
We'll wait for her.
I'll wait for them.
I'll wait for him.
I'll wait for her.
Can we wait for them here?
Can I wait for them here?
Can I wait for him here?
Can I wait for her here?
Didn't you meet her there?
What do you want to have for lunch?
Tom banged the table with his fist.
You didn't tell me Tom smoked.
You didn't tell me Tom smoked.
You forgave me, didn't you?
Under these circumstances, I cannot accept the offer.
I'll probably never come here again.
I didn't expect I'd find them.
I didn't expect I'd find him.
I didn't expect I'd find her.
Are you dating him?
Are you dating him?
Are you dating her?
Are you dating her?
I thought you were dating him.
I thought you were dating her.
Are you still dating him?
Are you still dating her?
I don't want you to date him.
I don't want you to date her.
I knew it would happen sooner or later.
Where is the ship?
It won't happen again, I promise.
I have no idea what I'm talking about.
Are you a teacher?
He was saying his head hurt a lot.
The girls don't like that song.
We're new in town.
Tom has a healthy life style.
Fish is expensive.
Tom will forgive Mary.
I want to be famous.
Why is fish so expensive?
What the hell is going on?
Where is the closest hospital?
I can't study at home.
I'll marry you.
Our cat is missing.
How many songs has Tom written?
I saw a dog. The dog held a piece of meat in its mouth.
How can you be sure that's true?
We have finished the work for today.
You may bring your own lunch to school.
Where is my watch? "It's in your drawer."
I can't save anyone.
Tom thinks that his TV is watching him.
They'll try again.
We'll try again.
We've run out of money.
Let's start here.
We have nothing left to lose.
Tom doesn't think that will do any good.
Make an offer.
I'm sorry I didn't call last night.
I don't think it's Tom's fault.
I didn't know that someone was watching me.
Tom completed his painting.
It's important to me.
The doctors thought he was dead, but today he is still alive and healthy, and has a job and a family.
I've got to try.
Mary is as guilty as Tom.
My mom bought this shirt for me.
You're lucky it's not Monday.
Even Tom looked annoyed.
Tom looked a little shocked.
This is completely my fault.
Come back in five minutes.
We don't even talk anymore.
Use them all.
Tom married a local girl.
Are you sure you don't want to go to the doctor?
I don't want to talk to you anymore.
I don't want to talk to you anymore.
I don't want to talk to you anymore.
I don't want to talk to you anymore.
I didn't want to kill them.
I didn't want to kill her.
There must be a connection between these murders.
There must be a connection between these murders.
Neither of us wants to get married.
Tom lost his wife a few months ago.
I can't remember the last time I had so much fun.
What a fool I am!
Just give the order.
I want to be sure.
I want to be sure.
The museum is closed on Mondays.
The museum is closed on Mondays.
Where did you spend your summer?
Where did you spend your summer?
Where did you spend your summer?
Love has never killed anyone. "Really? Ask Romeo and Juliet."
You were happy.
My father has been in the hospital for two months.
Give her a dollar.
Give her a dollar.
Give him a dollar.
Give him a dollar.
Hand it to me.
Hand it to me.
Hand it to me.
Hand it to me.
Hand it to me.
Tom is in his room, writing a letter to his grandmother.
How many more pages do you have left to read?
How much more time do you think this will take?
How much more time do you think this will take?
How much did you drink last night?
Do you like shopping?
Do you like shopping?
Humans are the only living creatures that make use of fire.
Tom has been accused of murder.
Oh, fine! I'll give it one more go! But that's it!
They gave me 3 days to pack my bags.
As the summer has come, so it will go.
You were happy.
You were happy.
How many names are on the list?
Have you finished your work?
You're lying to me.
You're lying to me.
I like this color as well.
We were happy.
Tom thinks of everything.
A cat has a tail and four legs.
You came too late.
You came too late.
You came too late.
You came too late.
Was Tom dating anyone?
I wonder why Tom hasn't called.
The lesson will begin on Monday.
Tom, will you get up?
We're very angry.
Tom is getting married tomorrow, right?
Tom isn't going to let that happen.
Tom is a pretty stupid guy.
I come home at 2:30 on Tuesdays and Thursdays.
I don't have time to help.
His aunt lives in Austria.
He's crying.
You'll make it.
I took a speed-reading course and read War and Peace in twenty minutes. It involves Russia.
He's dating my daughter.
Where are your clothes?
Where are your clothes?
Don't you see what you've become?
Don't you see what you've become?
Don't you see what you've become?
Don't you see what you've become?
Everyone gathered around her.
Please note that the price is subject to change.
Of course, I'm serious! Is it not written on my face?
Tom was almost killed.
Why was Tom crying?
My children won't listen to me.
Whose son are you?
A few days later, he came.
He's bound hand and foot.
He doesn't want to get married.
She doesn't want to go to church.
I'm on my lunch break.
I'm on my lunch break.
I never noticed that before.
Can't you see she's not interested?
Can't you see she's not interested?
I thought Tom said he didn't want to get married.
I thought Tom wanted to marry you.
Let's leave tonight.
I admitted that I was wrong.
I owe you thirty thousand.
I owe you thirty thousand.
I owe them thirty thousand.
I owe him thirty thousand.
I owe her thirty thousand.
I owe them thirty dollars.
I owe him thirty dollars.
I owe her thirty dollars.
I saw you spying on them.
I saw you spying on him.
I saw you spying on him.
I saw you spying on her.
I saw you spying on her.
His car fell into the lake.
The most important thing in life is having enough money.
She wouldn't even speak to him.
That feels very nice.
How tall is your wife?
We don't know what's in there.
That is not how you talk to your superiors!
I can't do without your advice.
Never have I dreamed of marrying you.
Never have I dreamed of marrying you.
Haven't I met you before?
Haven't I met you before?
Haven't I met you before?
I want you to take a look at this.
This isn't a pipe.
We came up with a lot of ideas, but none of them were very good.
It's just a bird.
It's my suitcase.
I'll meet you at the usual place.
I'll meet you at the usual place.
He goes there three times a week.
Does your girlfriend like flowers?
Do you take me for an idiot?!
Do you take me for an idiot?!
Don't forget to talk to him tomorrow.
What are you getting ready for?
I don't regret what happened last night.
Dogs see in black and white.
We long for peace.
He is still not accustomed to city life.
Please wait until seven, when she will come back.
Don't ask, and I won't lie.
This is the book I told you about.
I asked her what kind of music she liked.
There are 50 members in the club.
What classes did you have today?
Students may not enter the teachers' room.
He helps whoever asks him to help.
Some of them are healthy, but others are not.
Whose plan was that?
You must consider this problem as a whole.
When shall we get together next?
I'm going to get there before dark.
What does Tom think of all this?
I'm asking you both to try again.
I'm assuming Tom knew about this.
There are many factories in this part of the city.
I found this at the risk of my life.
I told Tom that I'd get him a gift.
How can you be sure Tom will do what you ask?
Please call Tom and tell him that.
He let me stay for a night.
We should get to Chicago by lunchtime.
Is she satisfied?
I understand the situation.
He has two cars.
Will you allow me to go with you?
Nobody is going to know where you bought your clothes. "No, they will!"
Nobody is going to know where you bought your clothes. "No, they will!"
Nobody is going to know where you bought your clothes. "No, they will!"
Is there something wrong with your hearing?
Is there something wrong with your hearing?
I spoke to my uncle on the telephone.
I don't answer the phone when I'm working.
Hope while you live.
Do they watch TV?
Tom hates listening to this kind of music.
Smoke was rising from the chimney.
I immediately thought of you!
His father always comes home late.
I lost my wallet somewhere around here.
Didn't you see my keys?
That student is Tom.
I found this book interesting.
I don't always get up early.
Obviously he is wrong.
She allowed him to go alone.
This joke is politically incorrect.
She allowed him to go alone.
Welcome to China!
What's your favorite novel?
She asked me if I knew his address.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
Choose one from among these.
That is not my pen.
You have to come back in 30 minutes.
This color is a bit darker than that one.
This color is a bit darker than that one.
We weren't lucky.
I'm sorry. I forgot about this.
I'm sorry. I forgot about this.
I'm sorry. I forgot about this.
I'm sorry. I forgot about this.
I think it depends.
When did the meeting start?
I want to go to sleep soon because I need to get up early tomorrow.
The work is practically finished.
I have no idea what I'm doing with my life.
Obviously, he is lying.
The shop is across from the bank.
He got accustomed to the new way of living.
Tom didn't want to get up so early.
Is what Tom said true?
Yesterday I met an old friend of mine whom I had not seen for a long time.
It is so early.
Don't forget to send this letter.
I want my girlfriend back.
They don't want to talk to me.
Tom didn't want to talk to me.
Tom didn't want to talk to me.
Do you want to wait in the car?
Do you want to wait in the car?
Tom can no longer be a member of our committee.
I really just want to talk.
I don't want to look younger.
My uncle arrived unexpectedly from Kobe.
I tried to call her.
I tried to call him.
I tried to call them.
It was their idea.
I'm almost thirty years old.
Did you phone me?
Did you phone me?
Did you phone me?
Listen to me very carefully, OK?
Listen to me very carefully, OK?
Who wrote these stories?
Tom hasn't read this book yet.
I had an interesting day today.
Tom took another look at the picture.
Is something bothering you, Tom?
Let me have a try.
Really? That's so interesting.
The young man is quite suited for the position.
I met him at Tokyo Station.
Thank you for coming to see me off.
She made her mother happy.
Of course it's a joke!
This is her pen.
I have to call my father.
Special care should be taken on this point.
It was really close.
I heard it on TV.
Watching movies is very interesting.
Later I'll go to the movies with my friend.
Later I'll go to the movies with my friend.
These flowers come from Holland.
Tom had no one to turn to for help.
I don't want to watch television.
It was a big black American warship.
Tom is lying again.
We're getting married.
Those were happy times.
Stop filming.
Stop filming.
Stop filming.
What's the most difficult thing about karate?
The moment she saw me, she started to laugh.
His next crime will be his last.
He's going to climb the ladder.
I've no friend to talk to about my problems.
Sometimes people make the same mistake over and over.
His only wish was to see his son one last time.
Tom has never gone abroad.
Tom has never gone abroad.
Come back within a month.
I have to shake hands with the President.
I like freedom.
Though it was very late, he went on working.
He had to leave his cat at home.
I'd like to talk with Tony.
I read five different magazines each month.
They made him do the work again.
I also hope for sunny weather at the weekend.
We were studying all afternoon.
My grandfather lived to be ninety-nine years old.
French is not only spoken in France.
You should not depend on your parents.
My wife is so happy!
He just shrugged his shoulders.
The goods arrived in good condition.
I like challenges.
I want to talk to you before you leave.
Can you prove that?
We're all students.
Tom put on one of John's shirts.
Your cat is black.
I just want to get out of here.
I was told to leave this alone.
Nobody wants to help him.
Nobody wants to help her.
Nobody wants to help me.
Nobody wants to help them.
Nobody wants to help us.
Nobody wants to help you.
Nobody wants to help you.
Nobody wants to help you.
Nobody wants to help us.
Nobody wants to help them.
Nobody wants to help me.
Nobody wants to help him.
Nobody wants to help her.
I don't have time to help her.
I don't have time to help you today.
I don't have time to help you today.
I don't have time to help you now.
I don't have time to help you now.
I don't have time to help you with your homework.
I don't have time to help you with your homework.
I'm sorry, I don't have time to help you today.
I'm sorry, I don't have time to help you today.
Are you scared?
Are you scared?
It's our job to help you.
It's our job to help them.
It's our job to help him.
It's our job to help her.
It's my job to help them.
Do you intend to help us?
Do you intend to help them?
Do you intend to help me?
Do you intend to help him?
Do you intend to help her?
Tom is expecting Mary.
I didn't want to lose him.
I didn't want to lose him.
I didn't want to lose him.
I didn't want to lose him.
Why do we have to help you?
Why do we have to help you?
Why do we have to help them?
Why do we have to help him?
Why do we have to help her?
Why do I have to help you?
Why do I have to help you?
Why should I help them?
Why should I help him?
Why should I help her?
We had to help them.
We had to help him.
We had to help her.
I had to help them.
I had to help him.
I had to help her.
We're not going to help them.
We're not going to help them.
They aren't going to help you.
They aren't going to help you.
They aren't going to help you.
They aren't going to help you.
They aren't going to help him.
They aren't going to help him.
They aren't going to help her.
They aren't going to help her.
I'm not going to help them.
I'm not going to help them.
I'm not going to help him.
I'm not going to help him.
I'm not going to help her.
I'm not going to help her.
I'm not going to help her.
I'm not going to help him.
I'm not going to help them.
We're not going to help them.
They aren't going to help her.
They aren't going to help him.
They aren't going to help you.
They aren't going to help you.
She could have waited for me and helped me to carry the table.
Should I repeat what I just said?
I'm sure Tom meant what he said.
Don't ever forget this rule.
Don't ever forget this rule.
Tom was my roommate.
I knew there was somebody in the next room.
We tried to walk past them.
They tried to walk past him.
They tried to walk past her.
Was Tom carrying anything else?
Could we please talk about something else?
Could we please talk about something else?
Tom wakes up early almost every morning.
Tom walked up to the third floor.
We didn't help them escape.
We didn't help him escape.
We didn't help her escape.
I didn't help them escape.
How come you've never been here before?
It was Tom who found your keys.
Tom lost his car keys.
Was that another joke?
Was that another joke?
Is that why you won't help us?
Is that why you won't help us?
Is that why you won't help them?
Is that why you won't help them?
Is that why you won't help me?
Is that why you won't help me?
Is that why you won't help him?
Is that why you won't help him?
Is that why you won't help her?
Is that why you won't help her?
I'm sorry I couldn't help them.
I'm sorry I couldn't help him.
I'm sorry I couldn't help her.
I'm sorry I couldn't help them.
I'm sorry I couldn't help him.
I'm sorry I couldn't help her.
I didn't help him escape.
I didn't help her escape.
Don't help them.
Don't help them.
Don't help him.
Don't help him.
Don't help her.
Don't help her.
Why didn't somebody call me?
Promise me you'll help us.
Promise me you'll help us.
Promise me you'll help them.
Promise me you'll help them.
Promise me you'll help him.
Promise me you'll help him.
Promise me you'll help her.
Promise me you'll help her.
I promise you I'll help them.
I promise you I'll help them.
I promise you I'll help him.
I promise you I'll help him.
I promise you I'll help her.
I promise you I'll help her.
Why would I help them?
Why would I help him?
Why would I help her?
I help them almost every day.
I help him almost every day.
Let's hope so!
Your phone's ringing.
Your phone's ringing.
Your help isn't required.
Your help isn't required.
I've always wanted to try that.
We need to get you out of here.
Should I tell Tom you're coming?
Tell Tom I'll talk to him later.
Isn't it fun?
I never made such a promise.
Tom agreed to wait.
This is my last project.
I don't like this program.
This is not a hospital.
Do you know why Tom was in prison?
Do you know why I was in prison?
We're very poor.
We're very poor.
I don't want to talk to you ever again.
I don't want to talk to you ever again.
We're not seeing each other anymore.
I discovered her secret.
I discovered his secret.
Don't just stand there. Come in.
Don't just stand there. Come in.
When did you take this picture?
When did you take this picture?
I don't remember when I took this picture.
I saw your photos.
I remember this photo.
I sent you a photo.
My parents were teachers.
Why do you want to be a teacher?
You can't be my teacher.
I'm a serious person.
They had three sons.
I need a red pen.
Don't forget to bring a pen.
Don't forget to bring a pen.
Don't forget to bring a pen.
Don't forget to bring a pen.
I drive a Porsche.
She acknowledged her mistake.
Tom tried to wash the blood off his clothes.
The child is not crying anymore.
Does it hurt here?
Some people are never satisfied with what they have.
Do it!
Why are you so pale?
Why are you so pale?
Tom looked very pale.
Why are you packing?
Why are you packing?
I've already packed.
Have you finished packing yet?
Have you finished packing yet?
You have only two options.
You have at least three options.
You have only two options.
You have only three options.
You have three options.
You have three options.
I'd like to hear your opinion.
I'd like to hear your opinion.
My favorite is this one.
My favorite is this one.
Forget about me.
Tom knows all about me.
Who else knew about me?
What didn't you like about me?
What didn't you like about me?
What didn't you like about him?
What didn't you like about him?
What didn't you like about her?
What didn't you like about her?
What do you know about me?
This is my favorite.
What do you know about me, exactly?
What do you know about me, exactly?
It's not size that matters.
What didn't you like about us?
What didn't you like about us?
What didn't you like about them?
What didn't you like about them?
I'm right in the middle of packing my things.
I forgot to call Tom.
I forgot to call Tom.
You were right about them.
You were right about them.
You were right about him.
You were right about him.
You were right about her.
You were right about her.
It turns out you were right about that.
It turns out you were right about that.
You were right about this.
You were right about this.
I was right about you.
I was right about you.
I was right about them.
I was right about him.
I was right about her.
Why don't we talk about you?
Why don't we talk about you?
I don’t want to talk about music.
I don't know what to talk about.
Why don't we talk about this over dinner?
I'm sorry, but I don't want to talk about it.
Let's talk about them.
Let's talk about him.
Let's talk about her.
I believed Tom at first.
We could talk about them.
We could talk about him.
We could talk about her.
Everyone is talking about me.
We wanted to talk about them.
We wanted to talk about him.
We wanted to talk about her.
I'm here to talk about them.
I'm here to talk about him.
I'm here to talk about her.
I'd like to talk about them.
I'd like to talk about him.
I'd like to talk about her.
I want to talk about him.
I want to talk about her.
I came to talk about them.
I came to talk about him.
I came to talk about her.
Are they talking about me?
Are they talking about me?
I'm not sure I know what you're talking about.
I'm not sure I know what you're talking about.
Tom used to be a teacher.
I didn't want to get in trouble.
I don't want to end up in court.
I don't want to talk about this.
He went to Paris at the end of May.
I'm not sure this is a good idea.
They sat in the shade of that big tree.
Let me try to talk to Tom.
Please don't say your birthday is over.
My aunt had three children.
She is fit for the job.
Call the number I gave you.
What about her?
What about her?
What about him?
What about him?
What about them?
What about them?
Tom claimed that he didn't kill anybody.
This looks bad.
Today's your birthday.
Today's your birthday.
Tomorrow's no good.
Try another one.
Try another one.
Try another one.
Try another one.
Try another one.
Try another one.
Try to understand.
Try to understand.
Wait for us.
Wait for us.
Wait until dark.
Wait until dark.
Wait until tonight.
Wait until tonight.
We saw them on TV.
We saw you on TV.
First impressions are important.
Who wrote that song you just sang?
This is simply one of the darkest pages in the history of Argentina!
She helps us.
She helps us.
Tom didn't know what hit him.
We went all out to finish the work before dark.
She did not look happy.
I have an American friend named Tony.
What was it that Tom put into the bag?
Is Tom being charged with a crime?
He stayed out of public life.
We need to leave here at once.
We'll have to talk about that.
I knew you'd want to go with us.
I knew you'd want to go with us.
I knew you'd want to go with us.
I knew you'd want to go with us.
I always wanted to see that play.
I don't want to hit you, Tom.
I forgot to close the window.
Tom said he wanted to marry me.
I honestly can't remember.
We have a problem. "What sort of problem?"
I don't have time to explain it now.
I don't have time to talk to you now.
I don't have time to talk to you now.
I'd like to go but I just don't have the time.
We always treated you well.
We always treated you well.
We met last year.
We went out for three years.
We just met yesterday.
That took thirty minutes.
Explain it to him all you like—he was always a fool and will be one forever.
A car, you say! He can't even afford to buy a sack of onions.
I don't use Facebook.
We waited for you.
We waited for you.
They like to remember old times.
I'm going to make you an offer that you can't refuse.
Which one will he choose?
Which one will he choose?
Which one will he choose?
Which one will he choose?
Which one will he choose?
Which one will he choose?
Which one will they choose?
Which one will they choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will you choose?
Which one will she choose?
Which one will she choose?
Which one will she choose?
Which one will she choose?
Which one will she choose?
Which one will she choose?
Please let me know when we get there.
Please let me know when we get there.
Would you like to go to a movie tonight?
Tom gets up at the same time every morning.
Before we can make a decision, we must have all the facts.
The work is very dangerous.
Do you want to try this?
The principal called and said you weren't at school today.
We're not going anywhere today.
Don't be so silly.
Here's a list of the people who'll be here today.
Tom, I've got to talk to you.
Tom, I've got to talk to you.
Many restaurants are closed today.
Who can I sell it to?
I wonder where she had her photograph taken.
Tom invited me to go with him, but I said I didn't want to.
I didn't know who I should give it to.
It's not me that Tom wants to talk to.
The question is which to choose.
What are you busy with?
What are you busy with?
I'm not quite sure who I should talk to.
Tom has written hundreds of songs.
I drank more than I was planning to.
I drank more than I was planning to.
If you don't want to get married, you don't have to.
The movie starts in thirty minutes.
I know where Tom went last weekend.
Your birthday is the same as mine.
We'll all be dead in thirty years.
We should've listened to you, Tom.
We should've listened to you, Tom.
I left my bag here.
I left my bag here.
That was only a figure of speech.
I knew I had to tell him the truth, but I couldn't bring myself to do it.
Let's meet here again a year from today.
Tom was startled by the noise.
Tom won't even talk to me now.
Tom said I should talk to you.
Tom didn't give it back to me.
Tom doesn't eat meat, does he?
Tom looked very surprised.
It's 8:30.
We work to get money.
You don't help the poor.
I'll call you around five o'clock.
You can go to prison for that.
You can go to prison for that.
Do you think I'm stupid?
Where on earth have you been all this time?
Who are you? I guess you're not from here.
Both her brothers are teachers.
Do you remember this song?
The teacher wrote his name on the blackboard.
Tom drives a Toyota.
They're making a movie.
Tom wouldn't like this movie.
Tom wouldn't like this movie.
I want to start a family.
He was unconscious for three days.
Do you want to be rich?
Do you want to be rich?
Do you want to be rich?
Do you want to be rich?
Are you happy with your weight?
Are you happy with your weight?
Everyone wants silence.
I would like some peace and quiet.
Turn around slowly.
I do like fish.
Maybe we're too late.
I might seem strong, but in actuality I am anything but.
I don't use Facebook.
It's obvious what he's trying to do.
Jenny has a gun.
The situation seemed very tense and dangerous.
Why was money invented?
Tom stopped taking his medicine.
I already put it in my bag!
I go to church every Sunday.
I have so much to say.
Jim drove his car, whistling merrily.
I hope everyone will be here tomorrow.
He died two hours later.
I've never seen such a beautiful flower.
When did she send you her pictures?
This dog runs very fast!
Can they try?
Can you try?
Why is Tom still crying?
I can easily touch my toes.
I've never seen my cat act like that.
We were unable to rescue them.
We were unable to rescue them.
We were unable to rescue him.
We were unable to rescue him.
We were unable to rescue her.
We were unable to rescue her.
I'm sure Tom was awake.
I'm sure Tom was happy.
I'm sure you can do it.
I'm sure you can do it.
I'm sure you knew that.
I'm sure you knew that.
I'm sure you are wrong.
I'm sure you are wrong.
I'm sure Tom knew that.
I enjoy spending time with you.
I enjoy spending time with you.
I enjoy spending time with them.
I enjoy spending time with him.
I think I'll wait here.
I think I'd like some more coffee.
It's pretty common.
I think I'd better call Tom.
I think I smell smoke.
I'm happy, Tom.
It was an interesting dream.
I'll never speak to you again.
I'll never speak to you again.
Tom grew up around here.
Tom grew up around here.
Do you have any idea who did this?
Why is Tom helping us?
Wait in the car, OK?
Wait in the car, OK?
Tom carefully stepped inside.
Tom couldn't take it anymore.
Helping Tom was a mistake.
How are you being treated?
I'm never getting married.
Tom got up from the couch.
Tom dashed out of the room.
I won't accept these gifts.
My cat is white.
How did you find that out?
How did you find that out?
How did he find that out?
How did she find that out?
What's the movie about?
I'm not planning to go anywhere today.
I'm not planning to go anywhere today.
We're going upstairs.
We're going east.
We're going west.
We're coming in.
We're coming in.
We're all afraid.
We're safe now.
We're not dressed.
I thought I'd lost everything.
Do you want to go see a movie?
Do you want to try that again?
Give me everything you've got.
Tom peeked around the corner.
Tom probably didn't hear you.
Tom rushed into the bathroom.
Tom says that he's very busy.
I'm sure you understand that.
I'll come right to the point.
In my place, Tom would've done the same.
I'm here to report a crime.
What were your favorite subjects in school?
What were your favorite subjects in school?
Many Russians have been killed while taking photos of themselves with their phones.
I will pick you up after work.
I found the test difficult.
I have to wake up early tomorrow.
I'm your only hope.
I'm your only hope.
I have nothing to add here.
Who's coming for dinner?
Tell Tom everything that happened here.
Tell Tom everything that happened here.
He made up the history.
I told William, but he didn't believe me.
They ordered the dog to sit.
They ordered the dog to sit.
You have nothing to fear anymore.
You have nothing to fear anymore.
It doesn't exist in nature.
I hope they're all correct.
I know you'll enjoy this book.
I know you'll enjoy this book.
This was an interesting book.
Tom came home early yesterday.
We're hoping for something better.
Why didn't I notice this before?
Who's going to believe us?
She left for Paris at the end of last month.
It's better than the movie.
He was supposed to call her at ten.
Do you know how that looks?
Do you think Tom is unkind?
Do you think you're mature?
We tried to keep it a secret.
You don't have to go, do you?
You don't know that for sure.
Tom put the box in the car.
I was dropped from the baseball team.
Tom thought up a good plan.
My behavior was very odd.
She found the key to my heart.
I've seen the film many times, but I'd like to see it again.
You might at least say thank you.
After a long absence, she returned home.
I won't let this happen.
I like the colour yellow.
We want to go to the cinema.
At least we know Tom is alive.
I know it must be hard to believe.
I don't know why that's hard to believe.
Are we all happy?
Tom looks pleased with himself.
Tom seems very pleased with himself.
Tom is looking very pleased with himself.
Tom's very pleased with himself.
I don't know what they're capable of.
This is totally unexpected.
It was totally unexpected.
I wish I could be as rich as you.
I wish I could be as rich as you.
I wish I'd never met you.
Tom will come by.
Tom will forgive us.
Tom will forgive you.
Tom will forgive you.
Tom will never stop.
Tom will try.
Put the money in the bank.
Are you sure about this, Tom?
This used to belong to Tom.
I'm not sure it's the right decision.
You'll never guess what Tom bought.
You'll never guess what Tom bought.
You'll never guess what Tom bought.
Tom is too busy now to talk to you.
Tom is too busy now to talk to you.
You're the only one I called.
You've known me thirty years.
Are you sure this is the spot?
I don't know what it's called.
I don't think you'd like that.
Tom tried to pull a fast one.
Tom wanted us to talk to you.
We live on the sixth floor.
I didn't believe it myself.
You'd make a good teacher.
We dated for three months.
I know every inch of New York.
Tom is working on another novel.
Tom is writing a novel now.
That's not up to you.
I eat meat three times a week.
Tom said it was fun.
Tom liked Australia.
Is that what you want to talk to me about?
Is that what you want to talk to me about?
There's a lot I want to talk to you about.
There's a lot I want to talk to you about.
Please don't hang up.
Tom closed the book.
The baby was crying.
Sorry, we're closed.
I'm sure about this.
I'm not a good liar.
I'll try to do it.
He was admitted to the club.
This is a new type of car.
I've seen that picture before.
I don't recognize this shirt. Whose is it?
The river is dangerous.
She hit him hard.
I forgot to tell you what to bring.
Keep your eyes closed.
I went to bed early.
I was being serious.
I was almost killed.
How was the meeting?
Tom wrote poems when he was in high school.
What's in your bag?
Tom was afraid to go back home.
I lost my car key.
We were both happy.
She came back in about thirty minutes.
Railroads were built across the west.
You could invite me.
I regret nothing of my life.
Don't let him eat it.
Mom, come with me to the store.
In my opinion he is not fit for the work.
I've never met him, but I recognize him.
I'd like to have tea instead of coffee.
Beauty is the reason of life.
I can't order you to do this.
You've got a sharp eye, Tom.
You've made me look foolish.
I'm sure Tom will like it.
I'm writing another story.
I've been calling all day.
We explained the situation.
Tom came too late.
I need a key to open a box.
I didn't see where you put your car keys.
I didn't see where you put your car keys.
I didn't see where you put your car keys.
I didn't see where you put your car keys.
I drank too much beer yesterday.
I drank too much beer yesterday.
What can we drink?
Tom won't stop drinking.
The teacher granted me permission to go home early.
The teacher granted me permission to go home early.
You drink milk, don't you?
You drink milk, don't you?
Come on Monday afternoon, if possible.
Don't shoot. I'm coming out.
She was raised in the United States of America but her mother tongue is Japanese.
I thought Tom had changed.
I thought Tom had changed.
The room was warm.
I hope that'll change.
I hope that'll change.
Maybe you'd like to drink some tea?
We flew from London to New York.
Let's go by train instead of by bus.
Children are sometimes wild.
We played on the same soccer team.
He sometimes goes to Tokyo on business.
Is your job dangerous?
Is your job dangerous?
What time are we meeting?
I'm sure I'm right.
I'm sure I'm right.
I thought that he had already finished the work.
Dublin is my favorite town.
You can watch television.
You can watch television.
Tom told us an interesting story.
Tom never told me he had a horse.
Tell Tom I'd like to talk to him.
Tell Tom I'd like to talk to him.
Tell me who else is on your list.
Tell me who else is on your list.
Tell me what else is on the list.
Tell me what else is on the list.
I wonder why Tom didn't tell you.
I wonder why Tom didn't tell you.
Are you sure you're sick?
Are you sure you're sick?
Do you like the song Stayin' Alive?
Do you like the song Stayin' Alive?
I wish I had a million dollars.
Are you telling me it's my fault?
Are you telling me it's my fault?
I don't care whichever you choose.
I am going to send my son to college.
You got lucky today.
I guess it's true.
He was sent to Guantanamo.
Which university do you think Ted will go to?
You told me you knew how to do it.
You told me you knew how to do it.
We'll talk again.
Are you on the committee?
I feel just fine.
I'm sure Tom is wrong.
Tom has told us so much about you.
Tom has told us so much about you.
Tom has told me so much about you.
Tom has told me so much about you.
Read this in the evening!
I told Tom to check the oil level.
I promised I'd tell you the truth.
I promised I'd tell you the truth.
It's really different from what I expected.
It was worth a try.
Why don't you just calm down?
Why don't you just calm down?
Tom built his own house.
Prove it to me.
Prove it to me.
This conclusively decided the matter.
I want to be able to speak Cantonese.
How's that different from the way we've been doing it?
Is this serious?
Tom lost his son in a car accident.
Xueyou is looking at the new pictures Renmei took in Beijing.
If I take the train today, tomorrow I'll already be in Beijing.
Get in the car immediately.
I can't prove it.
I can't prove it.
I'll meet you tomorrow.
Life begins at forty.
Tom, are you downstairs?
Tom hates Halloween.
They hate Halloween.
Why aren't we helping Tom?
Wolfgang switched to German.
Tom switched to English.
Alexandra switched to Russian.
Why did you do this to me?
She is above telling a lie.
That's a cute costume.
Friends are very important.
I kiss my child a hundred times a day.
I'm sorry if I snapped at you.
Don't play with that key!
He is suited for police work.
Let go of my hand.
She lost interest in her work.
I told her to sit down and drink a glass of water.
I met Mattias in Spain.
You're told to go.
It was Tom who found your keys.
Tom switched to French.
The sun is a medium-sized star.
Turn right.
I've got sand in my hair.
I have long blonde hair.
How tall is Tom?
Tom isn't busy now.
Tom will like this.
Tom can wait here.
It belongs to Tom.
Call me on Monday.
Call me on Monday.
Who did Tom marry?
Tom would've liked it.
I called Tom first.
The forest is burning.
I'll keep it secret.
I heard Tom singing.
I almost got caught.
Tom is clearly busy.
Tom is bothering me.
Since spring, she has been the president of the country.
How tall is Tom?
Is that the map that Tom gave you?
Is that the map that Tom gave you?
There are also people who like spring better than autumn.
Tom was absolutely correct.
We used to watch movies together.
I'll repeat the most important ideas.
Tom wore black jeans and a white T-shirt.
I don't know whether Tom is busy or not.
We have a lot more in common than I realized.
We have a lot more in common than I realized.
I have a little present for you.
I have a little present for you.
I cry every time I listen to this song.
I have to go to the bank today.
Prices went up.
My bag is very heavy.
While he found math difficult, he found talking to girls even more so.
I love the color of Nicki Minaj's hair.
You have to admit first your fault before I'll forgive you.
Tom is early.
I call Tom a lot.
Tom got here late.
Tom is back early.
Tom got here early.
Tom is early again.
Tom isn't finished.
Tom belongs in jail.
No one believed that.
Tom didn't invite me.
I decided to call Tom.
We heard this song before.
I don't smoke now, but I used to.
It's a question of personal taste.
I think a film is more interesting than any book.
He confessed that he was guilty.
Everyone has their own opinion.
I almost never lie.
I'm sorry. I wish I could take back what I said.
The job will take a minimum of ten days.
Don't let Tom do that.
He used to smoke, but now he doesn't.
Tom wanted to finish by 2:30.
Tom isn't dressed yet.
Don't let Tom watch TV.
Tom didn't have to lie.
Tom claims he was busy.
Tom can't ride a horse.
Tom can't ride a horse.
Tom is as tall as I am.
Tom asked me if I wanted to go to a movie with him.
Tom will have to leave.
Don't open that box yet.
Don't open that box yet.
Does this belong to Tom?
Both sides are to blame.
I called Tom right away.
I wonder where Tom went.
Tom could've invited me.
Tom could've invited me.
Tom didn't want to sing.
Tom is coming next week.
Tom works in a hospital.
Tom will never catch me.
Tom will leave tomorrow.
Do you eat a lot of fish?
Do you eat a lot of fish?
I hope that will change soon.
Tom can wait for me here.
Tom decided to turn back.
Tom has always helped me.
Tom doesn't wear a watch.
Tom doesn't wear a watch.
Tom doesn't look so busy.
Tom is a really bad liar.
We can't be sure of that.
Why hasn't Tom called me?
How often do you call Tom?
How often do you call Tom?
Could it have been murder?
Could it have been murder?
Breathe through your nose.
Breathe through your nose.
Breathe through your nose.
Breathe through your nose.
I've never heard Tom sing.
I've never heard Tom sing.
Tom can't make me do that.
Tom didn't help me at all.
Tom could've talked to me.
Tom could've talked to me.
Tom doesn't look so happy.
Tom is a very good singer.
Tom has recently lost his job.
Tom is helping his father.
Tom is busy all day today.
What song was Tom singing?
What song was Tom singing?
We'll be back before dark.
Tom would be very pleased.
Are you a Canadian citizen?
Are you a Canadian citizen?
No one has called me today.
I wonder who that could be.
The exact cause is unknown.
Please read this carefully.
Please read this carefully.
Things could be much worse.
Tom does that all the time.
Tom doesn't smoke, does he?
Tom has accepted our offer.
Tom said I could wait here.
Tom was listening to music.
Do you believe these rumors?
Do you believe these rumors?
Why did the prices go down?
I think you know exactly what I'm talking about.
I think you know exactly what I'm talking about.
Don't pay attention to them.
Don't pay attention to them.
Do you think Tom would help?
Do you think Tom would help?
I know this is my own fault.
I can't believe it happened.
I think no one believed Tom.
Listen to me very carefully.
Listen to me very carefully.
Tell Tom to quit doing that.
They're not going to change.
There's blood on this knife.
The movie has already begun.
Tom can't go anywhere today.
This isn't likely to change.
I've never hit a woman.
Are you going to call Tom or do you want me to?
Kids learn quickly.
I could run quite a bit faster when I was young.
Tom will need to do that sooner or later.
The situation could get ugly.
We found a corpse in the ruins.
Why are you so sure Tom is wrong?
This sentence is not in Polish.
I yearn for victory.
Stay down!
Tom doesn't need your advice.
Tom would never allow that.
Tom is looking for his cat.
Where did Tom meet his wife?
We didn't go out last night.
We didn't go out last night.
Let's wait till Tom wakes up.
It's not too late to do that.
I've always hated that color.
He's aware of his own faults.
You're almost as tall as Tom.
You're almost as tall as Tom.
I'll call.
I'd leave.
I'm safe.
I'm glad I've finally caught you.
I'm glad I've finally caught you.
I called home.
I feel safe.
I checked everywhere.
I wonder what this could mean.
I like our new French teacher.
I like our new French teacher.
Tom always gets what he wants.
Tom always gets what he wants.
Tom didn't want to go with us.
Don't let Tom answer the phone.
Tom removed his wet socks.
This may take some time.
He walked along the river.
My family is wealthy.
I didn't expect her to ask me such a question.
Tom was here recently.
Tom answered the first question on the list.
Can you help me with my French?
Can you help me with my French?
My life has changed completely.
Should I wait?
Should I close?
I guess so.
I was happy then.
I was happy then.
Things have changed since then.
Tom will never allow you to go.
Tom will never allow you to go.
Tom will never allow you to go.
Tom will never allow you to go.
Tom will wait for us, won't he?
Eat your soup while it is hot.
Tom used the F word.
I wonder what's inside the box.
Do you like this flower?
Do you like this flower?
The bus left early.
This flower is yellow and the others are blue.
Not much has changed since then.
Let's hope Tom doesn't find out.
Tom could've talked to me first.
Tom could've talked to me first.
Tom is expected to come by 2:30.
Tom has nothing to be afraid of.
Tom doesn't want me to help you.
Tom doesn't want me to help you.
I'm reading a book on American history.
Tom began to cry again.
Tom is smaller than me.
Tom looks half his age.
Tom looks half his age.
Tom must be very happy.
Tom still writes poems.
Tom still writes poems.
Apparently, not much has changed.
I often help Tom do his homework.
Death solves all problems — no man, no problem.
You and I will run.
Let's listen to her story.
They will run.
This group will run.
I'd rather stay home and watch TV.
Poor old Tom.
I love movies with happy endings.
Tom doesn't have to get up early.
Tom hasn't left the building yet.
Tom hasn't seen this picture yet.
How did we come here?
I wish I had your energy.
Several thousand people became victims of this disease.
I'm not sure you're ready.
I'm not sure you're ready.
I'm not sure you're ready.
I'm not sure if Tom is ready.
I'm not sure Tom is ready.
I'm not sure you're ready.
I'm not sure you're ready.
I'm not sure you're ready.
My birthday is in October.
I'll wait until October.
Tom went upstairs again.
I just started crying.
We like to listen to birds singing.
We bought Tom a birthday present.
Try breathing through your mouth.
Try breathing through your mouth.
Everything was supposed to change.
We'll meet you there.
Don't let anyone open the windows.
The noise gradually became louder.
Don't you know cheese is made from milk?
I'm looking for a present for Tom.
I'm clearly doing something wrong.
Unfortunately, help came too late.
I like watching people.
I like this film.
I go to school.
Do you like music?
Tom should have his eyes examined.
Is this the key you're looking for?
Is this the key you're looking for?
Is this the key you're looking for?
I was brought here against my will.
I don't think anything's going to change.
These shirts are all the same size.
Tom has already drunk all the milk.
We became best friends immediately.
Tom probably doesn't know who I am.
A lot has changed since I was a kid.
You didn't tell me Tom was so rich.
You didn't tell me Tom was so rich.
Your troubles are just beginning.
I helped Tom even though I was busy.
I don't get up as early as Tom does.
These shirts are both the same size.
Tom looked alarmed.
I'm not here to help you.
He tried to catch the bird, but couldn't.
They chose Peter as captain.
I wish I were as rich as he.
It is important to help each other.
You had better do as I suggest.
Tom passed away last winter after a long battle with Alzheimer's disease.
When are you going to leave for London?
Is Tom in trouble?
I was born in the year that Grandfather died.
What's your favorite German folk song?
I won't ever make that mistake again.
Whose paper is this?
I'm not so sure Tom is wrong.
My father has recently come back to Japan.
I don't know whether Tom is happy or not.
My car is red.
Tom doesn't know very much about me.
Tom has done so much for us already.
Tom wrote that song three years ago.
I'd like a quote on the following.
That child is impossible.
Are you sure Tom will let us do that?
Are you sure Tom will let us do that?
Apparently, Tom used to be a teacher.
You promised me that you would help.
You promised me that you would help.
He has a lot of foreign stamps.
Tom is between twenty and thirty years old.
It's impossible to work in such circumstances.
He wrote to his daughter's husband.
I didn't think that Tom was that old.
I didn't think that Tom was that old.
This building was named in his honor.
She spoke with tears in her eyes.
Have you forgiven me?
Have you forgiven me?
Were you addressing me?
Were you addressing me?
Why are you helping me?
Why are you helping me?
Why are you calling me?
Why are you calling me?
Tom is dressed very nicely.
You can't force me to marry you.
He lost his eyesight when he was still a child.
I spent my childhood in Pakistan.
Are you talking about me?
Are you talking about me?
Are you talking about me?
We gave up the plan.
Many young men went to war.
Of the Dravidian languages, Telugu, Tamil, Kannada, and Malayalam have the most speakers.
It's a Hindi movie.
I'll call Tom when I get there.
I made a stupid mistake.
Do you think Tom was drunk?
Is the hotel far from here?
Should we wait here?
Did you really go there?
Did you really go there?
Will you call me when you get there?
Will you call me when you get there?
Why is Tom so late?
Why do we have to go to that meeting?
Why are we helping Tom?
Don't you think Tom looks like an old man?
Do you think Tom looks like an old man?
What's it called again?
What's it called again?
What's it called again?
What's it called again?
She doesn't like fish.
And who asked for your opinion?
Who asked your opinion?
I could hardly close the suitcase.
Tom does that a lot better than I do.
Tom already knows my opinion.
I would've waited.
I'll read it.
I'll read it.
I'll read it.
I'll prove it.
I'll never leave.
I'll come by.
I'll go and check.
I'll forgive you.
I'm going to forgive you.
I'll send flowers.
I'm being used.
You didn't tell me Tom was busy.
You didn't tell me Tom was busy.
I wasn't being serious.
I should've called.
I should've called.
I don't date.
I didn't cry.
I didn't call.
I'm too busy.
I'm too busy.
I'm perfectly happy.
I wanted to leave.
I don't want to get up!
Spring is late this year.
I'm sure Tom wouldn't let that happen.
I found myself thinking he might be right.
You might want to go.
Call Tom and see what he thinks.
Please leave me alone. I am busy.
As you treat me, so will I treat you.
Tom is always asking stupid questions.
If you wish me to weep, you yourself must first feel grief.
I would hate to have a disease named after me.
She asked him to stay, but he didn't want to.
What a beautiful bird!
My aunt is coming to Tokyo tomorrow.
Tom couldn't come because he was busy.
Who's the richest person in Australia?
When was the last time you helped Tom?
When was the last time you helped Tom?
When was the last time you called Tom?
When was the last time you called Tom?
Does Tom want to see the movie with us?
I want to talk to her first.
You can take a break.
Tom asked for my opinion.
I'm glad you're happy.
Tom is unnecessary.
What a cute cat!
Born in better times, he would have become famous.
The boy grew up to be a famous scientist.
I'll give you a little tip.
What is your grandfather's name?
I hope that you'll help me.
I hope that you'll help me.
Who's going to believe them?
There were 30 guests.
Well, we are not in a hurry.
I awoke to find myself in a strange room.
The movie was more interesting than I expected.
Tom came at me with a knife in his hand.
Tom is silly.
This dog saved that little girl's life.
My cheeks burn.
I think that Tom has made a good decision.
I'm not so sure Tom is right.
I used to be rich.
What did you tell them about me?
What did you tell them about me?
What did you tell him about me?
What did you tell him about me?
What did you tell her about me?
What did you tell her about me?
I don't want to get up.
We want to see the king.
We want to see the king.
I didn't like being kept waiting so long.
Tom checked the list.
Tom always wears dark clothes.
I asked her if she knew his address.
I asked him if he knew her address.
Why does Tom want to be a teacher?
There are three options.
Tom says he hasn't seen that movie yet.
Tom says he hasn't seen that movie yet.
Tom lives in my building.
I never noticed that.
That gives me hope.
What is the tallest building in Japan?
I'm not sure I can help you.
Deal with this.
Deal with this.
Please give me back my pen.
Tom never cried.
You can lead a horse to water, but you can't make it drink.
Are you sure you don't want me to help?
Are you sure you don't want me to help?
Are you sure you don't want me to help?
Tom is an adult now.
I'm still not sure who they are.
I hope Tom understands.
I hope Tom understands.
Tom refused to leave.
We all have our orders.
Everything is so strange.
Did you catch the train?
You have been chosen.
You have been chosen.
How the hell did you get here first?
When I was your age, I had a boyfriend.
You should call Tom as soon as possible.
You should call Tom as soon as possible.
Tom was talking in his sleep last night.
Don't come any closer.
I invited my friend to dinner.
He is lying on the grass.
We have to wake up.
I'm glad you stopped by.
You don't look too busy.
Tom keeps telling everyone how rich he is.
You don't have to say that.
I thought I'd never be happy again.
They're on good terms with their neighbors.
She sang well as a child.
What music should we play?
Why is he busy?
Our store hours are from 10 to 7.
I hope Tom didn't tell anybody I was here.
I've never smoked.
The population of Japan is larger than that of New Zealand.
I heard that you're taking French lessons.
I heard that you're taking French lessons.
Unfortunately the store was closed.
Don't sit too close to the TV.
It's a completely different situation now.
Tom said that he didn't know how to do it.
What does Tom want to be when he grows up?
Tom looked into the box.
I know a good restaurant not far from here.
Sooner or later, Tom will tell me everything.
I have chosen you!
Have you seen my pen?
Have you seen my pen?
I had a crush on you when we were in high school.
How can we prove that?
Tom needs clothes.
It's a lovely idea.
Tom didn't look too surprised.
Don't be so sure.
I'll try to find out where it is.
I need to get to the bottom of this.
Are you a journalist?
Tom should be here within fifteen minutes.
I hope Tom hasn't already drunk all the milk.
I hope Tom doesn't have to work this weekend.
Tom doesn't usually watch this kind of movie.
Tom is always forgetting his own phone number.
Tom is always forgetting his own phone number.
Unfortunately, the ambulance arrived too late.
Translate the following sentences into French.
If Tom hadn't invited me, I wouldn't have come.
Why did you call me?
Why did you call me?
I think Tom would've come if you'd invited him.
I think Tom would've come if you'd invited him.
Tom doesn't have to sing if he doesn't want to.
Tom doesn't have to help if he doesn't want to.
Tom is rich enough to buy whatever he wants.
I have chosen you!
What direction is east?
What direction is east?
I'm pretty sure that Tom won't agree to do that.
Don't talk to the bus driver while he's driving.
Did you really expect Tom to tell you the truth?
Tom is going to have to do that sooner or later.
Tom asked if I wanted to go to a movie with him.
I hope Tom didn't tell anybody about what we did.
Tom doesn't have to help us if he doesn't want to.
What on earth are you doing in my room?
I told Tom that he should try to do it by himself.
I just want to sit in a corner and cry.
Tell them to leave me alone.
Tom can explain the situation.
Tom doesn't have to go there if he doesn't want to.
Such problems are to be expected.
We read about that in class.
Tom didn't have any idea what he should do.
We should determine what is to be done first.
I'll never forget this experience.
You didn't buy that story, did you?
I tried to phone you.
This is my daughter's school.
I swept the kitchen floor.
Tom tried to get up, but he couldn't.
I'll try to be there by 2:30.
The trees by the road were chopped down.
I'll leave tomorrow, weather permitting.
What's the third choice?
Tom has been living here since he was a kid.
Tom doesn't know his neighbors.
The slave carries the water.
When was the last time you helped Tom do his homework?
Who will you believe?
Who will you believe?
The shops are closed.
They wouldn't have come here if Tom hadn't invited them.
I get the feeling that Tom doesn't know what he's doing.
I have simply nothing to say about it.
He bought the land for the purpose of building his house on it.
Six of them are burning.
Why do you want to leave?
I spent my childhood in Pakistan.
Sooner or later, Tom will tell me everything I want to know.
Tom didn't want to get married, but his parents forced him to.
You must never forget that.
You must never forget that.
Never forget who you are!
Never forget who you are!
Tom has been in the hospital for three weeks.
That's our planet.
Do you still have my key?
Do you still have my key?
Could you please give me back my key?
Could you please give me back my key?
Tom, how old were you when you left Australia?
Tom, how old were you when you left Australia?
Tom came home early yesterday.
He sent flowers to his mother.
Tom left at four in the morning.
I just want to disappear.
No matter what happens, don't forget to smile.
No matter what happens, don't forget to smile.
No matter what happens, don't forget to smile.
No matter what happens, don't forget to smile.
This dog runs fast.
He is returning to this city.
If only it would stop raining!
Did you forget to do your homework?
Did you forget to do your homework?
Which do you like better, spring or fall?
Which do you like better, spring or fall?
Rich parents for everyone!
We're closed today.
I'm busy, so I can't help.
I'm not from a rich family.
Tom tried to do it.
Tom doesn't regret what he did.
Just breathe normally.
It's a possible story.
He and I are teachers.
It's now time to act.
Tom accepted the gift.
She didn't drink the milk.
Tom is short and fat.
This really is something.
What a lovely gift!
What else would you add?
What else would you add?
Children learn by example.
She has invited you all.
Tom was allowed to stay.
You asked for my advice.
You asked for my advice.
People ask me that all the time.
I don't have your address.
He says you're lying.
He says you're lying.
Where's the map?
There is a street in Copenhagen with a very strange name.
Sometimes, the cure is worse than the disease.
I'd like to be as rich as him.
Won't Tom be busy tomorrow?
How long do you think it takes to go from here to Tokyo?
How long do you think it takes to go from here to Tokyo?
Tom didn't answer his phone.
Tom didn't answer his phone.
Say it again, please.
That explains it.
Well, that explains it.
Tom rejected all of my ideas.
Tom told everyone to sit down.
Thank you for a nice day.
Tom didn't explain it very well.
I found the keys.
I found the keys.
Take a look in there.
Go ahead, try it now.
You always lie to me.
Tom asked what was in the box.
Oh, that. That explains it.
I can understand many foreign languages, but I speak them poorly or not at all.
I'm going to make some calls.
Tom wasn't poor.
Tom didn't understand your joke.
That's an order that I can't give.
I honestly don't care.
The first step is the most important step.
Women today drink as much as men.
I'm glad you called me.
I'm glad you called me.
I'm glad you called me.
I'm glad you called me.
I'm glad you called me.
I'm glad you called me.
Nobody ever helped me.
You look as healthy as ever.
I'd like you to meet him.
I'd like you to meet him.
I'd like you to meet him.
I'd like you to meet him.
I'd like you to meet him.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet her.
I'd like you to meet my husband.
I'd like you to meet my husband.
Do you feel like having a drink?
Tom is a silly man.
It'll get warmer soon.
We moved pretty quickly.
We thought it was hilarious.
I don't want to get into trouble.
I wonder if he's really sick.
Tom refused to answer questions.
The girl seems to be rich.
Now you've given yourself away.
Fresh air is necessary to good health.
You should've come by train.
You should've come by train.
You should've come by train.
Ahmed is a student.
Tom was the last person to leave.
Tom used to live at that address.
I can't even begin to comprehend why somebody would do something like this.
He went back to the store.
He went back to the store.
It's her fifth birthday tomorrow.
Is there a treatment?
Altogether, it was a success.
I've never woken up this early.
Only you can carry the bag.
I'm happier than you.
I'm happier than you.
Leave it alone!
We talked late into the night.
He got used to the work.
That's why I'm happy.
Have you already met?
Something unexpected has happened.
Something unexpected has happened.
How can you become happy? By making others happy.
Look at this large map of America.
That's the car I'm going to buy.
I've been really lucky.
I'm sorry, did I do something wrong?
I won't let anyone push me around.
Lots of famous people come here.
I sent her a note.
You do not necessarily have to go there yourself.
I sent her a note.
What kind of pet do you want?
He took out a piece of paper.
Would you please not smoke in this room?
He will either come or call me.
I think Tom wants more.
He confessed his crime frankly.
He'll do his best to finish the job.
I can't explain the reason for his conduct.
Is the capital city of Russia not Moscow?
Is the capital city of Russia not Moscow?
When was the last time you heard French being spoken?
Any student can solve this problem.
We added hundreds of sentences.
Where is the store?
Where is the store?
It's important to teach children good table manners.
Tom is very sophisticated.
Tom is very sophisticated.
Tom tried to do it, but he couldn't.
We are buying movie tickets.
Let's get together again!
The women stopped working.
You always pick her side.
I can't study with you watching me.
We must act at once.
Sorry, my mind was elsewhere.
Sorry, my mind was elsewhere.
I was wrong about you.
Could you tell me how to get to the subway station?
This is Lucia's pen.
Tom offered you a job, right?
I like helping people.
Is Tom in on this?
Tom doesn't look very strong.
I feel like I'm always being watched.
Even if I were rich, I wouldn't give money to him.
Tom refused to give it to me.
The horse is white.
By the way, what's your address?
He left three days ago.
I just want someone to talk to.
Don't believe people who claim that they know everything.
Don't believe people who claim that they know everything.
It took little more than an hour.
He is practically dead.
These flowers are not only beautiful but also fragrant.
My aunt is from Somalia. She is Somalian.
They ate in silence.
Tom wants to spend more time with his family.
There's something we have to talk about.
I'm not going to abandon you.
I forgot my key.
Tom wasn't sure if he could do it or not.
Tom called 911.
Why isn't the ship moving?
His paper is better than mine.
I wouldn't mind a drink.
This dress is cheaper than yours.
Indeed this car is small, but it is powerful.
A teacher should never laugh at his students' mistakes.
What do you have in the box?
What do you have in the box?
I was very impressed by his story.
Truth is more important than beauty.
Prices have been gradually rising in recent years.
Did you have fun?
He is said to be very poor.
I'll give you five minutes to work out this problem.
In the summer, I wear short-sleeve shirts.
Tom doesn't ever want to get married.
What you're asking us to do is impossible.
What you're asking us to do is impossible.
This letter is personal, and I don't want anyone else to read it.
What size do you wear?
I ran into an old friend three days ago.
I don't think it's that bad.
My father lost his work.
That’s the man whose wife died.
When will that new school open?
I've heard that Tom asked you to marry him.
His wish was to go to America.
I made his son a new suit.
My aunt treats me as if I were a child.
I'm not going to lie.
Do you want to try again?
I can see you're in a good mood.
I had an operation last summer.
I don't have a TV.
I can verify that.
I'm terrified.
Tom is in a very good mood.
I don't think you should get married.
Who are they talking to?
Sorry for not contacting you recently.
We don't trust the government.
Why does Tom want to talk to me?
I gave her all my money.
I gave her all my money.
He's still sponging off his father.
I hope you like spicy food.
Please tell me which bus to take to go downtown.
It was apparent that he did not understand what I had said.
Let's go listen.
Is the bird alive or dead?
Is the bird alive or dead?
Tom waited for us.
Tom is afraid of making mistakes.
I'd like to be as rich as Tom is.
Who else uses it?
Who else uses it?
Who else uses it?
I wonder if it's stopped raining. "I hope so."
Most people understand this.
At least we should try.
He got married in Nicaragua.
How would you translate this?
How would you translate it?
How would you translate it?
How would you translate it?
How would you translate it?
Tom is as tall as Jim.
Tom and Jim are the same height.
Those were difficult times.
Some topics are timeless.
I called her from the hospital.
I called him from the hospital.
I called them from the hospital.
I called her today.
I called him today.
I called them today.
I called her yesterday.
I called him yesterday.
I called them yesterday.
I called you yesterday.
I called you yesterday.
Someone called her.
Someone called her.
Someone called him.
Someone called him.
Someone called them.
Someone called them.
I haven't called her yet.
I haven't called him yet.
I haven't called them yet.
You should've called her.
You should've called her.
You should've called him.
You should've called him.
You should've called them.
You should've called them.
You should've called us.
You should've called us.
Did you call her?
Did you call her?
Have you called her?
Have you called her?
Have you called him?
Have you called him?
Have you called them?
Have you called them?
Have you called them?
Have you called them?
I didn't feel like calling her.
I didn't feel like calling them.
I didn't feel like calling you.
I didn't feel like calling you.
I'm calling her.
I'm calling him.
I'm calling them.
Let's try calling her.
Let's try calling him.
Let's try calling them.
Why are you calling her?
Why are you calling her?
Why are you calling him?
Why are you calling him?
Why are you calling them?
Why are you calling them?
Why are you calling us?
Why are you calling us?
We'll catch her.
We'll catch him.
We'll capture them.
You said we'd never catch her.
You said we'd never catch her.
You said we'd never catch him.
You said we'd never catch him.
You said we'd never catch them.
You said we'd never catch them.
We'll never catch her.
We'll never catch him.
We'll never catch them.
I caught her.
I caught him.
I caught them.
They never caught her.
They never caught him.
We never caught them.
I heard they caught her.
I heard they caught him.
I heard they caught them.
They caught her.
They caught him.
We've caught them.
We caught her.
We caught him.
I'm the one who caught her.
I'm the one who caught him.
I'm the one who caught them.
I wonder why they chose her.
I wonder why they chose him.
I wonder why they chose them.
You have strange tastes.
You have strange tastes.
Tom is the teacher.
Talk to your friends.
Talk to your friends.
Tom chose the colors.
Talk to your boss.
Talk to your boss.
Everybody was surprised.
We were very surprised.
Even Tom was surprised.
No one was surprised.
You'll be surprised.
You'll be surprised.
They were surprised.
I thought you didn't want to talk to us.
Why were you so surprised?
Why were you so surprised?
We wish Tom success.
School starts Monday.
I can do anything I want.
The movie has already started.
Is the milk good?
What was Tom singing?
The idea was simple.
Three workers died.
Tom said it was his fault.
It's a war crime.
The movie ran 85 minutes.
Why didn't you call me last night?
Why didn't you call me last night?
Everyone was quite satisfied.
Tom had no idea that the police were watching his every move.
Let me try again.
This book is the most interesting.
She has no more than fifteen dollars.
Did you ring the bell?
Did you ring the bell?
Should we ring the bell?
His voice sounds better than yours.
Her voice sounds better than yours.
Why should Tom return?
Tom returns Monday.
He's at church right now.
Poor Tom!
Most schools are closed today.
I'm beginning to regret it.
Is the milk good?
I have no idea, she said honestly.
Most snakes on this island are harmless.
The reason is that I want to be an English teacher.
These photos have come out very well.
What's your favorite day?
Tom said I was the only one who believed him.
Please tell Tom that I called.
Please tell Tom that I called.
We have refused.
Read the article again.
Read the article again.
Tom never reached Australia.
Tom rejected this proposal.
Tom promised to return.
History has proven that.
Prices are too high.
Are we that predictable?
Send us your photos.
Send us your photos.
Send us the photos.
Send us the photos.
I'm not in a good mood either.
Where are the photos?
Thanks for the photo.
The bank is open.
The gate opened.
Is this normal behavior?
I love music, too.
Welcome to our house.
I could cry for joy.
I could cry for joy.
Do you have time for one more question?
This cat is as big as that one.
When I feel fine, I go for a walk.
Why won't you leave me alone?
Why don't you leave me alone?
It looks fun. Why don't we try it?
If there's a way to tell whether or not a girl has a boyfriend, please tell me.
He refused to inform them.
If he knew her phone number, he could call her.
Girls notice that kind of thing.
She ended up in the hospital.
He wants a serious relationship.
Tom looked discouraged.
We needed a win.
Tom needed surgery.
I can't promise Tom won't be back.
Don't call again.
School begins at 9.
Here's what I think happened.
I wonder where Tom could've gone.
This is Mike speaking. May I speak to Hiroshi, please?
I'm sure he'll go.
I'm sure he'll go.
What's the name of the song that Tom was singing?
There were no mistakes.
The weather stayed cold for three weeks.
How many books have you read so far this summer?
There's just too few hours in the day.
That's a huge mistake.
It wasn't a mistake.
It wasn't a mistake.
That was our mistake.
Do you believe in eternal life after death?
Is there a TV in the room?
There aren't as many trains at night.
I'm not sure he wants to talk to me.
Where is the nearest internet cafe?
Your memory is fine.
Your memory is fine.
Your vote matters.
Your vote matters.
This is a dog that resembles a horse.
Tom never remarried.
Your opinion matters.
Your opinion matters.
Your opinion matters.
Your opinion matters.
That hardly mattered.
That hardly mattered.
Nothing else matters.
I'm going to write them a note.
We make mistakes.
We make mistakes.
We can see a lot of stars at night in summer.
Please eat only soft foods.
Driving for one and a half hours to get to work is a bear.
Sometimes, knowing the truth hurts a lot.
This book isn't as interesting as that book.
I'm glad you didn't call us.
Is there a shorter road to get there?
How can you say something like that?
It doesn't matter either way.
You've got to face the facts.
That's a horse of another colour.
Dating him was probably a bad idea.
Dating him is probably a bad idea.
Is Tom dating someone?
Tom is average height.
Tom is unlikely to want to go.
Many people lost their jobs.
People are losing their jobs.
Look at that bird.
Look at that bird.
Tom looked scared.
Tom looks very pale.
It took too long.
This kind of thing usually takes a long time.
The boys listened attentively.
Everybody liked that.
They like the idea.
Let's talk about somebody else.
Tom left about thirty minutes ago.
Tom left about thirty minutes ago.
I must talk to you about what needs to be done.
Learn from your mistakes.
Learn from your mistakes.
Some people never learn.
Children learn from adults.
Nobody laughed.
Tom suddenly stopped laughing.
Who knows for sure?
Tom would certainly know.
Nobody was killed.
Three people were killed.
Three were killed.
We were all so happy.
Was Tom on your team?
Was Tom on your team?
Was Tom on your team?
Wait for your sister.
Wait for your sister.
Both policemen were killed.
We're not that close.
Welcome to our house.
All three died.
One person was killed.
One man was killed.
She is said to be in hospital now.
I hear that she's in the hospital now.
Now, this is interesting.
That was pretty interesting.
I think a part-time job is a good experience.
Nobody ever helps me.
They believed Tom.
He's eager to speak to you.
I told you Tom was dangerous.
I told you Tom was dangerous.
I told you Tom was dangerous.
I told you Tom was dangerous.
Don't forget to return my pen.
You have to speak only English.
I can do my job without your help.
I can do my job without your help.
If you have a problem with that, we should talk about it.
No matter how long it takes, I will finish the job.
I don't know how can you stand that guy.
May I call at around 2:30?
Please turn right.
Liisa came too late.
Please wait until 3:00. She'll be back then.
Please wait until 3:00. She'll be back then.
I need cigarettes.
Please be seated, ladies and gentlemen.
Tom calls his mother three or four times a week.
Tom was badly injured.
We were impressed.
Tom is the richest person I know.
We have respect for our teacher.
The teacher talked on and on.
Allow me to introduce my wife to you.
I'd like to have a little talk with you.
I'd like to have a little talk with you.
They want me to sell the restaurant.
I should've called first.
I couldn't leave you alone to face the danger by yourself.
Read the text carefully, then answer the questions.
I'm shooting.
Dan wants me to stop writing.
Is there an easier way to do this?
Is there an easier way to do this?
Is there an easier way to do this?
The flowers were very beautiful to look at.
Her mother is not aware of her illness.
Tom doesn't need to come so early next time.
The boat was clean.
I've only got fifteen minutes.
I study about two hours every day.
We work at the same hospital.
They asked us for advice.
When does the performance begin?
Let me tell you about what happened.
You should never ask a woman how old she is.
Tom was walking towards the station when I saw him.
Tom was walking towards the station when I saw him.
He will catch you.
He will catch you.
I know this area.
I waited a month.
Tom talked to me.
Is this my fault?
I miss your smile.
They made me wait.
I know my daughter.
I made a statement.
I wasn't surprised.
Don't laugh with your mouth open.
Don't laugh with your mouth open.
They help each other.
They help each other.
I'll be back late.
Who should I talk to?
I have three daughters.
I was absolutely right.
It's going to take all day.
I told Tom to calm down.
Tom owes me thirty dollars.
I've already seen this movie.
Tom wasn't the only victim.
I thought Tom was happy here.
I like listening to you sing.
I like listening to you sing.
Stop looking at me like that.
Stop looking at me like that.
I have my feet firmly planted on the ground.
This is one of my favorite songs.
Recently I started smoking again.
The higher we go up, the cooler the air becomes.
I've been waiting for you to wake up.
I've been waiting for you to wake up.
How long does it take to reach Okinawa?
I've never made this kind of mistake before.
He asked for a cigarette.
Tom didn't want to talk about it anymore.
I think you should call him.
I think you should call him.
I think you should call him.
She gave a cat some milk.
He has a pain in his side.
She stopped singing the song.
Who's that cute guy I saw you with yesterday?
He gets up at 8 a.m. every morning.
Somebody has been sleeping on this sofa.
I went to church with him.
The higher we climb, the colder it becomes.
Even though Tom is my neighbor, I don't know him very well.
It goes without saying that time is money.
I think the box is empty.
Call the fire department!
I know some dirty jokes, but I never tell them.
Keep me apprised of any further developments.
Is it serious, Doctor?
I go jogging almost every morning.
Her sons have gone to Tokyo.
What a lovely day it is today!
I'm in the same boat.
I'm in the same boat.
I'm in the same boat.
Not all the students are against the plan.
What color do you think she likes?
She hit him.
She guessed.
She called for help.
She lowered her gaze.
She made a scene.
She's her daughter.
Does he have experience?
Does she have experience?
Do you have experience?
Remove your shirt and lie down.
That sounds hopeful.
Maybe there is hope.
I hope that you aren't serious.
I hope that you aren't serious.
He began to feel afraid.
Let's wait till he comes back.
Tom helps me a lot.
I hope it helps.
Tom often helped us.
Should I help Tom with his homework?
We heard three shots.
We heard three shots.
I don't know what it sounds like.
He didn't believe the rumor.
I want to talk seriously with you.
I want to talk seriously with you.
I cried reading this book.
Hopefully, that won't happen.
That isn't likely to happen in my lifetime.
Tom is gone forever.
Nobody is going anywhere.
Tom came over to my house for dinner yesterday.
Who should I give this to?
He won't leave me alone.
If you have ever visited Rome, you must have seen the Coliseum.
I know you'll enjoy that movie.
I know you'll enjoy that movie.
Next time I see this sentence, I will translate it.
I'll call her tomorrow.
Lincoln liked this plan.
I wonder where she lives.
Even if I were rich, I wouldn't give him money.
Could you send me a photo of you?
As for me, I'm a rather simple person.
Tom wants to know if you're planning to come to his party.
Turning to the right, you will come to the museum.
I went through the room into the garden.
The leaves fall off the trees in the fall.
Who is that man in the background of the picture?
The doctor may allow her to return to work next week.
Don't forget to return my pen!
Do you often talk to yourself?
Do you often talk to yourself?
I was in London for almost the entire summer.
I visited her, but she was not home.
Tom lives with his aunt.
I am as happy as a clam.
I want to buy a gift for her.
She was always willing to help people in trouble.
She couldn't get the point of his story.
Let me see a menu.
I'll write Tom a letter as soon as I get home.
I forget her name.
I forget her name.
I forget his name.
I forget his name.
I've forgotten your last name.
I've forgotten your last name.
I've forgotten your last name.
I've forgotten your last name.
Have you heard the latest rumors?
I can't promise that.
I'm not certain Tom knows what to do.
Are you two busy right now?
You've never heard of me, have you?
Now that you have finished your job, you are free to go home.
Now that you have finished your job, you are free to go home.
Now that you have finished your job, you are free to go home.
Not everybody can be an artist.
I hope you will have a good time in Europe.
This is a map of the city of Sendai.
I don't know why you're all so jumpy.
Tom was just doing his job.
I wonder why Tom was in such a bad mood.
What job experience do you have?
What job experience do you have?
What job experience do you have?
What job experience do you have?
They stopped singing.
What about a beer?
We flew business class.
Who are these flowers for?
Who are these flowers for?
We haven't finished.
Tom laughs at his own jokes.
Tom laughs at his own jokes.
Tom didn't understand the joke.
Hello, girl with the red dress!
John has been collecting stamps since he was a child.
John has been collecting stamps since he was a child.
He tasted the cheesecake.
Have a look at that picture.
Have a look at that picture.
Why would Tom lie about something like that?
He raised his hand as if to command silence.
She likes reading English literature.
Tom recently found a good job.
Please write about your real experience.
I love when things start falling into place.
I can't do this to her.
They arrived just in time for the last train.
We are both to blame.
It was a most beautiful flower.
He looks like a Greek god.
You're the only person who ever calls me after 10:00 p.m.
Tom wasn't the one who drank all the milk.
Give me some more milk!
Give me some more milk!
I feel warmer already.
Today I feel much better.
People expect too much.
Parents want their children to get a good education.
I try to only eat healthy foods.
Tom collected his things and left the room.
This data is anything but accurate.
I intend to try.
What changes should we expect?
Tom said that he doesn't regret his decision.
She has a healthy lifestyle.
Did Tom sing?
Who did Tom help?
I don't think I'm cut out for city life.
I rescued her.
Do you like horses?
Do you like horses?
I didn't have a key.
Why does that matter?
Does anyone have a map?
She died a week later.
She had a beautiful smile.
Can you repeat what you said?
Can you repeat what you said?
Tom never forgave himself for that.
Did you have an affair?
I'm interested in the history of Japan.
That house belongs to her.
The building is surrounded by police.
There were no stores in the Yukon.
Tom didn't talk to anyone.
Tom wanted me to meet him at the station.
Tom wanted me to meet him at the station.
I will give these tickets to whoever wants them.
I'd like to make a call to Tokyo, Japan. The number is 3202-5625.
Finally, we got to the Mississippi.
This book was first published in 1877.
Look! There's a cat in the kitchen!
I would like to speak with Johann.
Where can I pick up my ticket?
Tom said he didn't smoke.
Does their opinion matter?
Does their opinion matter?
Will Tom want to do that?
Will Tom want to do that?
She got kicked by a horse.
She got kicked by a horse.
I asked him to call you.
I asked him to call you.
I asked him to call you.
I asked him to call you.
Everybody is doing something.
Tom will show you how to do it.
I hope Tom doesn't do that again.
Does anyone have any suggestions?
Tom doesn't talk to his neighbors.
Tom didn't go to the lake with us.
Tom didn't go to the lake with us.
When does spring begin?
My father says he's planning to buy me a horse.
My father says he's planning to buy me a horse.
She did not want to go, but her father made her go.
Bill, call me tonight.
There was no mistake on his part.
The students are in the classroom.
He doesn't only teach English; he also writes novels.
Kuniko has never drunk so much before in her life.
This question is one of great importance.
Tom is no longer my student.
I can't lie to them.
Tom caught a fish with his bare hands.
Tell me the exact time when the next train will arrive.
My daughter went to Britain three years ago.
People are really stupid sometimes.
There are many lakes in the area where you live.
Prices have been rising since last year.
Do you go to school by bus or by train?
He brought a car from Japan.
Hard to believe, but that's the way it is.
When he finished speaking, there was a silence.
Tom runs faster than you, doesn't he?
I hope they don't name their dog Cookie.
Both of them started laughing.
Both of them started laughing.
Both girls laughed.
Both girls laughed.
Everyone's crying.
If Tom hasn't told you yet, he probably never will.
He studied very hard to become a scientist.
Get ready.
Get ready.
Who are you to judge?
Who are you to judge?
Who are you to judge?
Who are you to judge?
Who are you to judge?
I thought Tom didn't know how to speak French.
This girl sings pretty well.
I'm going back to Australia in October.
Tom had nothing to add.
I've never dated her!
Don't forget that Tom doesn't understand French.
Mark the correct option.
Our teacher looks very young.
You don't really love me at all. You only care about your math stuff! "Not at all, I do love you!" "Prove it!" "Okay. Let A be the set of the objects I love..."
Tom said that he didn't know French.
Is that coffee I smell?
Just ignore what Tom said.
Just ignore what Tom said.
Tom looked into the room.
Tom looked at the picture.
The noise bothers me.
You're safe.
They treat me like a child.
Three of them died.
Three of them died.
Both soldiers died.
All my plants died.
Three people died.
Three people died.
All of them died.
He stopped smoking and started running.
Tom probably knows the answer.
Both men died instantly.
Thank God nobody died.
Thank God nobody died.
Nobody should've died.
Tom died immediately.
Tom died in the hospital.
The student who is talking with John is from Canada.
You're the one who must decide.
You're the one who must decide.
I allowed Kate to go home.
Tom decided to wait.
Tom decided to wait for another three minutes.
This debate is silly.
If I take a hot shower the mirror in the bathroom fogs up.
That's pretty hard to believe.
War is evil.
My grown-up son is studying abroad now.
You don't have enough faith in yourself.
You don't have enough faith in yourself.
Tom treats me like a child.
Don't treat me like a child.
Tom always treats me like a child.
We are flying to Los Angeles tomorrow.
We are flying to Los Angeles tomorrow.
Tom doesn't like being treated like a child.
Tom doesn't like being treated like a child.
I don't like being treated like a child.
He is eager to go abroad.
He is eager to go abroad.
Call them now.
Call them now.
Mother went to town to get some bread.
My brother and I are about the same age.
The bed takes up a lot of space.
The bed took up a lot of space.
I hope Tom's wrong.
The kids started crying.
Some people started crying.
I started crying.
I cried, too.
Tom isn't really helping us much.
She is not quite content.
I wish we could spend more time together.
I thought you said you couldn't speak French.
I thought you said you couldn't speak French.
This is the best pen.
What will it all cost?
What exactly will it cost?
How much will it cost me?
Tom tried to hit me.
Tom said he'd call me.
Nobody believed me.
You're not going to believe me.
What does Tom know about me?
I'm going to a meeting.
I've been a little busy.
I've been a little busy.
Turn right at the next intersection.
Turn right at the next intersection.
What else did Tom say about me?
I'm sure Tom understands what I mean.
I'm sure Tom understands what I mean.
I didn't pay attention to what they were saying.
Don't you lie!
Are you sure you have to be at the meeting?
Are you sure you have to be at the meeting?
Tom gave his cat some milk.
Tom came back in about thirty minutes.
Tom can be there in thirty minutes.
You haven't made any mistakes.
You haven't made any mistakes.
If anyone is to blame, it's you.
We're all to blame for that.
In spite of the bad weather, they decided to go by car.
Don't you think this has gone far enough?
The goods arrive by sea.
I come here every year.
Without water, no creature could live.
She has a neighbor who arrived from Japan.
It wouldn't surprise me if Tom doesn't come.
I like the color green.
I like the bright colours.
I like the color black.
I like the color black.
What's the color of Tom's hair?
The restaurant is closed.
The shops were all closed.
Who chose those colors?
That'll change soon.
Things can change.
Not much has changed.
I hope things change.
We all have changed.
The laws have changed.
The rules have changed.
Now things have changed.
Many things have changed.
Things have changed here.
Let me explain it to you.
That cost a lot more than I expected.
Where did you first meet him?
You're on the right track.
Tom wants me to help him with his homework.
Tom wants me to help him with his homework.
Our school is in a good neighbourhood.
I liked them.
No one pays attention to me.
I'll read this book.
Wait over there.
Tom picked up the letter and read it.
This is the taste of victory.
Tom kept a penknife in his pocket.
He got married quickly.
I have to speak with them.
I should talk to them.
The boy has a horse.
I want to drink something.
I met her in the winter.
I can't talk to him.
I was very busy this week.
I was very busy this week.
What could be more important than this?
One of my friends bought a red car.
It's important to her.
This is important to her.
Dan didn't even pay attention to Linda.
I'm not finished with you.
That novel isn't for children.
The second book has more errors than the first.
This story is far more interesting than that one.
We are experienced.
We're early.
I'll let her go.
He's playing in the garden.
I have to admit that I never thought of that.
That is self-evident.
You can't trust a word Tom says.
We're dating.
We're certain.
She looked better than last time.
You little bugger!
Was it scary?
He never married.
Rules apply to everyone.
I have a different opinion on that subject.
The lake is deep at this point.
They watched her carefully.
What kind of songs does Tom sing?
We don't use it.
We don't use it.
Markku went with a neighbor to a nightclub.
Markku went with a neighbor to a nightclub.
She called him a fool.
This made me cry.
Where the hell can he be?
I have an important meeting.
Mahjong is one of the most interesting games.
This ship needs a captain.
Why can't you just call him?
I'm pretty sure we can help you.
Show him the picture.
Show him the picture.
I'll finish the work five days from now.
How did you get into the building?
How did you get into the building?
How did you get into the building?
I know a boy about your age.
He became secretary.
I want to become a French teacher.
You're gonna be famous one day.
I remember the happy days we spent together.
Both were unconscious.
Tom took off his glasses and rubbed his forehead.
At this point the depth is small.
I wonder what we'll be doing this time next year.
For example, this is a pen.
I'll deal with that later.
I'm here to rescue him.
Write with your left hand.
Write with your left hand.
It was my suitcase.
I didn't believe her.
The capital of Mongolia is Ulan Bator.
All the supplies ran out.
I do not understand the exact meaning of this sentence.
Her English was surprisingly good.
You're a bigger fool than I thought.
It's hard to say for sure.
It seems to me that I am always being spied on.
She is a scholar and poet.
I told them that I wasn't busy.
I told them that I wasn't busy.
From you I didn't expect it!
From you I didn't expect it!
He showed him a bird.
You're not going to catch them.
I never get up before seven.
You're forgetting her.
I have sold my books at a good price.
She and her friends love music.
How can I reach the hotel?
We'll shoot.
We'll check.
We need information.
We need experts.
We should wait.
We have to try.
Should we wait?
We waited outside.
We heard screams.
We heard screams.
We want to leave.
We want to talk.
We're very busy.
Perhaps we overlooked something.
There are quite a few hotels by the lake.
What else should change?
Actually, that's not quite correct.
He participated in an online survey.
The teacher said he did not know the answer to my question.
Could you give this to her?
Do you know who this car here belongs to?
Do you know who this car here belongs to?
He became an American citizen.
Bring tea immediately!
Give them everything you've got.
By the time I arrived, he had already left.
Tom tried to walk on water, but he sank to the bottom.
Tom didn't go to the market.
You will soon get accustomed to the work.
I am fed up with everything.
Many things have changed since I was here last.
Tom was sitting on the couch, watching TV.
I should talk to them.
I know what you ate for lunch.
I know what you ate for lunch.
I know what you ate for lunch.
We left when it was too late.
I know what it's like to lose a father.
You won't like him.
You won't like him.
I don't have a hundred dollars.
I'm going to bed. Good night.
Dan came back downstairs.
She's not interested.
She's not interested.
It is said in the summer it's nice here.
She made mistake after mistake.
I don't know how she finds the time.
I don't know how he finds the time.
I have no idea, Tom said honestly.
I'm sure this can wait.
Are you drunk or something?
They didn't like you.
They didn't like you.
They didn't like you.
Tom has never ridden a horse.
I think birthdays are important.
I never noticed before that you're taller than me.
I never noticed before that you're taller than me.
Watch him and do the same.
Watch him and do the same.
Tom started to take off his jacket.
Did you see my aunt?
Did you see my aunt?
I know how to make you talk.
I know how to make you talk.
Now, my boy, times have changed.
What are the teachers doing?
Tom isn't sure he's ready.
I can't stand my sister's kids.
Watch out! He's coming right at you!
Tom read everything very carefully.
Tom called home.
Please validate this ticket.
We'll capture them.
Tom called around 2:30.
Tom called the hotline.
Tom called me at home.
It's at the back of the building.
We're here to meet her.
You made a list, didn't you?
Tom never called.
Tom hardly ever listens to music.
I'm sorry, I didn't mean that.
I can't believe I said that.
I can't believe I said that.
How many suitcases do you have?
This suitcase isn't as heavy as it looks.
I can't make him love me.
That's my own personal opinion.
I want you to follow orders.
He was asking about your health.
I hope you'll come to my birthday party.
I hope you'll come to my birthday party.
Hundreds of people came out into the square.
All girls wear pink panties.
Tom immediately called 911.
Tom immediately called 911.
We're very pleased.
I felt great all day.
When are you going back to your own country?
Maria covered her face with her hands.
Men aren't all that different from women.
Tom is dressed in an inappropriate manner.
It's on the ground floor.
It's on the ground floor.
It's on the ground floor.
It's on the ground floor.
The boy talks like a great scholar.
Oh, thank you, Tom. Thank you!
Yesterday I went to bed without brushing my teeth.
Don't forget to bring a camera.
You're just going to have to get used to it.
You're just going to have to get used to it.
Breathing was difficult.
I could hardly breathe.
I've brought a gift for Tom.
You won't finish this project.
Here's a picture of my daughter.
Send it airmail.
My father didn't want to watch the film.
My father didn't want to watch the film.
There are only 24 hours in a day.
What a great experience!
I didn't say I was scared.
I didn't say I was scared.
I didn't say I was scared.
I didn't say I was scared.
Tom can't believe Mary is serious.
I'm sure I can find them.
I'm sure I can find them.
I was going to call them today.
I was going to call them today.
That's your gift.
I believed in myself.
Let's drink.
Will they believe Tom?
I don't think Tom will believe us.
This is just unbelievable.
Tom began wearing glasses when he was three.
Treatment will begin tomorrow.
Most months have 30 or 31 days.
Perhaps I should talk to him.
Perhaps I should talk to him.
Have you understood this joke?
Have you understood this joke?
Have you understood this joke?
Are you a member of the baseball team?
Are you a member of the baseball team?
I can barely stand.
I'm talking to him.
My father would never allow me to do that.
I think she wants you to notice her.
How did you find the time to read so many books?
How did you find the time to read so many books?
He just came down the stairs.
I have to get you out of here.
I want to meet him.
I stopped smoking once and for all.
I stopped smoking once and for all.
The market is large.
I'm sorry, but I won't be able to help you.
I'm talking to her.
You want me to come in?
You want me to come in?
You want me to come in?
You want me to come in?
It's actually a lot of easier than it looks.
Women have beautiful cheeks.
My fatherland is there, where my soul is.
I would give anything to win her back.
You can choose any color.
You can choose any color.
How much do you love him?
I don't think this movie is interesting.
Sorry, but I can't hear you very well.
Tom is in pretty good shape for his age.
We're still trying to determine what happened.
He forgot to rewind the movie.
I won't let them do it.
What would you do in that situation?
She's our teacher.
Tom is now in a very difficult situation.
A woman Tom didn't know approached him.
My daughter was premature.
No answer is required.
The children are learning to tell the time.
Dilma Rousseff is the current President of Brazil.
I haven't seen any of his pictures.
Tom told me my life's in danger.
I think we had better wait for another 30 minutes.
I saw him naked.
I saw him naked.
I'm 1.9 meters tall.
I've never seen Tom help anyone.
Tom abandoned that idea.
Tom abandoned that idea.
We invited him to our house.
We invited him to our house.
Tom was very calm.
Is 2:30 too late?
Tom is so stupid.
We were so lucky.
The idea was good.
Tom was an artist.
Where's the knife?
Is Monday too late?
It's all our fault.
It's a French word.
Three were wounded.
We've been very lucky.
Everything was fine.
Is that a submarine?
It's rather strange.
The kids were happy.
Tickets are limited.
Tom is still abroad.
We were lucky again.
Are you a journalist?
It wasn't their idea.
There are no victims.
We were just unlucky.
Tom was the youngest.
Tom was just unlucky.
Is thirty days enough?
Is thirty days enough?
That was pretty weird.
This island is six times bigger than Manhattan.
War is evil.
Do you remember that store?
Do you remember that store?
We have different color eyes.
It was quite pleasant.
The bridge is high.
I use my VISA card.
Is everybody happy now?
All three were wounded.
The deadline is Monday.
The children are happy.
The children are happy.
Tom doesn't have to talk to me if he doesn't want to.
Here are a few examples.
It was very important.
Why doesn't she help me anymore?
Are you sure we should be doing this?
Are you sure we should be doing this?
Are you sure we should be doing this?
There were nice pictures on that wall.
This story is too complex for children.
Did you think about our offer?
Did you think about our offer?
Did you think about our offer?
Did you think about our offer?
Tom is much taller than his mother.
This movie is appropriate for all ages.
Life is weird.
Is there a television in the house?
Is there a television in the house?
I hope you don't drink too much.
I hope you don't drink too much.
I hope you don't drink too much.
I hope you don't drink too much.
Tom is never going to forgive me.
Tom would never forgive me.
The weather was beautiful.
That was really important.
Tom was, of course, happy.
Tom is the team's captain.
That's probably a bad idea.
Your friends are downstairs.
I told him it was a bad idea.
I told him it was a bad idea.
He took something out from his pocket.
Who sent this letter?
He's very much satisfied with the result.
I drove downtown to meet them.
You are so white!
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
The teacher told me to stand up.
The teacher told me to stand up.
I guess I'll have to wait a little longer.
There are people who don't know yet that transgender exist.
Don't speak ill of the dead.
We're a good team.
Tom is lying unconscious on the ground.
I've got a wife and three children.
He somewhat resembles his father.
Where is her picture?
I think you should talk to her.
I think you should talk to her.
I think you should talk to them.
I think you should talk to them.
I think you should talk to them.
I think you should talk to them.
I gave him some advice.
Every summer I go to the countryside.
I'm already on the train.
The circumstances are different now.
The crowd was mostly women and children.
There will always be some kind of problem.
We all have fun.
We have the facts.
We have three kids.
She was my only joy.
It seemed like a good idea at the time.
He enjoys eating ice cream.
Let me call her.
I won't let them come in.
Did you talk with your husband?
Do I have to talk to them?
Everything smells so delicious.
I have never read such a scary novel.
He will catch us.
He will catch us.
When was the last time you had a stomachache?
When was the last time you had a stomachache?
I'm lucky to have had good teachers.
Give it a whirl.
You may choose one of them.
We stood on the top of the mountain.
Prices are going up every day.
I'm sorry, I did my best.
I couldn't have helped Tom, even if I'd wanted to.
Tom won't come back before 2:30.
We have three daughters.
Don't spend so much time watching television.
Don't spend so much time watching television.
That was a shepherd.
Rumors have been circulating.
Tom didn't give me back my money.
Tom didn't give me back my money.
Tom didn't like the idea.
She likes running.
This museum has been closed for five years.
Here is a photograph of my family.
Last summer was very hot.
Last summer was very hot.
I liked this book.
I may try again later.
I'll give you an example.
I'll give you an example.
I think most people would agree.
There was music.
I gave Tom thirty dollars.
It's about this big.
It's about this big.
It's about this big.
I haven't talked to them.
I haven't talked to them.
He is probably dead.
I think you make a lovely couple.
Why didn't he stop smoking?
Why didn't he stop smoking?
The book was an international success.
He's talking to himself.
The ceiling is very low in this room.
Have a nice sleep!
Who's more important, me or Tatoeba?
I bought her a beautiful dress.
I bought her a beautiful dress.
Why don't you give it to them?
Why don't you give it to them?
Why don't you give it to them?
Why don't you give it to them?
Translate this book into English.
Translate this book into English.
Could you see me off?
I let him sleep on my couch.
Just leave her alone.
Just leave her alone.
Show us where you found him.
Show us where you found him.
Show us where you found him.
You should try to help him.
You should try to help him.
You should try to help him.
Don't call her.
Don't call her.
Did you show him your pictures?
Did you show him your pictures?
Did you show him your pictures?
I've never met anyone like him.
I immediately accepted his offer.
I'm saving this seat for them.
Will you talk to her?
Will you talk to her?
Will you talk to her?
I was going to call him today.
I was going to call him today.
I was going to call him today.
My hair is still wet.
She wanted to be famous.
Tom is in a good mood.
She is in a very good mood.
Are you in a good mood?
Marie wasn't thirsty.
How much do you remember about that night?
He's read thirty-three books this year.
This is no way to treat a lady.
This is no way to treat a lady.
Your favorite color is red, right?
Did you watch the movie?
It's not going to happen anytime soon.
Why do you look so white?
What's wrong with wearing pink?
Tom was wearing a white shirt.
We never use them.
I really like riding horses.
Are you sure his name is Tom?
A new year always brings hope.
Brasilia is the capital of Brazil.
Have you ever spoken to her?
This car belongs to them.
Show them the picture.
Did you shoot him?
Did you shoot him?
Did you shoot him?
Do I have to talk to him?
Do I have to talk to him?
I'm expecting him.
I want to speak with you now.
I want to send him a letter.
How did you first meet her?
Who hit him?
Who hit him?
You would've liked them.
You're forgetting them.
I'm studying with him.
Have you forgiven them?
Have you forgiven them?
Have you forgiven them?
I told you to leave them alone.
How much do you love her?
I don't have a picture of him.
Somebody ought to talk to him.
I don't want to leave her.
Will you talk to him?
Will you talk to him?
Why don't you give her a call?
I can't marry her.
I can't marry her.
I won't let you come in.
I won't let you come in.
I've got to call her.
Are you going to call them?
We should try to help them.
I didn't ask her to come back.
Tom got used to ignoring the noise.
You are my daughter.
I wonder why Dad wants to buy that house.
I told them not to come back.
I suggest you talk to her.
I told them to leave me alone.
Show her the picture.
Why don't you talk to me?
I'm meeting them next Monday.
Tom shot us.
Tom watched us carefully.
I gave my half to her.
We should talk to them.
I gave her your address.
They should sue him.
I want to send them a letter.
We're not going to let her die.
I could talk to her.
I could talk to her.
Did you shoot her?
Did you shoot her?
Did you shoot her?
I don't want to meet them.
I was trying to rescue them.
We have three adopted children.
Tom is the one who hit me.
Tom took his glasses off and put them on the bedside table.
Tom was dangerous.
Where did the horse go?
Where did the horse go?
I can't call her at home.
Don't lie to her.
I'll meet them some other time.
You should talk to them.
We're done talking about her.
What's so interesting in there?
He is pleased with his new car.
He is pleased with his new car.
I'm not sure I follow what you're saying.
Tom left here about thirty minutes ago.
Please talk to me.
Tom considers himself to be a citizen of the world.
He sometimes forgets what he was talking about.
I regret that I didn't go there.
I regret that I didn't go there.
I'm sure that he went to Tokyo.
I'm sure that he went to Tokyo.
I'm sure that he went to Tokyo.
I'm sure that he went to Tokyo.
They're armed with knives.
Mark the right answer.
Give me that key.
Give me that key.
I've forgotten your address.
She answered in tears.
I just want to cry.
It's been two years since he went Hawaii.
Let's not forget.
Let's not forget.
Tom put thirty dollars on the table.
If the coffee is too strong, add some more water.
I told him to stay indoors.
I told him to stay indoors.
He nodded to me.
Pay attention to them.
Tom knows the situation well enough.
I like that it is soft.
They just want to talk to you.
They just want to talk to you.
I brought a picture of her.
You said I could talk to them.
You said I could talk to them.
You said I could talk to them.
I wanted to save them.
It happened before I met her.
You shouldn't have killed him.
I promised to leave him alone.
I want to send her a letter.
I told them it was a mistake.
I know you think highly of him.
Is it too early to call her?
Where did you first meet her?
I didn't lie to her.
I've got to try to catch them.
I want to speak with them.
Maybe you should call her.
You should talk to him.
We'll call him.
Why are you talking to him?
You needn't have told Tom about it.
Please don't kill me!
Please don't kill me!
The capital of Turkey is Ankara.
You should call him right now.
I told her to leave me alone.
I told her to leave me alone.
I told her to leave me alone.
My brother became an engineer.
We'll help you rescue them.
Let's get him out of the water.
We should talk to her.
We should talk to her.
I've never seen her so angry.
I've never seen her so angry.
We seem to have lost her.
Yemen is a country in the Middle East.
Do you think I went too far?
Are you going to talk to them?
You've got to read this.
I told them to stay indoors.
Why did you tell her I'd left?
Why did you tell her I'd left?
Why did you tell her I'd left?
Why did you tell her I'd left?
We want you to marry her.
We have to call him.
Did you have fun with her?
Did you have fun with her?
I need information about them.
I would've said no.
I know how to make her talk.
Tell her to leave me alone.
Tell her to leave me alone.
You should sue them.
It reminds me of them.
Stop talking about them.
We're not going to let him die.
Save us.
Save us.
You should just talk to them.
Let me do the dirty work.
I'll pick them up in an hour.
I want to make them happy.
I want you to leave them alone.
I want you to leave them alone.
I want you to leave them alone.
Why do you lie for them?
Why do you lie for them?
I've never seen them so angry.
I've never seen them so angry.
You should sue him.
I was going to call her today.
I was going to call her today.
I want you to meet him.
I want you to meet him.
Let me go in and talk to them.
Do you want me to call them?
We need to meet with her.
We're faithful.
You're faithful.
Are you faithful?
I live pretty close to you.
We'd like to speak with them.
Here's a picture of you.
I watched them carefully.
I forgave her.
I forgave her.
I'll call him tomorrow.
I saw you guys talking to her.
How could you do this to her?
Tom just wants to talk to me.
Send him to me.
I grew up with him.
I grew up with him.
We have information for them.
You'd like her.
We'll meet them later.
Maybe you could talk to them.
Maybe you could talk to them.
Say hello to them for me.
Say hello to them for me.
I let Tom drive my car.
I was going to call her.
I was going to call her.
I forgot to call her.
I forgot to call her.
Have you been talking to them?
I'm not going to call them.
I can't imagine life without music.
This building has 5 floors and 20 apartments.
I think Tom is safe.
You know we owe them a lot.
Were you surprised to see us?
You're not going to catch her.
You're not going to catch her.
You're not going to catch her.
Let them finish.
Let them finish.
You said you'd talk to them.
You said you'd talk to them.
You said you'd talk to them.
I asked her to stop.
I asked her to stop.
I'm pretty sure I can help him.
I hit him.
I hit him.
It's nice to see you so happy.
I think we lost them.
Get him something to drink.
This is important to us.
I'd never met them before.
Why not let her try?
I think we should talk to them.
I think we should talk to them.
Don't you want to get her back?
Did you hit him?
Did you hit him?
Did you hit him?
The note was from her.
We believed him.
I shook hands with them.
Why did you hit her?
Why did you hit her?
Why did you hit her?
Have you been talking to her?
I've always wanted to meet him.
I've always wanted to meet him.
How did you get to know them?
I'm not going to call her.
Here's a picture of him.
Tom says that he can move objects using only the power of his mind.
I think we should talk to him.
You needn't have written your name.
You needn't have done that, chief.
Tom didn't help Mary.
Maybe they're busy.
I won't let Tom do it.
Who did you see at the theatre?
You needn't have helped him with his work.
You needn't have gone to all that trouble just for me.
He doesn't eat meat, does he?
They managed to save her.
Show us the magazine.
Call them.
Call them.
We forgave them.
We forgave them.
I live pretty close to them.
It's very important to him.
It's very important to him.
I'll let them know you called.
I'll let them know you called.
I'll let them know you called.
I met them after work.
I've never seen her happier.
I've never seen her happier.
I've never seen her happier.
I've never seen her happier.
I asked her to call you.
I asked her to call you.
I'm watching them.
It's important to them.
I gave my half to them.
I gave my half to them.
I can't get used to her.
I can't get used to him.
Perhaps I should talk to them.
Perhaps I should talk to them.
We'll never let her go.
You should talk to me.
I just didn't believe them.
I just didn't believe them.
I'm not going to call him.
Call him.
Call him.
Things changed after that.
The sand is warm.
I forgot the map.
Her fingers were trembling.
Something was bothering him.
Something was bothering her.
It saved my life.
She mounted the horse.
I shrugged my shoulders.
Cry all you want.
What would Jesus do?
Tom married her anyway.
I don't like lying to them.
I'm helping him.
Don't show this to them.
Don't show this to them.
Don't show this to them.
I didn't lie to him.
I didn't lie to him.
I won't let her go there.
How could you do that to us?
I told him not to come back.
I told him not to come back.
Why doesn't anybody help us?
Why doesn't anybody help us?
I was talking to her.
I was talking to her.
Call him now.
Call him now.
Why can't you just call them?
Why can't you just call them?
I'll give them a call.
Don't let him talk to anyone.
I owe my life to them.
I can't let her do that.
I can't let her do that.
I had to send them home.
Did you believe her?
Did you believe her?
Did you believe her?
Did you believe her?
Back away from her.
Back away from her.
Don't lie to them.
Do you want to meet them?
Do you want to meet them?
Let her stay.
Are you sure it was them?
I hope you don't die.
I hope we'll see her again.
I hope we'll see her again.
Are you sure it was Tom?
Are you sure that it was Tom?
We may be in danger.
I'm trying to save him.
We can't just let you go.
We can't just let you go.
We can't just let you go.
We can't just let you go.
They just want to talk to her.
They just want to talk to her.
You must save her.
You must save her.
You must save her.
I never lied to her.
I'm going to call them.
I'm going to call them.
Just listen to her.
Just listen to her.
Hi, Tom. Come on in.
Have you seen them on stage?
I lost my car keys.
When did you meet them?
When did you meet them?
You said I could talk to her.
You said I could talk to her.
You said I could talk to her.
I told you I was busy.
That's how we first met.
Listen to this song, Tom.
Why do you like horses?
I don't think it's a big deal.
It reminds me of her.
We just want to take him home.
I've already talked to them.
I don't use Facebook anymore.
Tom, do you have your keys?
I hope it went well.
No one has the right to treat you like this.
I had nothing else to do.
I had nothing else to say.
I can't believe I'm actually doing this.
I've already spoken with them.
Call her.
Call her.
We believed them.
Tom is talking to them.
Why did you invite her?
Why did you invite her?
Why did you invite her?
Why did you invite her?
Why did you invite her?
Why did you invite her?
I've been helping them.
I've been helping them.
I think you should call them.
I think you should call them.
I think you should call them.
I hope it's not her.
I believed her.
I believed her.
I believed her.
I believed her.
I need information about him.
I've seen her on TV many times.
I've seen her on TV many times.
I promise not to tell her.
I hit her.
I hit her.
Stop talking about me.
Send her to me.
Send her to me.
Are you going to talk to him?
Just give him a call.
Just give him a call.
I told them to wait in the car.
I told them to wait in the car.
I had no idea you knew her.
I was talking to them.
I didn't keep her waiting.
I didn't keep her waiting.
Let me at least talk to her.
Let me at least talk to her.
I have to call him.
I have to call him.
I have to call him.
I have to call him.
I was hoping I'd see you again.
Did you know that Tom got married last week?
There's an easier way to do it.
I was hoping that you might know.
Tom quickly realized that he was different from the other children.
There's only one way out of here.
Was it really that bad?
I feel like Tom is using me.
Tom has been behaving strangely.
I owe Tom a great deal.
Are you sure that Tom is behind this?
Can I take my shirt off?
Can I take my shirt off?
I was just talking with her.
Tell him I'm coming back.
Tell him I'm coming back.
I've already called him.
I've already called him.
This gift is from her.
One of us should talk to her.
One of us should talk to her.
I won't let her die.
No liberty for the enemies of liberty.
I shook hands with him.
Can you call her?
Can you call her?
I talked to him on the phone.
I've never seen him happier.
This land belongs to us.
I'd better call him first.
The note was from them.
This is important to him.
This is important to him.
I didn't believe him.
I didn't believe him.
Just let me talk to them.
Why is my sister stupid? "I'm not stupid!"
Is there life beyond the solar system?
I'm sorry. I should have called first.
We'll have troubles for sure.
Why are you lying to us?
Why are you lying to us?
I want a kitchen like this.
I promise it won't take long.
That's how it is done.
I didn't know any of the songs.
I don't know who to choose.
There are many birds in this forest.
This is going to take years.
Tom wasn't sure.
Just call her.
Just call her.
Can we save him?
Can we save him?
Did you phone them?
We've got to rescue them.
We've got to rescue them.
I don't want to lose her.
Give me a full glass of water.
I'll call them in a few minutes.
It's very important to her.
Did you have fun with him?
Who appointed them?
I wanted to save her.
I wanted to save her.
I'll be sure to tell her that.
We help her.
I let them do it.
I still want to marry her.
I still want to marry her.
When do you want to meet him?
We'll call them.
We'll call them.
The cost will run into thousands of dollars.
I can call him.
I can call him.
How many bags did you have?
That question is irrelevant.
You shouldn't lie to her.
Let him do this.
No one pays attention to her.
I told him the bank was closed.
I told him the bank was closed.
Please add a new sentence.
You should've expected us.
I should've expected that to happen.
I should've left you a note.
I'd like to speak with him.
I'd like to speak with him.
I'd like to speak with him.
I'd like to speak with him.
I don't know her last name.
Why are you so hot?
Why can't we just leave right now?
We kept in touch.
I guess you talked to him.
I guess you talked to him.
I guess you talked to him.
Let us stay.
I'm going to check on her.
I'm going to check on her.
I've got to go meet her.
I've got to go meet her.
I'm not going to call you.
I'm not going to call you.
Don't forget to call him.
Don't forget to call him.
Don't forget to call him.
Don't forget to call him.
I'm the one who rescued her.
I'm the one who rescued her.
I'm here to rescue them.
I must find a way to help them.
I must find a way to help them.
I must find a way to help them.
I should try to help them.
I should try to help them.
I should try to help them.
We tried to save her.
We tried to save her.
We tried to save her.
We tried to save her.
I told her you were happy.
I told her you were happy.
I told her you were happy.
I told her you were happy.
Tom has lost too much blood.
Tehran is my favorite town.
It was a warm day.
It was a warm day.
It was a warm day.
I can arrange that.
He cries almost every day.
You bought the ticket for the train?
That'd be fun.
Humans are the only animals that wear clothes.
What is your favorite Pokémon?
Give me my beer.
Give me my beer.
I'm going to call him.
This car belongs to us.
Tom is watching them.
I'm sure I can find him.
I'm going to call her.
I'm going to call her.
I'll call her myself.
I'll call her myself.
I sent them home.
I've sent them home.
They believed her.
Can we call him now?
I don't want to see you naked.
I'm not going to lie to him.
Tom is watching us.
You should just talk to him.
Don't disturb him.
How can we save them?
How can we save them?
Why doesn't anybody help him?
Who appointed you?
Who appointed you?
Don't forget him.
Don't forget him.
I can call them.
I can call them.
I can call them.
I've seen her naked.
I've seen her naked.
I've seen her naked.
I'd like you to be happy.
Have you forgiven him?
Have you forgiven him?
Have you forgiven him?
Have you forgiven him?
Have you forgiven him?
Have you forgiven him?
I'll meet them.
We seem to have lost them.
We seem to have lost them.
I was born in Osaka, but I grew up in Tokyo.
I was born in Osaka, but I grew up in Tokyo.
She doesn't wear thongs.
I want you to call them.
I want you to call them.
We've got to rescue her.
I'm sure I can find her.
I've been a teacher for five years.
You're overweight.
You're overweight.
I can't call her.
I'm meeting him in ten minutes.
Everyone laughed except him.
I won't let him do it.
I won't let him do it.
Don't show this to her.
Don't show this to her.
Let's get them out of here.
Did you ever call her?
That gave her an idea.
We've been helping them.
I can't lie to him.
Don't lie to him.
Don't lie to him.
Just call them.
I'm here to rescue her.
They're watching him.
They'll grow.
Could you call her?
Could you call her?
Could you call her?
Could you call her?
You must save us.
You must save us.
You must save us.
You must save us.
This land belongs to her.
I couldn't let them go.
I couldn't let them go.
Sometimes we teach, sometimes we learn.
I can't lie to them again.
They believed him.
They believed him.
I told her not to tell anyone.
I promise not to tell them.
I promise not to tell them.
I have information for him.
He put his hand to his forehead.
I must speak with her.
I'm glad you didn't call me.
I'm glad you didn't call me.
We won't let them escape.
Did you ever call him?
We'll help you rescue him.
We'll help you rescue him.
I want to speak with them now.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
Show us the picture.
Show us the picture.
Why are you lying to him?
I think you should wait for us.
I think you should wait for us.
I think you should wait for us.
I think you should wait for us.
Tom is talking to us.
I suppose I can ask him.
I don't like lying to him.
I can't just let them kill me.
Let me help them.
Let me help them.
I gave them your address.
I gave them your address.
I have information for them.
He lost his parents at the age of seven.
It was a good idea to create Tatoeba.
I'm sure you'll like them.
I'm meeting them in an hour.
I want to talk to you now.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call him.
You really do have a beautiful smile.
I gave my old clothes away.
What language do you use at work?
Don't follow his example.
I talk to him more than you do.
We're supposed to help them.
Where did you send him?
Where did you send him?
Where did you send him?
I'd like you to meet with them.
Would you talk to him?
Somebody ought to talk to them.
I told them I was happy.
I told them I was happy.
Will you talk to them?
Will you talk to them?
I hope it's not him.
Can I talk to you about them?
We'd like to help them prove it.
I can't let them do that.
I'm trying to save them.
I'm trying to save them.
I got it practically for free.
This size doesn't fit me.
This is a very, very rare problem.
No one lives in this house. Everyone is dead.
Let me tell you about them.
Why didn't you try calling us?
Why didn't you try calling us?
Why didn't you try calling us?
Why didn't you try calling us?
I'm not going to lie to her.
I'm not going to lie to her.
I've decided to forgive them.
I've decided to forgive them.
I've decided to forgive them.
I've decided to forgive them.
I made them an offer.
I made them an offer.
Let him finish.
Let him finish.
Let him finish.
Why are you talking to her?
I'm not calling them.
I'm not calling him.
I forgot to call them.
I forgot to call them.
I can call her if you want.
I can call her if you want.
I can call her if you want.
I talked to him.
I talked to him.
I talked to him.
I've never seen her cry.
It doesn't matter to her.
I want to talk to him now.
Let her finish.
I'd better call him again.
I was going to call him.
I was going to call him.
I want you to call them now.
I want you to call them now.
I want you to call them now.
Why didn't you try calling him?
Why didn't you try calling him?
Why didn't you try calling him?
Why didn't you try calling him?
Why didn't you try calling him?
Why didn't you try calling him?
Tom lost his key.
Tom read the entire book in three hours.
Tom read the entire book in three hours.
I want to buy a gift for you.
Please don't call us again.
I've decided to forgive you.
I've decided to forgive you.
I've decided to forgive you.
I've decided to forgive you.
I think we can catch her.
I think we can catch her.
I think we can catch her.
I didn't want to lose her.
I didn't want to lose her.
I liked him.
Who's watching them?
We'll let them try.
I told her it was a mistake.
I told her it was a mistake.
I owe my life to her.
You can't ignore them.
You can't ignore them.
I owe her a great deal.
I'm calling her again.
We'll let her try.
I can't forgive him.
How can we save him?
How can we save him?
You must help me save him.
You must help me save him.
You must help me save him.
I'm glad you didn't call him.
I just didn't believe him.
I just didn't believe him.
You have to call them.
You have to call them.
You have to call them.
You have to call them.
You have to call them.
You have to call them.
May I speak with them?
May I speak with them?
Maybe you should talk to him.
Maybe you should talk to him.
This reminds me of him.
I could keep her company.
We'd like to speak with him.
Let's telephone him.
Let's call him.
I promise not to tell him.
I had to send him home.
I think we lost him.
We're going to send her home.
They're talking to him.
I gave him your address.
I gave him your address.
We had to let them go.
I can't get used to them.
Give him this picture.
Let her help you.
Let her help you.
Dream on!
I recently met her.
I recently met her.
You look worse than her.
They believed you.
They believed you.
I have a small gift for her.
Why doesn't anybody help them?
I suppose we could ask him.
I sent them a note.
We've got to rescue her.
Tom just wants to talk to us.
Tom just wants to talk to us.
How are you going to catch them?
This car belongs to me.
I need to see them immediately.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
I think you should talk to him.
They made her an offer.
It didn't matter to us.
I need information about her.
Forgive him.
Everyone believed her.
Everyone believed her.
I can't make them love me.
Tom thought we were in danger.
They just want to talk to him.
They just want to talk to him.
I have to talk to you now.
I live pretty close to her.
I must find a way to help him.
I must find a way to help him.
I must find a way to help him.
I must find a way to help him.
Show her the magazine.
Show her the magazine.
I want to see a Japanese movie.
Tom didn't expect the test to be as easy as it was.
Tom let out a sigh of relief.
We'd like to speak with you.
We'd like to speak with you.
We'd like to speak with you.
We'd like to speak with you.
Tom had no idea how to do it.
Tom had no idea how to do it.
Don't forget to call us.
Don't forget to call us.
Don't forget to call us.
Don't forget to call us.
I'll buy a gift for them.
He said he was poor.
I hope it's not them.
This used to belong to you.
He told me that he was busy then.
I have a son and a daughter. The one is in New York, and the other in London.
Everyone else laughed.
The boy took off his cap.
Does Tom have to be there?
Who did you translate this for?
The children sang songs.
Tom asked me whether I was busy or not.
I sold all my houses.
Tom almost never calls Mary.
I'll meet her tomorrow at 2:30.
Tell him I'll be there by 2:30.
Tell him I'll be there by 2:30.
We tried to save them.
We tried to save them.
I must find a way to help you.
I must find a way to help you.
I must find a way to help you.
I must find a way to help you.
You'd like him.
You'd like him.
Have you even talked to him?
I forgot to call him.
I forgot to call him.
I forgot to call him.
I forgot to call him.
I saw you talking to her.
I have no information on her.
I know how to make him talk.
That belonged to me.
I couldn't save her.
I couldn't save her.
I married her.
I called her this afternoon.
I'll buy a gift for her.
I sent him home.
I sent him home.
I went to her for advice.
Call him immediately.
We've got to save him.
We have to save him.
I never hit her.
I assume you found them.
I assume you found them.
I was just talking with them.
I was going to call them.
I was going to call them.
I've already called them.
I've already called them.
I asked them to call you.
I asked them to call you.
I asked them to call you.
Tell them I'll be there by 2:30.
Tell them I'll be there by 2:30.
We have to call them.
We have to call them.
In high school, French was my favorite subject.
Talk to her again.
I haven't talked to him yet.
I haven't talked to him yet.
I've got to call her.
I've got to call her.
I don't particularly like him, but I don't wish him any harm.
Tom kept singing.
I slept on the couch.
I told her it was a bad idea.
I told her it was a bad idea.
I met her three months ago.
I have a small gift for him.
Let me explain it to him.
If you eat nothing but ice cream, you'll get a stomachache.
I must find a way to help her.
I must find a way to help her.
Why did you invite him?
Why did you invite him?
I told you to give me a call.
This tree is more than a century old.
Do you want me to call her?
Do you want me to call her?
Do you want me to call her?
Do you want me to call her?
Can you manage lifting this box?
Can you manage lifting this box?
Did you call her?
This car belongs to her.
I've talked to them.
I won't let her come in.
His grandfather died of cancer a year ago.
I like folk songs.
Do you like French cuisine?
Do you like French cuisine?
I think we should call her.
I think we should call her.
I think we should call her.
I think we should call her.
I think we should call her.
I think we should call her.
They believed me.
At first, I didn't believe him.
Tell her I'm coming back.
Perhaps I should talk to her.
Perhaps I should talk to her.
I think we should call him.
I think we should call him.
I think we should call him.
You talked to them, right?
You talked to them, right?
I have to speak with him.
I have to speak with him.
I forgave him.
I forgave him.
I forgave him.
I forgave him.
Tom hasn't finished yet.
We have five English classes a week.
We can't let her die.
I didn't ask them to come back.
I didn't ask them to come back.
I hope we'll see them again.
I hope we'll see them again.
I hope we'll see them again.
I'm going to take him home.
Please don't call her again.
Please don't call her again.
Strictly forbidden.
Forgive and forget.
Mark the words that you cannot understand.
I'm getting ready for bed.
You know many interesting places, don't you?
You know many interesting places, don't you?
Her behaviour isn't normal for a young girl.
Pedophiles are cruelly treated in prison.
I prefer spring to fall.
I'm sorry, but you can't marry Susan.
Those men will run.
Is it possible to cry underwater?
We need music.
I am getting married to the most beautiful girl in town.
They adopted my viewpoint.
It started as a hobby.
What a gorgeous flower!
I met her on my way home.
Dogs like the autumn.
How many times do I have to explain this to you?
You were always too busy to talk to me.
Translate the book into another language.
It took three years.
Tomorrow it starts.
Did you fall from the sky?
Did you go to the shop?
Did you go to the shop?
Did you go to the shop?
I also did not call.
Tom took a pen out of his shirt pocket.
I'm sure they can hear us.
I'm sure they can hear us.
I'm sure they can hear us.
I'm sure they can hear us.
I can't let the matter drop.
That was pretty scary.
I like your mirrors.
I had to let him go.
I liked it a lot!
I'll call you in the evening.
I'll call you in the evening.
I'll leave right away.
I'll leave right away.
It occurred to me that I had forgotten my keys.
I just want you to be safe.
I'll wait until you've finished.
He who doesn't use "brauchen" with "zu" shouldn't use "brauchen" at all.
I thought I'd give you a key.
I thought I'd give you a key.
What time does the movie begin?
Tom showed me his garden yesterday.
Do you have your keys?
Do you have your keys?
Do you have your keys?
I don't know what your situation is.
She helped a student.
I believed him at first.
I can't understand the meaning.
You should go in the house.
You should go in the house.
It's obvious Tom can't do it without some help.
Their house is very modern.
Do you want to talk about something?
Do you want to talk about something?
Do you want to talk about something?
Do you want to talk about something?
Could I see you tonight?
Could you add me?
Tom was carrying a white box.
Tom wasn't very busy.
There's got to be another way.
The cab arrived late.
Are you sure you don't want to study at my house?
Are you sure you don't want to study at my house?
Are you sure you don't want to study at my house?
Are you sure you don't want to study at my house?
That's just the point.
That's where I grew up.
That's where I grew up.
I think Tom is enjoying himself.
Can I see you later?
I'm totally free.
I'm totally free.
How can we know for sure?
Did Tom go to college?
I'm going to jail.
Tom looks appalled.
You have to at least try.
I told them you were busy.
I told them you were busy.
I told them you were busy.
I told them you were busy.
I told them you were busy.
I told them you were busy.
Mr Fujimori is famous all over the world.
Is it possible to cry underwater?
The snow was very deep.
It depends on my mood.
Tom seems happier than before.
Would you like me to stop?
Would you like me to stop?
Would you like me to stop?
Would you like me to stop?
Never mind all that.
I liked what Tom said.
It was enjoyable.
Maybe that's a good sign.
I'm going to take this home.
I'm going to take this home.
You never know who's watching.
I think we both know who's really to blame.
Can you give this to Tom?
Can you give that to Tom?
Can you give this to Tom?
Can you give this to Tom?
Tom bought that car because his wife liked it.
I'll find a way to do it.
I'll find a way to do it.
He has a lunch.
Who are those men in white suits?
Tom looks serious.
I would like to become a poet.
I never had enough money to buy a car.
Tom will explain the situation to you.
Tom will explain the situation to you.
Tom does study a lot.
Tom seemed happy.
I'm highly impressed.
I think it's a bad idea.
We aren't that stupid.
I'll let Tom explain.
We're done for now.
I have a few ideas.
Be tolerant.
Tom didn't bring his keys.
We'll do our best.
Promise you won't tell Tom.
He's just an ordinary student.
I don't want to remember.
Tom wants our report before lunch.
I think Tom enjoyed doing that.
Tom is sure.
We aren't safe.
Tom got home later than usual today.
If he's busy, help him.
If he's busy, help him.
I'll use it.
You must sell it.
You must sell it.
You must sell it.
You must sell it.
Tom locked his car.
I just don't want to have people thinking I'm weak.
I just don't want to have people thinking I'm weak.
Does Tom have to be here?
You make it sound so easy.
You make it sound so easy.
I think you'll find it very interesting.
I think you'll find it very interesting.
What's there to explain?
What will that prove?
Tom plays quarterback on our high school's football team.
Tom had to spend a night in jail.
It's been changed.
Tom, if you're not too busy, could you come to my office for a minute?
I don't care about any of those things.
Tom is waiting in the conference room.
There is a lot of snow on the roof.
Does it matter to you?
Does it matter to you?
Tom bought several cameras last year.
I couldn't remember ever having met her.
I couldn't remember ever having met her.
I've never seen them so happy.
I've never seen them so happy.
She gives him the creeps.
Everybody tasted the food.
Is everybody having a good time?
Just watch me.
Just watch me.
As a child, I loved Barbie.
The medication is working.
Tom hasn't translated the article yet.
I want to get married.
Are you really sure?
Tom didn't know where his pen was.
Is this about me?
Tom wants to talk about the project.
What's the situation?
We started singing.
We expected that to happen.
Tom doesn't want to get married.
Everyone looked surprised.
You should look into it.
You should look into it.
Tom closed his eyes for a few seconds.
I've met someone.
I've met someone.
Every snowflake is unique.
I can't let Tom do that.
Tom will catch you.
Tom will catch you.
That doesn't sound quite right.
Tom let out a few words in French.
I've already called Tom.
I've already called Tom.
Tom turned the knob.
Tom said that he did his homework by himself.
Tom said that he did his homework by himself.
Please talk to me.
Let's calm down.
Tom has quite a temper.
Tom is completely wrong.
Tom is going to love it here.
I hope you feel at home.
I hope you feel at home.
We have to give it a try.
We have to give it a try.
If I'd had more money, I'd have bought that pen.
If I'd had more money, I'd have bought that pen.
The pen I lost yesterday was new.
The pen I lost yesterday was new.
Tom was perfectly fine.
Tom is currently in danger.
That building is the tallest in Japan.
Tom's obviously drunk.
Scary, isn't it?
Tom is wealthy.
Tom said I should talk to you.
I know the song.
They're rich.
Why did you want to speak with us?
Tom is quite weak.
Do you understand the situation?
Do you understand the situation?
There are no options.
Mary has stopped smoking.
I usually get up at seven.
Tom sleeps in the nude.
I don't have the energy.
I can't believe we're here.
I can't believe we're here.
We are both adults.
Tom is your son, right?
Would you like to have a look?
You'll be great.
You'll be great.
It wouldn't matter.
Wow, look at this.
Wow, look at this.
This road isn't on the map.
Drop your guns.
Drop your guns.
Drop your guns.
Drop your guns.
What colour is the bird?
We'll make it work.
We look like children.
I was told to come in.
There's got be a better way.
We must talk first.
How big an idiot are you?
Tom smiled slightly.
I was born in Osaka, but brought up in Tokyo.
Tom wasn't a bit scared.
He has been hospitalized.
Please come and get me.
Please come and get me.
I used to be pretty good at this.
Do you care what kind of music we listen to?
Don't expect everyone to agree with you.
Tom can't accept your gift.
We learn to read and write.
How does this thing work?
I waited for the bus.
I waited for the bus.
We all make mistakes.
Men talk about women all the time.
I couldn't be happier for you.
I couldn't be happier for you.
I couldn't be happier for you.
I couldn't be happier for you.
We aren't getting anywhere.
Perhaps you would be happier in another job.
Perhaps you would be happier in another job.
Just let me see it.
Just let me see it.
Just let me see it.
Just let me see it.
You'll get caught.
Tom has only used this once.
They're done.
I brought that back from Australia.
I wanted to hurt Tom.
I wanted to hurt Tom.
I see no cause for alarm.
Tom works in a factory.
He is a jack of all trades.
The girls laughed.
Yes, gladly.
It cost 30 million dollars.
It cost 30 million dollars.
It cost 30 million dollars.
Did you serve in the military?
Unfortunately, I am too busy now.
I'm all done.
Tom is always in a hurry.
At least I tried to do something.
My band name's Red Hot.
You aren't dead.
Modern jazz is not my line.
Tom, I want to talk to you.
They need protection.
Tom is busy writing something at his desk.
Tom, I'm scared we're going to get in trouble.
We're all safe.
Tom made me sing.
Who asked for your opinion?
Who asked for your opinion?
Why don't you call Tom and remind him?
Why don't you call Tom and remind him?
Tom speaks French better than any of the other students in his class.
As strange as it may sound, what Tom said is what really happened.
I can't believe Tom is still talking about what happened two years ago.
Would you have liked the dress if it had been a darker color?
When do you have to leave?
When do you have to leave?
She studied in Belgium.
Tom sings well.
Please let me try it again.
Please let me try it again.
Please let me try it again.
Why can't I sing like they can?
Let me explain our situation.
Could you wait until after Monday?
You've got my keys.
They're early.
How does that sound?
The wind is weak.
This operation is simple.
Tom turned the key.
Are you sure you don't want to go?
Are you sure you don't want to go?
Are you sure you don't want to go?
Use your fist.
Use your fist.
Tom is too weak to move.
My brother studied in England.
I just woke up.
Tom fell into the mud.
We make a pretty good team, don't we?
It all started on a hot summer night.
Alfred has lost interest in this project.
Then what does it mean?
I understand you had an interesting day.
I thought you wouldn't be so busy.
I thought you wouldn't be so busy.
I thought you wouldn't be so busy.
It couldn't be done.
Horses are bigger than dogs, but cats are smaller than dogs.
At first, I didn't believe her.
At first, I didn't believe her.
We learn by experience.
Even if he doesn't come, we'll have to begin.
They lost their dog.
The area of Canada is greater than that of the United States.
Tom must be hungry.
Am I hired?
Tom wants to become a teacher.
I must translate the sentences.
What is your favorite bird?
What is your favorite bird?
That would take all day.
All the stores are closed.
That would take all day.
All the stores were closed.
How can I prove it?
I didn't hear any sounds.
I didn't hear any sounds.
The students are making good progress in English.
I have to call Tom.
Are all the windows closed?
I've got the car keys.
Are all the windows closed?
Are you surprised to see me?
I have to see this movie.
I have to see this movie.
My shirt was ruined.
When did your baby start talking?
Please give me my book back.
Please give me my book back.
I'll check again.
I'll check again.
Tom looked very old.
I just think I should try.
Can you help me install this software?
Stay in the light.
I don't study as much as I should.
I'm not that hungry.
Bigfoot is not a pet. For one thing, they don't like being called 'bigfoot'.
I think it's time for me to show you how to do that properly.
I suppose you know why Tom didn't do what we asked him to do.
When I got out of prison, Tom helped me get back on my feet.
I can't tell you how good it makes me feel to see you alive.
Tom sang three songs and then left the stage.
Tom is looking for someone to help him translate a document from French into English.
When I was about to leave my house, I got a telephone call from her.
I figured you wouldn't want the teacher to know you hadn't done your homework yet.
Tom is captain of the football team and is on the baseball team as well.
He was right the first time.
Where's the hospital?
I thought I was making some progress.
I thought I was making some progress.
We can't stand by and let this happen.
You sure can run fast.
This government is corrupt.
Tom found the key that he thought he'd lost.
His son is in college now.
He was bound hand and foot.
Unfortunately, the soup is only warm.
Tom told me that he could hear something, but he wasn't sure what it was.
Tom called the students back into the room to tell them about the plane crash.
I think I have a pretty good idea what Tom might be doing right now.
I've forgotten his last name.
We set out for home.
You wouldn't be lying to me, would you?
You wouldn't be lying to me, would you?
I have to sell all today.
She wouldn't be happy with him.
Autumn changed into winter.
Autumn changed into winter.
Leaves go brown in autumn.
Leaves go brown in autumn.
I've read both these books.
Is this art?
He drank of the spring.
We'll meet you downstairs.
We'll meet you downstairs.
For the first time in my life, I found myself all alone in an unknown city.
For the first time in my life, I found myself all alone in an unknown city.
It's all your own fault.
It's all your own fault.
It's all your own fault.
Where's Tom? "Beats me."
I got a phone call from him just as I was about to go to bed.
Tom claims he doesn't watch much TV, but he watches more than three hours every day.
Me, me, me. Now picture billions of voices screaming that and you got yourself modern civilization.
That's being done.
They would have to move fast.
I can't let you do this.
Tom didn't have to explain it to me.
I didn't hang up on you.
I didn't hang up on you.
It was all a big mistake.
I've been busy all week.
I've been busy all week.
This type of thing happens all the time.
This has all been a mistake.
What's in all these boxes?
I'm not all that busy.
We weren't all that busy.
We weren't all that busy.
Did you open all the boxes?
Did you open all the boxes?
We weren't all that hungry.
I've been shopping all day.
This type of music is not to everyone's taste.
I hope Tom finds happiness in his life.
I didn't want to leave before the work was completed.
I didn't want to leave before the work was completed.
You've lost everything.
You've lost everything.
Put the book on the bottom shelf.
Did that hurt?
We aren't that poor.
We aren't that poor.
Tom died a few days later.
I'm almost done here.
I don't care how much you want it. I'm not going to give it to you.
I don't have enough money on me right now to pay you what I owe you.
I have no reason to believe that Tom won't do what I asked him to do.
I've just spoken to your French teacher and he says you're doing well in his class.
She told me once and for all that she did not want to see me again.
I managed to catch the 8 o'clock train by running all the way to the station.
I assume Tom will be the same as he was the last time we saw him.
This is a personal matter.
So, have you thought about my offer?
I won't get in the way.
I'm sorry I didn't call.
My wife is away for the weekend.
Why did you do it, Tom?
Say hello to Tom for me.
I've got nothing else to do.
I've lost your phone number.
Aren't you scared, Tom?
We're the same size.
Why are you sitting here in the dark?
Tom looks different today.
Why should I stop doing this?
Why should I stop doing this?
We want out of here.
Did you make any mistakes?
Did you make any mistakes?
Did you make any mistakes?
Tom must be up to something.
How could I be so stupid?
How could I be so stupid?
Do you want to go get a drink?
Do you want to go get a drink?
Let's talk about what went wrong.
Tom always wears blue shirts.
The fish aren't biting today.
Tom always wants to try something new.
In retrospect, Tom wishes he had spent more time studying.
Please begin immediately.
Please begin immediately.
We'd given Tom up for lost.
Do you think that Tom is happy?
Do you think that Tom is happy?
Do you think that Tom is happy?
Do you think that Tom is happy?
I suppose you know where Tom is.
I suppose you know where Tom is.
I never imagined myself going home so early.
I never imagined myself going home so early.
You're up to something, aren't you?
You're up to something, aren't you?
A portrait of an old man was hanging on the wall.
I received this electric knife as a gift.
What's that, buddy?
He loves writing articles for Wikipedia.
He is a Hollywood star.
It is their last movie.
I saw her get in a car.
I saw her get in a car.
I saw her get in a car.
Where are your sentences?
Where are her sentences?
Tom is having difficulty breathing.
The bank wants its money back.
Weren't you crying?
Weren't you crying?
Weren't you crying?
I've been in prison for three years.
I have no knowledge about their plans.
I've always hated her.
I've always hated her.
I've always hated him.
I've always hated him.
Jiro could not act otherwise.
His opinion doesn't count.
Your opinion doesn't matter.
Your opinion doesn't matter.
I didn't expect these results.
You have more energy than me.
I don't think he wants to marry you.
Today's a bit warmer than usual.
It was so cold that he was shivering.
Tom will be back in the afternoon.
They chose him as their representative.
Is that what the government wants?
All the students have gone home.
That's my mistake.
Would you like a newspaper or magazine?
Most people don't think so.
We don't think it matters.
We don't think it matters.
Are you sure Tom was the one who did this?
Are you sure Tom was the one who did this?
We just didn't expect it.
Tom has promised to do that.
You refused to pay.
We can do without that.
Tom refused to do that.
How do we get there?
How much did we lose?
I'm glad no one died.
Tom died a few years later.
Tom died three months later.
Tom died three years later.
Tom died three days later.
I'll watch TV.
Your life depends on it.
Tom is one of the world's richest and most famous men.
I'd like to hear exactly how Tom managed to get that old car running again.
Tom attended high school for three years without missing a single day or ever being late.
I plan to get a hold of Tom by phone tomorrow and ask him to help.
Suddenly, my feet stopped.
I wonder what's in the box.
That was a joke.
I think Tom was drunk.
They'll call.
I'm sure glad no one was killed.
I'm sure glad no one was killed.
Rich people aren't always happy.
Prices have been rising.
Tom certainly has a way with children.
Tom started to climb the ladder.
You don't need me to tell you that.
Tom was sitting in an armchair.
Where should we meet?
Where should we meet?
I don't know where to turn to.
Mistakes are made all the time.
He has sharp hearing.
Tom is going to sell his house.
He was chosen captain.
I finished the work in less than an hour.
This chair is yours.
Tom abandoned the idea.
Tom didn't remember where he'd put his pen.
Tom got married when he was thirty years old.
I sleep on my side.
She bought a handkerchief for ten dollars.
I can't believe I'm doing this again.
I could scarcely breathe.
It's early.
It was not until Chikako left me that I realized how much I loved her.
That's exactly what I'm suggesting.
We have important work to do.
Is Tom happy?
I think I can arrange that.
Can you at least try?
Does Tom wear glasses?
I'll be back when I'm done.
Tom has been busy all week.
I've never had a steady job.
I don't know why that's important.
I like trains very much.
We need accurate information.
I have to set an example.
The train passed by us.
The train passed by us.
That was the basic idea.
Tom did the best he could, but he still wasn't able to pass the course.
We'd better have a talk.
I can't believe I let Tom do that.
I can't believe I let Tom do that.
You have weapons, right?
That must've been something.
They said they're busy.
I have the information you wanted.
What's your favorite city?
We meet here once a month.
I just ignore them.
You don't need me to tell you that.
They'll catch us.
They'll catch us.
Tom looked indignant.
I suggest that you go and see a doctor about this as soon as you can.
Do you want a second opinion? I can get another doctor to come here right away.
If there's anything you want to do, you should do it if it makes you happy.
I think I can speak French well enough to say pretty much anything I want to say.
From the time he was a small boy, Tom knew that he wanted to be a policeman.
Are they busy?
I hope we are the last.
No one's going to save you now.
No one's going to save you now.
I grew up in the country.
I can't believe you did this behind my back.
I can't believe you did this behind my back.
I have homework to do.
We deserve better than that.
Everyone started crying again.
He is uncertain about his future.
We're getting married in October.
Why should we stop?
It was just supposed to be a joke.
He was my only joy.
What the hell is going on here?
I've got a class in a few minutes.
Is the bank still open?
I don't have time to go to the movies.
Tom wrote his name on the blackboard.
This situation has to change.
I'll mail this letter today.
I was breathing.
They're lying.
Tom heard the noise.
Tom heard a noise.
You'll die in jail.
Will you go to the cinema tonight?
I have an idea for a song.
Why don't you carry a weapon?
I hope this helps.
Do you have any ideas?
Do you have any ideas?
Tom waited breathlessly.
I see you found your bag.
So we're gonna have a barbecue party. Tell your parents that my parents are gonna be there.
My father always speaks to me in French and my mother always speaks to me in English.
Tell me why you're crying.
Let Tom decide for himself.
Tom wants to pay back the money he owes.
I don't think Tom is breathing.
Tom isn't too happy about it.
I have to go home and do my homework.
Do you think we should raise prices?
Do you want me to wait here?
Do you want me to wait here?
Do you want me to wait here?
I'm busy doing homework.
I'm busy doing homework.
I thought you wouldn't like it.
Let's hope this never happens again.
We lost almost everything.
Wait beside the car for me!
Wait beside the car for me!
Food shouldn't look like this.
Here's a little nugget of advice for you, Tom.
You're too busy.
When my father came home, I was studying.
You're too busy.
Everything else doesn't matter now.
Tom usually doesn't make mistakes.
You chose this job yourself, right?
Tom didn't waste any time, did he?
When's Tom arriving?
I enjoy listening to Russian speech.
I followed him into the kitchen.
The kitchen is a little bit too small.
They caught me.
Why should I pay that much?
You shouldn't leave your windows open.
Why should we help?
Don't talk about me like I'm not here.
Do you think fish can hear?
No one expected that to happen.
Tom slept in class again today.
If you shout from the top of a cliff, you can hear the echo of your voice.
Tom is so old that even the oldest in the village first knew him as an old man.
I don't quite believe it when I hear someone claim they can speak more than five languages fluently.
I was born and bred in Britain.
Expect to be pleasantly surprised.
She got more than she bargained for.
That wasn't something I expected.
He is different from his older brother.
Esperanto belongs to everyone. Unfortunately, not everyone knows that.
We didn't know how to do it, so we asked for help.
The housing market is stagnant.
Do you have another opinion?
What happened to the rest of your crew?
Tom couldn't find his keys.
She has been with me through the ebb and flow of my fortunes.
We'll find a solution, I'm sure.
Tom is finally getting married.
You'll feel better tomorrow, I promise.
I'm much better now.
Horus was the god of the sky, war and hunting.
All the flowers in the garden are yellow.
I felt as if a cold hand was touching me.
I felt someone hit me from behind.
We finish each other's sentences.
I have nothing to be afraid of.
I fully understand your feelings.
Tom is feeling good about himself.
You can call me whenever you want.
Tom needs someone to speak with.
Tom never fired a shot.
Tom is amazingly well informed.
Stop beating around the bush and answer my question!
Stop beating around the bush and answer my question!
Don't beat around the bush; tell me who is to blame.
Don't beat around the bush; tell me who is to blame.
Instead of beating around the bush, Jones got straight to the point.
Stop beating around the bush and tell us what you really think.
Stop beating around the bush and tell us what you really think.
Let's stop beating around the bush and cut to the chase.
Stop beating around the bush and tell me directly why you're so angry.
Stop beating around the bush and tell me directly why you're so angry.
Stop beating around the bush and tell me directly why you're so angry.
I'm not going to get up.
Tom came up with a good idea.
I'm very serious.
Tom is very calm.
What's your favorite baseball team?
Tom has decided to have the surgery.
I said I wasn't busy.
We needed this win.
Wish all my friends and loved one Happy New Year.
Beauty of the surrounding world.
I wish you both a lifetime of happiness.
My parents usually speak to each other in French, even though my mother is a native English speaker.
I don't allow it.
You should've expected us.
You should've expected us.
This is the first time I've written anything in French.
Tom doesn't have to talk about it if he doesn't want to.
The escaped prisoners are considered armed and dangerous.
We figured it out quickly.
I'm still figuring stuff out.
Do you think we'll be able to figure it out?
The water feels really warm.
It's a very nice feeling.
When do classes start?
I think Tom is still in prison.
I think Tom is still in prison.
We have different opinions.
Tom can finish the job.
Tom sometimes comes home late.
I'm pretty sure that Tom hasn't seen this yet.
We should be able to do a lot better than this next time.
We're about the same height.
Tom said he would wait.
Tom didn't know all the facts.
Tom is wearing suit today.
There are several options.
I just want to be sure.
She drank the expired milk.
Have you thought of checking the oil level?
This book is too difficult for me.
Do you regret marrying me?
What's your favorite gadget?
I'll make some calls.
Tom said he had more important things to do.
I know somebody's watching me.
Tom didn't like the plan.
Tom is no longer a student.
Tom finished the job in three hours.
Tom was obviously sick.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'm sure Tom will help you.
I'll write you a note.
The price is a little high for me.
Tom was never happy.
Tom looked like he'd slept in his clothes.
Tom quickly went up the stairs.
You'll just have to wait.
Who did Tom sell his car to?
What Tom said was beside the point.
I can't remember the last time I saw you so happy.
Tom didn't know how many of them needed help.
Why do they want to talk to me?
Tom liked to write stories.
What flavor is that ice cream?
Tom isn't going to get away with it this time.
I wonder why Tom said that.
Tom is very stupid.
Tom isn't much of an artist.
Tom never was rich.
Tom wants to be a doctor when he grows up.
Tom didn't want to answer the question.
Tom can speak three foreign languages.
He showed us photos.
She was admitted to Waseda University.
Let's help each other.
Her birthday is May 5th.
It's my younger brother's.
Tom couldn't stop crying.
We'll leave as soon as it stops raining.
You picked the wrong person.
You picked the wrong person.
Tom always wears black clothes.
Tom never said that he wanted to leave.
Tom is still not accustomed to city life.
Neither one of us rides horses.
Tom, hold your horses.
My parents are visiting.
There are no stars tonight.
Call me any time you want.
What size do you wear?
Let's try and find some shade.
Tom called.
Tom is totally dependent on his parents.
Tom is three years older than I am, but he's shorter than I am.
Tom is used to getting up early in the morning.
I don't know how Tom finds the time.
Tom is very good at changing the subject.
Tom is used to this kind of situation.
I do not get up early.
Mr Yoshida is at home in French history.
Tom promised not to tell anyone about it.
Tom teaches French to my children.
Tom turned right when he should've turned left.
Tom turned right when he should've turned left.
Tom talked in his sleep.
I talk in my sleep.
The shirt that I've just bought is very nice.
Tom didn't do it for money.
I will have finished the work before you return.
Tom lives in a quiet neighborhood.
They know the situation.
The bird is dead.
I want to talk to you, Tom.
Make me happy.
I'll get to the point.
We left at 2:30.
We left at 2:30.
Is Tom stupid?
Tell Tom that you love him before it's too late.
I think the reason Tom is so good at French is that he watches a lot of French movies.
My mother speaks French better than my father speaks English, so they usually speak to each other in French.
Whether you believe it or not, I want to get this thing over with as much as you do.
Tom is a member of this organization.
Tom began reading that book three weeks ago and he still has only read less than half of it.
I don't think it makes him a bad person just because he's decided he likes to eat horse meat.
Throughout my life, I've had the great pleasure of travelling all around the world and working in many diverse nations.
If Tom had been able to speak French better, he would've been able to tell everybody how he really felt.
I'm getting married next week.
Tom lost a leg.
Let me stay here.
Tom caught me.
I have a basic knowledge of French.
I find that very interesting.
I find that pretty interesting.
None of them are busy.
Is that an order?
I feel lucky.
Who are you calling stupid?
What else were you expecting?
Tom began to feel afraid.
And then everyone started singing.
What exactly were you expecting?
It was an unexpected opportunity.
Sooner or later, we'll have to buy a new TV since the TV we have now is a very old model.
Why did he do such a thing?
There isn't anybody in front of the main gate yet.
I'm just calling to say hi.
Do you help me?
Is it possible to land a plane on this island?
I'm sure that Tom will get the job.
He did a cartwheel.
Imogen of the Internet is not yet notable on Wikipedia, but it is one of the many things she aspires to.
We talked to each other in French since we thought people around us wouldn't be able to understand what we were saying.
We were unsure what kind of person Tom would be and whether he would like living in the same house as us.
She is a taxi driver.
What he needs is a swift kick in the tokhes.
What can be more important than that?
Tom went into the kitchen to get something.
My name isn't on the list.
Tom is working on a new novel.
Tom will never believe me again.
Going to the little girl's room is an euphemistic expression for "going to the toilet."
We're no longer in danger.
I couldn't understand a single word of what they said.
Tom can touch his nose with his tongue.
We're confident of our victory.
Tom pulled something out of his pocket.
Tom would tell me the truth, I'm sure.
Tom writes to me at least once a week.
Acne is a very common problem, especially among teenagers.
Come back anytime.
Tom says he feels a lot better today.
Tom was supposed to call around 2:30.
Tom wasn't able to open the box.
I need your car keys.
Who would believe me?
Tom did what he thought was right.
Tom drank three glasses of water.
It's an expression.
Tom sensed danger.
Seriously, I’m not lying.
Do you really think I'm afraid of the dark?
Where the hell have you been Tom?
You shouldn't have lied to him about the baby.
I have many books that I haven't read.
That shirt is inappropriate.
Elizabeth I became the Queen of England in 1558.
You're really something, you know that?
Tom doesn't want to talk to you now.
Tom doesn't want to talk to you now.
Tom claimed that he had not eaten for three weeks.
When do you get up?
When do you get up?
It's a complicated world.
I have to let you go.
I have to let you go.
I have to let you go.
I have to let you go.
I have to let you go.
I have to let you go.
Winning isn't the only thing that matters.
The richest man in the world cannot buy her love.
Who do you think wrote this note?
You should calm down.
You should calm down.
You should calm down.
You should calm down.
Tom enjoys listening to live music.
Why aren't you helping me?
Tom is pretty busy.
Tom admitted his mistakes.
I was able to finish the work earlier than I had expected.
I know a few words of French, just enough to be understood.
Tom grew up thinking that he needed to eat meat every day.
I want you to tell me what you really think of me.
Tom suggested that we leave right away before it started to rain.
That he was busy is true.
This offer is valid for five days.
Do you want to go and see a film this evening?
I'm going up the stairs.
Tom has given us so much help.
Let me give you some examples.
Let me give you some examples.
They've simply given up hope.
I think I'll give that a try.
I was only given thirty minutes to do that.
We're never giving up hope.
Tom gave everything he had.
Tom failed.
Both his grandfathers are dead.
Somebody called.
Tom chose the wine.
Tom's not at all sure.
Call me as soon as you get home.
Tom works at a hospital near here.
How nice of you to come.
Tom is never at a loss for words.
Tom is never at a loss for words.
Tom came home early.
What does Tom have on?
Tom read thirty books last year.
Tom ran to catch the last train.
They answered their teacher's question with difficulty.
I decided not to go to the movie after all.
I decided not to go to the movie after all.
I feel like I'm going insane.
Stand back, please.
Give me that thing.
Give me that thing.
Give me that thing.
Give me that thing.
This isn't music.
I forgot my bag.
I forgot my bag.
Everything looks exactly the same.
The plane turned eastward.
Tom didn't look sick.
I'd like to meet your older sister.
Tom let us go.
Can't you move faster?
Can't you move faster?
She sang with a beautiful voice.
Did you catch the train?
Tom didn't notice the change.
Tom apparently forgot to do that.
I wonder what's going on.
The mistake was mine.
Don't open those windows.
Don't open those windows.
Tom knows we aren't busy.
Who made this plan?
You've probably heard of me.
This car is easy to drive.
Tom promised to do his best.
Tom said it didn't matter.
Why doesn't Tom like to eat fish?
Why doesn't Tom like to eat fish?
Something has to change.
They'll wait.
Are you sure you want me to sell this?
Let me know when you're done!
Let me know when you've finished.
I thought Tom was still in jail.
I could have lost my job.
That's actually a really good idea.
Tom is calm.
Don't throw trash here.
I added your name to the list.
What should we talk about?
Tom said something really stupid.
We don't have a cat.
I can talk to him for hours.
They have some doubts.
Are you certain about this?
Are you certain about that?
Are you certain about this?
They have many students.
My parents are dead.
Tom is living abroad.
They forgave you.
They forgave you.
They forgave you.
They forgave you.
Tom is always open to new ideas.
The deadline is 2:30 on Monday.
My kids grew up here.
The list keeps getting longer.
2016 is the International Year of Pulses.
They have their own culture.
You shouldn't speak to your parents that way.
He was in good spirits.
The horse has four feet.
I enjoyed it, too.
She doesn't talk to me anymore.
We've run out of food.
You shouldn't judge people based on their names.
Mount Everest is also known as Qomolangma.
I'm sorry, I forgot to do my homework.
And then everyone started laughing.
I sometimes just don't want to get out of bed in the morning.
I can't believe Tom is still talking about what happened two years ago.
Tom never lost hope.
As strange as it may sound, what Tom said is what really happened.
As strange as it may sound, what Tom said is what really happened.
As strange as it may sound, what Tom said is what really happened.
What a weird idea!
I suppose you know why Tom didn't do what we asked him to do.
Why are you wearing sunglasses at night?
I can't remember the meaning of the word that I looked up yesterday.
That's the most important reason.
This book belongs to Tom.
Are you asking my opinion?
Thanks for showing me how to do that.
This car belongs to Tom.
Give me the knife.
I want a direct answer.
I think I fainted.
I think I fainted.
I love talking to you.
Save them.
Save them.
The boy grabbed the cat by the tail.
Please stay in line.
The sun is the eternal source of light, heat, and life.
I hope Tom isn't looking for us.
I hope Tom isn't looking for us.
I hardly ever watch TV.
They were very busy.
It's very important to us.
This is very important to us.
I don't know why Tom is so busy today.
I have three younger sisters.
Even Tom got up early today.
Tom forgot his own birthday.
We have to make a plan.
I don't like winter.
Tom is fully aware of the problem.
Tom refused to go to bed.
This is an old building.
She wants to marry a rich man.
Tom was trying not to laugh.
Did you get my flowers?
Tom, you're already drunk and it's only five!
But what if we get caught?
You spend too much time alone.
You spend too much time alone.
How am I going to explain this?
You're an interesting girl.
Tom is our only hope.
Is this a fact or an opinion?
Kokkinakis banged your girlfriend. Sorry to tell you that, mate.
He went to London in 1970.
We've both made sacrifices.
I'm not guilty.
I have a bad headache today.
Tom was sitting at a nearby table.
Tom is sitting in front of the TV.
If you want to sit down, sit down.
If you want to sit down, sit down.
The children were sitting around the campfire singing songs.
Where's the key?
I know what she's capable of.
I'm sure you don't want to go.
I'm sure you don't want to go.
I'm sure you don't want to go.
I'm sure you don't want to go.
My sister watches television.
I promise I won't tell.
I promise I won't tell.
Don't come back here.
Why did you come so early?
Why did you come so early?
Why did you come so early?
I'll tell Tom you called.
I'll tell Tom you called.
I'll tell Tom you called.
Tom is reading a magazine.
You don't look very good.
How many teams are there?
Do you know where his keys are?
Do you know where his keys are?
He was young and foolish.
She was young and foolish.
The person we're trying to catch is very dangerous.
The man on the bench was obviously dead.
Who made this possible?
It's not that scary.
Where do you want to meet?
Where do you want to meet?
I think we're safe for a while.
Tom dreamed of becoming a rock star.
This might take a few minutes.
You're very rich, aren't you?
Tom decided to stay until 2:30.
We can't drink milk.
We'll call you later.
I'm just not sure.
I hope it's worth it.
Tom was on that team.
Tom had no idea what to say.
I was happy there.
I was happy there.
She promised to give me a phone call.
You're drunk.
This might sound strange, but he has suddenly disappeared.
Look at that red building.
This is the lake's deepest point.
I am used to not to smoke.
I almost never watch TV.
I don't watch TV very much.
What movies have you seen recently?
If you understand, please raise your hand.
We're no longer living in the stone age.
Tom is all grown up.
We'll go when it quits raining.
You're losing me.
I want to try to help you.
I hope this medicine works.
You used me.
I'm wet.
Free Caucasus!
Which color do you think she prefers?
The crew found a stowaway.
The crew found a stowaway.
She is a quiet woman.
Tom is helping them.
I'm sorry, I just don't know.
Tom is dead, isn't he?
I wanted to participate.
Happy is the one who has not killed the child in his soul.
The girl was afraid of her own shadow.
She is learning very quickly.
She kept on writing stories about animals.
Most Hollywood movies have happy endings
I was born in Argentina, but I was educated in Brazil.
Which color do you think Tom will like better?
What's going to be different?
This expression is very Chinese.
I have never seen any reason to be frightened of the dark.
Where's that sound coming from?
My bag is very heavy.
You were very happy.
You were very happy.
Are you happy, Tom?
Which color do you think Tom prefers?
His name is further down the list.
Sometimes you go by bus, and sometimes by car.
They want to meet you.
They want to meet you.
They want to meet you.
They want to meet you.
It was worth trying.
I have a lot of dreams.
Tom isn't supposed to be here.
We ought to get over there.
Call an ambulance!
Call an ambulance!
Is she dating someone?
Tom thinks there's hope.
The bus had already left by the time my wife was finished dressing.
I hope that Tom will never do that again.
I hope that Tom will never do that again.
May I have a drink?
We were just hanging out.
Can you translate it?
Can you translate it?
Can you translate it?
Can you translate it?
This is your bag, isn't it?
This is your bag, isn't it?
Tom didn't admit his mistake.
Tom didn't admit his mistake.
We'll take that for granted.
We need to deal with the problem before it gets any worse.
Air is to man what water is to fish.
She was pleased with her new dress.
I hear music.
I thought Tom had already left.
I thought Tom had already left.
You've quit smoking, right?
Well, it's obvious now.
That's close enough.
I just think Tom was drunk.
The kitchen was clean.
You're obviously sick.
That's a debt I want to repay.
That's a debt I want to repay.
He is learning very quickly.
My advice is not to tell Tom.
I want you to listen to this song.
Tom is pale.
I suppose I could help.
They were safe.
I hope you don't do that.
I'm sure you're hungry.
I'm sure you're hungry.
I'm sure you're hungry.
Whatever you do, don't forget this.
Whatever you do, don't forget this.
I met him several times.
That's not such a good idea.
I decided it was a good idea.
I decided it was a good idea.
We take the same bus to work.
I'll have it sent to you.
I went there by train.
I went there by train.
I could really do with a grilled chicken right now.
He asked me if I was busy.
He asked me if I was busy.
Tom is always studying.
Tom is always studying.
Why did you stop talking?
Why did you stop talking?
Why did you stop talking?
Tom took a look at the pictures.
Tom should be back by 2:30.
You shot me.
Tom is interesting.
Go back to your room.
Tom is rich, isn't he?
I drink milk almost every day.
I meant that as a joke.
Apparently you're right.
Tom wants to know if you'll be ready by 2:30.
Did you really think today was my birthday?
Did you really think today was my birthday?
This store isn't very big.
Is Tom dead yet?
You shouldn't have called me.
You shouldn't have called me.
You shouldn't have called me.
You shouldn't have called me.
I think you're absolutely right.
There are options.
Tom was poor.
You need the keys?
May I talk to you?
Can I talk to her?
I guess I'm going to have to learn French.
I'm sure that Tom is busy.
Tom quickly realized his error.
They are all busy.
That event happened 15 years ago.
She and I are the same age.
Treat him well.
Treat him well.
He is used to such situations.
May I watch TV tonight?
I am a new student.
By the pricking of my thumbs, something wicked this way comes.
It's a stupid rule.
She didn't want to speak to anyone.
Are these your daughters?
Now pay attention.
I've written several songs in French.
I don't get up as early as Tom.
Tom is getting ready for school.
It is his photo.
It is her photo.
Tom never forgave me.
Tom made a statement.
I saw Tom get in a car.
Tom got on the train.
We all make mistakes, don't we?
Is that not clear?
Nobody talked about the movie.
We've got to talk seriously.
We've got to talk seriously.
Tom is my teacher.
I thought you'd want to take a look.
I thought you'd want to take a look.
I thought you'd want to take a look.
I thought you'd want to take a look.
Tom and his friends made a short film.
It's 2:30 now.
I didn't even know you had a horse.
I didn't even know you had a horse.
Do you know the movie Avatar?
The girls were quite impressed.
The girls were quite impressed.
The suspect remains at large.
It's clear that he likes you.
When you were a child, did you have any friends?
I asked my friend for advice.
I wish that we could spend more time together.
Wait, why am I telling you this?
Wait, why am I telling you this?
Tom is smarter than most boys his age.
Wait, why am I telling you this?
Wait, why am I telling you this?
Tom bought an ice cream and sorbet maker.
Don't talk during class.
He was fortunate enough to catch the train.
Tom was pacing in his room, unable to calm himself down.
After winter comes spring.
Tom sighed heavily.
Eat not only fish, but also meat.
You need to take this seriously.
Tom won't want to wait.
Now I am happy!
Now I am happy!
We're just students.
I want it back.
I want it back.
I have no idea what to do.
It was a good idea.
She refused to take the money.
We found that everyone was asleep.
He always repeats the same mistake.
What's on TV?
It's a common French expression.
He was talking to a girl.
Where did you find that dress?
Where did you find that dress?
I won't leave without you.
I won't leave without you.
Please calm down.
I wanted to sell it anyway.
I wanted to sell it anyway.
Tom thinks that's strange.
Tom thinks that's strange.
Barbie has blond hair and blue eyes.
Classes start on Monday.
Wait over there.
I told you not to call me on weekends.
He dropped in on me.
Don't you want to study?
Oslo wants to make its center car-free within four years.
We're sharpening the knives.
The world is a dangerous place.
That isn't a new idea.
You have no idea what you're talking about.
You have no idea what you're talking about.
The very day I got married, my mom died.
She's busy now and can't speak to you.
That's a filthy job and I don't want to do it.
The day is beautiful.
This movie is suitable for children.
This movie is suitable for children.
Is your name on the list?
Is your name on the list?
Read the article on the second page.
Read the article on the second page.
He was lying on the couch.
Tom can sing.
I don't like horror movies.
The other day I visited the museum.
I know you hate it.
I know you hate it.
I know you hate it.
I know you hate it.
I know you hate it.
I know you hate it.
That's really nice to hear.
Tom looked sick.
We all cried a lot.
I'm sorry. I shouldn't have said that.
I'm sorry. I shouldn't have said that.
I just want you to be happy.
I just want you to be happy.
I just want you to be happy.
I just want you to be happy.
They live downstairs.
You're not a city girl, are you?
Just give me one more chance.
He's dating my sister.
She's very sweet.
He's very sweet.
Tom lives in this building.
I can't be certain.
We help each other.
No one was helping us.
I wonder what Tom thinks about this.
I wonder what Tom would think about this.
I like the way it sounds.
He is a nice person, to be sure, but not very clever.
What exactly are you trying to prove?
She seemed to like that.
It almost worked.
I forgot my bag.
The cat is not dead.
I want to talk about it now.
It was a complete success.
We only use 10% of our brain.
It uses solar power.
It uses solar power.
It's an American company.
It's your color!
You don't look your age.
Tom just disappeared.
I had no idea what I was looking for.
I had no idea what I was looking for.
I won't lose it.
I'm not convinced yet.
Tom was busy working.
Don't you think it's strange?
Don't you think it's strange?
She uses Botox.
She wants to look younger.
She has a body to die for.
He has a body to die for.
I hope Tom will do that.
I hope no one was injured.
We hope you like it.
We hope you like it.
Tom sang very well.
I'm sure you're correct.
Just face the facts.
Tom called three days ago.
He felt a little guilty.
I can't believe I just said that!
I can't believe I just said that!
Tom believes that life exists on other planets.
Do you want to talk about them?
Look at the house with the red roof.
Sorry, I don't follow.
Tom is the fastest driver.
It was a lovely evening.
How do you spend your free time?
How do you spend your free time?
How do you usually spend your weekends?
I wanted to talk some more, but she hung up.
How much time do you spend on Facebook?
Tom had to stay in the hospital for three weeks.
Let's leave the building.
Let's get a beer.
How do you count to ten in French?
Those people are dangerous.
My grandfather loved reading.
How much time do you spend on Facebook?
You have to spend more time with your son.
How many hours a day do you spend in your office?
It's priceless.
It's priceless.
He caught a big one.
He caught a big one.
How many does he want?
The dog eats a lot of meat every day.
Each season has its own beauty.
Don't say such a thing in her absence.
I'll call later.
When are you going to pay me back the money I lent you?
Help each other with homework.
I've heard that you shouldn't eat red meat more than once a day.
What do you want from me?
What else do you want from me?
What exactly do you want from me?
We caught him red-handed.
Your name's further down the list.
Your name's further down the list.
Please wait here for a while.
The team waited.
We have to try.
Believe it or not, this woman has three kids.
Don't smoke so much.
Don't smoke so heavily.
What's the joke?
I just wanted to check to see if you're OK.
We could talk about music.
Her smile made her look even more beautiful.
Just wait here.
I don't believe you. You're always lying.
Listen to me!
I just don't want to be left alone.
I just don't want to be left alone.
Do you have a daughter?
The girl wearing a white dress is my sister.
The girl wearing a white dress is my sister.
Can you tell me your address?
I have just one more thing to ask of you - get lost.
I never would've shot you.
I never would've shot you.
The shop is closed on Sunday.
She sang as she walked.
They have solved the problem once and for all.
Tom couldn't eat solid food for a week.
Let her wait!
Let him wait!
Let's go over what we already know.
Which do you think she chose?
Tom wouldn't allow me to help him.
Show him how to do this.
Tell Tom I want to talk to him.
Tell Tom I want to talk to him.
Let's sing some songs.
Don't you want to know for sure?
Don't you want to know for sure?
Let me explain that.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
I wasn't expecting to see you here.
The result of the election will be announced tomorrow.
Tom is too lenient with his students.
Tom wouldn't let me leave.
Tom left home at 2:30.
Tom can do this work alone.
The airplane ascended to four thousand feet.
I'm so glad you called.
I'm so glad you called.
I'm so glad you called.
I'm so glad you called.
I'm so glad you called.
I remember that you said that you had a car.
I remember that you said that you had a car.
We need assistance immediately.
She calls him every night.
She calls him every night.
How many books did you read?
We all wish for permanent world peace.
There was a thick fog.
Don't go for a walk naked!
He's never been abroad in his life.
She told him where to put the suitcase.
Whose tea is this?
Please don't use Facebook during business hours.
Please don't use Facebook during business hours.
Make a list.
Make a list.
Tom brought dinner.
Which floor is it?
We'll save you.
We'll save you.
Is it difficult work?
Those flowers are beautiful.
I haven't read all of his novels.
I know it hurts.
That's what I hope for.
When Tom woke up, everything was covered with snow.
I was hoping I wouldn't have to work on Sunday.
We don't think it's serious.
The police lowered their weapons.
We hope to see you again.
Things might've turned out better if you hadn't gone there.
When my father came home, I was studying.
Let's never lose hope.
I hope to see you there.
I hope this is accurate.
I hope that you like it.
I hope this is not true.
That's what I'm hoping for.
I'm supposed to be here all afternoon.
You must have been surprised to meet your teacher in such a place.
Nothing but a miracle can save her now.
Choose the right word!
The Alcatraz prison was closed in 1963.
I'll talk with you when you're not busy.
He is far from rich.
Here's a picture of me.
Give me the key to this castle!
Your efforts came to nothing.
You shouldn't smoke so much.
You shouldn't smoke so much.
He is supposed to be at home today.
Let's go to the theater together.
Let's go to the theater together.
Let's go to the theater together.
Stop the train.
Stop the train.
He's playing a dangerous game.
We often eat fish raw in Japan.
Why did Tom call you?
I've made so many mistakes.
I've made so many mistakes.
I can't finish this work by 2:30.
Yesterday I finished learning Esperanto on Duolingo.
They were both drunk.
Was the bank closed?
Was the bank closed?
Tom won't let anyone in the house.
Have you seen my car keys?
Have you seen my car keys?
Stop going there.
Stop going there.
Stop going there.
Stop going there.
Winter came.
Tom loved to help people.
Prepare for combat.
Prepare for combat.
Tom was famous.
Thank you for that information.
Let's talk about work.
He had Parkinson's disease.
Stop looking at me.
Stop looking at me.
Please repeat.
We waited, but Tom didn't come.
We tried to save him.
We tried to save him.
Tom hasn't packed his suitcase yet.
I'm quite happy now.
I'm not lying to you.
I'm very happy with it.
I'm sure they need you.
I'm sure they need you.
I'm afraid I've set a bad example.
Where did you buy the flowers?
Tom really likes talking.
I hope you can hear me.
I hope you can hear me.
I hope you can hear me.
I hope you can hear me.
The magazine is published bimonthly.
I often wear sandals during warm weather.
Why would Tom lie about his age?
Tom goes for a walk every morning with his dog.
The dog lying on the grass is mine.
I'm sorry I made you wait so long.
I'm sorry I made you wait so long.
What floor?
Obviously not!
Bill stopped smoking.
It rang loudly.
It rang loudly.
It rang loudly.
You've hit the nail on the head!
He loves gardening.
Ladies and gentlemen...
He abandoned hope.
Tom hates children.
What about girls?
I also want to be happy.
I also want to be happy.
Do you want to talk about what happened?
I can't believe my eyes.
I'll never forgive you, Tom.
Tom said that he couldn't believe it.
This is serious indeed.
I usually drink a lot of milk.
I am putting my cigarette off.
I recall my childhood with pleasure.
I'm a sound sleeper.
I'm used to it now.
The black box is not actually black.
This really isn't an island.
I want someone to talk to.
It often seems that women will say one thing, but think and want something completely different.
Tom is studying web design.
I'll dream about you.
I'll dream about you.
I have class in an hour.
I think Tom is rich.
The situation became dangerous.
Where's my driver?
We don't have any other options.
If I had enough time, I would go to New York City every year.
We're both rich.
We're both not as rich as we wish we were.
It could have been much worse.
Tom doesn't use Facebook.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
You're lucky you didn't die.
We agreed to disagree.
Tom can't speak French without making mistakes.
My best friend always gives me good advice.
Do you see the garden?
It was quite funny.
Google is my teacher.
My husband lost his job.
I watch TV all the time.
I've been going out with her for months.
I've been going out with her for months.
Do you have a pen?
Do you have a pen?
I've already lost too much time.
It's what I'm used to.
With great pleasure!
Life's short, so I use Python!
You're losing your marbles.
I know we're a little early.
A fork fell off of the table.
I saw a flower on the table.
After a little while you'll know Esperanto.
Why are you staying awake so late.
I asked him why he was crying.
We got here first.
Please don't touch the flowers.
Please don't touch the flowers.
He still depends on his parents.
They studied the map, trying to find a shortcut.
I'm dying to meet you all.
I had no idea that Tom knew how to speak French.
She'll end up being fed up with it.
They'll never believe us.
She didn't go to the lake.
She didn't go to the lake.
We are not looking for new workers.
On Friday I help Mother make Challa for Sabbath.
We didn't buy the apartment very long ago.
I didn't get an email from my parents today.
I didn't get an email from him today.
Why do we call Hanukkah The Festival of Lights?
The trunk is the main part of a tree.
Purim is my favorite holiday.
It is getting bigger.
It is getting bigger.
It is getting bigger.
That was too close.
I hear a strange sound.
I still have a lot of pages to read.
He bit off more than he could chew.
I'm not entirely sure.
It won't be any problem at all.
She has blonde hair and blue eyes.
He has blonde hair and blue eyes.
Many Germans have blonde hair and blue eyes.
Many Germans have blonde hair and blue eyes.
It's a niche market.
It's a niche product.
It's a niche product.
They went to the maritime museum.
The sky's the limit.
I have a card up my sleeve.
With great pleasure!
The tsar was the ruler of Russia.
She's up to her neck in debt.
She's up to her neck in debt.
Tom looks quite happy.
She's a good-looking girl.
They sang songs around the fire.
I flipped him the bird.
We went out for some drinks.
It's all my fault!
Does she have what it takes?
Does he have what it takes?
He's a skater.
She's a skater.
He asked for my assistance.
She asked for my assistance.
It brought a smile to his face.
It brought a smile to her face.
Mistakes like these are easily overlooked.
She's a size four.
What if she says no?
What if he says no?
I wake up very early.
She loves gardening.
I love gardening.
My boyfriend lied to me.
My friend lied to me.
My best friend lied to me.
My brother lied to me.
My sister lied to me.
My son lied to me.
My daughter lied to me.
My dad lied to me.
My wife lied to me.
My husband lied to me.
We closed the suitcase.
My favorite song is "Hotel Tatoeba".
She hit me, not him.
They tried.
She dragged herself out of bed.
I don't hold grudges.
It wasn't just me who didn't like that movie.
We tried.
We tried.
Tom tried.
He tried.
He tried.
You tried.
You've tried.
You tried.
You've tried.
This is a dry town.
I hope you enjoyed the long weekend.
Cleveland was not sure the boy was his son.
You have soft hands.
You should be in jail.
You should be in jail.
The sight is considered the most complex of the five senses.
I can't depend on you anymore.
Tom will get out of prison in three years.
I use Google every day.
I knew it was serious.
I knew it was serious.
Tom likes to sing in the shower.
Tom likes to sing in the shower.
We're not dead yet.
We bought a couple of new chairs.
We got together in the park.
That's an interesting problem.
I can't go abroad this year.
I can't go abroad this year.
Turn toward me, please.
I went to the scene of the crime.
He rolled up his sleeves.
He's more popular than me.
She's more popular than me.
He sent me his picture.
It was my husband's idea.
He rolled down his window.
His father died in the war and his mother raised him and his siblings by herself.
I don't know why I cried so much.
Have you fed the horse?
Have you fed the horse?
This song makes me want to cry.
We had a really fun time.
I bought it at the vintage clothing store.
I bought it at the vintage clothing store.
It's not even true.
I'm not gonna lie to you.
That sounds like a bad idea.
She wants to go back to college.
Do you know his last name?
Do you know his last name?
They talked throughout the night.
That's where my family is from.
He jumped to his feet.
We were just talking about him.
My mother wants to be my friend on Facebook.
The gate opened all by itself.
Oops, I did it again.
Oops, I did it again.
Talking to your plants doesn't help them grow faster.
The winters are cold in Canada.
Let me know what you think.
Let me know what you think.
I don't know why it took me so long.
I'm very pleased to meet you, too.
I'm very pleased to meet you too.
I'm pretty sure he's right.
I'm pretty sure he's right.
I'm pretty sure she's right.
I'm pretty sure she's right.
I will do anything you say!
My dress is ruined!
I told her I was interested.
Why are you wearing my dress?
Why are you wearing my dress?
Her dress was ruined.
What if we get caught?
My hair is wet.
He's the cutest guy I have ever seen.
He's the cutest guy I have ever seen.
I saw the pictures. "What pictures?"
Where did this come from?
Where did this come from?
She has a crush on Justin Trudeau.
I bought this as a gift for my boyfriend.
I bought this as a gift for my boyfriend.
I bought this as a gift for my boyfriend.
She will make it.
What more could a woman want?
What more could a man want?
She did as she was told.
He'll make it.
I'll make it.
You are used to sleeping in a tent.
You are used to sleeping in a tent.
I have a red bike.
You'll make it.
They will make it.
Don't forget we have to do our homework.
Do you want to talk about what happened today?
I wonder if that's true.
I've lost your phone number.
I'll be here all afternoon.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
Excuse me for being dressed like this.
I know that this is strange.
She went there last summer.
I know all my neighbors.
I know all my neighbors.
I know all my neighbors.
Tom turned and walked to the exit.
You can't be happy all the time.
You can't be happy all the time.
I know you were afraid.
I know you were afraid.
I know you'll be happy here.
I know you'll be happy here.
I know you'll be happy here.
I am so busy that I can't help you.
He did as he was told.
Your roommate is creepy.
This floral arrangement is beautiful.
The sun will set in two hours.
Tom and his brother are about the same height.
This box is almost empty.
What kind of church is this?
I know you're afraid of heights.
I know you're afraid of heights.
You're famous.
You're famous.
You're famous.
We talked about a lot of things.
What's the name of that restaurant?
I love your daughter.
Why doesn't he write me back anymore?
Why doesn't he write me anymore?
Why doesn't she write me anymore?
Why doesn't she smile at me anymore?
Why doesn't he smile at me anymore?
Are you ready for spring?
Are you ready for spring?
Are you ready for spring?
Tom was breathing.
You have bad breath.
I can hardly breathe.
Let me catch my breath.
Tom had to stop to catch his breath.
He lives in his aunt's house.
None of them are drivers.
I'm not sure I understand what you mean.
I'm not sure I understand what you mean.
I'm not sure I understand what you mean.
I'm not sure I understand what you mean.
They walked side-by-side.
Were you spying on me?
Were you spying on me?
I can't do this to him.
No, it's not right.
That's not fair!
She has big dreams for her future.
She says you're lying.
Is Tom an artist?
I'm sorry, my love.
I'm sorry, my love.
He leapt out of bed.
She leapt from her chair.
Waves are generated by wind.
He has clear blue eyes.
What are you doing this summer?
There are some things I want to talk to you about.
She didn't believe the rumor.
I know who started the rumor.
We've almost finished.
That's not for me to decide.
I'm much better now.
I wonder where Tom is from.
I wondered where Tom was.
I wondered where Tom was.
I'll be there till 2:30.
I think we're on the right track.
I think you're on the right track.
I think you're on the right track.
We're on the right track.
I used to wear glasses.
I think it's our mistake.
I think it's Tom's fault.
I think that's unlikely to happen.
I think that's unlikely.
I lost my entire family.
I have no definite plans.
I'm happy for you both.
I'm happy for you both.
I made too many errors.
I owe everything to Tom.
I could've objected, but I didn't.
I could've objected, but I didn't.
I could've gone, but I didn't want to.
She wants to be a star.
She loves to go shopping.
What brings you here today?
I'm glad you made it home in one piece.
I'm glad you made it home in one piece.
He's a country singer.
You're changing the subject.
He's a bird watcher.
You are wasting your time.
I like the colors.
I couldn't stand it anymore.
Don't expect miracles.
She's out for a walk.
She lives right down the street.
He lives right down the street.
It's for your own protection.
This tea is too hot to drink.
She wasn't stupid.
She wasn't stupid.
She's a self-made woman.
He's a self-made man.
Apple is an American company.
I always eat healthy.
Do you want me to just call Tom up and tell him that we can't come?
What are some good French movies?
What are some good German movies?
I should have brought a lunch.
You shouldn't laugh at his mistakes.
You should not laugh at his mistake.
You shouldn't laugh at his mistakes.
The level of the lake dropped.
I wonder which of you will win.
If the situation doesn't improve, I'll be obliged to take measures.
If the situation doesn't improve, I'll be obliged to take measures.
Tom paused a moment.
I love the sound of wind chimes.
Oh, really?
He may be in danger.
I know you're not an idiot.
The others weren't so lucky.
The name of the restaurant is "Old Europe".
How many people died?
Can I call you again?
Why don't you just call Tom?
I couldn't save him.
I couldn't save him.
I couldn't save her.
I couldn't save them.
I couldn't save them.
Were you talking about me?
I know how important it is.
Tom thought I was lying.
We had a really good talk.
Please show me your bag.
This pen doesn't work.
That's how it all began.
We're famous.
I'm glad Tom left.
That is not an island.
I could go to jail.
I could go to jail.
Is it pleasing to you?
Is it pleasing to you?
Tom almost always has on sunglasses.
Tom put the map on the table.
You don't look very well. Are you OK?
You don't look very well. Are you OK?
What's that restaurant's name?
What is the name of the restaurant?
Tom stopped using Facebook.
Don't enter that room.
Don't enter that room.
You aren't allowed to go into that room.
You aren't allowed to go into that room.
There are a few houses around.
Tom had no idea that I'd be here.
I hope the weather will be dry.
She isn't as good as she thinks.
We won't let you pass away.
I will start early tomorrow, maybe I should go to bed soon.
We have to set up the tent in the shade of that tree.
Tom said that he will call you later.
I don't like to be judged.
Don't faint!
Never trust a naked woman.
Tom lives in an old building on Park Street.
I cry every time I watch that film.
Don't go in that room.
You may not enter that room.
I created Frankenstein by my own hands.
She's very busy on Friday.
My name sounds strange.
I'm only a freshman.
Tell me your price.
Why aren't you in jail?
There are no shops near my house.
Sorry, Jorge! I didn't see you!
I do not know if I will be on Skype for a while.
We wish you continued success.
We wish Tom continued success.
Who are you leaving in charge?
I can't believe we got invited.
That information isn't correct.
Tom can wear anything he wants.
The food is spicy.
I'm 99% sure it's true.
Tom knows. "He does? Did you tell him?" "No, he found out by himself."
I don't feel like talking to anyone right now.
I wanted to talk to you anyway.
I would probably have done the same thing.
He's totally ignoring me.
She's totally ignoring me.
Can't you see she doesn't want to talk to you?
Can't you see he doesn't want to talk to you?
You can't go out with your friends until you clean your room.
Do what your mother said.
I was just talking to her.
I was just talking to him.
Tom now lives in the Cayman Islands.
You probably don't remember me.
Tell me… have you seen that film?
Tell me… have you seen that film?
Tell me… have you seen that film?
It's a feature, not a bug.
Tom bought three bars of soap yesterday.
How is your progress?
Did I ask your opinion?
I told Tom that I was way too busy to talk to him.
Tom is the one who can speak French, not me.
The child is crying, because it wants to eat.
I've loved you since the day I first saw you.
I've loved you since the day I first saw you.
I left.
I left.
I don't need a tutor!
Your glasses fell on the floor.
It's ten past four now.
Honestly, Tom, I can't remember. It was more than 10 years ago.
Honestly, Tom, I can't remember.
We need to talk, honey.
I think Tom would like that.
Tom read novels.
Tony jogs every day.
I don't want to jump to conclusions.
Let's not jump to conclusions.
Let's not jump to conclusions.
I lost my job on Monday.
I come to this city second time.
It's not up to me.
Everybody in the world desires peace.
Look at this picture, please.
Please take a look at that picture.
Look at this picture, please.
Please take a look at that picture.
Tom looked under the couch.
Tom looked under the couch.
We have to abandon the plan.
Tom doesn't mind sleeping on the couch.
Tom died in his prime.
All the desk drawers were empty.
Last year I read more than five hundred books.
Would you please shut the window?
He ran straight home after school.
Parents teach children to speak, children teach parents to be silent.
Have you finished? "No, I haven't even started."
Have you finished? "No, I haven't even started."
No one will listen to me.
He received a good education.
Tom has found something interesting.
Tom has found something interesting.
I'm not sure if it's a boy or a girl.
Are men who don't drink still men?
I dream of becoming a teacher.
I hope you like this.
Michael is already an adult, but he still lives with his mother.
Will you show me a map of the world?
You'll be happy.
You'll be happy.
You'll be happy.
You're probably tired.
You're probably tired.
You're probably tired.
When we lose a language we lose information about culture, society and history.
We found all the boxes empty.
We found all the boxes empty.
I thought you'd never get here.
I thought you'd never get here.
This experiment was unsuccessful.
You took the wrong key.
I am sure you are right.
Where do I turn?
I have a lot of work to clear up by the weekend.
Actions are more important than words.
Call me if you need anything.
We made him go.
The school is closed during summer.
The house is warm.
The sea was warm today.
Give me your address.
I always forget people's names.
May I have your name and address?
Write your full name and address.
I gave Tom your address.
That's a real load off my mind.
What colour is your dress?
He married her.
I want to make you happy.
I want to make you happy.
Tom has forgiven me.
We totally forgot about lunch.
I'm working on my project.
Tom thought I was serious.
You can't even imagine how painful it is for me to tell you this.
Tom didn't help the poor.
Where do you want me to put these suitcases?
Our gods are dead.
I ignored their advice.
I ignored their advice.
I thought Tom was serious.
I think it's very important.
Nothing else mattered to me.
I regret this decision already.
I've always liked horror movies.
I've never regretted doing that.
I wonder what Tom is planning to do.
I'm very pleased.
We had so much fun.
I wasn't having fun.
I've never noticed that.
You made a fool of yourself.
You made a fool of yourself.
You made a fool of yourself.
It is on the left side of the street.
He thinks that she will leave.
My father usually watches TV after dinner.
Tom is a third-year student.
Has Tom quit smoking?
Tom is trying to quit smoking.
Tom promised he'd quit smoking.
I thought Tom had stopped smoking.
I will be busy tomorrow.
I will be busy tomorrow.
Tom had no idea why.
We use it every day.
We use it every day.
We use it every day.
Tom is lying to us.
That was a bad idea.
I'd like to talk to Jean.
I think they're happy.
Tom seems to be crying.
I don't know all of the students.
I'll call you after lunch.
I don't know all of the students.
I've never traveled by train.
He did not notice that there was a sick man sleeping in the next room.
The book belongs to Paul.
I hope you are hungry.
I hope you are hungry.
I hope you are hungry.
I can't bear the pain.
I'm not as rich as I used to be.
Let's call it a night.
He will excuse me.
Didn't you wear that same shirt yesterday?
My watch is very accurate.
Tom is the fastest runner in his class.
This isn't the only key.
Have you used it yet?
Have you used it yet?
Have you used it yet?
Have you used it yet?
Tom was sure of that.
I'm sure I've seen him somewhere before.
He wants to read this book.
If you invite him, he may come.
If you invite him, he may come.
He should have the right to decide for himself.
Tom is from a very wealthy family.
I'm sure I've seen him somewhere before.
Here's a short list.
If you went to sleep immediately it would have been better.
If you went to sleep immediately it would have been better.
The best way to learn is to make mistakes.
Your book is upside down.
Tom tried to stop it.
Tom tried to kill us.
Speech is external thought, and thought internal speech.
Language is the painting of our ideas.
There are men who gain from their wealth only the fear of losing it.
The pen I'm writing with belongs to Tom.
Obviously, I was a little shocked.
May I call you tonight? "Sure."
May I call you tonight? "Sure."
I wonder why women live longer than men.
Do you have some milk?
I hope to see you this Friday.
He knows he acted badly.
I am not asking them to forgive me.
I discovered a serious mistake.
I was watching television at the time.
You smell bad.
She's in jail.
I just thought you might want to talk.
I just thought you might want to talk.
He has no specific aim.
I like talking to you.
Was Tom very busy?
They dream.
They sing.
This forest is very dense.
I was stupid enough to believe Tom.
I was stupid enough to believe Tom.
I was stupid enough to believe Tom.
I was stupid enough to believe Tom.
Tom might not want to help us.
Tom might not want to do that.
We just met today.
Whose side is Tom on?
When will the store open?
We're not used to it.
That's a good song.
Most of us know that.
No one was quite sure.
It may take time.
She's suffering from a serious disease.
I just couldn't bring myself to do it.
It's Tom's own fault.
She will never make it.
He will never make it.
You'll never make it.
You'll never make it.
I'm sorry, I can't help you.
Does that suit you?
Does that suit you?
This is good stuff!
Use your head to save your heels.
How can we refuse?
Tom slept on the sofa.
We talked for a while.
Where on earth is Tom?
How is your grandmother?
You can never be sure.
We were quite happy.
Tom kept it a secret.
Tom said he's healthy.
He lives near here.
Doubt is the key of knowleadge.
I hope you find her.
It could have been a lot worse.
It's strange that no one knows the victim.
Could you pass me the water, please?
At what time do you start working or studying?
At what time do you start working or studying?
The chicken was dry.
Please do not open the windows.
Please do not open the windows.
Remember to shut the windows.
Don't trust anybody over 30.
You can’t trust anybody over thirty.
Don't trust anybody over 30.
I have to close the windows.
Did it not occur to you to close the windows?
Did it not occur to you to close the windows?
Tom asked me if he could close the windows.
Sorry, I can't do that.
Tom says that he's healthy.
Tom lives in a bad neighborhood.
I almost got caught a few times.
We almost got caught a few times.
Tom left the next year.
He gazed at me.
She's rich, but he's not.
She is rich but he is poor.
Can I call you again?
Can I call you again?
The food in my country is not very different from that of Spain.
I work as much as I can, but never as much as I would want.
Kids and fools always tell the truth.
Let's keep an eye on that.
We weren't expecting you this early.
We weren't expecting you this early.
Tom left the next year.
Listen to me, Tom.
I have dry hands.
I can't find the keys to my house.
Tom had to sell his house.
I'm tired and I want to go to bed.
The train doesn't stop at that station.
It's nice to see you again.
They have a large garden.
Whose glasses are these? "They are my father's."
My grandfather's picture is on the wall.
I've lost the car keys.
I had no idea what to say.
Not in my garden.
He didn't want to answer my question.
Tom was a good teacher.
Do you have any questions about this lesson?
Do you have any questions about this lesson?
I can't stop thinking about you.
His brother is always watching television.
My father drives to work.
In clear weather one can see Mount Fuji from here.
A fly fell in the soup!
I don't care what you think of me.
All of the students at school know me.
My hands are full.
Is the shop close?
I meant to call you.
You won't be able to prove it.
You won't be able to prove it.
If anyone has any problems, tell them to call me.
If anyone has any problems, tell them to call me.
If there had been a problem, Tom would've called.
Tom was born and raised in Ohio.
Are you really too busy?
We're part of the team.
We're happy to be here.
This doesn't look so good.
It was in the shop.
She was in the shop.
I was in the shop.
Thomas closed the shop.
Happy New Year!
Oslo is the capital of Norway.
Tom had nothing to lose.
She was surprised that it was that late.
Would you pass the salad?
I wasn't sure about that.
You were asleep at your post.
Birds are warm-blooded.
Don't let anyone come near the fire.
Don't let anyone come near the fire.
Can you prove that what you said is true?
Why is your room pink, Tom? "Oh, this was my sister's room before."
This shop belongs to me.
I have to open my shop.
Are the shops open on Saturday?
Are you sure you don't want to come?
Don't call him on the telephone now.
I'd like to see that movie.
I had never seen him cry.
Please give me a magazine.
Please give me a magazine.
She lost a book.
Everyone behave naturally!
You always find something you're not looking for.
Do not come between a husband and his wife.
I'm almost certain about that.
When did my sister sing that song?
When did my sister sing that song?
Tom always leaves everything to the last minute.
I am glad to hear that we were not seriously hurt.
She's the real expert.
Tom's the real expert.
Tom is a martial artist.
My hair is still wet.
Your pants are dirty.
That was the last straw.
Is Tom really happy?
There's been change of plan.
Galileo first discovered that the Moon had mountains just like Earth.
Tom came in thirty minutes too early.
Read this book!
Read this book!
Health is everything to me.
Did you really believe that is what Tom wanted?
Did you really believe that is what Tom wanted?
Tom is not at fault here.
Tom has had three glasses of wine already.
Don't open it.
Don't open it.
Don't open it.
Don't open it.
Nancy is getting off the train.
He knows neither German nor French.
My parents went to church, but I did not go.
My parents went to church, but I did not go.
The girls were crying.
Pink is for girls.
We have only two dollars.
Behave yourself during my absence.
Behave yourself during my absence.
My friend never leaves the house without cigarettes.
The light is green.
He studied to be a doctor.
Tom really likes going to the movies.
Tom likes the idea as well.
My aunt died of lung cancer.
I don't remember how tall she is.
I'll never make it without your help.
I'm sure that Tom can do it.
I made the train.
I made the train.
Call Tom this evening.
I have a weird neighbor.
Where are the horses?
I have a weird neighbor.
How much did it cost us?
Death is a great instructor.
Help me with my homework.
Help me with my homework.
Tom is thirty now.
Elizabeth the second is the queen of England.
Her daughter is bad at cooking.
Her daughter is bad at cooking.
She seemed to have been ill.
She looks like a Russian.
It was an experience.
I am helping my grandfather.
I am helping my grandfather.
Tom doesn't want to wait that long.
You're not helping me.
The border is closed.
My information was accurate.
Isn't it obvious Tom did it?
Tom never lends money to anyone.
Tom never lends money to anyone.
I heard a really beautiful song yesterday.
I'm sure that Tom is a very busy man.
What do you hope to find here?
What do you hope to find here?
What do you hope to find here?
She's obviously drunk.
She's obviously drunk.
It's a very difficult situation.
I promise you I'll help Tom.
I promise you I'll help Tom.
Tom said he found something in the forest.
I can't stand this kind of music.
Tom gave the documents to the wrong person.
I'm not going to open this.
You should probably go.
You're rich, aren't you?
I can't believe Tom refused to help you.
I can't believe Tom refused to help you.
I saved you a seat.
I like music, and I listen to it every day.
I remember that laugh.
Why didn't you call for help?
Why didn't you call for help?
Why didn't you call for help?
I just don't want to go to jail.
I'm still not sure if he likes me.
I can't run as fast as Tom.
Don't watch too much TV.
Just calm down.
Is Tom confident?
I should've left Tom a note.
I should've left Tom a note.
Why is that interesting?
Tom was holding a glass of whiskey in one hand and a cigarette in the other.
We almost got caught.
He was happy to hear her voice.
We're happy together.
They kept their relationship a secret.
It isn't likely that she will come.
Do I have to choose?
Whose fault was that?
What's the name of your hotel?
What's the name of your hotel?
You have a hard day ahead of you.
You have a hard day ahead of you.
Tom uses that word a lot.
How many islands does Indonesia have?
This wine tastes good.
The two left.
The two left.
You always find something you're not looking for.
The two left.
Give the cat some meat.
John is as old as I am.
We are going to build a wall.
Return to your work.
If you don't want to come back, I'll understand.
Why can't you believe that?
Tom finally woke up.
My grandfather doesn't know how to take money out of an ATM.
There was no hot water.
There was no hot water.
Let's open the box and see what's inside it.
How many students are in the classroom?
Was that a good idea?
Tom is too stupid to be scared.
You should try this.
I have to be in court at 2:30.
Tom wants to meet me.
I was very busy today.
Yesterday my wife and I went to the theatre.
Did you sing?
I hope you enjoy it.
We're approximately the same age.
She has always been faithful to her husband.
She has always been faithful to her husband.
Where is your cap?
I hope you don't mind.
I hope you don't mind.
I hope you don't mind.
How many animal species are discovered every year?
I told Tom to stay indoors.
Tomorrow may be too late.
Let them take a look at it.
Let them take a look at it.
Let them take a look at it.
Tom clearly misunderstood what I said.
Tom clearly misunderstood what I said.
I don't know which book to choose.
Why don't you cry?
Why don't you cry?
Please don't cry any more.
Do I have to choose?
I'd like you to take a look at this.
I'd like you to take a look at this.
Tom is an Australian citizen.
I don't use it.
I don't use it.
We may as well wait.
You may as well leave at once.
You may as well keep it a secret.
You may as well leave such a decision to your daughter.
You may as well wait for a while. It'll clear up soon.
You may as well ask for your teacher's advice.
At what time did you go to bed yesterday?
At what time did you go to bed yesterday?
The train was very crowded.
Listen up.
How do you know that he's already dead?
We have to pick a name for the child.
The last time I called him, he was out.
Don't shout, the neighbours will hear you!
She refused to speak English.
Aren't you going to open it?
Aren't you going to open it?
I'd like to get married.
This man is drunk.
Tom studied at Harvard.
I went to Europe before the war.
Tom rejected the idea.
Tom was helping me.
The country was gearing up for war.
He wants to go to the sea.
He wants to go to the sea.
I only want to talk.
She won't like this.
The path was narrow.
I'd like to speak to you.
I'd like to speak to you.
I'd like to speak to you.
I'd like to speak to you.
You have to get up early.
We have a 20% share of the market.
Have you made a list yet?
Have you made a list yet?
Have you made a list yet?
I gave it to Tom.
What have you come up with?
They're a good team.
I'm being watched.
They're watching.
We're finished here.
Tom isn't very busy.
It's scary.
There's nothing to say.
There's nothing to tell.
I'll deal with this problem later.
She isn't adequate to the task.
If you are free, give me a hand.
If you are free, give me a hand.
Tom was a little drunk.
Can we talk about music?
I'll send a letter to my mother.
I will wait for you.
They'd like that.
I want to see the horses.
My mother gets up at six every morning.
Tom didn't want my help.
Who vanished?
Empty your pockets.
I can't stand kids.
Can you show me where you live on this map?
Can you show me where you live on this map?
Can you show me where you live on this map?
Can you show me where you live on this map?
I'm a seriously ill man.
I like the picture.
Tom practices martial arts.
This is a dangerous road.
Tom is our employee.
Believe me!
I cannot build a house. I don't have money.
Who's your favorite poet?
Tom will probably tell you the same thing I did.
I can show you how to do that.
Why haven't you called?
Why haven't you called?
Butter and cheese are made from milk.
Would you forgive me?
Would you forgive me?
Nobody knows it's my birthday today.
I sometimes hear my father singing in the shower.
He is always forgetting things.
I've decided to stop eating meat.
I've decided to stop eating meat.
Everybody knows that you're lying.
Everybody knows that you're lying.
I just want you to know that Tom is safe.
I just want you to know that Tom is safe.
I just want you to know that Tom is safe.
Tom made one last attempt.
Do you like that song?
Do you like this song?
Don't leave the key in the lock.
Tom drinks a lot of milk.
My apartment is in that building.
It's a complicated story.
Tom is obviously angry.
We both know it's too late.
We hope this is true.
It's a beautiful sword.
Tom has made some mistakes.
I was made to go there.
I was made to go there.
That's all we know for sure.
Did you read everything?
Did you read everything?
Did you read everything?
Did you ask the price?
Did you ask the price?
One who tells the truth, needs a fast horse.
Tom's lost a lot of blood, but he hasn't lost consciousness.
Tom made me wait for three hours.
Tom promised me he'd do it.
Does this bus go to the museum?
Does this bus go to the museum?
A bird has wings.
Everyone has their own point of view.
I can stop any time I want.
I don't need protection.
My brother smokes a great deal.
Here, use my pen.
Tom is looking for his car keys.
Tom should write a song.
Tom should write a song.
Are your bags in the car?
It's not a gift.
Why are you so late?
I'll call for you at 8 tomorrow morning.
I thought Tom was in danger.
What does the word "get" mean in this sentence?
Why is it important to eat healthy food?
I watch television with my daughter.
I felt happy.
I felt happy.
I'd like to finish the job.
There used to be big trees around my house.
I'm on the roof.
What's in the sack?
The stomach ache has gone away.
Tom has to go to the bank.
Tom has to go to the bank.
How are Grandma and Grandpa cooking the fish?
Tom wanted to become a teacher.
Who invited you?
Who invited you?
Who wants to talk to me?
Who wants to talk to me?
This is the book I want you to read.
This is the book I want you to read.
Tom read a lot of books.
They look so happy.
What's Tom doing in the kitchen?
The store is almost empty.
I'll leave.
Both of them are teachers.
You're being used.
The movie wasn't as interesting as the book.
They're using you.
They're using you.
They're using you.
They're using you.
I've explained the situation to Tom.
I've explained the situation to Tom.
I've explained the situation to Tom.
I've explained the situation to Tom.
Tom isn't as rich as people think he is.
That helped a lot.
Tom rolled up his sleeve.
I'll come by train.
Tom got his eyes tested.
Why didn't you just call?
Why didn't you just call?
Why didn't you just call?
Stop watching TV and start studying!
I assume you know why I'm here.
I assume you know why I'm here.
I assume you know why I'm here.
I have to leave.
He signaled them to stop.
I will choose one.
I will choose one.
I'm not safe.
This is the train for New York.
I misspelled the word.
I really don't know why that happened.
If they'd taken their doctors' advice, they might not have died.
Nobody who works forty hours a week should be living in poverty.
I didn't expect you to come so soon.
I didn't expect you to come so soon.
Tom took out a loan in order to buy a car.
All students are admitted free.
If you want to sit down, sit down.
I've been busy this week.
Everything was just a joke.
The old church is located in the northern part of the city.
I'm sure about that.
I didn't translate this text myself.
He commanded me to do it.
It sounds simple.
Every vote counts.
Love is possible.
Love is complicated.
I suppose we could ask them.
Just try not to try.
What are the facts?
It's quite serious.
I enjoy what I do.
I enjoy what I do.
We must do more.
I'm glad you asked me for advice.
That shouldn't have been allowed.
Tom might object.
They're rich.
We have achieved great successes.
I wanted to rescue you.
I wanted to rescue you.
I wanted to rescue you.
I wanted to rescue you.
What did you eat? Fish or meat?
What did you eat? Fish or meat?
What did you eat? Fish or meat?
This is my father's shirt.
I told you Tom was busy.
I told you Tom was busy.
This is a very complex issue.
Tom was carrying two suitcases.
Her age qualifies her for the job.
You should avoid making such a mistake.
A face without freckles is like a sky without stars.
I suppose Tom told you what happened.
This could mean war.
Tom will never admit that.
She waited for him to call.
Wait here for me.
I don't like lying to Tom.
Did you meet someone else?
I have ten more pens than you.
That song is my favorite.
Someone's talking.
Tom is watching a movie.
Ten to one he will be chosen.
I hope Tom is in a good mood.
I hope Tom is in a good mood.
I like that dress.
This was the right decision.
Are you sure you're ready?
Are you sure you're ready?
Are you sure you're ready?
The snow has disappeared.
Truth is a dangerous thing.
I consider that very serious, for several reasons.
The cat ruined my sofa.
I've decided to call Tom.
Put the gun down.
Is she still interested?
Is he still interested?
He wants to marry my daughter.
Would you like more?
We want you to be happy.
We want you to be happy.
We want you to be happy.
This is correct.
It belonged to my mother.
It belonged to my mother.
It belonged to my mother.
It belonged to my father.
It belonged to my father.
It belonged to my father.
It belongs to my mother.
It belongs to my mother.
It belongs to my mother.
It belongs to my father.
It belongs to my father.
It belongs to my father.
Did Tom succeed?
I don't have a sword.
Tom drives a white car.
I have a pain in my neck.
Tom is still doing his homework.
This is the watch that I'd lost.
I still have your key.
We can build that.
I remember this map.
May I have this magazine?
Tom lost his job.
We live ten kilometers from Thessaloniki.
We like going to the museum.
It was a rumor.
It was time for lunch.
Please stop calling me that.
Everyone has vulnerabilities.
Are you both drunk?
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
I'm glad I invited you.
Can we talk to him now?
I'm going to get you out of here.
I'm not sure that's a good idea.
I'm not finished talking to you.
You said you were thirty.
You said you were thirty.
You said you were thirty.
You said you were thirty.
Tom reminds me of his father.
There are no restrooms in this building.
I forgot my debit card at home.
I remember when I was about your age.
Did he hit you?
Did somebody hit you?
Did somebody hit you?
It's never too late to say no.
He came out of the shower naked.
They couldn't stop smiling.
She couldn't stop smiling.
He couldn't stop smiling.
It would be fun.
I was afraid of making the first move.
She was afraid of making the first move.
He was afraid of making the first move.
There's something important I need to tell you.
Give it back to me!
Does she know how he feels about her?
Does she know how he feels about her?
I promised him not to tell anyone.
Would she like that?
She died a happy woman.
I stopped at the store and got some milk on my way back.
You're a lot smarter than you think.
Is Tom really guilty?
This car looks happy.
Tom is a very wealthy man.
Tom is out of prison.
The crowd is going nuts.
Alive or dead, I'll always love you.
Tom doesn't have a shirt on.
These pens are better than those.
We went to church.
They went to church.
I've known him since I was a child.
The professor has office hours every Tuesday afternoon.
He paid no attention to her.
It's definitely a good sign.
Everyone needs to read this book.
I read an interesting book yesterday.
He could be happy if he wanted.
She could be happy if she wanted.
You could be happy if you wanted.
You don't want to be happy.
You can be happy if you want.
It hardly made a difference.
It's a very serious illness.
Tom is too weak to talk.
I sold it on craigslist.
I sold it on craigslist.
I need to go to the toilet.
Tom has lost his keycard.
That's where Tom started his career.
It's a hot button topic.
I'm just watching television.
The men drew their swords from their scabbards.
We're not really sure yet.
Tom is very serious.
I'm going to prove it.
I don't know if it's important or not.
I don't know who called you yesterday.
Tom passed out from the heat.
I don't want to be famous.
I soon noticed his absence.
I soon noticed his absence.
I know you weren't planning to come.
I know you weren't planning to come.
Tom has no idea where we are.
You have to calm down.
They didn't choose me.
This is how I got acquainted with them.
This bag is not available in any store.
I've finally found the woman I want to marry.
Tom is afraid of the dark.
Where did you get all those keys?
You must return immediately.
You must return immediately.
You must return immediately.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
I'd like you to translate this into French.
We'll talk soon.
It was amazingly easy.
I have a sharp pain in the stomach.
Air pollution is a serious problem in this country.
As I didn't know his address, I couldn't write to him.
As I didn't know his address, I couldn't write to him.
We did it with the greatest pleasure.
I'm almost thirty years old and I'm still single.
I'm not in the mood anymore.
The train pulled out two hours ago.
The rumor cannot be true.
The sun rises earlier in summer than in winter.
Such manuals should be written in simpler language.
Only then did I see the danger we were in.
This view reminds me of my home town.
The garden is famous for its irises.
It's a matter of cost.
However, if he is brain-dead, he will never think, speak, or hear again.
Can I have a look at the magazine?
What a fuss about nothing!
The gate is too narrow for a car.
It goes around the sun in 365 days.
The ship was at the mercy of the wind and the waves.
The ship is at the mercy of the waves.
The ship was sailing at full speed.
Harry is an American actor.
I heard my name called in the crowd.
We have already seen this film.
What time do you usually return home?
I want to say something very important.
I want to say something very important.
Tom is banned from entering this building.
Are you thinking about me?
Tom didn't understand Mary's joke.
The milk's a bit off.
At the summer camp, she was in charge of the group I belonged to.
What time do you leave here?
The ship sailed up the Thames.
You have good taste in clothes.
The ship sailed up the Thames.
I'm not sure I can be there by 2:30.
They're still not safe.
I'm open to new ideas.
I can only hope that in time you'll forgive me.
I'll just go check.
I'll just go check.
My thoughts are with the families of the victims.
Seen from a distance, it looks like a man.
Seen from a distance, it looks like a man.
Seen from a distance, it looks like a man.
Maybe some examples will help?
The police want to talk to me.
Why are you throwing books in the fire? "Because I'm cold."
Kindness is the only way to bring peace to this planet.
My friend has a really long name.
Summer is almost here!
It pains me to have to say this, but it's the truth.
Sometimes a sentence is worth more than a word, and sometimes a word is worth more than a sentence.
Dad, put Mum on the phone.
Dad, put Mum on the phone.
They became citizens of Japan.
For me, all days are holidays.
My roommate is studying Chinese.
Drive carefully.
We are having lunch.
It's going to take a while.
I've dreamed of this.
I've dreamed of this.
I don't know how many years ago that bridge was built.
Don't give up hope, Tom.
Tom must've forgotten his key.
Most of them just don't care.
Please don't open this window.
I used to eat a lot of meat.
Tom and John both married younger women.
Excuse me, do you have a pen?
Tom is such a lucky guy to have you.
On that day we want to spend a pleasant evening with some friends.
Put the box on the table in the kitchen.
Tom told his friends that he never ate meat.
Tom started laughing again.
Tom closed all the windows.
Tom took off all his clothes.
They need to talk.
Tom got out his pen.
This road is dangerous.
Tom did his duty.
What's your favorite love song?
Tom is getting married tomorrow.
Tom likes to take walks in the woods.
Sing me a song.
Are you sure we can do this?
Summer is almost here.
I made a couple calls.
I made a couple calls.
I made some calls.
You're my neighbor.
You're my neighbor.
You will sell your house.
Friends are like flowers in the garden of life.
Tom came home late.
Come over any time.
Tom woke up at 2:30.
Tom heard some shots.
Tom heard the shots.
This is an important victory.
Tom would probably choose this one.
Tom would probably choose this one.
Tom would probably choose this one.
It's unlikely Tom will help us.
Please don't open this window.
It's unlikely Tom will return.
You should take things more seriously.
You should take things more seriously.
You think you can toy with me, but I don't play games.
We only have one television.
We talked about food prices.
We take that very seriously.
I thought you might like that.
I thought you might like that.
Tom makes very few mistakes.
Tom thinks that's a mistake.
This is a common occurrence.
School started last week.
Tom is probably not alone.
Whose decision is it?
Tom is losing interest.
Nobody's life was in danger.
Let's talk about the future.
Let's talk about the future.
Tom isn't too happy.
Tom forgot the milk.
That's your conclusion, not mine.
I don't read as many books as I used to.
Education is really important.
You can't end our relationship this way.
There is no reason for being sorry.
How weird.
Under no circumstances will we take part in military actions.
Tom is 100% correct.
She simply stared at me in amazement and went away without saying a word.
I am sure of your son coming back safe and sound.
Everyone knows you're rich.
Tom decided to leave.
Tom is a very interesting man.
Tom is a very interesting man.
I owe my success to the fact that I never had a clock in my workroom.
This is a serious mistake.
They're lucky to be alive.
When he returns from hunting, I will not speak with him.
The leaves trembled in the wind.
To tell a lie is wrong.
Tom drank heavily.
Do not play with the key.
Tom told me his father was in the hospital.
Tom told me his father was rich.
Tom wasn't wearing a shirt.
Stay with me, dad! I'm afraid of the dark.
We'll meet at the station.
You're busy all the time.
You're busy all the time.
You'll be very happy here.
You'll be very happy here.
You'll be very happy here.
One police officer is dead.
It's a very important step.
It's a very serious matter.
It's a very complex system.
I am going to be much more careful.
I'm not sure that's all true.
Tom recovered.
Can you determine what happened?
Can you determine what happened?
He was killed in an airplane accident.
This pen is mine.
However hard you may try, you will not be able to do it.
He's a poor student.
Tom is already drunk.
Tom was well-dressed.
I think Tom is thirty.
Tom died unexpectedly.
Tom died suddenly.
I can't stop hiccuping.
Tom said he had a knife.
Tom didn't kill his wife.
I think Tom is over thirty.
I think Tom is over thirty.
I think Tom is about thirty.
I think Tom is about thirty.
I think Tom is under thirty.
I think Tom is thirty years old.
I think Tom is thirty years old.
I think Tom is thirty years old.
I don't have anything to tell you.
Tom lost his friends.
He is said to be rich.
Your work is not as difficult as mine.
I wonder if he will come.
Our ammunition has run out.
That's an interesting proposal. I'll think about it.
I'm busy now, but we can talk during lunch.
Tom emptied his pockets.
Tom doesn't smoke cigarettes.
Did you like the flowers I sent you?
I guess Tom didn't see me.
Tom didn't finish the job we asked him to do.
Tom is a lot smarter now.
Tom got home around 2:30.
Tom fell off the roof.
My watch didn't cost as much as yours.
Tom heard some shots.
I want you to keep me informed.
Tom lived abroad for three years.
Tom treated everybody the same.
Tom took several pictures.
Tom died at 2:30.
Tom killed three enemy soldiers.
I usually drink my coffee with milk.
God died. We killed him.
Don't pay attention to anything they tell you.
The second part of the lesson is harder than the first one, but the third one is the most difficult.
Your horse is fast, but mine is faster.
Having done the lessons, he immediately went to bed.
Since the moment he arrived, everything changed.
Singing is their thing.
This can be easily proven.
I closed it.
I closed it.
I closed it.
I closed it.
Shall I close it?
Shall I close it?
Shall I close it?
Handle with care!
Tom spent thirty days in jail.
How do I get to Park Street?
Tom took his clothes off.
Who is my neighbor?
Who is my neighbor?
I like this music.
It can't be Mary. She's at the hospital right now.
I gave my half to Tom.
I proved him wrong.
Tell me you're not serious.
Tell me you're not serious.
Tell me you're not serious.
I hope the weather will clear up tomorrow.
Tom decided to call the police.
Tom arrived around 2:30.
I wonder why Tom left.
Tom is crying in his room.
Tom has decided to get married.
Tom has been acting very strange.
How much time do we have to finish this?
Tom still hasn't done his homework.
Tom tried to call for help.
Tom tried to call for help.
Tom left the water running.
Since it was Sunday, the store was closed.
I know you're not serious.
I know you're not serious.
I know you're not serious.
I hope you're happy.
I hope you're happy.
I hope you're happy.
I hope you're happy.
Does Tom know how to ride a horse?
Does Tom know how to ride a horse?
Tom is opening the window.
Do you think that I should go talk to her?
You saved our lives.
Where on earth have you been?
Where on earth have you been?
Tom had no idea what was going on.
Tom didn't want to go there.
Tom didn't want to go there.
Tom is frequently free in the afternoon.
Tom runs every day.
I always dreamed of having many children.
Why doesn't anybody help me?
Tom looks about a hundred years old.
I have nothing to do here.
The cap is too small for me.
Not knowing what to do, I called her.
Did I show you this?
Tom put the box on the table.
I read the letter for him.
Music is a part of me.
The teacher is right.
She slept deeply.
The girl put the key in her pocket.
The girl put the key in her pocket.
He can talk to the dead.
I have a strong will.
The permanent population isn't big.
This coffee tastes like dishwater.
This coffee tastes like dishwater.
The fish is still raw.
I'm completely on your side.
I'm completely on your side.
She called her mother.
She called her mother.
He raised an eyebrow quizzically.
He has a heart murmur.
He asked me if I had experience in this area, and I said no.
Many think that Finnish is a really difficult language.
I hope you are more successful next time.
You ought to help her.
You ought to help her.
Eat your soup while it's warm.
Eat your soup while it's warm.
She really likes going to the movies.
Unfortunately I don't know a single word in Turkish.
She wore an apricot-colored dress.
That girl isn't stupid.
The teacher teaches.
Tom is lying about his age.
What's your favorite drink?
After he had done his homework, he watched TV.
After he had done his homework, he watched TV.
Why do you always do this?
I had a cat.
The horse is old, but healthy.
Who else uses this room?
I have no idea who she is.
It's not possible to breathe here.
If you need him, call him.
I'd like to hear you sing.
I'd like to hear you sing.
He said he was poor.
He said he was poor.
I found the photo you were looking for.
Which songs did they sing?
People obviously like it.
All the meat had spoiled.
Ah! What a beautiful flower!
I took off my clothes.
I tried to save him.
I tried to save him.
I tried to save her.
The English and German sentences have totally different meanings.
Goodnight ladies.
Take a walk every day.
Take a walk every day.
Please tell Tom to wait.
Please tell Tom to wait.
I think you're going to find this interesting.
Water is wet.
The show is about to start.
He is sure to win.
Whose book is that on the table?
If you are busy, I will help you.
If you are busy, I will help you.
Impossible.
Tom loves talking about music.
We'll talk later.
I met one of my old teachers yesterday.
Who did Tom get married to?
This book is interesting to read.
We have more than a hundred books at home.
The bird was injured.
Come back when you're done.
Take the bus.
Can we meet tomorrow?
Can we meet tomorrow?
They're definitely more than just friends.
They're safe.
I was a rich man.
Tom was taller than I expected.
The train stopped.
If you had a million, what would you do?
If you had a million, what would you do?
Translate the word.
She asked her friend for advice.
Give me the car keys, please.
John is not as old as Bill; he is much younger.
I'm going to be too busy.
My father graduated from Harvard University.
Tom probably saved my life.
Tom tried to leave.
Tom shivered.
Did you lose your car keys?
Did you lose your car keys?
Did you lose your car keys?
I'm more of an oldies kind of girl.
We wish Tom the best.
Does this shirt come in other colors?
Do you have this shirt in other sizes?
In one year there are more than thirty-one million seconds.
Tom is clearly over thirty.
Tom is clearly over thirty.
Her father didn't allow her to go to movies alone.
Do you know the smell of death, asked John, shoving his fist under my nose.
Sacrifice is sometimes necessary.
There's no way we can get this done by next Monday.
It's very strange!
You've gone too far.
You've gone too far.
I'm happy in here.
I'm happy in here.
They've been spending a lot of time together.
The museum is open from Mondays to Fridays.
Google's search results are usually more useful than those of Yahoo's.
She has her period.
I've got as much money as he has.
I got married 8 years ago.
She had no one to turn to.
Tom is a fast learner.
Can you meet me at nine o'clock on Saturday morning?
I have been busy since last Sunday.
I have been busy since last Sunday.
I have been busy since last Sunday.
I have been busy since last Sunday.
There are few, if any, mistakes in his English.
I must buy a new pair of shoes.
The police are going to catch you sooner or later.
The police are going to catch you sooner or later.
The police are here to talk to you.
The police will never catch us.
The police told us the road was closed.
The police are watching us from across the street.
The police showed me your picture.
The police found some blood on the floor.
I've heard that most police cars don't have bulletproof glass.
The police can't find a single person who remembers seeing you where you said you were on the night of the murder.
I thought you'd want to see this movie.
I thought you'd want to see this movie.
We sang as we walked.
He paused the film and went to the toilet.
The police are telling people to stay inside.
He doesn't know how to handle children.
Tom was sitting in the dark, smoking.
Her father didn't allow her to go to the cinema alone.
The police could not establish the identity of the man.
My neighbor called the police.
My neighbor called the police.
I saw him caught by the police.
I wonder if I should call the police.
Tom didn't call the police.
He was caught by the police.
Whose idea was it to call the police?
Tom is going to call the police.
It would take a long time to tell the whole story.
Tell me when you will call me.
My aunt is my father's sister.
I hope that you'll help me.
Don't forget to give us a ring when you arrive in Kyoto.
He doesn't know who built those houses.
Why haven't you gone to the police?
Have you called the police?
Have you called the police?
Have you called the police?
Send the kids to bed.
Tom isn't very good at explaining things.
I like the blue one. How much does it cost?
I like the blue one. How much does it cost?
Tom stopped talking and began to eat.
Tom wants to be left alone.
You wouldn't like them.
You wouldn't like them.
You wouldn't like me.
You wouldn't like me.
You wouldn't like him.
You wouldn't like him.
You wouldn't like her.
You wouldn't like her.
You wouldn't like her.
You wouldn't like her.
You wouldn't like him.
You wouldn't like him.
You wouldn't like them.
You wouldn't like them.
You wouldn't like us.
You wouldn't like us.
Tom has gone away for a weekend.
Tom took part in the search.
When is my brother's birthday?
Tom wears very thick glasses.
I just don't want to lose you.
I just don't want to lose you.
What a beautiful couple!
I'll visit a museum today.
Don't be a fool.
He's too old to go out until 6 a.m.
You drive too fast.
To be honest, I don't understand it.
To be honest, I don't understand it.
She stopped reading the newspaper.
I'm already busy.
Wow, he drank five bottles of wine!
I am in a bad mood.
She celebrated her fifteenth birthday yesterday.
That's especially true right now.
That's probably what they'll say.
I'll prove it to you.
We never met.
I did what Tom ordered me to do.
How many times a month do you go to the movies?
I don't know where Tom put his suitcase.
Tom ignored my advice.
Tom hasn't called the police yet.
Do you really think Tom is going to die?
How long after that did Tom die?
Tom jogs in the park every day.
How about a game of darts?
That's not entirely correct.
I wouldn't help you even if I could.
Tom named his cat Cookie.
What's the other condition?
Why's the restaurant closed?
It was a warm summer evening.
A white boat came into sight.
A white boat came into sight.
I don't want to be rich.
I suggest we all calm down.
Why was everyone so surprised?
Everyone has something to lose.
Everyone has something to lose.
Isn't that obvious to everyone?
I want to make you happy.
I want to make you happy.
I want to make you happy.
I lost my keys and I can't find them.
I lost my keys and I can't find them.
Tom closed the store.
I am going to church now.
If you don't know where you're going, you'll certainly get there.
If you don't know where you're going, you'll certainly get there.
It's not a difficult question.
Many things will be different.
Some people are pretty scared.
Something smells good in here.
Where should I put my suitcase?
Everyone looked happy.
It's worth talking about.
Everyone looked happy.
Please return to your seats.
My life is different now.
My house isn't so far from here.
It's nice to have someone to talk to.
It's just so unexpected.
It's quite a simple idea.
It's just a suggestion.
I'm glad I met you today.
Is Tom learning French?
If Tom doesn't want to help, he doesn't have to.
I've already explained this to you many times before.
I've already explained this to you many times before.
I'm sure I can help.
I'm sure I can help.
I'm sure I can do what you're asking.
I'm sure I can do what you're asking.
I'm sorry for calling so late.
I'm so sick of this song.
I like French cooking.
I'm pretty sure that Tom doesn't know French.
I'm pretty sure I don't have enough money to buy this.
I'm pretty sure I don't have enough money to buy this.
I'm not sure whether I'm doing this right.
Are you sure you want to know?
Are you sure you want to know?
I'm glad you are happy with your job.
I'm glad you are happy with your job.
I'll tell Tom you dropped by.
I wonder why Tom hasn't come yet.
I wonder why Tom did it.
I wonder why Tom hasn't come yet.
I wonder why Tom came here today.
I wonder why Tom came here today.
I wonder when Tom will arrive.
I wonder when Tom plans to go home.
I wonder when Tom plans to go home.
I wonder what Tom plans to do tomorrow.
I was the one who said we should wait.
I was hoping we wouldn't have to go.
I was hoping we wouldn't have to go.
I want to leave here as soon as possible.
I want to know where you were yesterday afternoon.
I want to know where you were yesterday afternoon.
I used to not eat meat.
I told you not to call after midnight.
I told Tom that I wouldn't help him.
I want you to wear your new dress.
I've almost finished my work.
I've almost finished my work.
It's important to understand why.
Unfortunately, it's not that easy.
You're really looking much better.
Wait.
Tom has been very busy this week.
I hear you went to the United States.
Am I still on the right road?
All is quiet on the western front.
I don't think it's up to you to decide.
Tom asked me if I had any suggestions.
You're not even thirty yet.
I hope that you'll come tomorrow.
I hope that you'll come tomorrow.
I have a ton of things to do.
I suggest we go home.
I suggest we go home by cab.
I smell smoke.
I saw Tom entering that restaurant.
I hope you like this gift.
I hope you like this gift.
I helped Tom do his homework.
I helped Tom decide where to put the sofa.
I heard that Tom is in the hospital.
At least we have a roof over our heads.
The bus is full. You'll have to wait for the next one.
When are you going to marry her?
I'm going to the market in town. Do you want to come?
Are you going to marry her?
Are you going to marry her?
This must've cost a small fortune.
There's something here for everyone.
Unfortunately, it's not that simple.
Unfortunately, these things take time.
Many of the children had no clothes on.
Many of the children had no clothes on.
It's important that we remember that.
Do you want to become famous?
He has no more than five English books.
Just let me go.
Just let us go.
Just let them go.
Just let him go.
Just let her go.
I'm a redhead.
She decided to stop smoking.
Let's not press our luck.
It's impossible to tell for certain.
What are those spots on your skin?
What kind of car does he drive?
My parents don't like my boyfriend because he's poor.
I like the way you take care of me.
I like the way you take care of me.
Isn't that your shirt?
This sentence was never translated.
Two people were killed in the traffic accident.
I have no idea where Tom lives.
I have no idea what's going on here.
I have a little announcement to make.
I have a friend who works at that store.
I had no idea you were so good at French.
I had no idea you were so good at cooking.
I had no idea you were a teacher.
I had no idea you were a teacher.
I had no idea you knew how to play the trombone.
I had no idea you were a member at this club.
I had no idea you were a member at this club.
I had no idea you were a member at this club.
I had no idea you didn't like Tom.
I had no idea you didn't like Tom.
I don't want Tom to know that I got married.
I don't think Tom will want to go with us.
You don't look very good.
How did you get that much money?
How did you get that much money?
I wish you success in your work.
The price is right.
We forgave you.
It hurts me to say this, but I can't help you.
They received a dollar each.
I watch TV all day.
Your eyes are red from crying.
Your friend left the city.
Has Tom already left?
Go do your homework.
Go do your homework.
Do you think Tom will like that?
I heard the boys singing.
Do you actually know how to do this?
Do you actually know how to do this?
Can you prove that?
Can you prove that?
They're all dead! All dead! All dead!
How long will one hundred dollars last me?
Helsinki is the capital city of Finland.
Tom doesn't like modern art.
I don't need your advice.
I remember last night perfectly.
Wait, don't shoot!
Wait, don't shoot!
My life has changed since I met him.
When's your birthday?
Then why are you crying?
Then why are you crying?
Then why are you crying?
Then why are you crying?
I still don't know if we'll go to the museum.
The house was empty, if you don't count the cat.
Wait here for me.
You are safe here.
Down is warm.
Can I come over?
He wears designer glasses.
You can wait here.
You can wait here.
I'm not sure I understand.
Don't stop here.
He died in battle.
Consider it a gift.
I'm a redhead.
Tom can't be a poet.
Actually, we waste water.
Then why have you sold it?
Then why have you sold it?
You are more stupid than I thought.
You're more stupid than I thought.
Why do you want to talk with her?
Why do you want to talk with her?
There's only one possible decision.
That's how I solve problems.
The ones that don't make noise are dangerous.
You've changed so much that I can hardly recognize you.
You've changed so much that I can hardly recognize you.
I have a spare key.
I want to send Tom a letter.
I promise you.
Tom lost a lot of blood.
The girl was homesick.
What color is your house?
What color is your house?
Tom was my buddy.
Tom showed us how.
Antananarivo is the capital of Madagascar.
Whose bike is this?
Who called me?
I don't meet him so often.
What made you decide to come here?
You weren’t supposed to come here.
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Why don't you just sell it?
Not every bird can sing.
This country is called Russia.
Let's wait here until she comes back.
She didn't want to do it.
You could have been happy.
You could have been happy.
You could have been happy.
How can I stop being afraid?
Do you have any idea why Tom did what he did?
Do you want to get together this weekend?
Tom promised Mary that he would help her.
I've been looking for my keys all day.
Her beauty will fade in time.
I'm happy here.
I'm happy here.
I sent her flowers on Valentine's Day.
You are never going to believe this.
Do you wanna talk?
I live on the planet Sakura.
Can we talk after class?
Tom has written more than 300 songs.
Please listen to me carefully.
Please listen to me carefully.
Tom is quite happy.
Tom is a serious guy.
Tom will call me.
Tom wasn't drunk.
They say that he is seriously ill.
About thirty soldiers were wounded.
It's important to understand why.
It's important that you understand.
It's important that you understand.
It's not anybody elses' business.
You're a very interesting woman.
You're a very interesting woman.
Thanks for keeping us informed.
Experts say that's unlikely.
My kids watch too much TV.
That's what's most important.
Why was everyone surprised?
Tom isn't that stupid.
This path is dangerous.
This path is dangerous.
Tom doesn't get paid.
That's a direct order.
I thought you'd be much fatter.
I thought you'd be much fatter.
I thought you'd be much fatter.
Now that you're my girlfriend, I'm happy.
The water's not very warm.
Tom isn't as rich as I thought he was.
Tom stepped in a puddle of water.
Tom is very rich.
Tom forgot to close the window.
I think that he is from Egypt.
I think that he is from France.
I think that he is from Brazil.
I think that he is from Russia.
I think that she is from Italy.
Do you remember what the attacker looked like?
Do you remember what the attacker looked like?
I wonder if Tom is busy now.
Tom drank too much wine.
Tom looks like a woman.
My eyes feel gritty.
Tom requires our assistance.
I may not have a girlfriend, but at least I'm rich, said Tom.
Tom wouldn't allow us to do that.
Tom isn't a journalist.
Tom has no idea what to say.
I'm sure you'll like him.
I'm sure you'll like him.
I'm sure you'll like her.
I'm sure you'll like her.
I'm sure you'll like them.
I'm sure you'll like them.
Tom took a deep breath and closed his eyes.
Tom took a seat at the counter.
Tom took a sip of wine.
Nobody likes to lose money.
I'm prepared for any situation.
Mr. Green is a history teacher.
Tom, I want you to close your eyes.
Tom is alone in the kitchen.
Tom took out his driver's license and handed it to the police officer.
Tom opened the letter and read it.
Tom is mean.
She has a wicked tongue.
Tom vanished into the darkness.
They drove away.
I'm glad you're having a good time.
I'm glad you're having a good time.
I'm glad you're having a good time.
I'm glad you're having a good time.
No good deed goes unpunished.
No good deed goes unpunished.
Joy was mingled with sorrow.
Tom has lost something.
Tom gets a lot of help.
Tom gets a lot of help from his friends.
Tom is busy now and can't speak to you.
Did you happen to see her yesterday?
Did you happen to see her yesterday?
I'm as tall as you.
Tom usually takes a bus to work.
Do you want to try it again?
Do you want to try it again?
Do you want to go to prison?
Do you want to go to prison?
Do you want to go to prison?
Tom sat in front of me.
Tom doesn't know all the facts.
Are you in a relationship?
I can't bear to see her cry.
He is even afraid of his own shadow.
How has Tom changed?
There's a mistake in this sentence.
I don't see another option.
What doesn't kill us only makes us stronger.
Tom thinks he's God's gift to women.
I hope you'll come back.
My grandmother is already more than ninety years old.
This is a bad neighborhood.
Tom is your boyfriend, isn't he?
This is a long list.
Please show me your picture.
What's your favorite restaurant?
Today is the fifth.
Drink something.
I basically like your plan.
When did you see the film?
I thought I'd give you a key.
She has as many stamps as I do.
I am sorry I cannot help you now. I am busy.
I am sorry I cannot help you now. I am busy.
I'm sorry I can't help you now. I'm busy.
I'm sorry I can't help you now. I'm busy.
At least somebody is having a good time.
At least somebody is having a good time.
I'm not good at lying.
Can you wait ten minutes?
Listen and listen carefully.
I told Tom it was a mistake.
Be specific.
Be specific.
Be careful! The soup is very hot.
Who is it that Tom wants to talk to?
I wish you fall off a cliff.
Your daughter isn't a girl anymore.
We're watching a movie now.
I wasn't expecting you to be here today.
I wasn't expecting you to be here today.
I wasn't expecting you to be here today.
I wasn't expecting you to be here today.
You'd better back off.
You'd better set off at once.
You can cry if you want.
She is wearing a green robe.
He is wearing a green women's robe.
I did my homework.
You ignored me.
You ignored me.
Good actions are never in vain.
Tom beats his girlfriend.
They forgave him for his crimes.
Were you happy?
Tom has outgrown his clothes.
His clothes have become too small for him.
There's a cat in the box.
Tom's clothes have become too small for him.
I got married three years ago.
We're all adults.
We're very happy.
This is your fault.
This is your own fault.
This is our team.
I'll never change.
I'm about Tom's age.
I hope you'll come back.
Tom is already over thirty.
I must admit I like Tom.
I laughed when Tom said that.
I hope Tom will call me.
Tom isn't looking well.
Tom isn't looking well.
Tom is now thirty years old.
Tom said this movie wasn't very good.
Tom said this movie wasn't very good.
I've lost my watch and I can't find it.
Tom accidentally got on the wrong bus.
It's important to tell the truth.
Tom became a minister.
Don't leave me alone here.
Don't leave me alone here.
Don't leave me here alone.
Don't leave me here alone.
I want to talk now.
Tom says he's very rich.
I want to try again.
I assume you know there are no classes today.
I think that can be arranged.
Where the hell are you?
Where the hell are you?
Tom found your keys.
We chose this one.
We chose this one.
We chose this one.
We chose this one.
We chose this one.
We chose this one.
Who chose you?
Who chose you?
She chose the red dress.
It is worth it to read the novel.
Most of the shops were closed.
He helps us.
I started crying.
I started crying.
It's been nice meeting you.
It's been nice meeting you.
It's been nice meeting you.
This is a big project.
Can you prove that what you said is true?
What is the name of the restaurant?
That's all that matters.
I hope you understand.
You have to come at once.
This car used to be owned by Tom.
I have a friend whose father is a teacher.
Tom bought flowers.
Tom is always one step ahead of us.
I was busy this week.
I'm coming back next week.
I'm coming back next week.
I like her cat.
I like his cat.
A lot has changed since then.
Tom has changed a lot since then.
I hope you'll agree.
I hope you'll agree.
I think everybody's happy.
I'm not even thirty yet.
I've been so busy.
I'm very, very happy.
I don't like trains.
I don't regret this.
I called my mother.
I called my mother.
I didn't drink much.
I'm really happy now.
You live in constant fear.
Our victory is secure.
I just got an idea.
Leave them alone.
Tom is a music teacher.
Love is a beautiful thing.
Jack bought a present for his friend.
Jack bought a present for his friend.
Jack bought a present for his friend.
There's clearly something wrong.
Do you wanna talk?
I drank the wine.
Where can I buy a map?
We've already met.
Tom doesn't like to wear a watch.
Oh. You're alive? "Yes. Where is everyone?" "Dunno."
We've got the key.
Tom left the building at about 6 p.m.
When are you going to ask her to marry you?
Do you like giving advice?
Have you finished your Duolingo tree yet?
We'll never let him go.
He's serious.
Do you meet her often?
Do you meet her often?
Let us out.
Let us out.
I'm glad you came over.
I'm glad you came over.
Where shall I put my suitcases?
Where shall I put my suitcases?
Ten people died, among them, a woman.
Would I lie to you?
Would I lie to you?
Unfortunately, it rained yesterday.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I sent you the money through PayPal.
I called them from the hospital.
Is anyone in there?
She didn't get caught.
He didn't get caught.
Tom shut the window.
She has wet hair.
The sky was as clear as ever.
As long as it was winter, he did not go outdoors.
As long as it was winter, he did not go outdoors.
I'll give you the address either today or tomorrow.
Try this on for size.
Let's all just calm down.
I don't feel like helping you.
Tom was in a bad mood.
All that has changed now.
We're all at risk.
They didn't understand your joke.
Have you finished your question?
Today the sea was warm!
I have a pink car.
I have a green car.
Try that one.
Use your gun.
I'd like to borrow about three hundred thousand dollars.
We all learn by experience.
Everything happened all at once.
All that has changed.
We all had hope.
Everything is gone.
We can all dream.
We can all dream.
I can't get used to this.
All share the blame.
All right, listen carefully.
All right, listen carefully.
All right, listen carefully.
All right, listen carefully.
Everything's fine.
They're all guilty.
You're all happy.
You're all happy.
Why did you translate this sentence?
Why did you translate this sentence?
Have you told your parents about me?
She paid no attention to him.
Why did you translate this sentence?
I must admit that I've never heard of it.
They all changed.
Ten people died, among them, a woman.
Tomorrow I have to go shopping.
The photo is the first thing you notice.
On Saturday, we went to the movies and then to a restaurant.
It's my fault, not yours.
It is not you but I that am to blame.
It is not you but I that am to blame.
I had to read this three times before I understood what it meant.
I want you to call home now.
I hope Tom will understand me.
They go to the movies together once in a while.
They go to the movies together once in a while.
Tom says that he didn't study at all for the test.
Fall is late this year.
I've never seen you in a dress before.
It's obviously a typo.
Let's not forget that.
Which goes faster, a ship or a train?
He will come if you call him.
I hope I'm not being a bother.
That's not our fault.
I'm not busy either.
I'm not busy anymore.
We'll wait here.
Today is one of my friends' birthday.
I won't marry you.
Don't smoke in here.
I'm not that drunk.
I'm not that drunk.
Be careful not to fall.
Be careful not to fall.
Did you give them the money?
Did you give them the money?
We're not sure.
Tom suddenly stopped smiling.
I think Tom is serious.
Tom is really rich.
Tom is in a suit.
I hope you're feeling better.
I told Tom to ignore it.
I told Tom to ignore it.
I wonder if Tom can come.
I had no idea Tom knew French.
I was the last to know.
I was the last to know.
I was wrong to do that.
We slept in a tent.
I told you not to sing.
I told you not to sing.
He has a very interesting book.
Is this my fault or your fault?
Is this my fault or your fault?
I'm not certain.
I'm not certain.
Don't make fun of me. I'm serious.
Don't make fun of me. I'm serious.
I don't like fish with lots of bones.
I don't like fish with lots of bones.
Are you using the latest plugins?
I wonder if dinner is ready.
I will gladly help you.
I will gladly help you.
I told you it was funny.
I told you it was funny.
I was so happy that day.
I sold my house for three million dollars.
I don't care how I look.
What if we get caught?
What if you get caught?
What if I get caught?
I have nothing to write.
Don't follow her example.
Do you know who you’re talking to?
Do you already know the new song?
Do you already know the new song?
Tom lost a finger.
Tom didn't sing.
Please stay inside.
Please stay inside.
Did you think that was my idea?
I don't think my life is very interesting.
For how many hours can you sit in front of the television?
I wonder what I'll do once I get home.
We're all ears.
We're being used.
We're too weak.
She's not poor.
Call me when you get home.
Call me when you get home.
Call me when you arrive at home.
We wanted to listen.
That's an old joke.
Give Tom a chair.
Give Tom a chair.
Tom is still on the roof.
It's very late.
Why don't you sing?
Why don't you sing?
Tom sent his daughter to bed without dinner.
Are you two busy?
I couldn't write a single word.
I couldn't write a single word.
Tom got married three weeks ago.
I immediately stopped laughing.
We're not in danger.
Please give this pen to me.
Tom doesn't like being made a fool of.
Let's hope it's all true.
Tom was obviously very drunk.
Consider yourself lucky.
Can we talk inside?
We caught you.
We caught you.
We caught you.
We all cried.
I'm used to waiting.
Tom drank some wine.
Can I buy you a drink?
I used to smoke.
I'm not used to waiting.
Tom is used to waiting.
I got used to it quickly.
I have to get used to it.
Tom used to be a journalist.
You'll soon get used to it.
I'm used to this sort of thing.
Tom used to be a math teacher.
I'm sure Tom hasn't forgotten about us.
I haven't gotten used to it yet.
Tom is used to sleeping in a tent.
Canada, too, began to prepare for war.
You'll soon get used to the cold.
You'll soon get used to the cold.
I used to think this was impossible.
I used to help Tom with his homework.
Tom used to work for the government.
Tom used to smoke, but now he doesn't.
I used to read a lot more than I do now.
Come and give it a try.
I'd like to study with you, but I can't.
Why do you love me so much?
Use your power.
I'm used to this kind of thing happening.
I used to watch TV three or four hours a day.
You'll soon be used to living in a big city.
You'll soon be used to living in a big city.
I'm not used to talking to people I don't know.
We'll have to wait a couple of hours.
Tom drove very carefully.
Tom drove very carefully.
Don't you remember the title?
Don't you remember the title?
Do you remember the title of that book?
Do you remember the title of that book?
Do you remember the title of that book?
Do you remember the title of that book?
Are you sure you know what to say?
Are you sure you know what to say?
Are you sure you know what to say?
Are you sure you know what to say?
Tom likes music.
Tom is too weak.
That doesn't help me.
We're all impressed.
Tom left after lunch.
He is in poor health.
You're not safe here.
You're not safe here.
She refused to go with me.
Did she show you the picture?
Tom translated a letter from French to English for his boss.
She is a very nice person.
She succeeded in opening the box.
I have around thirty of them.
She regrets having never been there.
I'm not mean.
I'm not mean.
She called while I was out.
All the students returned home.
Tom became a teacher.
She used to date him.
What are you promising me?
Why are we wasting time with this?
We are wasting time.
I want my children to go to college.
I want all my children to go to college.
I want Tom to leave immediately.
I want Tom to leave immediately.
I want my children to be happy.
I want everybody to be happy.
I only eat meat about three or four times a month.
I want to help people.
I want to move away.
I want to hear your opinion.
I want to hear your opinion.
I want to move away from here.
I want to build a house here.
I want to talk to your mother.
I want to talk to your mother.
I want to prove I can do this.
I want to prove I can do this.
I want to talk to as many people as possible.
I want to tell as many people as I can about what happened.
I want you to help me choose a book.
I want you to help me choose a book.
I want you to tell Tom what I said.
I want you to tell Tom what I said.
I wanted to show Tom how to do that.
I wanted to know about everything.
I hope we don't have to do that.
Please shake hands.
I want to talk about the future.
The enemy is raising his head.
Can you see me from there?
Can you see me from there?
Almost no one believed her.
Can you give me the keys?
Can you give me the keys?
Can you think of any examples?
Can you think of any examples?
Can you think of any examples?
Can you translate that into French?
Can you translate that into French?
Can you finish this in three days?
Can you finish this in three days?
Have you already rung the doorbell?
Have you already rung the doorbell?
Can you tell me about your project?
Can you tell me about your project?
She likes blue dresses.
My father often goes abroad on business.
Will you be at home this afternoon?
Will you be at home this afternoon?
I will wait here for you. Come back tomorrow evening.
Welcome to your new home.
Welcome to your new home.
The tears began to gather in her eyes.
The tears began to gather in her eyes.
They're dangerous.
They're downstairs.
Which floor does he live on?
We're lucky to still be alive.
They're coming.
I'm still too weak to get out of bed.
Nobody wants to help Tom.
That house belongs to him.
I understand it now, or at least I think I do.
Can you read it to me?
I've lost my watch.
I feel like a fool.
I feel like a drink.
I feel like a drink. Got any beer?
We were both safe.
You're safe with me.
You're safe with me.
Tom doesn't like working in the garden.
Her father made her tell him everything.
You have to see this movie.
It wasn't my mistake.
Tom is evidently sick.
Tom never goes anywhere without his dog.
We don't always know what makes us happy.
Stop repeating everything I say.
Stop repeating everything I say.
Neither of them was present at the meeting.
He is far from being happy.
Tom was sick, so he couldn't come to my birthday party.
I don't think I can, but I'll try.
Well, don't you have anything to say?
Be sure to tell Tom what happened.
Be sure to tell Tom what happened.
It looks exactly the same.
Do you have the key to this room?
Do you have the key to this room?
Are you sure this is the right room?
Are you sure this is the right room?
Are you sure this is the right room?
Are you sure this is the right room?
Was he really that bad?
Tom isn't used to driving on the left side of the road.
My horse is black.
This phone has a multitouch screen.
This phone has a multitouch screen.
We're going to Tom's birthday party tomorrow, right?
Are you sure this is right?
Are you sure this is right?
Are you sure everything's all right?
Are you sure everything's all right?
Are you sure you're feeling all right?
Are you sure you're feeling all right?
What was the name of that restaurant?
Friends are very important to him.
Freedom is a state of mind.
All of them were wearing black.
What's Tom trying to prove?
What exactly are you suggesting?
What exactly are you suggesting?
I think Tom will be able to solve the problem.
I don't answer stupid questions.
They need to get up early.
Could I get another piece of pie?
I've always wanted a pet.
Are you sure we're talking about the same person?
Are you sure we're talking about the same person?
Tom lost his favorite pen.
Tom wants you to come to his birthday party.
Tom wants you to come to his birthday party.
Do you expect me to believe you did this on your own?
How did you get to know each other?
His youngest son is five years old.
Her youngest child is five years old.
Tom drank some beer.
There are only three options.
I added new examples.
Are there any other options?
Is the bank still open?
She played an important part in this project.
My father is busy now.
He looked back.
You're lucky to have found each other.
It's unlikely Tom understands what's going on.
We'll talk about this later, OK?
Are you sure this is the right number?
Are you sure this is the right number?
Do we have to talk about this now?
It's up to Tom now.
What projects are you working on now?
What projects are you working on now?
I'm doing my homework now.
I cannot finish reading such a thick book in a week.
You made it, Tom!
This song makes me cry every time I listen to it.
I spend too much time in front of my mirror.
Canada is a Nordic country.
Look, are you going to help or not?
Look, are you going to help or not?
Look, are you going to help or not?
Look, are you going to help or not?
So are you going to help me or not?
So are you going to help me or not?
Do you promise not to tell anyone else?
Do you promise not to tell anyone else?
Do you promise not to tell anyone else?
Do you promise not to tell anyone else?
I can tell you if you promise not to tell anyone.
I can tell you if you promise not to tell anyone.
Why didn't you leave me a note?
Why didn't you leave me a note?
It's nice to feel needed.
It'll take us three, maybe four weeks at the most.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I'm not sure I want Tom working for us.
I barely have enough money for groceries.
We hope it's all true.
Try to work together.
Tom got three presents for his birthday.
Tom knows it was a mistake.
Everyone gathered around me.
What's your lucky number?
Did that happen recently?
This is a lot harder than I thought it would be.
This is a lot harder than I thought it would be.
It was probably a mistake.
It was probably a mistake.
Welcome to France!
It'll take a few minutes.
Why didn't you wait for me?
Why didn't you wait for me?
Is it true you got married?
This place isn't on the map.
Tom is the son of a very rich man.
It's more dangerous than it looks.
Tom didn't want to wait any longer.
My Grandmother has a weak heart.
I'm trying to remember the name of the article.
What are you promising me?
It was the happiest day of my life.
It was the happiest day of my life.
How did you lose your leg?
A lot has changed around here since you've left.
A lot has changed around here since you've left.
Perhaps it would be best if you left.
Perhaps it would be best if you left.
Do you want to know why Tom left?
Do you want to know why Tom left?
It's been almost a week since Tom left.
Are you sure everyone's already left?
Are you sure everyone's already left?
Do you like my new Halloween costume?
Do you like my new Halloween costume?
I should have listened to Mary.
What time do you want to leave?
What time do you want to leave?
Everyone in the room laughed.
I told you this was a good idea.
I told you this was a good idea.
I told you this was a good idea.
I told you this was a good idea.
You shouldn't get married.
You shouldn't get married.
By the time Tom realized what was happening, it was too late.
How much did you drink?
What was the name of the movie we saw last night?
Can you believe that summer is almost over?
Can you believe that summer is almost over?
Promise me you won't laugh.
I lost my hat on the bus.
Tom must've changed a lot.
This is harder than I expected.
That's really important for me.
Tom is a university student.
That doesn't bother Tom.
I'm in a good mood today.
I'm sure you can do better.
I'm sure you can do better.
Tom became an engineer.
I wonder where Tom is now.
I think Tom would be pleased.
I wonder where Tom is now.
He's using you.
Have you seen my pen?
Let's talk about what happened yesterday.
He invited me to lunch.
Tom sued his neighbor.
The schools are closed today.
It was God's will.
This city has many historical buildings.
He was born rich.
He helps her.
They decided to leave the bullet where it was.
Tom said this belonged to him.
Tom said he was coming back.
I think that's important.
Tom said he cried every day.
Tom wants me to believe him.
Tom turned and looked at me.
Tom says that's a good sign.
Tom was in a very good mood.
Welcome to the team.
What did you promise to do?
What did you promise to do?
So, are you seeing anyone?
Have you read the book Tom bought for you?
Have you read the book Tom bought for you?
Tom went too far.
I hope to see you tomorrow.
I hope to see you tomorrow.
I don't know what I'd do in that situation.
I hope to see my parents tomorrow.
Tom is the captain of the soccer team.
I hope Tom never gets out of prison.
Tom left a short time later.
Tom left a short time later.
I believed that.
This sort of music is not my cup of tea.
Give me half.
I called you.
I called you.
I called you.
I called them.
I built it.
I built it.
I fell.
I promised.
Whose documents are these? "They are Michael's."
Either Tom is lying or Mary is.
My father went to Hong Kong on business.
I hate Halloween.
You need a key to open the box.
You need a key to open the box.
She left me a note.
You're fools.
You're rich.
You're rich.
You're rich.
You're rich.
You're rich.
You're rich.
You're rich.
My grandma's hearing is better than ever before.
Take a glance at the mirror.
Take a glance at the mirror.
He nodded in response to my question.
Tom was killed by a drunk driver.
I cried when Tom told me about that.
I'm very happy here.
You seem happy.
You seem happy.
You seem happy.
You seem happy.
You seem happy.
You seem to be happy.
You seem to be happy.
You seem happy.
Were you happy?
Watch what everyone does and do the opposite.
If you had a time machine, when would you go to?
If you had a time machine, when would you go to?
If you had a time machine, when would you go to?
I'm used to the pain now.
I'm used to the pain now.
Why don't you give it another try?
How is this my fault?
She will like it.
Why are you so scared to talk to him?
Why are you so scared to talk to him?
She tried to impress him.
Beethoven gradually lost his hearing.
It's an honor to make your acquaintance.
I've always dreamed of seeing the future.
They're not going to catch us.
She's going to drink some milk.
I live in the next street.
I couldn't come to his birthday party.
Mr. Yamada is in charge of the personnel section.
Let's go shopping!
I hope it isn't that bad.
I hope I didn't hurt you.
You look like an imbecile.
Tom wanted to be a minister.
I really hope Tom comes back.
I'm a good driver.
I'm a good student.
I'm a good student.
We had a nice weekend.
What does this text mean?
This bread smells really good.
I loved you very much.
How much is it in dollars?
I helped him cross the street.
It rained this afternoon.
The future will come soon enough.
They're playing our song.
It just vanished.
Tom isn't going to leave us.
I hope that's everything.
I hope they all have fun.
I promise to do my best.
I use this all the time.
I think Tom was lying to us.
Tom is a very good painter.
Tom has no idea what that means.
So you haven't seen her yesterday by chance?
No one lives in that building.
It's worth trying it.
I'm not sure that it was Tom who did that.
Tom said he didn't eat meat.
Are you going for a walk?
Are you going for a walk?
You're drunk.
You're drunk.
Tom is poor and happy.
Did he show you the picture?
Did he show you the picture?
Animals have sharp teeth.
Are you ready to fly?
Are you ready to fly?
Are you ready to fly?
Do you need keys?
I am the same age.
I want to meet your older sister.
I want to meet your older sister.
Don't go in my room.
Don't go in my room.
It's starting to snow.
Get me the key.
We need a map.
There's just one problem.
He almost looks like a girl.
Mary had dark circles under her eyes.
The ship hull is divided into watertight compartments.
It sounded too good to be true.
Add a little milk.
What have you got to lose?
What have you got to lose?
What a joke!
She was angry at herself.
Mary confessed that she had given Tom her phone number.
I feel I'm wasting my time here.
I wonder who wrote this letter.
I hope I've done the right thing.
I'm pretty sure it was Tom who did this.
I didn't know that Tom didn't know French.
Why are you asking my opinion?
Are you sure it was him?
Are you sure it was him?
Are you sure it was him?
What did he look like?
Tom, call security, right now!
On the last page, Mary wrote: "Where did I leave my glasses?"
Where are our clothes made, and how are they being made?
There must be an easier way to do this.
I want a piece of pie.
Tom likes horses.
Why did you call us here?
I can't get there in an hour.
That pen is more expensive than this one.
That pen is more expensive than this one.
What kind of music do you like listening to?
What kind of music do you like listening to?
I also found this.
This meat is good.
What language do you speak with your parents?
I'm in a hurry to get home.
I think that's a good sign.
I'm happy with what I've got.
I'm happy with what I've got.
I'm not going to allow that.
He has a strong will.
All of us are happy.
Autumn is here.
I don't know that for sure.
I enjoy being with my kids.
I didn't expect Tom to help us.
I hope everyone will be OK.
I lose things all the time.
I didn't know Tom was a teacher.
Tom reminds me a lot of John.
I'm taking this seriously.
I asked you to wait for me.
I asked you to wait for me.
Tom will leave in a few days.
I didn't show it to anyone.
I didn't show it to anyone.
I didn't show it to anyone.
Is it next Monday that Tom returns?
I didn't say I would help you.
I didn't say I would help you.
I wonder who wrote this note.
How did you lose your arm?
I didn't know Tom was coming back.
What the hell just happened?
What the hell just happened?
I think your answer is accurate.
Tom is trying to do his best.
I've got to get some milk.
I know how lucky I've been.
I have no clue who you are.
I have no idea where to go.
You have no way to verify it.
You have no way to verify it.
Why are you asking my opinion?
Be happy and smile!
He came back a few years later.
I wanted to be a teacher.
He gave the dog a piece of meat.
That boy runs very fast.
I'm not sure if I'm right.
I'm so glad that Tom is gone.
Fresh vegetables are very expensive in the winter.
Why did you want to become a teacher?
Why did you want to become a teacher?
I went to bed a little later than usual.
I went to bed a little later than usual.
Don't blame me for your mistakes.
Can you reach the ceiling?
Can you reach the ceiling?
Tom had no idea what I was talking about.
I wonder who he really is.
I think Tom was lying to me.
I think we're a good team.
What floor does Tom live on?
I'll be happy to help you.
I'll be happy to help you.
I was a little bit scared.
This is my kitchen.
She drinks milk.
Tom is drinking milk.
He drinks milk.
They're like one big happy family.
Mount Fuji is beautiful.
You've been sitting here all afternoon. Are you waiting for someone?
You've been sitting here all afternoon. Are you waiting for someone?
The future is unknowable.
Tom is very important to me.
You can kill a man, but you can't kill an idea.
Mount Fuji is Japan's most famous mountain.
We're not sure yet.
How high above sea level are you right now?
How high above sea level are you right now?
Why do you consider that event important?
I hope this will end soon.
I heard a very loud noise.
I wonder if Tom knows that.
I really hope Tom is right.
I'm happy that Tom is here.
I really want to be happy.
I really want to be happy.
I like to help my friends.
Who built this building?
No one had anything left to say.
What's the matter with you? You look pale.
Why don't you give it up?
Can you complete the work in three days?
We've already chosen.
I can't let you push me around anymore.
I'm afraid of losing you.
Are you sure it's all true?
Are you sure it's all true?
Are you sure it's all true?
We need all the facts.
You want answers, don't you?
I hope it'll happen soon.
Tom stopped playing.
These suitcases are heavy.
Tom was hired in October.
I hope things get better.
He got married in Turkey.
Is Tom a Canadian citizen?
I expected Tom to do more.
Where is your homework?
She watches television from four to six.
Don't be a victim.
I didn't like it at first.
I didn't like it at first.
I didn't like it at first.
Tom can help us, I'm sure.
I have a lot of neighbors.
It's important to keep learning.
What colour is your car?
What colour is your car?
Tom says it was a mistake.
Tom says it was a mistake.
What does it concern you? That's my business!
What does it concern you? That's my business!
I didn't like that at all.
I told Tom to stop crying.
I'm very serious.
I wonder who wrote this.
I hope we'll meet again.
I go there all the time.
I like to talk to kids.
I like to talk to kids.
I was happy I did that.
They made us pay.
This isn't scary.
She was stupid enough to believe him.
Tom was the first one to finish eating.
He abandoned the plan.
This suitcase is heavier than it looks.
It looks fascinating.
Tom isn't an adult.
I hope I make the last train.
We have no other options.
I'm happy for the first time in life.
Tom talked about his experiences.
I slept on the couch last night.
Let's not use our real names.
Tom is pretty good at singing.
They must be dead.
I have a sore throat.
That's my wish.
I saw Tom crying.
I saw Tom crying.
Thanks for trying to help.
Tom knows you're lying.
Tom knows you're lying.
Which color do you prefer, blue or green?
How many students are there in your class?
I don't know my IQ.
Tom didn't get the joke at all.
When did they build that?
Do you have a knife?
I'm not sure I really want that.
I'm not sure I really want that.
Can you get me a glass of water?
They weren't busy.
I think it's very strange.
Do you really want to put your money in that bank?
Do you really want to put your money in that bank?
Do you really want to put your money in that bank?
Do you really want to put your money in that bank?
We'll talk at dinner.
We can talk about it.
Was I talking to you?
Was I talking to you?
We can talk outside.
This is a good movie.
She invited me.
She invited me.
There are fresh tracks in the snow.
It's a stupid system.
Sometimes, I feel like a hamster running on a wheel.
I feel like a hamster on a wheel.
Can we talk to you?
Everybody was safe.
You can talk to me.
You can talk to me.
We can talk later.
Let's talk here.
Let's find out for sure.
Please translate this.
Please translate this.
I have forgiven her already.
I have forgiven him already.
The lake has a very clear water.
She is capable of teaching both English and French.
You'll become a teacher.
You'll become a teacher.
Women also played an important role during the war.
Tom was sure you'd like that.
Tom was sure you'd like that.
Tom looked in the drawers.
That smells good.
This smells good.
I think we should buy a new car.
Tom watered the flowers.
Tom put on his sunglasses.
Tom took off his raincoat.
I had nobody to play with when I lived with my grandmother.
She had nothing else to do.
Is this the key your uncle is looking for?
I managed to catch the last train.
Japan is a beautiful country.
I told him to wait in the car.
I told her to wait in the car.
I told you to wait for me.
I told you to wait for me.
I told them to wait for me.
I told him to wait for me.
I told her to wait for me.
I told him to wait in the car.
I told her to wait in the car.
I told them to wait in the car.
I told you to wait for me.
I told you to wait for me.
I told them to wait for me.
I told him to wait for me.
I told her to wait for me.
Tom is unlikely to go with us next weekend.
I spent a lot of time here when I was a kid.
These pens are better than those.
These glasses don't have any water.
Tom was in too much pain to speak.
Where is the horse?
I wonder if there's a connection.
I couldn't have stayed even if I'd wanted to.
The cat is in the yard, too.
He made Tom an offer he couldn't refuse.
She made Tom an offer he couldn't refuse.
Are you more a summer person or a winter person?
Are you more a summer person or a winter person?
Finland is a Nordic country.
We're finished here.
We must maintain a constant vigil.
Where is the horse?
Is it a horse?
Look, I know you're busy.
Have you heard this joke before?
Tom closed his eyes quickly.
The banks are closed.
I'll be back before dark.
Tom will want to help.
I sure hope that Tom doesn't do that.
This train moves very slowly.
Tom says he has no idea what to do.
I wonder how Tom managed to do that.
I wonder how Tom managed to do that.
Tom is unlikely to want to do that.
I sure hope that Tom helps us tomorrow.
Tom was thirty years old at that time.
I got out of the hospital three days ago.
I'm happy with the way things turned out.
I'm not going to teach you how to do that.
It's a pleasant feeling.
These are fresh.
I found a rare book I had been looking for.
I'm over thirty.
Do you like to watch movies?
Do you like to watch movies?
Tom can't find his bag.
I'll explain the situation to Tom.
How did Tom get past the guards?
Tom is over thirty.
It's a dangerous world.
I have only one pen.
I think we'll be safe here.
I'm a slow learner.
You lost me.
Tom opened his bag.
Tom didn't want to kill anybody.
Tom looks about thirty years old.
Tom came back three months later.
Tom tried to smile.
That was evident.
I don't like your smile.
We've sold all the tickets.
He left.
That's an interesting thought.
I hope to see you again next year.
I won't judge you.
Can you understand the meaning of this sentence?
She had no idea what I was talking about.
She had no idea what I was talking about.
Tom had no idea what I was talking about.
Where have you been all night?
I want to talk to your boss.
Tom heard a cry for help.
Tom heard a cry for help.
Tom has no intention of helping us.
Tom has helped me many times.
Tom doesn't know you were helping me.
Tom doesn't know you were helping me.
Tom doesn't help me very often.
Tom cried for help, but nobody heard him.
Tom asked me not to help him.
Tom always tries to help others.
I can't believe you've done this.
I can't believe you've done this.
Let us help you.
Let me help you with your suitcases.
Why are you dressed?
Do you like the colors?
Do you like the colors?
What a stupid idea!
What a beautiful picture!
What a beautiful picture!
Tom is working at this company now, isn't he?
You obviously want to help.
You obviously want to help.
They found us.
Please stay as long as you want.
Tom is one of my neighbors.
This is a government project.
There's nothing more to be done.
Do you have any idea how much this cost me?
Who's first on your list?
Tom has agreed to our proposal.
Tom got in the boat.
Tom will never forgive himself.
You're a star.
Tom doesn't think it's possible.
Tom doesn't watch TV anymore.
I need your car.
The flowers are red.
The flowers were red.
What is the capital of Hungary?
The teacher became a soldier.
I don't know how to use Facebook.
Do you like French literature?
Every year, I bring my family to the capital.
Every year, I bring my family to the capital.
Help came too late.
Milk is a good beverage.
You know we owe him a lot.
You know we owe him a lot.
You know we owe her a lot.
You know we owe her a lot.
Is Tom in danger?
Tom is sure to succeed.
Tom is sure that he'll succeed.
We've got to face facts.
Tom is the richest man in town.
We're here to rescue you.
Would that be fair?
I'm sure everyone understood.
I hope you remember that.
I hope you remember that.
This error could cost you your life.
This error could cost you your life.
It's hard to understand his ideas.
Do you really think it's important?
Do you really think it's important?
Do you really think it's important?
I suggest you go west.
The situation is different today.
The situation is different today.
I like your offer.
We were told Tom is in danger.
Tom is testing me.
Show Tom the magazine.
Show Tom the magazine.
Let's hope it's enough.
There's something else in the drawer.
Every word matters.
Tom may still be in the hospital.
We can talk when you get back.
For God's sake, what happened?
I can't stand being looked at like that.
We'll begin immediately.
Even Tom thinks that the price is too high.
I heard you don't eat meat.
I heard you don't eat meat.
I heard you don't eat meat.
I heard you don't eat meat.
Some of them are teachers, and some are engineers.
Tom is dumb, but not that dumb.
Tom is dumb, but not that dumb.
I made no mistakes.
He shouted at the top of his voice.
I said to her, "You look pale. Are you all right?"
What was the name of that movie?
I suppose I shouldn't have done that.
The child is sleeping on his stomach.
Don't walk in the park at night!
They sang Hawaiian songs.
I always get up early.
Your daughters are beautiful.
Your daughters are beautiful.
Were you on the train?
Were you on the train?
Tom is coming back from Australia next week.
It was a huge project.
I can't let him do that.
That doesn't sound stupid to me.
I don't expect them to win.
Smart people learn from their mistakes.
I told you you'd like him.
Tom bought a new pair of sunglasses.
Don't call Tom at home after 2:30.
Don't call Tom at home after 2:30.
I wonder who this sentence belongs to.
We have no way to verify this.
I think I'd be a good teacher.
You're not obligated to come.
You're not obligated to come.
His daughter is sick.
Her daughter is sick.
How many women would you like to marry?
I just want her to be happy.
I just want her to be happy.
It's a black-and-white picture.
I have no idea what happened.
Joseph is in the garden.
I know it's heavy.
We used to know all the neighbors by name.
Tom wasn't seriously wounded.
Have you been thinking about me, Mary?
Have you been thinking about me, Tom?
We had to leave.
Was that a joke?
Were you on the train?
Look at the map.
Look at the map.
Tom had to run.
Tom got a call.
She went to America.
Is Tom in pain?
What time did you go to bed last night?
What time did you go to bed last night?
I didn't feel like going out.
Tom made only three mistakes.
Tom refused to help at first.
I don't write poetry anymore.
Tom said that was a bad idea.
I have no desire to go there.
I have no desire to go there.
No one claims that he's a saint.
Tom wrote poems about his love for Mary.
Tom wrote poems about his love for Mary.
It's getting late and I have to get up early tomorrow.
Do you like historical novels?
Do you like historical novels?
I've always loved horses.
I've always loved horses.
I'm almost sure of it.
He returns from Rome tomorrow.
He returns from Athens tomorrow.
Show me that list.
Tom spent three days in jail.
I do think there's hope.
You can go from Washington to New York by train.
I've heard that joke before.
We live in a complicated world.
We live in a very complicated world.
I've met so many new people.
Tom has never been in prison.
She gave a bone to the dog.
Tom is always in a good mood.
Tom and Mary began spending more time together.
Her eyes were wet.
I'm still not sure about it.
What's her occupation?
I knew Tom would be thirsty.
You did a good thing.
You ran in the garden.
Tom quickly disappeared in the crowd.
I'm fed up with this system.
I talked to him after class.
I talked to him after class.
I hope Tom gets married soon.
I had no idea Tom was coming.
From year to year they were growing poorer.
Are you sure there's no meat in this soup?
Are you sure there's no meat in this soup?
And how about you?
I think ours is much better.
Turn around!
Turn around!
You're wet.
What is your earliest childhood memory?
Tom wrote a song about Mary.
I think Tom is looking for his keys.
I think we have a good team.
Tom was wearing a gray suit.
I ride the subway every day.
I'll wait for you to finish.
Tom promised to wait for us.
I think it's a good project.
Tom says he's healthy again.
Tom seems to be pretty rich.
Where was the black cat?
When will you call?
Was this man an enemy of the church?
I know that I won't like it.
I know people find that odd.
I don't love Mary enough to marry her.
That reminds me of you.
I went to the shop.
You have absolutely nothing to fear.
Tom never forgave me for it.
She never forgave me for it.
He never forgave me for it.
Would you close the window?
From this point of view, you are right.
The train is coming!
I'll give you $30.
They sleep in separate beds.
I read your letter yesterday.
I'm shorter than you.
Please explain this sentence to me.
I believe that's a bad sign.
Our baby is learning to speak.
I get up at 7:00.
I know it isn't Tom's fault.
I'm happy with what Tom did.
Tom promised to wait.
You have no idea what's going on, do you?
You have no idea what's going on, do you?
This company is a victim of its own success.
This company is a victim of its own success.
I'll always love you. No matter what.
It's too late to go there now.
It's too late to go there now.
Tom gives me a lot of advice.
I'm sure Tom regrets it now.
She has a drunken husband.
That sentence doesn't pertain to you.
I've never seen a yellow submarine in my life.
Love isn't the only thing that matters.
We can't land the plane on that field.
I had a friend die recently.
I had a friend die recently.
I have no idea why I did it.
Tom died shortly afterwards.
Tom died a few months later.
I have my doubts about that.
This is a difficult situation.
Tom is helping.
Look at that house.
Tom should've called.
Go straight on, and you will find the store.
It is a song.
I do not know what is in the box.
We sat at the table in silence.
I really hope that Tom will come back.
Tom obviously wasn't happy.
I went too far.
I'm not sure it's worth it.
Tom said he liked the idea.
Tom says he's not done yet.
Mum's just gone shopping.
He's full of big ideas.
She fell unconscious to the floor.
I helped him cross the street.
Give them this picture.
Give them this picture.
Give him this picture.
Give her this picture.
Give her this picture.
Tom died a few weeks later.
Tom died a few hours later.
I like your garden.
Tom grew up in the Midwest.
Try this one.
Try this one.
Come out of there.
Tom bet on the wrong horse.
Where did you find this picture?
Where did you find this picture?
Sorry, I had completely forgotten about it.
You have to wait for the next bus.
You have to wait for the next bus.
Tom drank a beer.
You'd better look at this.
Tom has just lost his job.
The circumstances were different then.
Why are many bars closed on Mondays?
I know you're not lying.
I want you to call Tom now.
They're angry.
Tom was my student.
Tom said he liked my idea.
Tom is a very serious guy.
I thought it was a mistake.
I think Tom made a mistake.
I wonder how Tom found out.
Which key is it?
Tom isn't so good at singing.
You asked for my advice, so I'm giving it to you.
That soon might change.
Tom said jokingly that he was not very rich.
Tom was the only one who was busy.
I know it'll take a while.
Tom got out of jail.
How did they die?
Tom is a very mean person.
I don't think I'll make it.
Tom didn't go to the bank.
Tom didn't go to the bank.
I'm sure it was a mistake.
I'm sure it was a mistake.
I sure hope that Tom wins.
Tom had no one else to turn to.
Drive cautiously.
Drive cautiously.
Drive cautiously.
Tom had no one else to turn to.
Drive cautiously.
Drive cautiously.
Study with us!
Study with us!
What fools they are!
Their opinion matters little.
There are many wild animals in this forest.
Tom has written a novel.
I was lucky to be there.
I thought it was strange.
Do you want to save them?
Do you want to save them?
Tom is happy to be home.
I've read a lot of books.
What does this Esperanto sentence mean?
You'll talk to me.
When she came inside, we had finished eating dinner.
Do you think they're dead?
Do you think they're dead?
I can call Tom if you want.
I can call Tom if you want.
This is such a mistake.
I've got so much to do.
I've never shot anyone.
Tom didn't like it much.
Have you packed your suitcase?
Have you packed your suitcase?
Have you packed your suitcase?
The best way to solve a problem is sometimes the simplest.
I don't have a garden.
Tom is talking on the phone with his mother.
I serve no one.
If she annoys you, I'm going to ask her to leave.
Is God important in your life?
I remember the first time I heard this song.
Tom is the president of the local astronomy club.
Tom is back in prison.
He's reading a novel.
She's reading a novel.
There is a bird in the sky.
I planted a tree.
Unfortunately, no one told us.
I planted a tree.
It's not what you say, but what you do that counts.
Stay in the garden, then!
Stay in the garden, then!
Welcome to our 1st German class.
Is she sure?
I could have died.
Where can the black cat be?
The "Grexit" means a Greek exit from the euro.
Many Germans travel to Greece every summer.
I want to know absolutely everything.
Tom eats only white meat.
I didn't go there.
I often wear blue.
I often wear blue.
I think you've already met her.
I think you've already met her.
I think you've already met her.
I think you've already met her.
I hope that I've done the right thing.
Sit down, please.
I'd love to, but I'm busy.
Thanks, it was fun!
One of the books is in French, and the other is in German.
He solved the difficult problem easily.
What did she buy at that store?
She's shorter than I am.
I want to know your opinion.
Tom is an American citizen.
Tom showed me a picture of his family.
I can't see what it is from here.
Not a single star could be seen in the sky.
Tom never drinks with his students.
I still make mistakes.
The box wasn't empty.
Tom is using you.
Tom has no idea where he left his keys.
She said, she regretted her decision.
He said he regretted the decision.
I never lie.
Iceland belonged to Denmark.
Please water the flowers.
Tom says he doesn't have any regrets.
Who organized the meeting?
I have nothing to give Tom.
I hope Tom doesn't do that.
I saw Tom get on the train.
I saw Tom get on the train.
Tom didn't like that idea.
I don't write poetry.
It's a difficult job.
I guess it's time to go.
I don't understand art.
Why didn't you call me earlier?
Why didn't you call me sooner?
I guess it's time to leave.
That was a serious mistake.
Islamabad is the capital of Pakistan.
What's your favorite day of the week?
What's your favorite day of the week?
What's your favorite day of the week?
I was eating when you called me.
Next time, you won't be so lucky.
The ship is at sea.
I only did it for the money.
The only one who knows for sure is Tom.
I can't believe you agreed to this.
Where did you go last Sunday?
I will show you some pictures.
Are you sure you really want to know the truth?
Let's not forget who Tom is.
I'm only thirty years old.
Tom was here thirty minutes ago.
Give me back my bottle.
I know where the key is.
I don't understand modern art.
I wanted to give Tom a gift.
I wanted to give Tom a gift.
We're not wealthy.
Tom promised to tell the truth.
You're disturbing my reading.
I'm here to pick up my book.
Today is the warmest day of the year.
Do you think that Tom is happy?
What time is it now? "It's 3:30."
My mother made me study.
This time, you've crossed the line!
Let's not forget who Tom is.
It is a film for adults, not for children.
Why do you like Tom so much?
Emily is crying.
I'm not talking to you.
I'm not speaking to you.
I tried to do that.
Tom said he had no regrets.
What's on TV now?
What's on TV now?
I wonder what Tom bought me.
I wonder what Tom would say.
This bread smells very good.
He couldn't wait to see the look on her face.
She couldn't wait to see the look on his face.
I enjoyed doing that.
Tom claims he didn't do that.
I don't enjoy doing that.
Tom doesn't understand the situation.
Sadly, "sadfully" is not a word.
At least we're still in one piece.
One day, I will marry her.
Where were you the night that Tom died?
Tom is my age, or maybe a little younger.
She's capable of anything.
We met through a mutual friend.
Has Tom spoken to you about me?
You make it sound very simple.
You make it sound very simple.
I'm trying to take it easy.
Tom is a very capable person.
Do you know what the neighbors say about you?
Do you know what the neighbors say about you?
I just want to help people.
I won't forgive you if you do it again.
I won't forgive you if you do it again.
She's dead. "No, it's not possible!"
They sat in the kitchen.
I have the same dress as you!
Age? "16."
I think we're a strong team.
Tom really likes this sentence.
He doesn't go to church.
I was aware of the situation.
I was trying to take it easy.
Tom likes talking about the weather.
I'm sure Tom knows what to do.
I'm not going to go in there.
I'm not 100% sure about that.
I'm sure Tom wouldn't do that.
I'm afraid it's too late now.
I'm 100% sure of my decision.
I want you to close your eyes.
I'm sorry, but you're wrong here.
I can't lie.
Can you pass me the milk?
I'm not sure if that's a good idea.
I'm not sure if that's a good idea.
She held a flower in her hand.
When did Tom wake up?
Tom went back into the kitchen.
We didn't listen to music.
Tom is too stupid to understand your jokes.
Do you still have a key to the house?
We have to talk, Tom.
Tom, we have to talk.
Tom doesn't know who he should ask for advice.
Tom doesn't know who he should ask for advice.
I can't believe I finally did it.
I can't believe I finally did it.
Tom didn't even shake my hand.
I closed my eyes and screamed.
I hope you like trains.
I didn't have anything to eat.
Why doesn't Tom pay any attention to me?
That's it. I'm not lending you any more money.
There's still a little milk left in this glass.
Tom knows that what he did was a mistake.
I don't do this for the money.
You're drunk!
You're drunk!
You're drunk!
You're drunk!
You're drunk!
Tom is much better today than yesterday.
The island is very easy to reach.
I want to feel important.
I bought these flowers for you.
Tom doesn't eat red meat.
Have you already chosen?
Do you feel guilty?
Who's been shot?
I drove to Kyoto.
I don't think it's a bad idea.
Tom didn't agree to the proposal.
You're not like other girls I've dated.
Why aren't you wearing a costume?
Why aren't you wearing a costume?
Help! Help! cried Pierrette, "I'm being murdered!"
Who were you calling?
I'll never forget the look on his face.
I'll never forget the look on his face.
I can't believe you didn't recognize me!
Tom hopes you're happy.
Tom hopes you're happy.
She's stark naked.
Tom is smarter than he looks.
He was killed.
I thought you were against this proposal.
The soldiers are dead.
I need protection.
Tom doesn't want his parents to find out that he was drunk.
Jefferson remained calm.
We should study.
Jefferson rejected this idea.
J. J. Thomson was an English scientist.
Tom was so calm.
Tom woke up with a pain in his side.
I'm afraid at night.
Who gave you this list?
Good parents are the best teachers.
Puns are often untranslatable into another language.
I met her before you were born.
I met him before you were born.
I met them before you were born.
Tom played with his cats.
Tom played with his cats.
I've always dreamed of going to Australia.
You've got a lot of work ahead of you.
You've got a lot of work ahead of you.
Tom allowed this to happen.
Are you sure you're ready to do this?
Are you sure you're ready to do this?
Are you sure you're ready to do this?
Tom is almost certainly right.
Look, I'm a little busy.
Tom doesn't seem to be very happy.
Tom checked his pockets.
Were you invited to her birthday party?
Were you invited to her birthday party?
It was getting late.
Tom put a great team together.
Tom is good at explaining things.
Tom is good at explaining things.
There is a disproportionate number of girls in the class.
We have to find a way to stop it.
The cost is $300.
I think he was rich.
Our train already left.
Our train already left.
Tom put the note into his pocket.
Tom wants us to go to church.
Should I call you or will you call me?
Her eyes were red from crying.
We were kids together.
Some people will find his behaviour strange.
I've wanted to meet you for a long time.
I've wanted to meet you for a long time.
Unfortunately I can't find the lyrics for this song.
He's a good liar.
Juan doesn't know that Maria is his daughter.
Who helped him?
Who helped her?
Who helped them?
I thought you had lost your watch.
I thought you had lost your watch.
I thought you had lost your watch.
I thought you had lost your watch.
I thought you had lost your watch.
I thought you had lost your watch.
She goes to work by taxi.
I thought Tom was guilty.
She bought a shirt for him.
Do you eat meat every day?
Do you eat meat every day?
How many times a week do you go shopping?
How many times a week do you go shopping?
How old were you when you got married?
How old were you when you got married?
I've already read that document.
I know what you think of me.
I know what you think of me.
I think he was rich.
When I was in school, I dreamed of becoming a pilot.
I thought he would find it interesting.
I thought you would find it interesting.
I thought you would find it interesting.
I don't care what you think of me.
I thought you might find this interesting.
I thought you might find this interesting.
Tom spends very little time with his family.
Tom rushed to her aid.
Human relationships are very complex.
Tom told me that he wants to meet my parents.
It's so bad, it's good.
I run every morning.
I read a lot of books last summer.
The baby was fast asleep.
The baby is fast asleep.
My daughter is fast asleep.
We found the boy fast asleep.
The baby was fast asleep in her mother's arms.
My husband and daughter are fast asleep.
My husband and daughter are fast asleep.
I think you're going to like it here.
I think you're going to like it here.
He likes films.
I went abroad to start a new life.
I went abroad to start a new life.
He had no idea what these words meant.
Why is Tom still on this team?
I don't think it's such a bad idea.
I read the whole book in one day.
I was supposed to do that yesterday.
I hate that color.
Isn't that where we first met?
Isn't that where we first met?
They rented a house.
Your hands are really soft.
We know it's hard to quit smoking.
We've finally reached the summit.
I wonder why Tom didn't do that.
I don't think Tom is busy today.
I'm sure a lot of people would agree with you.
I'm sure a lot of people would agree with you.
I feel much worse today than I did yesterday.
I feel much worse today than I did yesterday.
I'm sure a lot of people think that way.
Tom died before his son was born.
Tom died before the ambulance got here.
Tom died before the ambulance could get there.
There are no pens on the desk.
I'll be busy all day tomorrow.
I hope Tom does the same thing.
I hope Tom doesn't do it again.
I hope you don't tell Tom that.
I hope you don't tell Tom that.
This is a nice place, don't you think?
The sea is deep.
I'm quite happy.
I was horrified.
The ship was at sea.
I see your pen.
Many men died at sea.
I read about him in the newspaper.
I tossed and turned all night.
I tossed and turned all night.
Tom doesn't get up as early as I do.
Let's build a wall.
I've been having some bad luck.
It's very hot inside.
I think Tom has been very lucky.
My grandmother always said, "Don’t breathe and drink at the same time."
Tom left here three hours ago.
Tom called me a few hours ago.
Tom died a year and a half ago.
Tom disappeared three days ago.
It's taken a while.
He has no respect for authority.
They have a complete lack of respect for authority.
Tom usually gets what he wants.
I'm beginning to recall.
Where can I put my bag?
Tom needs a break.
The father left all his money to his daughters.
I lost my wife in a traffic accident.
I like the red dress more than the white.
Release him!
Release him!
I think Tom knows who shot him.
Did you ask them to wait?
Did you ask them to wait?
Tom is probably not hungry.
When did you start wearing glasses?
Your telephone's ringing, Tom.
It's not believable.
Romania's capital is Bucharest.
She left for Osaka yesterday.
She left Osaka yesterday.
They refused to help us.
Tom was one of the victims.
Good advice isn't always expensive.
What does the T stand for?
I don't like my neighbors.
That's my hope.
I could not believe my eyes!
I could not believe my eyes!
The last time I called him, he was out.
I'm still not sure I can help you.
I think you're going to like it.
I think you're going to like it.
Tom promised not to drink anymore.
Tom was afraid he'd lost his key.
Tom left me a note.
I thought Tom had stopped smoking.
I thought Tom had stopped smoking.
Why does Tom lie so much?
I'm your teacher.
I woke up.
Yesterday, my aunt regained her sight.
I'm so happy to finally be back home.
Where did you catch them?
Where did you catch them?
I'm busy here.
You're going to be famous.
I love French culture.
The bag is empty.
The bag is empty.
Please watch this movie.
He rented an apartment.
I feel very guilty.
There is hope.
Tom didn't drink much.
We can't waste even a minute.
Would I tell a lie?
Would I lie to you? "Yes, I think you would lie to me."
Would I lie to you? "Yes, I think you would lie to me."
Tom will buy that painting. "How can you be sure?"
There are 86,400 seconds in a day.
Smoking and drinking aren't allowed.
Tom announced his decision Monday.
She's much happier than him.
Tom likes redheads.
What kind of music did you listen to when you were a teenager?
I don't remember losing my memory.
Wow, you're on the front page!
Wow, you're on the front page!
Let's forget the past and talk about the future.
We can't allow Tom to do that.
We can't allow Tom to do that.
We're your last hope.
Do you want me to believe this?
Do you want me to believe this?
Do you expect me to believe that?
Do you expect me to believe that?
Please don't come in.
Please don't come in.
You've never been happy.
You've never been happy.
The world population will soon be doubled.
He didn't speak to me for several days.
I'll let you know as soon as I get there.
Did she have Parkinson's disease?
What you are saying is very important.
What you are saying is very important.
What she is saying is very important.
What you are saying is very important.
Tom is breathing normally.
She does not smoke.
I can't believe it's happening again.
Tom might want to go there with us.
Tom might want to go there with us.
I think it's too early to tell.
I think that's a huge mistake.
I'm sure Tom knows why we're here.
I wish I could figure out how to finish this project without asking for help.
How do you manage to do this?
We're going to the movies tonight.
He got married three days ago.
I didn't lose much time.
Tom looks older than he is.
I didn't lose much time.
Tom ignored our advice.
Tom ignored our advice.
I still can't believe my luck.
I only want to know the facts.
I bought this shirt yesterday.
Tom said he regretted doing that.
I'm sorry. It was my mistake.
I'm sorry. It was my mistake.
Where did you buy that shirt?
Where did you buy that shirt?
Where did you get that shirt?
Where did you get that shirt?
I know Tom won't want to do that.
I know Tom isn't very happy here.
Do you know the capital of Belgium?
Do you like my new shirt?
Do you like my new shirt?
Tom isn't going anywhere this afternoon.
Tom isn't going anywhere this afternoon.
On Thursdays we go to the movies.
I don't think I've ever heard that joke before.
I think we should talk about it.
I think we should talk about it.
Are you seriously going to wear that?
I've just woken up.
I just woke up.
Every day is a gift.
Every minute is a gift.
Every minute with you is a gift.
I'm so glad I listened to you.
I'm so glad I listened to you.
Giving up isn't the answer.
Thanks for calling, Tom.
Are we going for a walk?
Above all, don't forget to write me.
I ran out of money.
Try to put yourself in her shoes.
The best way to know a foreign country is to go there yourself.
Tom is very poor.
Some people claim to know everything.
We lost sight of each other.
We lost sight of each other.
I lost my key around here.
I need money to buy Tom a present.
How long has Tom been unconscious?
We can't waste any more time.
Can you bring them back to life?
Tom thinks he's a big shot.
Okay, Tom, you can open your eyes now!
What do you mean, I'm not your type?
Dan's throat was cut almost from ear to ear.
I could've married her.
I got married on October 21, 2012.
It was a godsend.
Tom couldn't stop smiling.
He left a good impression.
Sea turtles don't have teeth.
She wets her bed at night.
The girl is small for her age.
Why did you call?
Why did you call?
How are they treating you?
How are they treating you?
Tom never called me.
I would like to meet them.
I would like to meet her.
Did you just meet him?
Did you just meet him?
Did you just meet him?
Did you just meet him?
Did you just meet them?
Did you just meet them?
Did you just meet them?
Did you just meet them?
Did you just meet her?
Did you just meet her?
Did you just meet her?
Did you just meet her?
It's really important.
That's my teacher.
I brought these flowers for you.
How can we prove it?
The best thing is to telephone her.
The Jacksons have invited us over for dinner tonight.
Tom decided to sell his house.
The telephone was ringing when I got home.
Why is love so difficult?
Does Tom go to church?
Whose book is it?
Are you not a teacher?
Her voice echoed in the hallway.
She died in her bed at the age of 96.
You should call Tom.
We like to talk.
We had a fun day.
I don't have a horse.
I have no horse.
I run quickly.
Children watch adults.
You are watching.
The market is big.
I like the teacher.
I promise!
Tom said you'd want to talk with him.
I treated him like my own son.
Do you really want to talk about that now?
Do you really want to talk about that now?
Where are the other three?
I accidentally saw her naked.
I'm glad we already have so much in common.
Today they'll show a good movie.
Today they'll be showing a good film.
What do you think about the films that we saw yesterday?
What do you think about the films that we saw yesterday?
What do you think about the films that we saw yesterday?
What do you think about the films that we saw yesterday?
There were many books inside of that box.
There were many books inside of that box.
It makes a big difference.
He is listening to music in his room.
They forgot my birthday.
Are you seeing a man?
We spoke yesterday.
Could you give an example?
Could you give an example?
This dress fits me very well.
You must not kill.
You must not kill.
The cat is white.
This cat is white.
Three children are playing in the park.
Do you like being famous?
When she entered the kitchen, no one was there.
Tom graduated from high school last year.
What's the difference between science and pseudo-science?
He's tall, famous and rich.
We feel safe.
These pictures are really very beautiful.
Are you safe?
Are you safe?
Tom left for Australia.
Tom is safe.
Pass me the wine.
I have 13 employees.
I did my homework yesterday.
Tom can run faster than me.
Tom talked to me about his plans.
She likes to walk alone.
Did you read an interesting book?
Did you read an interesting book?
Can't we talk about this later?
This flower is blue.
What colour is this flower?
This is more important.
Tom was nothing but skin and bone.
I'll call Tom in a few minutes.
The lake is blue.
I suppose you're busy.
Most women think like that.
My situation has changed.
Tom is busy now, so he can't talk with you.
Tom is busy now, so he can't talk with you.
This dress is cheap.
Don't get married.
It is important to remember who your friends are.
Are we sure of it?
A major is above a captain.
Tom will do whatever it takes to win.
Tom will do whatever it takes to win.
I'm so fed up of everything.
You don't know how much I love you.
I can understand your point of view.
Walt Whitman is my favorite American poet.
Tom had to wait.
Is that a scientific fact?
The boys are under the bed.
Tom gladly accepted.
Mercury is the closest planet to the sun, but it’s not the hottest. Venus is hotter.
Her sons are in the garden.
I've had a lot of calls today.
I've had a lot of calls today.
Why are planets round?
We don't have anything to eat.
We don't have anything to eat.
Tom often goes shopping alone.
I have a meeting at 2:30.
Tom put thirty dollars on the table.
You're hurting him.
Do you like to run?
Do you like to run?
We liked the food, especially the fish.
We liked the food, especially the fish.
You won't believe who came by today.
You won't believe who came by today.
If you don't stop smiling, you'll get a kiss from me.
I can't think of anything to write about.
I can't think of anything to write about.
How many songs have you written?
How many songs have you written?
Horses run fast.
Take me home.
I heard Tom singing in the next room.
I think I know as much as you do.
I'm afraid I have no experience.
I really hope that doesn't happen.
I really hope that doesn't happen.
Tom never forgave me for doing that.
Tom never forgave me for doing that.
Tom never forgave me for doing that.
I'm glad I listened to you.
I'm glad I listened to you.
Tom was probably born in Australia.
She became aware that her parents were watching her.
You can't save me.
You can't save me.
I have a list here.
Tom wants to be rich.
Talk to my boss.
Talk to my boss.
Tom used to smoke.
I'm sure I've seen her before somewhere.
I'm sure I've seen her before somewhere.
I'm sure I've seen him before somewhere.
I think we've met before.
Tom has never been so happy.
Are you sure we haven't met?
I got in my car and I drove off.
Tom got there first.
How pretty is this flower!
Is Tom dreaming?
I like walking alone.
I'll build a large building.
I met her in the street.
It was a warm summer evening.
You look ugly.
It's so painfully obvious.
Tom thought the bed was too soft.
I can get you out of prison.
Let me explain it once more.
Tom will wait for you.
Tom regrets what he did.
I talk to myself all the time.
I talk to myself all the time.
I talk to myself all the time.
If I were you, I would propose to her.
Why did Tom leave so suddenly?
The train hasn't come yet.
Tom watches at least one movie a day.
Tom will be back in thirty minutes.
A look of surprise came over Maria's face.
I just want to be a good neighbor.
This example is a little more complex.
I bought this book as a gift for Tom.
We should help each other.
You always leave the bathroom floor wet.
I thought Tom would want to know.
I thought Tom would want to know.
I think it's time for me to abandon that plan.
I'll bring lunch.
Will you stop talking?
I didn't have enough space to fit my lunch in the bag.
What time and where could we meet?
As she hasn't written to me, I don't know what time she will arrive.
I figured you wouldn't want to drink coffee so late at night.
You should take her illness into consideration.
He left the class because he was feeling sick.
I was trying to do the right thing.
You're too soft on him.
Children learn by watching what adults around them do.
Mary's face was very pale.
She was raised in France.
I want to watch this film.
The people here are used to the cold.
I want to know how long it'll take.
Thank you for the beautiful flowers.
My hobby is writing stories.
Meat is expensive nowadays.
Are you free after school?
You must forgive me.
His lips were pale.
He had pale lips.
What do the kids do in the garden?
I met my teacher by chance at the restaurant last night.
Whose shirt is this?
Tom just confessed.
She's dependent on her husband.
What does Tom think of your music?
I have half a mind to marry her.
Belgrade is the capital of Serbia.
No one would have guessed it!
We all make decisions based on our personal experiences.
Can he see our horse?
An honest life is pleasing to God.
She answered through tears.
He gets up at 7.
For whom have you brought the bone?
For whom have you brought the bone?
For whom have you brought the bone?
Where can I find the milk?
I like the theater. I go to the theater often.
Send me a picture of yourself.
Don't start a sentence with "but".
Do you remember what Tom was wearing yesterday?
Tom wanted to get married to Mary.
Tom lost everything he had.
You owe me three dollars.
Tom should recognize this.
Tom always lies to me.
We don't know that for sure.
Tom is listening to music.
I'm sure I'll do that.
It's my only hope.
The island was completely deserted.
You can smoke in this room.
I'm going to plant a bunch of pretty flowers in my garden.
He often dropped in on me.
Do you know what kind of flower this is?
Do you know what kind of flower this is?
It's strange that our friends are not here.
I read an interesting book yesterday.
The economic situation grew worse.
I promise you I'll stay with you until your father arrives.
I never drink beer before lunch.
Is Tom serious?
I built this company.
Do you have a map of the downtown area?
We're being called.
We deserve to be happy.
Did you buy flowers?
Did you buy flowers?
Did you buy flowers?
When I return, we'll talk.
I cannot translate this book.
How did you lose it?
How did you lose it?
How did you lose it?
How did you lose it?
Did you close the window?
I have to go home and do my homework.
I don't want to talk anymore.
Did you close the window?
Did you close the window?
Did you close the window?
Is Tom still in the hospital?
Tom translated the letter from French into German.
We've been in dangerous situations before.
They won't be happy until we're all dead.
He'll never admit he's wrong.
The student gave the correct answer.
Tom is probably in the kitchen.
The student gave the correct answer.
What's in that box?
I haven't worn this in years.
I wonder who liked my picture.
I am explaining the rules.
I have to understand the meaning of this sentence.
The central nervous system consists of four organs.
Drop your pants.
Someone liked my picture on Instagram.
I can't tell if you're serious or not.
I can't tell if you're serious or not.
We were just about to call the police.
We were just about to call the police.
I was just about to call 911.
Where have you been? We were just about to call the police.
She's screaming, not singing.
Be careful. It's spicy.
Be careful. It's very spicy.
Be careful. It's a little spicy.
Tom will want to know how you're doing.
Tom will want to know how you're doing.
She seems short beside her sister.
Tom beats his wife.
Do you accept my offer?
Do you accept my offer?
A year consists of 365 days or 366 days.
A year consists of 365 days or 366 days.
We've made many mistakes.
Unfortunately, I can't.
They got caught red-handed.
You're missing the bigger picture.
I'm practically already grown up.
I'm practically already grown up.
You're missing the bigger picture.
It happened faster than I had expected.
Tom asked the DJ for a slow song.
Tom asked for a slow song.
He has lost weight.
All of her friends are students.
He knows ten times as many English words as me.
This new shop will open in a week.
Come in already.
Come in already.
Tom stopped laughing.
I want to be here when Tom wakes up.
I was born on a ship.
Tom probably knew who I was.
Maybe we can talk.
I hope Tom says no.
We'll be neighbors.
Let me have another look at that.
She was very happy.
They're not that stupid.
The meeting isn't over.
The situation is grave.
These are my suitcases.
The restaurant we're going to isn't far from here.
Who the heck is Tom?
The ring is ringing.
I have no experience, but I'm a fast learner.
It seemed pretty important to me at the time.
I think we have an obligation to do that.
Tom is the only one who knows for sure.
Tom is the only one who knows for sure.
I don’t' feel like watching TV tonight.
It seemed pretty important at the time.
Can I go to the movies tomorrow?
Do you want to go to the movies tomorrow?
Do you want to go to the movies tomorrow?
Do you want to go to the movies tomorrow night?
Do you want to go to the movies tomorrow night?
I can't believe you did this.
I can't believe you did this.
We sang songs around the campfire.
Tom is still at his grandmother's house.
You'd make a lovely couple.
Green is the color of money.
I'm not bothering you?
I'm not bothering you?
Finally I can go to bed.
He's a Phd-doctor, not a doctor-doctor.
Do you happen to know the time?
I know there was a big church there.
Before dying, she spent more than a month in hospital.
My watch is more accurate than yours.
My watch is more accurate than yours.
Only you can save me.
Only you can save me.
Only I can save you.
Only I can save you.
Only we can save them.
Only they can save us.
Yes, I have read the book.
Next time, you won't be so lucky.
Next time, you won't be so lucky.
This debate won't get us anywhere.
Tom, wake up. It's me.
Tom will probably say no.
Let's try again.
We're safe in here, aren't we?
The cat is drinking.
Can I telephone London from here?
They're fast runners.
He looks happy.
She wore a simple dress.
Your life is in danger.
I just got a good idea.
I know the facts well enough.
I know the facts well enough.
Tom didn't know where to catch the bus.
He is having difficulty breathing.
I wonder where Joe went?
We are all products of our environment.
A fool always believes that it is the others who are fools.
That's not what I meant. I'm sorry.
That's not what I meant. I'm sorry.
Don't sleep too close to the fire.
What are those flowers called?
It was hot inside the tent.
Big girls don't cry.
Big boys don't cry.
I've been wanting to see that movie for a long time.
I've been wanting to see that movie for a long time.
They were wealthy.
That's an interesting topic.
That's an interesting topic.
How did you get that idea?
This is very, very important.
I come from a planet called Earth.
We live on a planet called Earth.
Tom comes from a planet called Earth. It's very far away.
Most people aren't that stupid.
How could you do such a thing to me?
How could you do such a thing to me?
These clothes are too big for you.
These clothes are too big for you.
It's so true.
Tom is the project manager.
Tom is the project manager.
Every Thursday we go to the cinema.
Did you see the knife?
Drivers must stop at the stop line.
Something extraordinary happened.
That's a very interesting topic.
Freedom is very, very important.
Her face was wet with tears.
Tom would never let that happen.
I think we should sell our old car.
That event happened 15 years ago.
This soup is too spicy.
I've brought you a gift.
She phoned him as soon as she got home.
I know for a fact that Tom would never want this.
Why are you dragging this out?
Tom isn't the kind of person I want dating my daughter.
She has posters of her favorite bands on her walls.
I thought you'd be busy.
I thought you'd be busy.
I thought you'd be busy.
I thought you'd be busy.
I thought you'd be busy.
I thought you'd be busy.
We'll be there in thirty minutes.
We'll be there in thirty minutes.
Please read that book.
Do I look like a guy who wants to get married?
He looked back.
We knew it would happen sooner or later.
Are you sure you don't know what this is?
Are you sure you don't know what this is?
Are you sure you don't know what this is?
Please come back home as soon as you can.
I met her in the winter of last year.
I'm not in the mood.
What was your first impression of London?
Stop talking loudly.
The gardens are very beautiful in the spring,and we often go there.
Tom passed out from the pain.
What does your family name mean?
What does your family name mean?
I don't like the sound of my own voice.
I thought you were already dead.
I'm drawn to you.
Сold is blowing in from the windows.
Send her my regards.
I don't think Tom would lie.
Beowulf became king of the Geats.
Beowulf killed Grendel with his bare hands.
Children learn languages very quickly.
You're not missing much.
You're not missing much.
Don't pull my sleeve.
Don't pull my sleeve.
Look! There's a cat in the kitchen.
Dogs can see in the dark.
I told Tom how to get to our house.
We watched a movie.
Please stop.
Please stop.
I'm pretty happy with how things turned out.
How many followers do you have on Twitter?
I don't really use Facebook that much.
He played an important role in the movement.
I didn't think you'd get here so soon.
This year I'm living at my grandparents'.
Tom believed it.
The shadow falls upon the wall.
I haven't read his novel, and my brother hasn't either.
I want to be happier.
You can't leave.
You can't leave.
He ushered me to the hall.
Do you study French every day?
Do you study French every day?
This task is too much for him.
Stop singing this song.
Stop singing this song.
This is not a complete list.
How long will it take to you?
How long will it take to you?
Please keep me informed.
Who were you just speaking to?
Who were you just speaking to?
Tom tried to stand up, but couldn't.
It took an hour.
You're an interesting girl.
Monaco is a tax haven.
I gave Tom my car keys.
Tom was in that building.
Tom didn't even try to help.
Women don't usually want to talk with me.
I've heard they don't let girls in this club.
No language is as lovely as Japanese.
She became a great artist.
Every problem can be solved.
I have to speak with you immediately.
I have to speak with you immediately.
We'll catch you.
We'll catch you.
Suddenly, it started to rain very hard.
I'm not talking to you, Tom.
Tom is in his room studying French.
Prepare yourself for the future.
Prepare yourself for the future.
I wasn't sure I could do it.
I wasn't sure I could do it.
I wasn't sure I could do it.
I wasn't sure I could do it.
What color are the walls in your room?
What color are the walls in your room?
What color are the walls in your room?
What color are the walls in your room?
Are you going to come back?
Are you going to come back?
Let Tom stay home.
I told Tom to wait in the car.
Let them leave.
Let them leave.
Let me leave.
Let me leave.
Let them leave.
Let me leave.
Let him leave.
Let her leave.
Let her leave.
Let her leave.
Let him help you.
Let them help you.
Let's talk about love.
Let him go home.
Let him go home.
Let her go home.
Let her go home.
Let her finish.
Tom refused to ask for directions.
We should have turned right.
You have no idea where we are, do you?
You have no idea where we are, do you?
Tom always keeps a map in the glove compartment.
My name is Richard, but you can call me Dick.
My name is Richard, but you can call me Dick.
My name is Richard, but everyone calls me Dick.
The girl was wearing pink panties.
Tom has caught every Pokémon.
I succeeded in my first attempt.
We're moving in the right direction.
We're moving in the right direction.
The sun is bright today.
Let us do that.
Let him decide.
Let her decide.
I have to admit that you're right.
How much time did we lose?
Tom couldn't find the keys.
You told me to give it to Tom.
You told me to give it to Tom.
I bought a new bag.
Are you sure you saw someone on the bridge?
Are you sure you saw someone on the bridge?
Tom glanced at the others.
I hope Tom comes back soon.
I sure hope Tom likes this song.
I wanted to watch that movie with you.
I wanted to watch that movie with you.
That's much worse.
I sure hope Tom doesn't do that.
Thank you so much for inviting me.
Because she has a good figure, whatever she wears suits her.
I think you're just wasting your time.
I think you're just wasting your time.
I sure hope Tom does that.
The children are listening attentively.
Tom knows this area very well.
My idea is better.
Have you met her before?
Have you met him before?
Have you met them before?
The meeting started thirty minutes ago.
This is more expensive than I expected.
Tom probably needs help.
There were blood stains on the floor.
They're thirty dollars each.
This photo was taken by Tom.
Tom is always very busy.
How much money did you lose on that deal?
Tom is still inside.
I'll choose this one.
I'll choose this one.
You would be safe there.
You would be safe there.
Is everybody happy now?
Give me the car keys.
Don't call Tom anymore.
Don't call Tom anymore.
Tom wanted to be a scientist.
Tom worked until 2:30.
Tom is walking up the stairs.
What do you see in the picture?
What do you see in the picture?
I know that most people here don't like me very much.
I had no clue what to do.
Tom put on his spectacles to read the letter.
If you had told me you were planning to go, I would've waited for you.
If you had told me you were planning to go, I would've waited for you.
My life hasn't been the same since I met him.
My life hasn't been the same since I met him.
It's rude for people to cut in line.
Here are a few interesting facts.
I remember my childhood well.
Sometimes adults behave like children.
Return to the ship immediately.
Return to the ship immediately.
Spring is in the air.
Are you sure that's what Tom said?
Are you sure that's what Tom said?
I won't tell anyone. I promise.
We talked about music.
Tom was the first to arrive and the last to leave.
I'm not so certain.
Hanako grew taller than her mother.
Are you attracted to her?
Are you attracted to her?
Are you attracted to him?
Are you attracted to him?
That's not an opinion. It's a fact.
What other movies did you watch?
What other movies did you watch?
We're on the same team, right?
French is an interesting language.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
Tom thought you were drunk.
He's your age.
Now I don't feel like watching television.
Her hair was as red as fire.
Tom waited, but nobody came.
Is this pen yours?
Tom forgot the keys on the table.
Tom left his keys on the table.
I don't want Tom to help me.
What's in the box is none of your business.
Tom is always in a bad mood.
Do you know what color she likes?
We can stay here as long as we want.
We can stay here as long as we want.
Who helps her?
Would you mind if I took the pink one?
The longest word in the French language is "anticonstitutionnellement".
The last I heard, Tom was in prison.
This is a very important day for us.
Would you like to take a look at it?
Would you like to take a look at it?
Tom is the happiest person I know.
I heard some weird noises last night.
I'll wait for you in the car.
Tom watched TV while he ate dinner.
You should call your mother more often.
You should call your mother more often.
I couldn't stop crying.
I already did my homework at school.
Do I look fat in this dress?
I look so fat in this dress.
Please stop lying.
Tom woke up toward the end of the movie.
Tom spent the night on the couch.
I left halfway through the movie.
Let's watch a horror movie.
She gave him the middle finger.
Who did you invite to your birthday party?
No, sit down.
They don't want to get out of bed.
I have no idea who he is.
He reeked of liquor.
I have an appointment at 2:30.
Why don't you call Tom?
Why don't you call Tom?
Repeat after me.
I don't like the taste.
Astrobiologists think our best bet for finding life on other planets is to search for water.
Talk to me if you want.
I must talk with you.
Tom shut his eyes again.
Summer is coming to an end.
The summer was coming to an end.
Autumn is coming.
It was a pleasure meeting you, Tom.
You've grown up, Tom.
I called your office today, but you weren't in.
I was quite calm.
I was quite calm.
Are you watching carefully?
Are you watching carefully?
People are depending on you.
Look how happy Tom is.
If that happens, call me.
If that happens, call me.
How did you learn about the Tatoeba Project?
How did you learn about the Tatoeba Project?
How did you learn about the Tatoeba Project?
How did you learn about the Tatoeba Project?
Tom never falls.
Tom tasted the wine.
Tom is small for his age.
I'm glad you invited me.
I'm glad you invited me.
Tom claims that he has never killed anyone.
Don't open it, please.
Don't open it, please.
Don't open it, please.
Don't open it, please.
What time do you usually get up every morning?
Who gave the order?
They still haven't woken up.
What is it that you liked about him?
What is it that you liked about her?
What is it that you liked about him?
What is it that you liked about her?
He nodded encouragingly.
There's nothing to do here.
How about going to the movies on Saturday?
How about going to the movies on Saturday?
Look at your map.
Look at your map.
Tom is a 33-year-old man.
I expected a bit more.
The neighbors' dog passed away.
The sea level is rising.
I'm sure you'll be very happy.
I'm sure you'll be very happy.
We should plant more flowers.
I don't understand how could I have made such a mistake.
There are 187,888 lakes in Finland.
I don't understand what you find so interesting about squirrels.
What do you find so interesting about him?
What do you find so interesting about her?
What do you find so interesting about him?
What do you find so interesting about her?
What do you find so interesting about squirrels?
What do you find so interesting about squirrels?
What do you find so interesting about this website?
What do you find so interesting about this website?
What do you find so interesting about Japan?
What do you find so interesting about Japan?
I don't understand what you find so interesting about squirrels.
The roof of my house is red.
I'm not sure if that'll help.
Her voice was soft and beautiful.
Almost everyone participated.
I'm going back home tomorrow.
Tom started climbing.
I usually wake up at six o'clock.
Tom knew where he had put his keys.
Tom said you told him to wait.
You're not prepared for what awaits you.
You're not prepared for what awaits you.
You're not prepared for what awaits you.
You're not prepared for what awaits you.
Let's talk about solar energy.
We're not ready to have a kid now.
I'm sorry. I forgot.
Tom couldn't speak French.
I feel funny today.
He fell down the stairs.
Munich is the capital of Bavaria.
I don't wear a watch but I used to wear one when I was younger.
I think it's time to wind up this meeting.
He went to Berlin last year.
You've been very kind to me.
What department do you work for?
Tom and his friends sat around the campfire and sang songs.
What department do you work for?
She went out on a limb defending him, and now she has lost her job.
I've been watching you study.
I've been watching you study.
We'll find a way to use it.
We'll find a way to use it.
We'll find a way to use it.
Leave me alone now.
Leave me alone now.
Good morning, ladies and gentlemen.
Tom looks more friendly today than he usually does.
It's on the sofa.
Tom decided to call for help.
It's on the sofa.
I've already paid back all the money that I owed Tom.
I promise I'll never do that again.
Did you believe Tom?
Did you believe Tom?
Tom is your age.
I wonder what Tom is laughing about.
We'd like to leave.
Tom always answers his phone.
This bed is too soft.
Prices keep going up.
Explain the situation to Tom.
Explain the situation to Tom.
Wait here until I get back.
I served in the intelligence corps.
Just wait in the car.
There was only one way out of here.
I don't think Tom is planning to help us.
Are you afraid of losing your money?
Are you afraid of losing your money?
I'd like to know when you can send it out.
Listen to me.
Tom was one of the people who helped us.
It's hard to choose.
That's not a museum.
That's not a museum.
He is not dependent on his parents.
Tom died in 2013 at the age of thirty.
I hope it goes well.
Tom worked as a teacher and journalist.
I think Tom isn't the right man for the job.
Why did you leave Australia?
When did he leave for Mongolia?
When did he leave for Mongolia?
My brother died in a traffic accident.
When did you become a teacher?
The children watched TV while Tom cooked dinner.
Tom drank the glass of vodka.
Tom is the only one who knows how to do that.
They have no idea what's going on.
I wanted your opinion.
Wear whatever you want to wear.
Tom used to eat a lot of meat.
I tried to tell Tom, but he refused to listen.
Why did Tom leave so suddenly?
Why did Tom leave so suddenly?
Tom finally confessed to the killing.
Did you like the movie we watched yesterday?
If you go on like this you'll end up like your father.
There’s no better way to start the day.
Like I said, I was busy.
Like I said, I was busy.
You did not like my book.
You did not like my book.
You did not like my book.
Tom grabbed his bag and left.
Tom died a day later.
Please don't go. Don't leave me alone here.
Please don't go. Don't leave me alone here.
Please don't go. Don't leave me alone here.
Please don't go. Don't leave me alone here.
I hope Tom does everything he's promised to do.
Tom had no idea where he was.
May I open my eyes now?
May I open my eyes now?
We don't really have anything to talk about.
They won't help us.
Did you talk about me?
Did you talk about me?
It doesn't matter to me, but it matters to Tom.
Why did you sell your car?
Why did you sell your car?
Why did you sell your car?
Why did you sell your car?
I've brought you a gift.
I've brought you a gift.
I always thought that Tom would become a teacher.
Tom completely lost his head.
I just can't believe Tom is dead.
I just can't believe Tom is dead.
The guard is dead.
What makes you so sure I want to be your friend?
Bring me a drink.
I stopped drinking coffee.
Go back to your work.
The higher we went, the colder it became.
He loves her for her beauty.
I want you to leave right now.
I want you to leave right now.
My uncle's wife is my aunt.
I have no idea how long it will take.
Look around you. What do you see?
Look around you. What do you see?
Look around you and tell me what you see.
Look around you and tell me what you see.
Tom reads the newspaper on the train on his way to work.
Tom said that he wanted to talk to you about something important.
Tom said that he wanted to talk to you about something important.
We need to finish this before Tom gets here.
I wonder what it tastes like.
I wonder what it tastes like.
I wonder what it tastes like.
Tom is writing on the blackboard.
Are you sure you don't want to come tonight?
Are you sure you don't want to come tonight?
Are you sure you don't want to come tonight?
Test pilots are constantly tempting fate.
I hope you won't tell anyone you saw me leave this house.
I hope you won't tell anyone you saw me leave this house.
I hope you won't tell anyone you saw me leave this house.
I hope you won't tell anyone you saw me leave this house.
Watch your speed.
Is the hotel far from here?
Do you really think it's impossible?
Let's go to the hospital.
Let's go to the hospital.
We were all busy.
Will that change?
The human eye is like a camera.
Tom talked to a lot of people.
Do you want to go to a museum with me?
She gets up at seven in the morning.
Do you want to watch a movie?
Do you want to watch a movie?
Tom stopped shivering.
What's your favorite American beer?
I just knew I had to try.
I've made the same mistakes as I made last time.
Tom lives on the third floor.
I wish my family was happy like yours.
Why are you dressed?
Why are you dressed?
I can't believe Tom did all this.
Tom lost a book.
What a nice family!
I've just become a grandfather.
Where do you park?
Where do you park?
Let's ignore that.
Tom is quite rich.
You won't enjoy it.
You won't enjoy it.
You can't prove it.
Tom wrote a short story about a young girl and her dog.
I hope that Tom will come.
It was still warm.
It was still warm.
It was still warm.
Tom said he wanted to talk.
Tom put on a clean shirt.
I don't have that information.
What's wrong with my jokes?
Do you happen to know him?
Do you happen to know him?
I honestly don't know.
Who made the rules?
Tom noticed a change.
Choose a word.
Choose a word.
Don't stop!
She was the youngest of three children.
Do you know the man standing on the bridge?
Do you know the man standing on the bridge?
What did Tom build?
Tom was teleported to another planet.
You're still growing.
You're still growing.
I was very pleased.
Please listen to us.
Please listen to us.
Tom sent me his picture.
Tom wastes his money.
He seemed nervous.
She seemed nervous.
Can't you understand that it's impossible?
Can't you understand that it's impossible?
Everyone's having a great time.
Tom can't finish this job in a day.
She has no idea what she's doing.
Why did you do this to me?
Are you serious?
I forgot to buy a gift for you.
I forgot to buy a gift for you.
I spoke to my daughter.
I spoke to my daughter.
I'm glad to see that today is such a beautiful day.
Wait here until we get back.
The men are wearing short sleeve shirts.
Norway is my new homeland.
Don't tell me he's dead.
Don't tell me he's dead.
All that belongs to the past now.
Tom confessed everything.
That topic comes up often.
Wait here until we get back.
Tom wouldn't help us.
Tom made a list of songs he doesn't like.
I expected better than this.
Tom is a quiet man.
Tom doesn't go to church.
I won't go so easy on you next time.
I won't go so easy on you next time.
Tom tried to compose himself.
Tom is at least a head taller than me.
Tom is our teacher.
Tom happened to be there.
Tom goes there every day.
Tom goes there every day.
Tom goes to kindergarten.
Things are about to change.
I hope Tom never finds out.
This was part of the plan.
I wash my hands before eating lunch.
I bought a new cutting board.
Close your books.
The simplest solution is often the best.
This is the house that Jack built.
Tom likes to drink.
We're very, very busy.
Tom likes my jokes.
Tom gave us everything he had.
Do I have to stay in the hospital?
How do I know that you're not going to try to kill me?
How do I know that you're not going to try to kill me?
I was asleep from one to four this afternoon.
Turn around and close your eyes.
He has a low libido.
Tom looks forward to going to work every morning.
Tom was obviously dying to know.
It's made of leather.
Which color do you prefer, blue or green?
Which color do you prefer, blue or green?
This house straddles the border between Canada and the United States.
I've never ridden a horse before.
I'm sure Tom would've agreed.
I'll wait for you in the car.
There are no fish in this lake.
Tom says he's having fun.
We've talked about it.
I heard a call for help.
I heard a call for help.
Tom sang while he worked.
There's a lot of room in here.
Tom said they were lucky.
There was a lot to talk about.
There was a lot to talk about.
Tom claims he never said that.
Are you sure Tom can do that?
Are you sure Tom can do that?
Are you sure Tom can do that?
I can run as fast as Tom can.
There was no sound.
Could you excuse us a sec?
That's what we hope will happen.
Do you remember how it all began?
Tom is waiting in the backyard.
I never forget a face.
Tom needs open heart surgery.
We want Tom back on our team.
That's not very likely to happen.
Tom sang at church.
We enjoyed being there.
My kids don't usually lie to me.
Tom, what happened? Why are you crying?
This book isn't very interesting.
We lost a lot of money.
There were no trees on the island.
We know you're in pain.
I'm looking at the flower.
I'm looking at those flowers.
What do you say we go to my house?
What do you say we go to my house?
Did you meet someone else?
Did you meet someone else?
Don't treat me like a kid.
Tom is in great danger.
What percentage of the people speak three languages?
Let's get serious.
Short sentences are better.
I don't think you'll like this.
I don't think you'll like this.
Tom wants to leave, but he can't.
Tom got out his pen.
Tom forced me to go.
Tom made me go there.
Tom gets up at 6:30.
We're not the majority.
Tom gave the cat some milk.
Tom gave the cat some milk.
I hope that won't happen again.
I hope that won't happen again.
Tom disappeared a year ago.
I haven't cried in a long time.
What is the title of your new book?
Tom wants to go from Europe to Australia.
We'll be there by 2:30.
We'll never meet again.
I have no idea how they did it.
Tom died three hours later.
Tom called a friend.
How many times did she call?
Tom arrived in a black car.
We were both very busy.
What movie did Tom want to see?
What movie did Tom want to see?
Tom bought a gift for his daughter.
Tom bought a gift for his daughter.
What is the title of your new book?
Tom asked for a pen.
I feel like this is all my fault.
We haven't talked since.
Tom still loves me, I hope.
If I had enough time, I would talk with you.
I wonder what Tom thinks of me.
Tom knew I was busy.
Tom is well dressed.
We're not going to let Tom do that.
We'll keep you informed.
We'll keep you informed.
I'm sure you're going to enjoy it.
I'm sure you're going to enjoy it.
I wonder what I'll find in the box.
There's nothing to eat in the kitchen.
Tom cried like a little baby.
Tom sings at church.
We're so lucky to have Tom on our team.
Tom wouldn't let me do that.
I hope you're doing what I told you to do.
I hope you're doing what I told you to do.
When I hear this song, I cry.
Tom sang a lot of old songs.
We hope Tom will do what we've asked.
We're leaving right now.
This does not concern you at all.
This does not concern you at all.
Some women are very dangerous.
Do you find that interesting?
My brother has lived in England for more than thirty years.
They're getting married.
Excuse me, I don't understand.
Please don't talk about me when I'm gone.
I'm sure you're going to enjoy it.
I'm sure you're going to enjoy it.
I wonder what Tom actually thinks.
We just want to be happy.
How do you know that belongs to her?
How do you know that belongs to her?
How do you know that belongs to him?
How do you know that belongs to him?
What's your daughter's name?
Please hold on tight.
Please hold on tight.
What colour were they?
Tom looked at the horse.
We tried to call you.
I didn't like them.
They didn't like her.
They didn't like him.
Tom didn't like them.
We didn't like them.
Did you just call me?
Did you just call me?
Tom was close to tears.
Tom has left us forever.
You did a good thing.
Tom made himself get up.
You can't leave here.
You can't leave here.
Tom will end up in prison.
You're in fine shape.
You're in fine shape.
You may wait outside.
You were great today.
You were great today.
Have you sold it yet?
Have you sold it yet?
Have you sold it yet?
Have you sold it yet?
Did you just wake up?
Did you just wake up?
We didn't expect them to buy a new car.
He lost his parents in a plane accident.
I'm afraid I'm on the wrong train.
Do you promise not to tell?
Do you promise not to tell?
There's so much we haven't done yet.
Do I have to stay in hospital?
I've read about a hundred books so far.
I've read about a hundred books so far.
Is that weird?
We walked in the park.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
I didn't know you were so rich.
So, why are you here?
So, why are you here?
Tom will come to save us.
How much time did you need for that?
I sent you some flowers.
They both are in the garden.
I just don't feel safe here anymore.
Tom has never been a teacher.
Tom is different from other boys.
You should've seen the look on your face.
Which language do you use when you speak to your parents?
You have nice skin.
Can I call you later?
I hate girls like that.
That dress is cheap.
I didn't expect you home so soon.
We have a lot of fun.
Why are you calling Tom?
Why are you calling Tom?
I met them last week.
That's what saved me.
Tom played much better today.
They'll be safe here.
That woman was almost always in a bad mood.
Tell me your address.
Tom ran across the road.
That reminds us of something.
That reminds us of something.
You did well, my son.
They told us to wait.
It's probably a sign.
It must be a mistake.
Tom isn't going to sing.
We can talk about it.
Maybe we should talk.
Tom will try to stop me.
He lost his friends' phone numbers.
We have to wait here.
Tom was the only one who laughed.
Try this instead.
Try this instead.
I want to drink milk.
Tom will call you later.
Tom will call you later.
Excuse me one second.
Tom lost his house keys.
Tom was shorter than me when we were kids.
We didn't expect it.
I forgot to tell you that Tom is coming over for dinner tonight.
I forgot to tell you that Tom is coming over for dinner tonight.
We were about to call you.
We were about to call you.
We talked on the way home.
I have a feeling Tom won't do what he's promised to do.
We have a lot of homework.
We do what we can to help.
I hope Tom never finds out what happened here today.
You can't be so sure.
Tom accepted my gift.
We hope Tom will do what we've asked him to do.
My best friend was Tom when I was a little kid.
We're having so much fun.
Someone sent me a gift.
Someone sent me a gift.
I had good teachers.
Tom clearly wants to go.
How's your daughter?
Tom isn't going to help.
How is that my fault?
Tom may already be dead.
Tom is drowning in debt.
Tom didn't want to come.
Tom probably won't come.
My son could've died.
Tom likes to play cards.
Come back to Chicago.
Come back to Chicago.
We owe you our lives.
We owe you our lives.
He was too drunk to drive home.
She allowed me to go.
She allowed me to go.
Tom asked me for advice.
This cat is very fat.
It's time for action.
It's time for action.
Greece is an old country.
I sometimes go to the cinema.
That's how Tom died.
Sorry for being so late.
Sorry for being so late.
My daughter likes Tom.
Tom told me to be here by 2:30 tomorrow.
Tom has refused to go.
Give me back my tickets.
Give me back my tickets.
Why did you buy so much?
Why did you buy so much?
Tom was able to do it on his third try.
Tom says he left a note.
Did you get up early?
Did you get up early?
Tom is a serious person.
Are you going to cry?
Show me what you have in your bag.
Tom died during surgery.
Tom lost his sunglasses.
Tom isn't going to stop.
I know it's my fault.
He finished his work.
I'll definitely come.
I'm not busy tonight.
We're sure of that.
They'll get caught.
Tom was thirty years old when he died.
My situation is different.
That's why Tom left.
Why are you helping Tom?
Why are you helping Tom?
I met a young man whose name was Tom.
He took a sharp left.
We work in a factory.
Both of you be quiet.
Both of you be quiet.
Everyone was so busy.
Do you have the keys?
Do you have the keys?
Can you forgive me, Tom?
I knew you'd be busy.
I knew you'd be busy.
Put it in the drawer.
Put it in the drawer.
Put it in the drawer.
Put it in the drawer.
Tell Tom it's important.
Can you believe this is really happening?
Can you believe this is really happening?
Can you believe this is already happening?
Can you believe this is already happening?
Tom told us you hit him.
Tom told us you hit him.
Tom told me you hit him.
Who was on the phone?
You have thirty days.
You have thirty days.
Why were they chosen?
You're a good singer.
You're a good singer.
You need new clothes.
You need new clothes.
Everyone shook hands.
Are your bags packed?
Are your bags packed?
Are your bags packed?
Give me another chance.
Give him another chance.
Give her another chance.
Please give me another chance.
Tom gave me another chance.
I gave them another chance.
I gave him another chance.
I gave her another chance.
Give me another chance to try.
Let's give them another chance.
Let's give him another chance.
Let's give her another chance.
I'll give you another chance.
We'll give them another chance.
I'll give you another chance.
I'll give them another chance.
I'll give him another chance.
I'll give her another chance.
I was in a nightclub.
I was there recently.
I was talking to you.
I was talking to you.
I was out for a walk.
I wonder who took it.
I'd rather wait here.
I'd never get caught.
I wouldn't like that.
Tom had to carry all three suitcases.
Why didn't Tom wait?
They're very happy.
Tom was dressed in blue.
Quit before it's too late.
Haven't you finished yet?
Haven't you finished yet?
Everybody started running.
Tom slipped me a note.
This one belongs to Tom.
This one belongs to Tom.
I'll try to help you.
I'll try to help you.
I'll take the stairs.
Tom is sure to help you.
Tom is sure to help you.
I'm glad you had fun.
I'm glad you had fun.
What time are you coming back?
What time are you coming back?
Give Tom back his money.
Give Tom back his money.
No one is going to help us.
We can at least try.
Tom had nothing to give.
I'm lucky to be here.
I'm not leaving here.
I'm not here for you.
I'm not here for you.
I'm not sure anymore.
I'm not sure anymore.
Thank you so much for this information.
Thank you so much for this information.
I'm on the phone now.
The store was closed.
Did Tom see you come in?
Did Tom see you come in?
We watch TV together.
You're a teacher now.
You're almost thirty.
You're almost thirty.
I hope you don't die.
I'll go to bed early.
I lost my sunglasses.
Tom is packing his bags.
Why do you always wear white shirts?
I thought you hated red wine.
Tom knows it's too late.
Your cat is fat.
I know you're afraid.
I know you're afraid.
I knew you'd make it.
I knew you'd make it.
I hope you know that.
I hope you know that.
Tom is obviously scared.
I feel safe with you.
It's much better now.
Let's take our seats.
I didn't believe you.
It didn't hurt a bit.
Come in and sit down.
Come in and sit down.
You don't waste time.
You don't waste time.
I don't normally lie.
It doesn't bother us.
Tom loves trains.
It's so hard to choose.
Tom has gone back home to Australia.
Maybe we'll try again later.
Tom forced me to do it.
Tom forced me to do that.
I see you're all awake.
Tom didn't like school.
Let's sing that song again.
Tom is rich, but not me.
I didn't expect that.
My health's very bad.
I'm unnecessary here.
It's past the square.
You were unconscious.
You were unconscious.
You've got willpower.
You've got willpower.
You should've called.
You should've called.
You should've called.
Tom hit me on the head.
Nobody was paying attention.
Are you sure you'll be OK?
Tom did everything he could to help.
Tom came home very drunk last night.
Tom is the lead engineer.
Didn't you read the story?
Didn't you read the story?
Tom is as busy as I am.
Tom does his homework before dinner.
That's likely true.
That's hardly likely.
Tom didn't help anybody.
Tom didn't shoot anyone.
Nobody's been inside.
Nobody's that stupid.
It's not explainable.
Isn't that important?
Tom is the one to blame.
They're watching you.
They're watching you.
They're closed today.
They wouldn't listen.
They'll believe that.
They'll call tonight.
They're already dead.
They nodded silently.
They started talking.
Tom said you were happy.
Tom said you were happy.
We're probably right.
We're probably wrong.
This is all my fault.
How much is that going to cost me?
You're unforgettable.
You're unforgettable.
He's a very nice boy.
They were both naked.
Wait a little longer.
Wait a little longer.
Her daughter is sick.
His daughter is sick.
You seem to be happy.
You seem to be happy.
I'm busy on Saturday.
I'm sure you're busy.
We just want to talk.
I want you to listen.
I want you to listen.
Tom is a very angry boy.
I regret telling you.
Tom was also having fun.
I worked in this factory.
Are you sure that it was Tom?
Tom wants to go hunting.
I'm studying French now.
Is that another joke?
Who shot you?
Who shot you?
I watched you.
I watched you.
You always make the same mistake.
You always make the same mistake.
It reminds me of you.
It reminds me of you.
It reminds me of you.
It reminds me of you.
It reminds me of you.
It reminds me of you.
I forgot to call you.
I forgot to call you.
Everyone believed you.
Everyone believed you.
Should we wait for you?
Should we wait for you?
What were you doing when I called you yesterday?
Our store isn't open.
They've changed a lot.
I just didn't believe you.
I just didn't believe you.
When I was a boy, I always got up early.
How was your meeting?
How was your meeting?
Who's going to believe you?
Who's going to believe you?
You helped them, didn't you?
You helped them, didn't you?
I saw that movie a long time ago.
I could never do that to you.
I could never do that to you.
Why doesn't anybody help you?
Why doesn't anybody help you?
I want to buy a gift for you.
Call us this evening.
Call us this evening.
We were just talking.
I know Tom will read it.
I know Tom will read it.
I know Tom will read it.
Give me your address.
The police will find us if we stay here.
I enjoyed doing it.
Tom is a happy boy.
I gave Tom all my money.
Are you spying on me?
Are you spying on me?
You are about my age.
Is the phone ringing?
No one wanted to eat.
It belongs to me now.
It belongs to me now.
I'm glad he liked it.
Tom didn't give it back.
Tom didn't give it back.
We had fun with them.
They had fun with us.
Tom is opening presents.
Tom is probably waiting.
We won't forgive you.
I must let off steam.
I liked your picture.
I liked your picture.
Tom watched carefully.
I've read both books.
Tom met John in prison.
I drank a lot of coffee.
Tom is wearing a black shirt today.
Tom should be around thirty by now.
Read me your speech.
She forgot my birthday.
Tom wants to talk to me.
Tom just wanted to talk.
Is this your picture?
I want Tom to read this.
Will you wait for me?
Leave my stuff alone.
Leave my stuff alone.
Leave my stuff alone.
Let's wait until Monday.
I won't sell my soul.
Most people don't enjoy this.
Does Tom run every day?
Tom can't do this to us.
I can't get used to Tom.
I can't stop writing.
He was satisfied with his new car.
I've already saved your life twice.
Tom can't find his keys.
Tom can't find his keys.
You must help your friends.
You must help your friends.
I don't know whether you're happy or not.
Tom reads to his daughter.
This milk tastes odd.
Tom responded instantly.
Tom took the habit of running every morning.
Do you look your age?
Do you look your age?
She sold him her car.
People are rich here.
I read the book.
I ran into my friend.
She gets up at seven.
I have no idea who did that.
I have no idea who did that.
We waited until 2:30.
I already called him.
I didn't read it all.
I didn't read it all.
It took a little longer than I expected.
It's taking a little longer than I expected.
Is it that obvious?
He likes to show off.
She likes to show off.
Tom just wants to show off.
Tom listened to the sounds of the forest.
Write with a pen.
Our school begins at eight.
Tom was deep in thought.
She's a quiet person.
This gift is for you.
This gift is for you.
It's a present for you.
It's a present for you.
He doesn't get jokes.
Tom doesn't have a clue.
Tom doesn't have a clue.
You can't prove that.
You can't prove that.
Tom didn't give up hope.
Tom doesn't know French.
Don't expect anything to change.
Don't expect anything to change.
Why has the train stopped?
I like this much better.
Tom probably won't like this game.
Tom had to catch a taxi.
Tom had nothing to read.
Tom has to get up early.
Tom has to get up early.
Tom has to get up early.
She has fine manners.
Tom wants to go abroad.
Tom must be over thirty.
Tom is probably over thirty.
She served me coffee.
Tom refused to join the army.
Who made those policies?
Tom thought you were busy.
Tom thought you were busy.
Tom thought you were busy.
Tom thought you were busy.
Tom thought you were busy.
Tom is about the same age as you are.
Speed isn't everything.
It doesn't matter at all to me.
It won't take very long.
I have no idea what has happened here.
My cat eats like a horse.
When can we get together?
Can you send me a screenshot?
I didn't expect this result.
Tom nodded and left.
You didn't expect to find me here, did you?
That's mine. Give it back.
What's your favorite kind of pie?
About how long will it take?
About how long will it take?
Tom said he'd call you.
Tom said he'd call you.
You were dying, but the doctor saved your life.
You were dying, but the doctor saved your life.
Tom found the keys he thought he had lost.
He slipped me a note.
The train is made up of fifteen cars.
It was just a stupid mistake.
Do you want to see my boat?
Do you want to see my boat?
Tom died recently.
Tom was surprised, too.
I want to talk about us.
We'll talk about it.
Tom never forgets to call his mother on her birthday.
Tom is still dangerous.
You may speak to him.
Tom kept his eyes open.
Tom kept his eyes open.
How many pens did you buy?
How many pens did you buy?
How many pens did you buy?
A horse runs quickly.
I'll have to take a look.
Don't take that tone with me, Tom!
You look much better.
You look much better.
It's a beautiful day outside.
It's my job to help people.
That's quite a list.
My neighbour's name is Tom.
It's such a beautiful day outside.
Do you want me to try talking to her?
Do you want me to try talking to him?
Do you want me to try talking to her?
Do you want me to try talking to him?
It's a bright, beautiful day outside.
Tom will probably like this game.
Tom always got up early.
Really? Are you serious?
Really? Are you serious?
The stars are bright.
I hope you'll be happy here.
I hope you'll be happy here.
Tom was happy about that.
We learn by teaching.
We learn by teaching.
How do you get downtown from here?
The grown-ups know.
Life's nature is cyclic.
I hope that won't happen.
I hope that won't happen.
Whose phone number is this?
Whose phone number is this?
Tom couldn't reach the top shelf.
Tom couldn't reach the top shelf.
We hope Tom will see it.
We hope Tom will see it.
We hope Tom will see it.
We're playing cards.
Tom didn't stop talking.
It's impossible to describe.
Tom is a minister.
Tom did nothing but cry.
Everyone wondered who it could be.
We're a little early.
It'll be winter before long.
This house belongs to Tom.
I don't remember his last name.
My sword is my life.
I promised Tom that I wouldn't cry.
Health is not just the absence of illness or disease.
Raise your right hand and repeat after me.
Tom is a very nice man.
Tom is a very nice kid.
I got my eyes tested.
I must buy some milk.
I'd like to watch TV.
I go to Osaka by bus.
Tom is singing in the shower.
Tom was always good to his kids.
He can't treat me like that.
The author of this book is dead.
Before WWII, the border between Finland and the USSR was near Leningrad.
A person's heart is approximately the same size as their fist.
They are very important people.
I have serious doubts.
The conversation turned to politics.
There was once a time when most people didn't know who Christopher Columbus was, but then he was born.
Tom is an engineer now.
Tom ended up in prison.
We got off the train.
We enjoy watching TV.
Do you get up at six?
What should I do if Tom calls?
I already sold that.
I'm happy for you both.
I'm happy for you both.
I'll phone Tom tonight.
I'll phone Tom tonight.
You don't like music.
You don't like music.
This house is famous.
Tom can't come in here.
Glad to meet you!
Glad to meet you!
Glad to meet you!
Glad to meet you!
Glad to meet you!
Glad to meet you!
Today he feels much better than yesterday.
I think we're neighbors.
Nobody called Tom.
Tom read lots of books.
Smog hung over Tokyo.
The dog began to run.
We talked about French.
Tom said he isn't sure.
Don't leave things half finished.
Don't leave things half finished.
Don't leave things half finished.
Don't leave things half finished.
Where should we meet?
I can't find my pipe.
Tom was calm.
I don't know the reason for her absence.
Thousands of people gathered there.
They never studied in school.
Tom hates country music.
Tom hates country music.
Tom is our driver.
Do you want me to finish it?
Do you want me to finish it?
Let's try it again.
Return to your seat.
Return to your seat.
I don't usually lie.
I run every morning.
I run every morning.
You run every day.
I made a wrong turn.
I'm not at all busy now.
Let's all calm down.
Is your father rich?
Tom married into money.
It was a nice place.
It was a nice place.
I told Tom that I was happy.
That's pretty obvious.
I'm really not sure.
We have a good team.
I had three options.
Don't smoke so much.
That helps us a lot.
What is the name of that river?
I think you're going to find this interesting.
I didn't make the rules.
I'm not used to this heat.
As soon as they return, I will telephone you.
I felt a lot better.
I felt a lot better.
Tom looks older than he really is.
Do you want fish?
Everyone lies to me.
Most of it's in French.
Most of it's in French.
Tom solved the problem.
Skopje is the capital of Macedonia.
Her laughter echoed through the house.
Wait till next year.
House prices are up.
Everybody's at risk.
Why are we helping Tom?
Look at her. She's beautiful.
Tom isn't at all stupid.
He did better than last time.
Any chance you know where I put my keys?
Any chance you know where I put my keys?
We can't forget that.
We saved your life.
I guess we can be friends.
Tom wouldn't allow me to leave.
Tom wouldn't allow me to leave.
We didn't believe it.
What happened to my suitcase?
Tom is beginning to cry.
Has Tom been watching TV?
Tom has always kept me informed.
Tom intends to become a teacher.
It'll cost you thirty dollars.
It'll cost you thirty dollars.
Tom is about thirty now.
I must leave on Monday.
That makes us happy.
How is whiskey made?
Tom didn't want to cry.
It looked beautiful.
I'm sure Tom can do it.
I'm sure Tom can do it.
Tom kept his eyes shut.
Do you think you can catch me?
Do you think you can catch me?
Do you think you can catch me?
Do you think you can catch me?
I hope everything goes OK.
It'll clear up in the afternoon.
Tom looked in the book.
Tom hated his own name.
Tom hated his own name.
Let me explain this.
They helped me, too.
What in the world is going on?
Tom married a rich girl.
It'll take an hour to get there.
I didn't have a key.
Tom wasn't quite happy.
When did you finish?
Read this carefully.
Read this carefully.
The walls were bare.
This belongs to you.
This belongs to you.
Tom put his glass down.
Tom put his glass down.
Tom wasn't quite happy.
It's too hot inside.
How's your daughter?
What else can I add?
Don't you like fish?
Don't you like fish?
You're bothering me.
Let's just talk.
Tom didn't seem very hungry.
I tried my best to help Tom.
Tom lost a lot of money.
What page is Tom on?
Tom is still tied up.
Tom was here for three hours.
I'm being paid to help you.
She can't find her keys.
Give me thirty minutes.
Tom isn't a bus driver, is he?
I can't call Tom.
I'm sure Tom will do the same.
She wore a green dress.
He's the fifth man in line.
It's my gift to you.
It's my gift to you.
Sorry, but I'm busy.
Sorry, but I'm busy.
She wondered what his lips would taste like.
I meant to call you.
I meant to call you.
Nobody believed you.
Nobody believed you.
Nobody believed you.
Why don't you help Tom?
Call her tomorrow.
Why are you even talking to me?
Why are you even talking to me?
Do you believe in eternal life?
Do you believe in eternal life?
Did you get the flowers I sent?
Did you get the flowers I sent?
The car drove away.
It'll stop snowing soon, I think.
She eats but white meat.
She has beautiful blue eyes.
I have several caps.
Tom waited a while.
Tom looked at the list.
Tom was very surprised.
Your car is on fire.
Your car is on fire.
Do you have a knife?
Tom is too busy to help.
Tom is too busy to come.
I don't want to lie.
Tom ran to school.
You could invite me.
I wonder why Tom doesn't like me.
I wonder why Tom doesn't like me.
I heard you singing.
I heard you singing.
Tom took out his knife.
They're very poor.
He went to Tokyo yesterday.
Who wrote this song?
What in the world happened here?
We were really drunk.
Tom has been calling every day.
Tom has really helped the team.
Tom has gone back to Australia.
They're nice people.
I had my doubts.
Tom asked us to dinner.
Tom tried to look calm.
I wonder who it was.
Who asked for vodka?
Tom looked really busy.
Tom went into the bank.
Tom is a famous artist.
Why were you crying?
It was a warm night.
They're interesting.
I got married young.
Are you sure Tom is OK?
Tom did well in school.
Tom was singing a song.
Tom is certain to come.
You ticked them off.
You ticked them off.
It'll take too long.
You've done so much.
You've done so much.
We all have a price.
I will not help you.
I will not help you.
When does Tom get back?
I'm happy Tom liked it.
I'm busy, so I can't go.
I'm busy, so I can't go.
I'm busy, so I can't go.
I'm busy, so I can't go.
What smells so good?
It's your only hope.
It's your only hope.
It's the right size.
Tom doesn't know the difference between Iraq and Iran.
Tom doesn't know the difference between a star and a planet.
Tom doesn't know the difference between wine and champagne.
Tom doesn't know the difference between Europe and the European Union.
I'll get used to it.
I'll get used to it.
I'll get used to it.
I'll wait a little longer.
We're going to try to do that.
Be careful. It's very sharp.
Tom takes his job very seriously.
I hate being laughed at.
Nobody talks to me anymore.
They often help each other.
Birds scare me.
Hand me that book.
This is my lucky day.
Fake it till you make it.
I think you can prove it.
My phone's stopped working.
You're overthinking this.
I'll get there in an hour.
You like cats, don't you?
They'll become teachers.
They want to go abroad.
Please make a right turn.
I hate it when guys do that.
I'm aware of your problem.
He lost his sunglasses.
Just tell Tom I called.
Just tell Tom I called.
That's nice to hear.
Now, open your eyes.
Now, open your eyes.
Sorry, I can't help.
Sorry, I can't help.
Sorry, I can't wait.
I'll come and see you later.
I'll come and see you later.
They're lying to us.
Tom laughed at my joke.
Tom has to speak to us.
Tom talked about music.
It could take hours.
My neck still hurts.
My neck still hurts.
Tom never talked to me.
It may be important.
Please talk to me, Tom.
At least we had fun.
I don't know where your keys are.
They are both good teachers.
What do his parents do? "I have no idea."
Tom always wears black.
Should we try again?
Does it hurt at all?
That's much better.
Tom often helps others.
That's a good sign.
With whom did she speak?
A large crowd had gathered on the street.
You're not going to wear that, are you?
What colour are they?
Did Tom buy your story?
They were all happy.
Ask for his advice.
How did you get my address?
What's your favorite magazine?
She had Parkinson's disease.
Please don't judge me.
When the letter arrived, I read it.
That was a good movie.
I like this dress. It's kind of cute.
How many floors does this building have?
Tom made a film about his childhood.
Weight is a force that is always directed toward the center of the earth.
In 1950, the U.S. population was 150 million.
He was stabbed in the back.
You may not like it.
You may not like it.
Use your brain!
You said you'd call.
You said you'd call.
You said you'd call.
You said you'd call.
He had nothing to tell.
Is Finland dangerous?
You're all grown up.
You're all grown up.
Make sure you tell Tom.
Make sure you tell Tom.
You got lucky today.
You've made us wait.
You can come in now.
You can come in now.
You look good today.
You look good today.
Tom is taking his time.
Get back in the car.
Get back in the car.
She helped her younger brother with his homework.
Can I have the list?
Tom will probably come.
Whose stuff is this?
Can you verify that?
It's a big hospital.
It's all a big joke.
We can finish later.
We've got all night.
Tom came back soon.
That's a strange idea.
I have some advice for you.
How does your wife feel about it?
They treated me well.
Tom was very, very busy.
We're both very busy.
We're both very busy.
Are you sure you heard something?
Are you sure you heard something?
Are you Tom by any chance?
We're a happy family.
It's a rumor.
This music is giving me a headache.
Just call me.
I will help you when I have finished my work.
Of course, I have a plan.
I will help you when I have finished my work.
I hope I did the right thing.
I hope I did the right thing.
You aren't rich.
Tom lost his money.
Tom is a social worker.
Please drive safely.
Please drive safely.
Tom smiled and nodded.
We saved you a seat.
We saved you a seat.
Now are you sure?
Now are you sure?
What are the options?
That's very good advice.
I watched a movie.
Tom arrived very early.
Tom arrived too early.
Tom came too early.
Tom abandoned the plan.
You must talk to us.
You must talk to us.
Are you busy on Monday?
Are you busy on Monday?
I'll give them back.
That's a good price.
Who gave that order?
We make a good team.
I have lost my keys.
Could you give me some examples?
Could you give me some examples?
It's time to go back home.
It sounds strange.
Are you coming back?
Are you coming back?
You're bothering us.
You're bothering us.
I hope Tom will write soon.
I couldn't call you.
I heard you singing.
I heard you singing.
I heard you singing.
I heard you singing.
Should we wait for him?
Should we wait for her?
Should we wait for them?
Should I wait for them?
Should we wait for you here?
Should we wait for them here?
Should we wait for him here?
Should we wait for her here?
Should I wait for them here?
Neither happiness nor misery last forever.
In everyday life no one speaks in verse.
How would that look?
Did you get my gift?
Did you get my gift?
There were two bridges.
He's shorter than his brother.
Tom must be rich.
You could sell that.
You could sell that.
This must be a joke.
We have great kids.
We're not students.
Whose dog is this?
Tom told everybody at work that he was getting married.
We were so afraid.
Are you on the list?
Are you on the list?
Tom should've gone weeks ago.
We hope that you're ready.
We hope that you're ready.
Tom collected stamps.
We made too many mistakes.
We're really pleased.
Tom wouldn't believe us.
Do you have the key?
Do you have the key?
Tom looked very guilty.
Tom looks very content.
Listen to the music.
You wouldn't like it.
Your house is on fire!
Your house is on fire!
Your house is on fire!
Did you know that this is a sentence?
Tom is the one who told me that I should read this book.
We'll die if we stay here.
Tom said he would've come if we'd invited him.
Tom sang better tonight than he usually does.
Tom often goes out drinking with his friends.
Who shall I choose?
Read me your speech.
Tom may be in danger.
This is my favorite.
They know our plans.
They believed in me.
What did you expect me to say?
What did you expect me to say?
We've got several options.
It's cold in here.
Was it that obvious?
Was it that obvious?
This wasn't my idea.
We were all so busy.
What are my choices?
Tom says he's not busy.
My brother says he isn't afraid of the dark.
Why are you calling?
Why are you calling?
You're not that old.
You're not that old.
You're not that old.
You're not that old.
You're not that old.
You're not an idiot.
You're not an idiot.
We caught the train.
How old is your cat?
I wonder what it is.
I'll call you again.
I'll call you again.
I hope Tom doesn't die.
I'll read it to you.
I'll read it to you.
I'll read it to you.
I'll read it to you.
Tom walked to the store to buy some milk.
Tom says he's too tired today to help us.
Tom walked to the store to buy some milk.
He went to the store to buy some oranges.
Go to the store and buy us some food.
Go to the store and buy us some food.
Go to the store and buy us some food.
Go to the store and buy us some food.
Buy me something sweet when you go to the store.
Buy me something sweet when you go to the store.
I'm in the backyard.
I'm sure it'll pass.
I'm offering Tom a job.
We elected Jack chairman.
She loves trains.
Are you sure that Ken is busy now?
Are you sure that Ken is busy now?
Are you sure that Ken is busy now?
What is the capital of New Hampshire ?
She likes to read scientific articles.
He's in the kitchen preparing food.
Who will they choose?
I woke up at four.
I woke up at four.
Are these sentences correct?
What does a woman like you see in a man like me?
I thought you wanted to get married.
I thought you wanted to get married.
I thought you wanted to get married.
I thought you wanted to get married.
We have so much work to do.
We have no idea what to do.
My legs are weak.
That's my favorite blue shirt.
Tom bought a present for his son.
Tom bought a gift for his daughter.
I bought this as a gift for Tom.
Is Tom wearing the new shirt you bought for him?
Is Tom wearing the new shirt you bought for him?
Do you think Tom will like the gift I bought for him?
Do you think Tom will like the gift I bought for him?
I'm sure Tom loves you.
Lucky, weren't they?
You are my daughter.
Would you calm down?
Would you calm down?
You're a big help.
You're a big help.
What else is needed?
All my hope is gone.
Tom put down the knife.
There's a cat there.
I said we're closed.
I opened the drawer.
Tom will listen to you.
Tom will listen to you.
Tom will leave tonight.
Tom wouldn't let me go.
I hope you can help.
Tom didn’t look back.
I'll leave tomorrow.
Whose photo is this?
I cried myself to sleep almost every night.
I am going to save the world.
I ordered Tom to do it.
Do you often go to the church?
I know Tom will change.
I know you'll like Tom.
I hope Tom forgives me.
I didn't lie to you.
It didn't bother me.
You have three pens.
You have three pens.
Tom is the head of my department.
Don't show this to Tom.
Don't show this to Tom.
Don't show this to Tom.
Don't show this to Tom.
I will do it gladly.
They let her marry him.
She thinks highly of him.
How much do you bet?
How much do you bet?
Tom is still breathing.
Tom is probably asleep.
Tom is probably hungry.
Tom is probably scared.
They're ignoring us.
Tom doesn't waste time.
There's another way.
Now watch carefully.
Did everybody leave?
I want you to try it.
I want you to try it.
I want you to try it.
I want you to try it.
I want you to try it.
I want you to try it.
They're watching me.
They've forgiven me.
They waited outside.
We'll talk tomorrow.
Show me the picture.
I want you to call Tom.
You're looking well.
He had a smile on his face.
I thought Tom left.
Tom was paid thirty dollars an hour.
Tom still remembers his grandfather.
Tonight, Tom sang better than usual.
We're skeptical about this.
Tom was sure that everybody saw him.
Why don't you leave?
Why don't you leave?
Why don't you leave?
Why don't you leave?
It wouldn't take that much time.
You're acting weird.
You're acting weird.
The girl looked ill.
Everybody's talking.
You are a teacher.
People like to talk.
We know you're busy.
Well, I'm busy, too.
Well, I'm busy, too.
Tom is picking flowers.
We want our kids to be safe.
Tom wouldn't allow us to help him.
We knew it could be serious.
Would you like some cream in your coffee?
Send a letter to this address.
We don't know how to use it.
When did you lose your job?
When did you lose your job?
Did Tom ask us to wait?
I've just finished writing a letter.
Let's not open this.
I just got home.
I just got home.
Tom is still in prison.
Tom is still in prison.
Love is not a crime.
Tom went out for lunch.
He treated me badly.
Tom was probably right.
Do you want some advice?
Seen any movies lately?
Seen any movies lately?
Tom got an A in French.
We weren't wasting our time.
We weren't wasting our time.
We weren't paying attention.
She likes subdued colors.
I regret not marrying her.
She married Hiroshi against her will.
Tom says he isn't sure he's ready.
We'll forgive you this time.
We'll forgive you this time.
I found my car missing.
How often do you look at yourself in a mirror?
How often do you look at yourself in a mirror?
She promised to marry him, but she didn't.
Tom lost his house key.
I have another idea.
Tom reminds me of John.
Please stop singing!
Every country has a capital city.
Tom knows the capital of every country in the world.
This country is very poor.
Can you find Afghanistan on a map?
Can you find Afghanistan on a map?
Can you find Kyrgyzstan on a map?
Can you find Kyrgyzstan on a map?
Can you find Eritrea on a map?
Can you find Eritrea on a map?
Can you find Iraq on a map?
Can you find Iraq on a map?
Is it too early to call him?
It's too early to call Tom.
Tom was the first one to wake up.
God created mankind.
God created mankind.
I am about your age.
I am about your age.
Tom is studying French.
I go to work by bus.
I like your article.
We'll talk later.
I hope he isn't ill.
Can you find Kyrgyzstan on a map?
This country is very poor.
Tom was in a good mood yesterday.
She lives alone in a house of enormous dimensions.
Tom wanted his mother to leave him alone.
This is an easy way.
Please sell me that.
Please sell me that.
Bring me my clothes.
Bring me my clothes.
You'll be safe here.
Go back to your bed.
I will wait outside.
Maybe it's too late.
Kids can be so mean.
The train is coming.
I can do without it.
I can do without it.
You're poor.
They don't know their neighbors.
He's likely to come.
Despite the rain, we're deciding to go out.
If you had been to the meeting, you would know this.
If you had been to the meeting, you would know this.
I woke up at three o'clock.
I woke up at three.
I woke up at four o'clock.
I woke up at nine o'clock.
I woke up at ten o'clock.
I woke up at six o'clock.
I woke up at five o'clock.
I woke up at six.
I woke up at noon.
I woke up at eight.
I woke up at seven.
I woke up at eight o'clock.
I woke up at seven o'clock.
I woke up at ten.
Let's begin on page 30.
Hand me that box.
Hand me that box.
Hand me that jar.
Hand me that jar.
Because you are an idiot!
Go away, Tom. I don't want to talk to you.
Listen, Tom. You've got it all wrong.
I wouldn't want to work here.
She's your daughter, too.
I'm happy to be back.
When can I call you?
When can I call you?
My neck hurts today.
Tom said he felt fine.
You can't just not show up.
You can't just not show up.
I arrived too early.
Tom often wears black.
Why did you call me?
Why did you call me?
My daughter told me all about you.
My daughter told me all about you.
My daughter told me all about you.
My daughter told me all about you.
How did you and Dad meet?
How did you and Mom meet?
You promised!
You promised!
You promised!
You promised!
You promised you'd come.
You promised you'd come.
You promised you would be here.
You promised you would be here.
You promised you'd be there.
You promised you'd be there.
Can I speak with the director?
She put on her best clothes and went out.
Tom says that he'll wait for us.
Tom says he likes horror movies.
Ladies and gentlemen, I'm very happy to be here.
He watches television every night.
We shouldn't expect too much.
We should finish by 2:30 p.m.
Tom was in a bad mood yesterday.
We're getting ready for that.
I hope there weren't too many mistakes.
We're keeping an eye on them.
We're not going to stop here.
We're not going to stop here.
Tom is a little early.
Lie on your stomach.
Tom doesn't read books in French.
Who's your favorite?
Who's your favorite?
Who's your favorite?
Father lost his job.
Tom would be so happy.
Tom would be so happy.
He refused to do so.
She kept her eyes closed.
She kept her eyes closed.
Tom died three weeks before I got out of prison.
Tom has blue jeans on.
Leave immediately!
Leave immediately!
Give me a cigarette.
Tell her to call me.
Tell her to call me.
Tell him to call me.
Tell him to call me.
Tom called the office.
My room key, please.
How do I get there?
I continued singing.
I continued singing.
I am as old as he is.
You have three cats.
This is my advice.
My skin is dry.
Tom will never change.
She hit upon a good idea.
Due to technical reasons, the search feature is currently disabled.
I must have lost it.
I must have lost it.
I must have lost it.
We've got to finish this job.
We're very lucky to be alive.
What train is Tom arriving on?
Tom spent many years in prison.
I was called on in English class.
I was called on in English class.
I'm used to this kind of work.
I'm used to this kind of work.
I'm used to this kind of work.
Promise me you'll do that.
It should be interesting.
The train just left.
Tom says he regrets doing that.
Shouldn't we call Tom?
Shouldn't we call Tom?
Please don't help Tom.
Please don't help Tom.
I do hope you understand.
I do hope you understand.
Your name was number three on the list.
Tom closed the drawer.
He has a good brain.
I was in the hospital.
He has a thick neck.
I knew you'd like Tom.
I knew you'd like Tom.
I'll be there at 2:30.
Tom didn't want to go.
Tom didn't want to go.
Let's read Lesson 3.
The light is green.
Is that why they died?
Tom waived his rights.
Paper burns quickly.
Paper burns easily.
I have fewer students in my class this year than last year.
I have fewer students in my class this year than last year.
I'm very busy today.
I'm very busy today.
Tom is wearing my cap.
I can't believe you did this to me.
I can't believe you did this to me.
We lay on the grass.
Don't call her now.
Tom seems to be lying.
He left an hour ago.
Tom has lost his car keys.
You'll have to wait.
I'm busy doing homework.
We hope you're in good health.
We hope you're in good health.
Tom regretted what he had done.
Tom ran to a neighbor for help.
We know how important this is.
Don't leave it open.
Don't leave it open.
Don't leave it open.
Don't leave it open.
I'll give you thirty dollars for that.
I'll give you thirty dollars for that.
I feel like singing in the rain.
Tom gave his life for his country.
He doesn't have his own ideas.
Please don't put that on the table.
Please don't put that on the table.
She will attend the meeting instead of me.
I'm sorry. I take back my words.
We'll manage without it.
We'll manage without it.
We'll manage without it.
I wasn't happy.
Tom is helping me.
We know what we're capable of.
We know the work is dangerous.
We know we're capable of that.
We know it's important to you.
We know it's important to you.
Listen...
Listen...
Thank you for waiting.
Thank you for waiting.
The stomach ache has gone away.
Tom doesn't want to talk to me.
Tom could not stand his mother.
Do you think this is a movie?
Do you think this is a movie?
Why are you so late?
Why are you so late?
Every seat was full.
I like to observe birds.
I like to observe birds.
Please make the bed.
We must think of another plan.
Do you know if Tom is seeing anyone?
I'm not as rich as you are.
Do you think Tom is seeing someone else?
What rock have you been hiding under?
It is a miracle that Tom's still alive.
I'm not as rich as you are.
I'm not as rich as you are.
I'm not as rich as you are.
Tom waited for thirty minutes.
We really had nothing to lose.
Tom wasn't allowed to do that.
Tom cried all morning.
I'll call him later.
He arrived too early.
Her father always comes home late.
She never woke up.
Why didn't you listen to your father?
Why didn't you listen to your father?
I've met people like that.
We're pleased with the result.
We're just not used to it yet.
Tom put his keys on the table.
We're going back to our hotel.
We want to solve that problem.
We want to solve that problem.
We won't allow this to happen.
What lovely flowers!
Tom went to the store.
Tom will win for sure.
Tom will win for sure.
Take off your shoes.
Take off your shoes.
You'd better not go.
You'd better not go.
They like to observe birds.
Why did you hit me?
Tom left town three weeks ago.
Tom wrote a story about that.
Tell Tom I'll be back.
Tell Tom I'll be back.
Tell Tom I'll be back.
Tell Tom I'll be back.
It's good to dream.
I've got a suggestion.
He hit him in the face.
The case is closed.
I have blonde hair.
I never lost hope.
I didn't feel safe.
We've got to call Tom.
Tom is safe, isn't he?
Why's everyone wet?
Tom sat beside me in church.
We just didn't want to do that.
Tom stopped reading the book.
We just didn't want to do that.
They kept their love a secret.
Are you sure you don't want to stay for dinner?
I'd like to hear your advice.
Many new factories have opened.
They help us.
We know what you're capable of.
We really have nothing to lose.
Tom, there's a call for you.
Tom's mother is calling him.
We know what you're capable of.
Tom left the room to make a phone call.
It took us a while.
I hope to see them.
Tom probably went out.
Can I open my eyes?
Can I open my eyes?
How tall is he?
He disappeared.
Tom put on some music.
He disappeared.
Tom put it in the box.
Tom put it in the box.
That gave Tom an idea.
It looks all right.
I wanted to scream.
My heart just sank.
Tom looked a bit sick.
Tom looks a bit sick.
That gives us hope.
Get ready for more.
Tom talks to me a lot.
They went shopping.
You have superb English.
We followed orders.
Things got serious.
They believed that.
That'll change now.
Tom owes you his life.
Tom owes you his life.
Things are serious.
Tom arrived very late.
Tom arrived too late.
Tom got back at 2:30.
Are you using that?
Are you using that?
Please wait for me.
Please wait for me.
When did Tom get home?
We found them here.
Tom lives like a king.
Tom didn't look happy.
I dare you to prove me wrong.
I told you that you'd like it.
Should I repeat it?
Should I repeat it?
I arrived too late.
We'll be back by 2:30.
Are you busy now, Tom?
Who sang this song?
I'm writing a song.
Did you catch them?
Did you catch them?
I hope Tom is at home.
Can I have my keys?
How did you get it?
How did you get it?
How did you get it?
How did you get it?
How did you get that?
How did you get that?
Do you feel guilty?
Do you feel guilty?
Do you feel guilty?
When do you use it?
When do you use it?
When do you use it?
When do you use it?
Tom treats me like an adult.
Tom treats me like an adult.
Tom usually comes home late.
Tom wants to be an engineer.
We were just about to call you.
We were just about to call you.
Tom was very busy yesterday.
We went to church every Sunday.
We used to be on the same team.
We spoke for about three hours.
Tom always looks busy.
I think we made it.
Tom became an officer.
It's our own fault.
It was your own fault.
It was your own fault.
It was your own fault.
It's my own fault.
It's my own fault.
That was Tom's own fault.
I know this is my own fault.
Tom should be there by 2:30.
Tom doesn't seem to be busy.
It saved our lives.
Did you invite him?
It'd be impossible.
Tom isn't busy either.
Fire on my command.
Fire on my command.
There was no music.
Keep your shoes on.
Keep your shoes on.
Are you both drunk?
Are you both drunk?
It's a bad example.
I started talking.
She is dressed in her best.
We'll meet in three hours.
My dad just called.
She could not believe what she saw.
No one will believe her.
Let me verify that.
Let me verify that.
She quickly confessed everything.
He quickly confessed everything.
Tom ran toward the house.
Put down the knife.
Put down the knife.
Tom stood in the dark.
Tom lost his son in the war.
We have no idea how it happened.
Tom plans to sell his house.
Tom plans to sell his house.
These shoes don't fit.
Look what I caught.
Look what I caught.
You sure have a lot of friends.
You sure have a lot of friends.
We've read what you've written.
We've read what you've written.
Tom refused to listen to me.
Tom knows many French songs.
We haven't increased our prices.
We haven't increased our prices.
We haven't increased our prices.
Tom won't forgive you.
Tom won't forgive you.
It was in this box.
It was in this box.
It was in this box.
Keep your shirt on.
Keep your shirt on.
What floor am I on?
We'll meet again, Tom.
Why is Tom downstairs?
Did you check this?
Did you check this?
Why isn't Tom in jail?
Everyone believed Tom.
It may be too late.
I wonder what Tom saw.
I'm sure Tom told you.
I'm sure Tom told you.
I'm sure Tom told you.
I'm sure Tom told you.
I'm sure Tom is right.
I'm sure Tom was busy.
Tom fell down on the floor.
I wasn't expecting it to happen so soon.
Tom decided to go abroad.
Can you forgive us?
Can you forgive us?
We saw you come in.
We saw you come in.
Tom ran after his dog.
We'll wait an hour.
We just talked for a little bit.
We knew something had to change.
I got on the horse.
It'll be over soon.
She started crying.
Tom watched in horror.
He started to cry.
You'll be safe now.
We'd be safe there.
Here's an example.
Please don't cry.
Tom lost his son in the war.
Don't I even get a phone call?
Don't I look the same?
Can you and I talk?
Can you and I talk?
Can you and I talk?
You wouldn't like Tom.
You wouldn't like Tom.
Can I speak to you?
Can I speak to you?
You must excuse me.
That job was not very interesting, but on the other hand it was well paid.
The police caught him red handed.
I'm looking for a bag for my wife.
I refused at first.
Who gave the order?
We'll give it back.
We'll give it back.
Tell me your price.
She runs fastest in our class.
Her belief in God is very firm.
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
You look very good.
Why did you like it?
Why did you like it?
Do you like salmon?
Do you like salmon?
How about this one?
How about this one?
Let's try one more.
Let's try one more.
Let's try one more.
I need a secretary.
Do you smell smoke?
You have to believe us.
Give me your knife.
You can believe me.
You can believe me.
Consider it a gift.
Give it back to me.
Give it back to me.
Give it back to me.
Give it back to me.
That would be hard.
Tom didn't talk to me.
Tom didn't talk to me.
No one was helping.
Tom is the oldest student in our class.
I hope it helps!
Let me out of here.
Let me out of here.
Check this one out.
Check this one out.
Check this one out.
Check this one out.
Is that so strange?
Why didn't Tom listen?
It was all my idea.
It was all my idea.
He heard the sound.
Tom is returning home.
Never give up hope.
Never give up hope.
Tom is dating someone.
I think Tom is satisfied.
Do you still have my key?
We could sell that.
We could sell that.
Tom has lost interest.
Here, have a taste.
Here, have a taste.
Go and have a look.
Go and have a look.
Give us an example.
Give us an example.
We want to make everybody happy.
We want new ideas, not old ones.
We're going to raise our prices.
We're hoping to open in October.
He made it plain that he wanted to marry her.
Tom punched me in the face.
Tom punched me in the face.
Tom thinks he can prove it.
Tom was allowed to do that.
We spent a lot of time together.
We know that this is impossible.
Tom took a sip of my drink.
I'll leave tonight.
This is my project.
What have I become?
What have I become?
I'll marry you.
I heard you sing.
What's in this box?
You're early again.
You're early again.
I have many dreams.
In any case, no one listened to his advice.
That's my favorite language.
It's her favorite language.
It's his favorite language.
I wish you success.
It sounds lovely.
We've learned from our mistakes.
Tom will become a teacher.
I'll come by later.
I'll come by later.
Tom is busy right now.
Look how happy Tom is.
Look how happy Tom is.
Look how happy Tom is.
Look how happy Tom is.
Tom can die happy now.
Tom threw his cigarette on the floor.
Tom wants to meet you.
Tom wants to meet you.
I'll wait with you.
I'll wait with you.
Tom wanted to sell it.
Tom wanted to sell it.
I'm done with that.
I'm making a movie.
I'm making a movie.
We can't force people to do that.
We can't force people to do that.
I found this book interesting.
We haven't spoken in three years.
We have to find a way to do that.
We haven't been able to prove it.
Tom reminds me of someone.
We watched a movie.
I think we're done.
I guess Tom was right.
I must find my key.
I talked with friends.
I talked with friends.
I proved her wrong.
I proved him wrong.
I proved them wrong.
I heard you crying.
I heard you crying.
I heard you crying.
I heard you crying.
I hope it's enough.
I hope we can help.
I have a good crew.
I have a good crew.
Tom is probably right.
I lost your number.
Don't work so much.
Don't work so much.
I can't leave here.
I won't let you go.
Why don't we check?
I didn't finish it.
I didn't finish it.
Don't get too near.
Don't give it away.
Don't give it away.
Don't give it away.
Don't give it away.
Tom eats like a horse.
You'll never guess.
You'll never guess.
You'll never guess.
You'll never guess.
Tom is thirty at most.
We'll talk tonight.
Were you surprised?
Were you surprised?
I found her mother dead.
My eyesight is beginning to fail.
A shout arose from the people.
I hope that your parents will allow us to marry.
Quit wasting time.
That's the trouble.
That would've hurt.
Tom refused to do so.
Tom runs the fastest.
She is my father's sister. She is my aunt.
Tom watches TV every day.
Tom solved the problem easily.
Tom wants his money back.
Tom treated me very well.
Tom went down the stairs.
She wants him to be happy.
Isn't that weird?
Her husband occasionally pauses mid-sentence, and then simply leaves.
Tom looked very good.
I'm probably wrong.
Let's hope Tom is OK.
Everybody left.
Are you interested?
They learn quickly.
We still have so much work to do.
When do you study?
They're both drunk.
They're both drunk.
We were also in church on Monday.
We went to Australia last summer.
Tom says that he'll wait.
They'll be pleased.
They laughed again.
They never stopped.
They both screamed.
They both screamed.
They heard gunfire.
They heard gunfire.
We'll wait outside.
Tom still isn't sure.
Older people still remember the Kennedy assassination.
Rich people have fat cats.
I said leave her alone.
I said leave her alone.
I said leave him alone.
I said leave him alone.
I said leave them alone.
I said leave them alone.
Please leave them alone.
Please leave them alone.
Please leave him alone.
Please leave him alone.
Please leave her alone.
Please leave her alone.
We forgave you.
Tom forgot to buy milk.
We'll sit down and talk about it.
Tom admitted that he was afraid.
We lost everything.
I forced him to go.
I forced him to go.
I'm the one who built this.
Tom was very poor.
Tom isn't rich.
What's your favorite podcast?
You're the experts.
You're over thirty.
You're over thirty.
I've worked extremely hard.
I've worked extremely hard.
You're lying again.
You're lying again.
You're always busy.
We went to a movie.
We went to a movie.
These pants are dirty.
Can I walk you home?
Will you help me translate this?
The water was hot.
Tom wanted to drink some milk.
I want to drink a cold beer.
Tom wants to study abroad.
Do you have any pictures I can look at?
Do you have any pictures I can look at?
This is a good opportunity to get to know one another.
Tom did a good thing.
Tom has to let me go.
Tom is a teacher now.
Someone's shooting.
Tom is a mean person.
Return immediately.
Tom didn't act alone.
Tom was already dead.
I'm learning a lot.
How lovely you look!
How lovely you look!
This movie has a happy ending.
This movie has a happy ending.
I like learning.
Where can I buy a map of the city?
I play with my cat.
I've been too busy.
Can you wait a bit?
Can you wait a bit?
I think I'll have an early night tonight.
Tom helped everybody.
Tom heard the scream.
Don't come near me.
Look at me. I'm talking to you.
Look at me. I'm talking to you.
This is a crime scene.
We can't stop here.
We can't stop here.
Does Tom feel guilty?
He looks very good.
What a lot of pens!
Tom studies on Saturdays.
I owe you a favor.
I owe you a favor.
Tom thought it was strange.
You didn't call me.
You didn't call me.
We'll finish later.
I know you're busy.
When's Tom arriving?
Tom likes to do that.
Tom likes to do that.
Tom ignored me today.
Who's on your list?
Who's on your list?
Tom allowed me to go.
Tom allowed me to go.
He was not invited.
Call me right away.
Call me right away.
John left for France yesterday.
Go wait in the car.
Go wait in the car.
She felt a pain in her side.
Does she drink milk?
Check your pockets.
Check your pockets.
Tom looked very sick.
It wasn't very fun.
Tom wouldn't like it.
You're a good liar.
You're a good liar.
We will meet again.
She did not listen.
He did not listen.
Tom went back to bed.
Who made up these rules?
It was extremely weird.
He went to America.
They did not listen.
All the class waited for the new teacher.
A week later, she died.
This young man has blue hair.
No matter what she says, remain calm.
Misato tried to be calm, but finally she lost her temper.
Do you know your size?
Do you know your size?
Please don't forget to mail this letter.
Please don't forget to mail this letter.
Please leave me alone.
Please leave me alone.
The best fish smell when they are three days old.
I met a friend I hadn't seen for three years.
I usually drink a lot of milk.
I bought a magazine in a store.
We are picking flowers.
I've never seen such a beautiful flower.
Let Tom make the decisions.
Tom is hoping you'll do it.
Tom is hoping you'll do it.
We haven't been invited yet.
Do you always get up before six?
Do you always get up before six?
I think I have an idea.
Does Tom want to watch the movie with us?
Tom held up a finger.
Tom has stopped doing that.
Tom wasn't busy at all.
I know something is wrong, but I'm not quite sure what.
I knew something like this was going to happen.
Tom was very busy today.
Something's obviously wrong here.
Thanks for calling.
Please stop crying.
Please stop crying.
I left the country.
Tom held up his hand.
I can't promise you that.
I can't promise you that.
I can't promise you that.
My friend was shot.
Isn't it beautiful?
Isn't it beautiful?
Isn't it beautiful?
We have different points of view.
Tom is happy with it.
Tom is happy with it.
These are his pens.
Tom is a likable guy.
When does it start?
When does it start?
When does it start?
Tom refused at first.
The garden was full of beautiful flowers.
Let's meet at five.
Tom tried to stop me.
You look beautiful.
You look beautiful.
I have been abroad.
Tom seems to be nice.
He's coming closer.
She heard him sing.
Tom seems to be rich.
I lost my house keys.
I think I'm drunk.
Tom is being serious.
Tom is being serious.
Tom is a bad student.
We believed you.
We believed you.
We found her alive.
She's thirty-three.
Tom accepted the job offer.
What's the title of the movie?
Keep going in that direction.
Keep going in that direction.
Can you forgive me?
Can you forgive me?
When is my surgery?
Tom was lying to you.
Tom was lying to you.
Would Tom lie to you?
Would Tom lie to you?
Does it taste okay?
Does it taste okay?
Does it taste okay?
Tom called me a fool.
I'll read the book.
I hope Tom sees this.
Where are you? I am in the garden.
I won't bother you.
I won't bother you.
I want to wait another week.
It's foggy today.
Tom never was stupid.
Where did Tom live when he was a kid?
Give Tom the money.
Where's that music coming from?
Do you mind waiting?
The area was quiet.
I hope Tom has fun.
Put your arm down.
Put your arm down.
Tom told me to do this.
Was his story true?
Tom told me to stay.
Tom told me to leave.
He told me to do it.
Tom told me to come here.
Tom told me to go home.
You told me to do that.
You told me to do that.
Tom told me to keep quiet.
Tom told me to stay here.
You told me to come here.
You told me to come here.
Tom told me to wait here.
They told me to wait here.
Tom told me to wait outside.
Tom told me to wait outside.
Tom told me to sit down.
Dad told me to help you, Mom.
The teacher told me to stand up.
Takuya told me to start at once.
I told you to call me.
I told you to call me.
I told you to call me.
I told you to call me.
You need to call Tom.
He told me to speak more slowly.
She told me to open the window.
My doctor told me to give up smoking.
My doctor told me to give up smoking.
I told you to leave me alone.
I told Tom to wait for me.
Tom told me to give you this.
Tom told me to give you this.
Tom told me to give you this.
Tom told me to give you this.
Tom told me to stay at home.
I told Tom to leave me alone.
Tom told me not to follow him.
Tom told me to open the window.
You told me not to do that.
You told me not to do that.
Tom told me not to open it.
Tom told me not to open it.
Tom told me not to help you.
Tom told me not to help you.
Tom told me to come here today.
Tom told me not to tell anyone.
You told me not to tell anybody.
You told me not to tell anybody.
I told Tom to quit bothering me.
He told me to give you this.
He told me to give you this.
Tom told me not to do that.
I told him to leave me alone.
I told them to leave me alone.
I told him to leave me alone.
She told me not to tell you.
She told me not to tell you.
She told me not to tell you.
She told me not to tell you.
Tom told me not to tell you.
Tom told me not to tell you.
Tom told me not to tell you.
Tom told me not to tell you.
Tom told me to leave right away.
Tom told me to leave right away.
The doctor told me to give up smoking.
The doctor told me to give up smoking.
Tom told me to come here today.
My mother told me not to go out.
Who told you to say that to me?
Who told you to say that to me?
Who told you to give that to me?
Who told you to give that to me?
I did everything Tom told me to do.
I did what you told me to do.
I did what you told me to do.
I told you to stop calling me that.
I told you to stop calling me that.
I told you never to call me again.
I told you never to call me again.
Tom told me to leave the room immediately.
Tom told me to leave the room immediately.
Tom told me to give this to you.
Tom told me to give this to you.
I did what Tom told me to do.
They told me to stay in the car.
Tom told me to go buy some bread.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me to leave the window open.
Tom told me to close all the windows.
Tom told me to close all the windows.
She went to the market once a week.
Only those with poor memories are happy.
My sister told her to leave me alone.
Tom told me to stay in my room.
I did what they told me to do.
I can't do as he told me to.
The doctor told me I had to stop smoking.
Tom told me you're going to help him.
Tom told me you're going to help him.
Tom told me to be there by 2:30.
Tom told me not to go into that room.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me not to go there by myself.
Tom told me he wanted to be a teacher.
You're the one who told me to do this.
You're the one who told me to do this.
Please, listen to me!
Please, listen to me!
Tom regrets doing that.
I wonder whose footprints these are.
We raised quite a bit of money.
We're fortunate to have you here.
We probably won't do that.
I need the ladder.
Tom was so drunk that he didn't even recognize me.
I think we're almost done.
Did you like that book?
Did you like that book?
I stayed inside.
I stayed inside.
Do you like to watch TV?
Do you like to watch TV?
Tom tried to stab me.
If i die today, I will be dead tomorrow.
Tom entered my house.
What is that in front of us?
I'll call you right after the meeting.
I'll call you right after the meeting.
Haven't I told you never to call me here?
Haven't I told you never to call me here?
Tom told me to stay here until he got back.
Tom told me he was going to sell his house.
I didn't do what they told me to do.
I just did what my boss told me to do.
She told me that she would go to Paris in August.
Tom told me not to tell anyone, so I didn't.
I wanted to tell you, but Tom told me not to.
I did everything the way Tom told me to do it.
Tom wasn't the one who told me to do this.
I almost told Tom what you told me not to tell him.
I don't intend to do what Tom told me to do.
Tom gave me his phone number and told me to call him.
If Tom was planning to get married, he would've told me.
It's very far from here.
Tom told me that he'd like to become a bus driver.
I laughed when Tom told me he was planning to get married.
I didn't go out at all because you told me not to.
I didn't go out at all because you told me not to.
I think I'd better do what Tom told me to do.
Tom told me I was the one he wanted to talk to.
Where in the world is Tom going?
Tom told us to leave.
I told Tom to leave.
I told Tom to come.
I told Tom to stop.
I told Tom to stay.
I told Tom to go home.
I told Tom to stay indoors.
I told Tom to stay here.
I told Tom to do that.
Who told Tom to do that?
I told Tom to stay still.
I told Tom to calm down.
I told Tom to wait over there.
I told Tom to wait over there.
I told Tom to leave it alone.
I told Tom to leave you alone.
I told Tom to leave you alone.
I told Tom to leave you alone.
I told Tom to leave you alone.
I told Tom to stay in his room.
I told Tom to wait in the car.
Is that what you told Tom to say?
Is that what you told Tom to say?
It was me who told Tom to do that.
I'm not the one who told Tom to leave.
I wasn't the one who told Tom to do that.
I told him to come.
She told him to stop.
She told him to study.
He told him to study.
I told him to stop.
I told her to stop.
I told him to leave.
I told him to go.
I told him to go.
I told him to stay.
She told him to go away.
Who told him to do that?
I told him to stay here.
I told her to stay here.
I told him to go home.
I told him to do that.
I told her to do that.
I told him to leave the room.
He did what I told him to do.
He did as I told him.
Tom did what I told him to do.
I was surprised when Tom told me he was planning to get married.
I told him to stay in his room.
I told her to stay in her room.
Tom did what they told him to do.
Are you happy now?
Tom did it the way I told him to.
The doctor told him to give up smoking and drinking.
The doctor told him to give up smoking and drinking.
He told her to study.
I told her to leave.
I told her to go.
I told her to go.
Who told her to do that?
I told her to go home.
I told her to be home by nine.
I told her to wait in the car.
I told him to wait in the car.
I told them to leave.
I told them to go.
I told them to go.
I told them to stop.
Who told them to do that?
I told them to study more.
I told them to stay here.
I told them to go home.
I told them to do that.
I told them to wait for me.
I told him to wait for me.
I told her to wait for me.
I told them to stay in his room.
I told you to leave.
I told you to leave.
Who told you to do that?
Who told you to do that?
Most people only want to hear their own truth.
Don't quit English.
Don't quit English.
I've never met her.
She's at a meeting.
Leave my car alone.
She made me a star.
Her face betrayed her real feelings.
Her slurred speech was an indication that she was drunk.
Follow his example.
Tom left us this map.
Didn't he go there?
He didn't go there.
I have a lot of friends that can speak French well.
Tom helps us.
She hardly ever sees him.
Tom told us to take our time.
Do you have any idea how lucky you are?
I can prove it.
Can I talk to you for a second please?
Sometimes I read so much that I forget about food and sleep.
Tell Tom I'll be there as soon as I can.
Tell Tom I'll be there as soon as I can.
Tom says he already knows how to do that.
Let's go by train.
Let's go by train.
Let's hope Tom comes.
Have you seen my green shirt?
Have you seen my green shirt?
That's a very old song.
I hope Tom goes home.
We're sure we can do that.
That was a good movie.
I woke up at 2:30.
I woke up at 2:30.
Give it back to Tom.
Give it back to Tom.
Give it back to Tom.
Give it back to Tom.
Can I give you some advice?
Can I give you some advice?
Does Tom wear boots?
Does Tom wear boots?
Tom didn't help us.
Tom was very pleased.
The clock says two.
I will make him go.
I will make him go.
I got on the train.
I'll call you.
I don't know. It depends on my mood.
I'll call you.
This wasn't Tom's idea.
My father was busy.
Show Tom the picture.
You may use my pen.
You may use my pen.
We have to act now.
This is serious, Tom.
Are you busy today?
Tom brought us gifts.
I saw him recently.
May I watch TV now?
I hope Tom isn't sick.
I hope I can help Tom.
Tom is going to sing.
Shake hands with Tom.
Shake hands with Tom.
Tom covered his face.
You are a nice boy.
You have been busy.
You have been busy.
Look at that smoke.
I'm always thirsty.
Tom had a lot of fun.
This is a hospital.
Tom hasn't called me.
Tom is still smoking.
Tom is still singing.
The movie was good.
Tom is still talking.
The meat is frozen.
I think I'll call Tom.
I can't believe I believed Tom.
We were both a bit drunk.
Who can translate this article?
Tom means us no harm.
The buzzer sounded.
Call me immediately after you meet him.
Call me immediately after you meet him.
Do you like movies?
Do you like movies?
Do you want me to try doing that?
Do you want me to try doing that?
Do you want me to try doing that?
Do you want me to try doing that?
Are you in a hurry?
Go to the hospital.
Go to the hospital.
I can't lie to you.
You can call me anytime you want.
You can call me anytime you want.
I'm being helped.
Why didn’t you answer me when I called?
There's no sign of life.
I've seen him naked before.
I should have listened to you.
Tom was the luckiest.
I hope Tom can help me.
I hope Tom can help me.
Where are you going for the summer?
Where are you going for the summer?
Tom is always smoking.
I'll be home by 2:30.
How hard was that?
I'll call Tom myself.
That box is heavy.
Are your lips dry?
I'll call Tom myself.
Hand me that book.
What the hell was Tom thinking?
Tom got on his horse.
I'm in a bad mood today.
I'm in a really bad mood.
Why are you in such a bad mood today?
We aren't serious.
Go ahead and sing.
Prices will go up.
Tom used to eat meat.
I wonder what they're laughing about.
Women are judged differently than men.
I hope you're not talking about me.
Didn't you hear me call?
Didn't you hear me call?
Didn't you hear me call?
Didn't you hear me call?
Didn't you hear me call?
Didn't you hear me call?
Tom took out his gun.
I hope they do it.
I can't believe this is really happening.
Tom wasn't surprised.
Can I have a glass of water, please?
Tom wouldn't help me.
You have to try, Tom.
I'm a French teacher.
I only have three dollars.
I hope Tom feels better.
I hope Tom feels better.
I hope Tom can help you.
I hope Tom can help you.
Tom is as busy as ever.
I didn't enjoy doing that.
You're much better looking than I am.
You're much better looking than I am.
Is it just me or is there a cat there?
Tom is coming tomorrow.
Tom is coming tomorrow.
My stomach has been hurting all day.
What movie are you planning to watch?
What movie are you planning to watch?
I bet Tom won't help us.
My grandmother passed away last year.
Let's leave as soon as possible.
Tom calls me every day.
Stop, or I'll shoot!
I'll call you on Monday.
I'll call you on Monday.
It was raining when I took the bus.
Tom isn't an engineer.
Tom crossed the border.
Tom is the expert on this.
I tried solving the problem.
I could see Tom was busy.
Are you sure you can do that by yourself?
Are you sure you can do that by yourself?
I didn't drink that milk.
I don't want to bother you.
I don't want to bother you.
They ran after us.
That car belongs to Tom.
I don't have a white shirt.
You have three choices.
Tell Tom that I'm angry.
Tell Tom that I'm angry.
I can't stand these people.
Is Tom a French teacher?
I bought a shirt yesterday.
The car is dark blue.
Please listen now.
Please listen now.
I liked them both.
I liked them both.
They took my baby.
They took my baby.
That was my lunch.
We just got lucky.
I feel very happy.
We finished today.
I handed Tom a knife.
I handed Tom a knife.
This is my driver.
I hate doing that.
I really regret doing that.
I want to know you're safe.
Here's your bag.
Prices may change.
No one's to blame.
I wonder if there is anything good on TV.
That was really weird.
Why didn't Tom speak?
Tom stayed here once.
There were errors.
Tom is probably dead.
I liked this book.
Let's drink to us.
Let's drink to us.
Who went with you?
Who went with you?
Look at the price.
No one's in there.
Tom is conscious now.
Were you invited?
Were you invited?
Almost everybody was invited.
Tom is always eating.
It doesn't matter what you read, but how.
It tastes like tea.
Can we use this?
Why was I invited?
You're acting like a fool.
When are you going back to Japan?
When are you going back to Japan?
I miss your jokes.
I'll try to do it.
I didn't believe Tom.
I have to go pack.
Tom watched silently.
They didn't speak.
Tom waited anxiously.
Tom stopped shouting.
Tom began to shoot.
Tom stopped abruptly.
That's how we met.
That's how we met.
Tom started dreaming.
I work afternoons.
They are all ears.
He was last on the list.
The guy had a gun.
You are something.
Is the carpet blue or green?
Please talk to me.
My son left today.
Tom continued crying.
Tom called everybody.
The second part of the book is much more difficult than the first.
Tom calls me every night.
Tom started packing his suitcase.
Tom started packing his suitcase.
We will finish it.
We will finish it.
Did you see my daughter?
Did you see my daughter?
Am I so different?
I knew you'd like that restaurant.
I knew you'd like that restaurant.
Do you want to talk about it now?
Tom called her again.
Did you read this?
Did you read this?
Is the coffee hot?
Tom wants to sell it.
Tom wants to sell it.
I'd like to make a phone call.
I could see Tom was drunk.
We're going in the right direction.
I could see Tom was happy.
Get ready for bed.
Get ready for bed.
This is the watch that I lost a week ago.
What time do you usually get up on Saturday?
What time do you usually get up on Saturday?
Did you have a dog when you were growing up?
Tom is busy, and so am I.
We're quite happy with the results.
I hope Tom comes tomorrow.
I hope Tom gets home soon.
I hope Tom gets home soon.
Tom is a really nice man.
Tom is a history teacher.
We are all in grave danger.
We are in grave danger.
They are in grave danger.
Our lives are in grave danger.
That could be fun.
I hope you're feeling better.
Tom is too weak to work.
I'm getting ready to go out.
I haven’t finished eating.
Please let me out.
We hope things won't get any worse.
Tom is dressed in black.
I'll call you when I leave.
I'll call you when I leave.
Just listen to me.
Just listen to me.
What would I wear?
Wait for me there.
I'm not lying now.
We can't let Tom die.
Get me some paper.
You have to call Tom.
Is Tom bothering you?
Is Tom bothering you?
You can't sell it.
You can't sell it.
You can't sell it.
You can't sell it.
None of you have any idea what I've been through.
I know Tom is watching me.
How did Tom get here?
I didn't want you to read that.
I didn't want you to read that.
Pull the rope tight.
You did your job well.
Can you translate those documents for me?
Can you translate those documents for me?
Let's not forget the main purpose of this meeting.
How many guests did you invite?
How many guests did you invite?
How many guests did you invite?
You were lucky to be at the right place at the right time.
You were lucky to be at the right place at the right time.
My grandparents died before I was born.
He sometimes goes to work by car.
We'll try again later.
Children are prohibited from smoking.
French is spoken in Switzerland.
Thanks for saving my life.
Thanks for saving my life.
French is the only foreign language I've ever studied.
Give me the keys.
How many meters are in a kilometer?
Tom put his gun down.
We tried them all.
My glass is dirty.
You are safe here.
It must be a sign.
Give me the knife.
This country is rich in coal.
We gave up trying.
They gave it back.
They gave it back.
I'll give you $30.
Are you coming in?
Are you coming in?
Tom has many regrets.
It wasn't a crime.
It wasn't a crime.
I wasn't dreaming.
Tom won't let you go.
Are you a teacher?
Pick up the knife.
Pick up the knife.
Pick up the phone.
Put on some music.
Take the next bus.
Take the next bus.
Take the next one.
Take the next one.
That was so funny.
Tom seems very happy.
Tom seems very happy.
Tom gave up all hope.
Get up out of bed.
Get up out of bed.
Did you inform your teacher of this?
Did you inform your teacher of this?
He defected to the Soviet Union in the 1950's.
When can we leave?
My hearing is bad.
Let go of my hair.
Let go of my hair.
Let go of my arms.
Let go of my arms.
Let go of my hair.
Let go of my hair.
Let go of my arms.
Let go of my arms.
Let go of my hand.
Let's go to lunch.
Let's go to lunch.
I don't like science.
Take off your cap.
I read this book when I was in high school.
If I want to go, I'll let you know.
How did you meet him?
He took out his knife.
We must hurry now.
Tom didn't even try to understand.
It's a stupid law.
Are you busy here?
Are you busy here?
What does a man like you see in a woman like me?
Send the letter airmail.
I've already told Tom I won't help him.
I've already told Tom I won't help him.
The current is very strong.
I'll be sure to tell Tom you said that.
I'll be sure to tell Tom you said that.
We have serious problems.
I've told you a million times.
Sorry this took so long.
They immediately informed the police about it.
I'm sorry this took so long.
I'm sorry this took so long.
Are you going to the movies this weekend?
Let me finish my sentence.
Are you going to the movies this weekend?
Are you going to the movies this weekend?
Get your house in order.
Get your house in order.
Do you have a gun?
Do you have a cat?
Tom put down his pen.
I wasn't too busy.
I said I was busy.
I said I was busy.
Call Tom immediately.
I'm slightly busy.
You can stay here till the snow stops.
You can stay here till the snow stops.
Tell them to stop.
Tell them to stop.
Call me again in two days.
There is fog over the lake.
She spoke to me in Spanish.
I'm not sure if I like this one or that one.
A woman is walking towards us.
What language do you speak there?
What do squirrels dream about?
They must be busy.
They must be busy.
Hold me closer, Tom.
We're not so sure.
We were all happy.
We were all happy.
What was your job?
What was your job?
I'm sure Tom's fine.
I met him three months ago.
I met them three months ago.
You must leave.
You must leave.
You have to leave.
You have to leave.
I'm used to Tom now.
We watched an interesting movie.
Where were you? I lost you.
Tom isn't an artist.
We'll try it.
We'll try it.
I'll deal with it.
I'll give it back.
I'll give it back.
I'll get you more.
I'll get you more.
I sincerely hope it won't come to that.
In general, generals run faster than soldiers.
My daughter lives in Rio de Janeiro, which is four hundred miles away from Sao Paulo.
Production has increased by four times in the past ten years.
You're lucky Tom didn't come.
You could at least try.
I'm not that wild.
I'm not safe here.
We have a meeting.
We know Tom is poor.
I'm sure Tom will do that.
I'd like to look like Tom.
Tom accidentally did that.
Is Tom really a teacher?
Is Tom really a teacher?
I haven’t finished eating yet.
I tried to call Tom again.
I'm as old as you.
She is listening to the new song.
I said good night.
I really hope not.
My glass is empty.
Please turn right.
Tom refused to talk.
Tom didn't like it at all.
Tom has proven that.
I closed the gate.
I could sell this.
I didn't call you.
I didn't call you.
Tom got married last year.
Tom eventually left.
I wonder how Tom got there.
I don't want to talk to you right now.
I don't want to talk to you right now.
I was surprised to see you yesterday.
I was surprised to see you yesterday.
Tom has gone to the store.
I hope Tom comes home soon.
We're ready for whatever might come.
Tom had trouble breathing.
Tom gave me back my money.
I thought you might like this book.
I thought you might like this book.
Tom drove along the river.
Adam met Eve, his wife.
We weren't expecting this to happen.
When did you meet?
Tom is finally safe.
I've met her.
I've met her.
Don't be too long.
Don't be too long.
Tom was quite happy.
Tom was quite happy.
You'll get caught.
Tom told us to wait.
Tom told us to wait.
They'll rescue us.
These don't match.
The students left.
That's really odd.
That's just weird.
You have translated all the sentences.
You have translated all the sentences.
Please don't stop.
Please don't talk.
Please forgive us.
I found the story interesting.
Tom came about 2:30.
Tom is dating my daughter.
Tom is certain to show up.
Tom will definitely do that.
Tom is as tall as you are.
Tom is as tall as you are.
I'm sure Tom won't do that.
I'm sure Tom won't do that.
Tom is a childhood friend.
I have no idea who took your suitcase.
It's pretty heavy.
Tom wasn't so lucky.
I know you're happy.
I know you're happy.
I know you're happy.
I'm unsure.
Tom won't let us go.
I can't believe this is actually happening.
I've forgiven you.
I'm quite serious.
Do you understand the situation?
How many letters did you send to Tom?
How many letters did you send to Tom?
How many letters did you send to Tom?
It sounds very beautiful.
My daughter was taken away from me.
Despite your reservations, we will do what we decided to do.
I'm still talking.
Tom is here to talk.
Tom is here to talk.
I called security.
I call Tom almost every day.
I still haven't decided who to give this to.
We're not likely to use this anymore.
We've spent almost thirty years here.
Don't call anyone.
Don't call anyone.
Don't get married.
Aren't you afraid?
Call the hospital.
Call your brother.
Call your brother.
Can you translate?
Can you translate?
Close that drawer.
Close that drawer.
They've never met.
Tom wants to try it.
Tom wants to try it.
They haven't left.
They finally left.
Tom lives near here.
They all screamed.
They already left.
We'll go shopping.
Tom is no expert.
We'll be forgiven.
She has been dating him for about two years.
What's that letter about?
The circumstances of his death have not yet been clarified.
Please do not go near the dog.
Tom managed to save them.
Tom managed to save them.
Tom managed to save us.
Tom managed to save us.
We managed to save them.
We managed to save them.
Tom managed to save me.
They managed to save him.
They managed to save him.
They managed to save her.
I managed to save them.
I managed to save them.
We've got to save them.
We've got to save him.
We've got to save her.
Tom has gone abroad.
Tom went abroad.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Call your sisters.
Tom let the dog out.
I don't feel sorry for her.
I don't feel sorry for him.
You aren't thirty.
I owe thirty dollars to Tom.
I hope Tom will wait for me.
I hope Tom does that for us.
Was she the one who called you yesterday?
Was she the one who called you yesterday?
All of these sentences are weird.
You're so serious.
You're so serious.
You're so serious.
You're so serious.
Tom always calls on Monday.
I'm sure Tom wouldn't agree.
We have to seriously think about this.
We've got a lot of young guys on our team.
We hardly ever talk to each other anymore.
Tom drank a glass of water.
I returned Tom's book to him.
We've known each other for thirty years.
I didn't want Tom to help me.
We have nothing to fear but fear itself.
Have you been helping Tom?
Have you been helping Tom?
Tom didn't like that place.
We have to find another way to do that.
Tom became a national hero.
Tom beckoned me to come in.
We've solved the problem.
Tom goes abroad every year.
We haven't had those kinds of problems yet.
Fly!
Free Palestine!
Absolutely impossible.
Good night, Dan.
He tried again.
I need fish.
Drink your milk!
He drank milk.
Many people died.
What's inside?
What a splendid dinner!
Tom has nobody to help him.
Tom is capable of anything.
Sing us another song!
We've known each other for more than thirty years.
We've known each other for more than thirty years.
This song was written by Tom.
We've got something we need to talk about.
Tom has nothing to do here.
I told Tom that I was happy.
Tom heard the sound.
Tom heard the sound.
I hope Tom feels better today.
You're back early.
You're back early.
What a beautiful dress you have on!
Did Tom believe you?
Did Tom believe you?
Did Tom believe you?
Say good night, Tom.
Did Tom really think we would help him?
Are you expecting me to help you?
Are you expecting me to help you?
We're pleased with the way things have turned out.
I saw Tom going into the bank.
We've done something similar to that in the past.
Learning a foreign language is hard.
Learning foreign languages is hard.
Are you for or against open borders?
Are you for or against open borders?
Don't forget your friends.
Are you listening closely?
Are you listening closely?
Most students don't have a lot of money.
I did not reply to your letter as I was too busy.
Can I call you?
Can I call you?
Can I call you?
How does it taste?
How does it taste?
How does it taste?
Can you believe Tom?
Can you believe Tom?
He left the house.
When was the last time you saw Tom crying?
When was the last time you saw Tom crying?
I wonder why Tom gave this to me.
I'd never seen Tom cry before.
We haven't had those kinds of problems in a long time.
Tom is totally ignoring me.
There are a lot of new buildings here now.
Tom is reading a novel now.
Tom is playing with my cat.
We want to know what this project is going to cost us.
Tell Tom to call me.
Tell Tom to call me.
Tell Tom we're busy.
Have I kept you waiting?
I'm just too busy.
I'm just so happy.
Try to look happy.
Try to look happy.
Try to look happy.
Try to look happy.
Try to look happy.
You were so happy.
Who wants to go hunting?
Who wants to go hunting?
Who else do you want to talk to?
Who else do you want to talk to?
Let's have a beer.
I don't know who you want to meet.
I want to know who helped you do your homework.
I want to know who helped you do your homework.
I want to know who helped you do your homework.
I want to know who helped you do your homework.
I wanted to get married. You're the one who didn't.
Let's get serious.
How tall are they?
Don't go in there.
As a child, Tom dreamt of becoming a world famous author.
You're sitting too close to the TV.
The enemy is weak.
Finally I was able to get the meaning across.
We should wait a little.
We should wait a little.
They're weak.
They're weak.
Tom didn't keep me waiting long.
What can you talk about for hours on the phone?
I think we shouldn't have gotten married.
Of course, I'll marry you.
It would be interesting, I think.
I hope Tom feels better today.
Who wants to go shopping with me?
Who wants to go shopping?
I could try to get you a ticket.
I could try to get you a ticket.
He kept on crying.
Would Tom like that?
I'd like to know for sure.
It's an option.
You're lucky that you have a job.
You're lucky that you have a job.
This box is heavy.
Tom isn't really my type.
My neighbors, who live on the same floor, are from Lebanon.
What is science?
What is science?
I can read many foreign languages, but speak none of them.
Even men sometimes cry.
You were very busy, weren't you?
You were very busy, weren't you?
I'm sure you never told me not to do this.
I'm sure you never told me not to do this.
I'm sure you never told me not to do this.
I'm sure you never told me not to do this.
Tom is really drunk.
Tom refused to help.
Tom refused to help.
I wanted to sell Tom my old car.
Have you been mistreated?
Have you been mistreated?
We can't stop now.
We can't talk now.
We can't use this.
We can't use this.
We can't use this.
Tell Tom I don't know where his car keys are.
Tell Tom I don't know where his car keys are.
I'm not going to let you get away with this.
I knew that Tom wasn't busy.
I knew that Tom wasn't busy.
Get your things together.
Tom will come back at 2:30.
Tom has come up with a few new ideas.
Does that mean you're going to buy it?
What's your opinion on this?
We are in a difficult situation.
They forced me to take the medicine.
Did you give the order?
If there are problems, call me.
I want to talk to you, Tom.
I wanted to talk to you because I need your help.
I wanted to talk to you because I need your help.
I wanted to talk to you because I need your help.
I could never forgive myself if I did that.
I hope you're well paid.
I hope you're well paid.
I hope you're well paid.
I didn't want to waste so much time.
This bridge is in New York.
Tom made a list of things he wanted to do before he died.
Tell Tom that everyone is here.
Tell Tom that everyone is here.
Tom asked me not to help him.
Are you sure you just want water?
Are you sure you just want water?
Are you sure you just want water?
After being in a coma for three weeks, Tom regained consciousness.
I've explained all of this to you before.
I've explained all of this to you before.
Tom lives on the floor above me.
Let me explain what's happened.
I don't think I realized how much I loved you.
How long have you been watching me?
How long have you been watching me?
Does it matter to you?
Does it matter to you?
Does it matter to you?
Does it matter to you?
You can't come in.
Please come by 2:30.
Please come by 2:30.
Do you see a star?
Tom left without me.
Tom seems very calm.
You're the expert.
You're the expert.
He cut off a piece of meat.
You're home early.
You're home early.
I was on the list.
It's up to you, Tom.
It's up to you, Tom.
Tom is losing blood.
He looked pleased.
Tom looks very sick.
Don't repeat that.
French is difficult.
You're so stupid.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I like your offer.
What's this music?
The train is here.
Boy is this tasty!
Tom can't leave now.
The price is good.
Tom drank some wine.
Have you tried it?
Have you tried it?
Have you tried it?
Have you tried it?
Tom grabbed a chair.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
I'm lucky to have you as a friend.
Her skin was warm.
His skin was warm.
It isn't over yet.
Tom looks very busy.
They refused to answer my question.
He refused to answer my question.
She refused to answer my question.
You refused to answer my question.
You refused to answer my question.
He refused to answer my questions.
They refused to answer my questions.
You refused to answer my questions.
You refused to answer my questions.
You did not want to answer my questions.
You did not want to answer my questions.
They did not want to answer my questions.
She didn't want to answer my questions.
He didn't want to answer my questions.
He went there.
She went there.
We went there.
We're lying in the shade.
They're lying in the shade.
He's lying in the shade.
She's lying in the shade.
I'm lying in the shade.
Let me show it to you.
Let me show it to you.
Tom admitted that he didn't know what to do.
I hope to make it.
He wants to speak.
She wants to speak.
I'm sure he'll go.
Tom was my cellmate.
He left for Paris.
Tom was on the list.
You are a student.
Are you able to buy a ticket after boarding the train?
Are you referring to me?
Wait your turn, Tom.
Tom showed up three days later.
Give Tom back his money.
Give Tom back his money.
I should be there helping Tom.
A leaf is falling.
I'll never be that famous.
Stop the train.
Don't be an idiot.
Are you breathing?
Give up that idea.
Are you happy now?
Nobody went there.
Tom is at a meeting.
Tom is wearing blue.
Unexploded ordnance is found every year in Europe.
What floor is it on?
What floor is it on?
What floor is it on?
What floor is it on?
Did you like that?
No, I didn't help.
Wait! Don't shoot!
What was that song you were singing?
It was very foggy.
He's having an affair.
I have sunglasses.
Do you have a map?
How did you two meet?
I hope you like Tom.
She talks so much.
He won't admit his fault.
Is that your roommate?
I'm old enough to not have a curfew.
I go to work with my neighbor.
I go to work with my neighbor.
How long do you think it will take?
How long do you think it will take?
I have a meeting in fifteen minutes.
I have a meeting in fifteen minutes.
I watched Tom leave.
What if I am poor?
We will finish the book tomorrow.
They are at lunch.
I hope Tom gets better soon.
I just didn't believe it.
Tom is much shorter than I am.
How old was Tom in this picture?
I hope she doesn't notice.
I hope he doesn't notice.
I hope Tom doesn't notice.
Everyone wanted Tom to have fun.
I'm here to help people.
I see no reason to stop.
I was very, very lucky.
I'm sure that Tom will do that.
I hope everyone agrees.
I grew up in Australia.
I enjoyed living there.
I'm not going to quit.
Tom came back an hour later.
Tom called me the other day.
I wonder what Tom would do.
I wonder what Tom would do.
I feel very safe here.
Is French difficult?
I liked that song.
We are so happy.
I'll wait a day or two.
You know where to find me if you want to talk.
Tom didn't drink all the milk.
I aim to be a doctor when I grow up.
Are we making progress?
We must keep fighting.
Let's allow Tom to do that.
I'm not very happy, either.
I knew Tom would accept our offer.
Tom did that against his will.
I don't understand what this sentence means.
I was shocked by the price.
I was born and raised here.
This is the house Tom grew up in.
Three months later, Tom was dead.
I treat everybody the same.
Tom can't be over thirty.
Tom is a lot shorter than you.
Tom is a lot shorter than you.
I don't want to leave here.
I'm sure I can find a job.
Tom has found a way to do it.
Tom has called me many times.
I know I've been very lucky.
Nobody knew how dangerous Tom was.
Tell Tom where to put the suitcases.
Tell Tom where to put the suitcases.
I'm sure Tom will tell us the truth.
Tom knew it could be too late.
I dropped everything and ran.
No one lives in that building anymore.
I don't see you as a teacher.
Tom is the one who called 911.
Tom is the one who called 911.
I still couldn't believe it.
The school is across the street from my house.
Can you promise me you won't tell Tom?
Can you promise me you won't tell Tom?
I don't want my kids to smoke.
Are you sure Tom will let us help him?
Are you sure Tom will let us help him?
I've had a lot of fun so far.
Tom forgot the key in the lock.
You don't know what Tom is capable of.
You don't know what Tom is capable of.
I wasn't entirely sure myself.
I wasn't entirely sure myself.
I hope we don't do this again.
He began to shout.
She is lying about her age.
I don't want to waste my money.
I don't think it was a mistake.
I hope Tom likes the gift we bought him.
Tell Tom that I'm too tired to help him.
Tell Tom that I'm too tired to help him.
I don't find it that difficult.
I don't know why we're so busy.
I'm pretty sure that Tom didn't do that.
I'm pretty sure that Tom didn't do that.
I wish Tom would spend more time at home.
I had a pretty happy childhood.
Tom is acting a little strange.
I don't know how I'll get home.
My mother passed away recently.
My mother passed away recently.
I read it in a magazine.
I know how much you love her.
I know how much you love him.
I know how much you love her.
I know how much you love him.
Tom is a Canadian citizen.
I've made many mistakes in my lifetime.
I've made many mistakes in my lifetime.
I sat down on the couch next to her.
I sat down on the couch next to him.
I shouldn't have come here. I'm sorry.
I shouldn't have come here. I'm sorry.
Tom bought a gift for his girlfriend.
I'm pretty sure that Tom won't do that.
I'm pretty sure that Tom won't do that.
I'm sure Tom is planning on doing that.
He runs very fast.
If you don't stop, I'll tell Mom!
If you don't stop, I'll tell Dad!
I can't tell you who's on the list because I haven't seen the list yet.
Sooner or later, someone is going to have to tell Tom that he needs to behave himself.
The price rose.
The middle one is mine.
I am calling my father.
Most people expected John Adams to win.
I could have saved Tom's life.
I could have saved Tom's life.
Tom doesn't seem very hungry.
Everyone's been really nice.
I think Tom drank out of my glass by mistake.
I just found out that Tom is wealthy.
I only hope Tom likes Mozart.
Are you happy with your life?
I think Tom won't come to our party.
My watch is accurate.
That's a real good sign.
Why is Tom so busy?
Come with me to the hospital.
You can't get there by train.
We have nothing else to eat.
Winter is just beginning.
I'm trying to get used to this.
Tom will never get out of prison.
Let's put our cards on the table.
I'm pretty sure Tom lives on Park Street.
I'm pretty sure Tom lives on Park Street.
I'm not a student either.
It's freezing outside.
A soldier who doesn't dream of becoming a general is a bad one.
I'm sure that Tom will do that.
That's how I met your mother.
That's how I met your mother.
That's how I met your mother.
That's how I met your mother.
I hope you find it interesting.
Tom is richer than most of you.
Tell Tom that I don't want to talk to him.
Tell Tom that I don't want to talk to him.
I hope you won't leave me here.
I hope you won't leave me here.
It may have been Tom that wrote this note.
I sent them back home.
Let's drink something?
Shall we drink something?
Do you have children's clothes?
Are you happy with your life?
I've been trying to talk to you for over a month.
I've been trying to talk to you for over a month.
Does it taste good?
I wanted to make her happy.
I wanted to make him happy.
Tom grew up in a working-class family.
That is a dog that looks like a horse.
I recently started seeing a man.
I tried talking to her about how I feel.
Tom wasn’t born rich.
I like having people around me.
I just wanted to help the team.
I was losing my mind.
Tom gave his dog a piece of meat.
We were out shopping.
She was out shopping.
He was out shopping.
They were out shopping.
I was out shopping.
I was out shopping.
I hope Tom comes as well.
This kills me.
Our profits have declined over the past few years.
This is killing us.
She will sell her house.
Tom is pretty happy about that.
I'm pretty sure that Tom wouldn't do that.
I'm pretty sure that Tom wouldn't do that.
I hope you find it interesting.
Tom is too young to drink beer.
Tom isn't ready to go anywhere.
Tom isn't ready to go anywhere.
How can you be so sure of that?
You're much faster than I am.
We've met before, haven't we?
So, what are we going to do?
What kind of music do you normally listen to?
Why are we lying to Tom?
Does your school have a baseball team?
I have read.
I have read.
I enjoyed reading this.
I can read French.
I still make a lot of mistakes.
I think it's a serious problem.
Tom comes from a wealthy family.
Tom comes from a wealthy family.
I stopped and looked behind me.
I think you would like it here.
I think you would like it here.
I thought you wouldn't like it.
I would like to meet you.
I would like to meet his father.
I would like to invite you to dinner.
I would like you to translate this book into English.
I wonder who did that.
I think it's obvious.
Do you like costumes?
Do you like my island?
What music do you like?
Do you like science-fiction movies?
I don't like journalists!
I feel like watching television.
I don't feel like smoking today.
Look into the box.
Look into the box.
Do you know whose car that is?
A book has pages.
I wish I were rich.
I wish Tom were my younger brother.
The banks are closed Sunday.
I don't know how old that bridge is.
Permit me to stay.
Tom arrived at 2:30.
Solve the problem.
Solve the problem.
Give me some milk.
Give me some milk.
This student is from Japan.
I called for help.
Have you called Tom?
Tom isn't the type of person who learns from his mistakes.
Come into my room.
Come into my room.
Let us go, please.
Have I told you this joke before?
Tom, I also want to know what your opinion of this is.
I like your idea.
What I have to say concerns everyone here.
There were more than 100 students there.
I expect Tom back by 2:30.
I'll ask how to get there.
What makes you so sure about that?
Can I talk to you a minute?
Are you sure you weren't followed?
Are you sure you weren't followed?
Are you sure you weren't followed?
What color is this cat?
Tom isn't sure this is a good plan.
Can I leave my bag here?
Who did you buy those flowers for?
Who did you buy those flowers for?
Who did you buy those flowers for?
If I were in her place, I'd refuse to do that.
It's a well-known fact.
I translated everything Tom wrote into French.
Tom clearly doesn't understand what we're talking about.
I'm sure you've been told this already.
I'm sure you've been told this already.
I'm sure you've been told this already.
I'm sure you've been told this already.
I'm not sure I like this.
I'm not sure I like this.
Tom went downstairs.
We go there often.
Tom was unconscious.
When are you busy?
When are you busy?
When are you busy?
Are your eyes bad?
There are always options.
It's starting now.
It's starting now.
Do you have a pen?
Read it again.
Read it again.
Read it again.
Read it again.
We need to talk to everyone.
I'm confident I can do that.
I'm confident I can do that.
This doesn't look too bad.
They bought a new RV.
You've got to let me go home.
You've got to let me go home.
Our committee consists of ten members.
We could try again.
I didn't ask you for your opinion.
Let's meet at the station.
I want you here tomorrow by 2:30.
I want you here tomorrow by 2:30.
I want you here tomorrow by 2:30.
This horse is white.
I've read only the first three chapters.
The little flower is white.
What is your favourite song?
Tom didn't tell me who to give this to.
I can't wait to leave.
I've heard this joke before.
How many students are there in your school?
You've got to move.
You've got to move.
Watch your speed.
This is a letter.
She acknowledged that my statement was true.
This isn't going to end well!
Can't you wait until tomorrow?
Tom says that he's very rich.
I have no idea whether or not Tom will come.
I'll do my best, I promise you.
Let's finish what we started.
Let's finish what we started.
You remind me of somebody.
You remind me of somebody.
Tom didn't go to the lake last summer.
I'm thirty years older than you.
I'm thirty years older than you.
I got here a little early today.
I remember you. We met three years ago.
Sorry, could you repeat that?
Let's wait a bit.
Let's wait a bit.
That helps a bit.
Are you busy doing something?
Are you busy doing something?
Are you busy doing something?
Get me a glass of milk.
I got here first.
How did you find out that I like this fish?
Am I to cry or laugh?
Let's get back to our topic!
He's constantly abroad.
We have to study.
Let's start at 2:30.
I want to work in a hospital.
You'll soon get used to life in the village.
Do you know whose this is?
Tom has stayed at my house several times.
Tom isn't accustomed to working at night.
I was in the hospital.
It's a very simple idea.
Take a picture with your phone.
How many students do you have?
Tom laughed at my jokes.
By the way, have you done your homework?
By the way, have you done your homework?
It's a good sentence, by the way.
It's a good sentence, by the way.
You can't even imagine what he's capable of.
This is so beautiful.
Tom opened his present.
It was a very foolish mistake.
At the time, I thought it was a mistake.
Your happiness is the most important thing in the world to me.
Your happiness is the most important thing in the world to me.
I don't care who Tom is talking to.
Mary collects anything that's connected with squirrels.
I'll give you a present.
It is very late.
It was her idea to sell the house.
Tom isn't in a good mood today.
He's constantly abroad.
Tom told me I was the one he wanted to talk to.
Tom used to spend a lot of time with his grandparents.
You should call Tom.
You should call Tom.
You should call Tom.
Many people left.
I liked them all.
Can we call Tom now?
I was overweight.
It hurts to move.
Did Tom forgive you?
Did Tom forgive you?
I truly hope not.
We just got home.
Tom is ignoring you.
Tom is ignoring you.
I don't want to regret anything.
Tom has done what we expected him to do.
They have failed.
Tom always wears sunglasses, even indoors.
I feel a lot better than before.
I didn't want to get out of bed.
I have a son and a daughter. He is in New York, and she is in London.
They're not busy at all.
I understand how hard this is.
I've had a wonderful time here.
Tom didn't do what he promised he would do.
Tom didn't get married until he was thirty.
It's your own stupid fault.
I'm sure you have many friends.
I'm sure you have many friends.
I'm just hoping we can do that.
I'll meet you there at about 2:30.
We just want you to be happy.
I was really pleased with that.
He didn't come to the last meeting.
Tom isn't as busy this week as he was last week.
I wouldn't mind doing it again.
I'd like to build a new house.
The teacher wrote French words on the blackboard.
Tom is taller than anybody else in his department.
I thought it was a good movie.
I never would've allowed that.
Tom says he feels much better today than yesterday.
I wonder where Tom put the key.
I haven't always been a teacher.
I have nothing to say right now.
I guess that doesn't concern me.
I feel sorry for these children.
What's wrong? Why are you crying?
They all began to laugh.
I have to go. It's getting late.
What's wrong? Why are you crying?
Why are you all wet?
I think I could get used to this.
I think I could get used to this.
Tom is their leader.
Tom watched the children play.
I still find it hard to believe.
Tom looks like he just got up.
Tom wanted to talk to you about something.
Give me back my husband!
I think that was a huge mistake.
I think it's unlikely to happen.
I think it's a good idea myself.
Tom lives on a boat.
Tom hopes to become a famous painter.
Don't go in the kitchen.
Don't go in the kitchen.
Hopefully, Tom will wait for me.
That's what I hope for.
She may have been surprised when she received my letter.
She may have been surprised when she received my letter.
We have fun here.
I only need half.
I've lost my key.
What've you lost?
What've you lost?
How was the show?
Are they serious?
Did I invite you?
She cried over his shoulder.
He cried over her shoulder.
I laughed so hard I cried.
Let me add water.
Now it's serious.
Let me come, too.
Tom didn't go there.
My keys are gone.
I think the best is yet to come.
I think that would be a mistake.
I'm sure Tom doesn't know either.
I said ignore it.
I said ignore it.
I don't know French.
Put the bag down.
Put the bag down.
That's your half.
That's your half.
We'll do that, but probably not this week.
It matters to us.
Tom isn't going to let you do that.
Tom isn't going to let you do that.
Everyone has the right to education.
Don't even talk to me.
Don't even talk to me.
Let's hope Tom can do that.
Look at it closely.
Look at it closely.
Look at it closely.
Come run with me.
Come run with me.
Come run with me.
Come run with me.
You can try this experiment at home.
You can try this experiment at home.
They wouldn't believe me.
I thought I had nothing to lose.
I think you're right about that.
I think you're right about that.
You won't believe what I heard.
You won't believe what I heard.
What's your home address?
What's your home address?
The pie is fresh.
It's so much fun.
Have you read it?
Have you read it?
Have you read it?
Have you read it?
Tom came home late.
Pass me the wine.
Now look at this.
Now look at this.
Now listen to me.
Is Tom really busy?
You shouldn't allow Tom to do that.
You shouldn't allow Tom to do that.
Why's Tom so angry?
Don't call Tom now.
Don't call Tom now.
Tom closed one eye.
Tom can't use that.
Hand me that bag.
Hand me that bag.
His hands quivered when he began to speak.
That's not my mistake.
I was just about to call you.
He's a man with an iron will.
Tom is early again.
Tom will love this.
We've got a boat.
We'll find a way.
They calmed down.
Tom is almost as tall as his father.
Tom is almost as tall as his father.
Tom is almost as tall as his father.
I won't cry anymore.
I forgot the map.
I was busy doing something else.
Put the box down.
Put the box down.
You gave me hope.
You gave me hope.
Tom looked healthy.
Tom lost his shoes.
Tom lost his phone.
Tom lost his phone.
Tom is on the list.
Tom is on the list.
Try and catch me!
Try and catch me!
You look pleased.
You look pleased.
You look pleased.
You look pleased.
I just want you to listen to me.
I just want you to listen to me.
Try some of this.
Try some of this.
Was that so hard?
How about a song?
Stop bothering Tom.
I need fresh air.
The sea was calm.
Do they drink milk?
He said that he would call you later.
This is a present from all of us.
I won't lie to Tom.
I'm sort of busy.
I'm not so tired.
Tom won't like you.
Tom won't like you.
Listen to me, OK?
Listen to me, OK?
Keep it a secret.
They're not busy.
Do you want fish?
Tom is on our team.
Would you like to come over to my place?
I waited an hour.
I'll give you a couple examples.
I'll give you a couple examples.
I'll believe that when I see it.
Tom says he wants to talk with you.
Tom says he wants to talk with you.
I walk across that bridge every morning on the way to school.
I can't let him go alone.
I can't let her go alone.
I was too afraid.
I'll release you.
I'll release you.
I'll release you.
I'll release you.
I'm an adult now.
I'm an adult now.
I'm not her type.
I'm not his type.
Tom was interested.
Do I look fat in this dress?
There are a lot of interesting books in German and French.
They didn't talk.
Tom is standing up.
Tom is standing up.
Tom began to shoot.
Tom screamed again.
We were so close.
I hope everything's going well with you.
Tom met John at Pride.
Tom met John at Pride.
Do you want my honest opinion?
Many transgender people experience gender dysphoria.
Where's the list?
Tom didn't like the taste much.
You're an artist.
You're an artist.
You're all fools.
Tom braced himself.
I want more milk.
I'll pack my bag.
Tom needs the ladder.
Tom is a good liar.
Tom abandoned hope.
I know I'm early.
Tom ran downstairs.
Surprise, surprise: it's Tom and his cohort.
Tom lifted the box.
You have no idea.
She is an expert.
I'm going to cry.
Will you help me pack my suitcase?
Will you help me pack my suitcase?
Tom never was poor.
Tom never was poor.
I didn't lose it.
I didn't lose it.
Don't be so sure.
Don't pick it up.
Don't pick it up.
Don't pick it up.
Don't pick it up.
Don't disturb me!
Don't disturb me!
Tom sang me a song.
Do it right away.
Tom is on the team.
Your wife called.
Your wife called.
Tom is very unkind.
I only regret that I have but one life to lose for my country.
I'm just glad no one was killed.
I'm not certain, but I think so.
Who could refuse?
Are you sure we have enough water?
Tomorrow is fine.
Tom claimed he wasn't afraid.
Tom claimed he wasn't afraid.
Talk to somebody.
You won't like Tom.
You won't like Tom.
Nobody called me.
Just ignore that.
Just ignore that.
I'm pleased.
It's so unlikely.
It's my birthday.
It's my birthday.
I want to see the horses.
It just vanished.
It just vanished.
He began with a joke.
This is hard.
I'm going abroad.
Come by tomorrow.
Come by tomorrow.
Don't call again.
Don't call again.
Don't call again.
Is it helping?
Read it to me, Tom.
Read it to me, Tom.
Read it to me, Tom.
Call your father.
Call your father.
Call your father.
Call your father.
Shut the blinds.
They're not sure.
Tom came home very late last night.
Tom rubbed his forehead.
They were dating.
Tom called me, too.
He will soon get used to the class.
He will soon get used to the class.
He will soon get used to the class.
Thanks a lot for stopping by.
I wonder what he's doing...
We went shopping.
I'm sorry. I won't do it again.
I won't let them do that.
I'm sorry. I won't do it again.
The children all ran outside.
The roof of my house is red.
The building has no fire exit.
My feelings for you haven't changed.
My feelings for you haven't changed.
You can smoke in this room.
We're not afraid.
Tom isn't that old.
We're back early.
Tom looked pleased.
What's your size?
I like your idea.
I like your idea.
I like your idea.
Tom ran to his car.
Am I that predictable?
Am I that predictable?
Tom hasn't regained consciousness.
Tom hasn't regained consciousness.
I've tried to explain it to Tom.
I've tried to explain it to Tom.
I've tried to explain it to Tom.
I've given you everything I had.
I do think that Tom is dangerous.
I'm ready to throw in the towel.
Are you unwilling to even try?
Tom won't catch me.
You were the one who gave me that tip.
Where were you when your wife disappeared, Tom?
Where were you when your wife disappeared, Tom?
Europe is more dangerous than I thought.
Tom disappeared three days ago.
I'm not going to disappear.
Tom disappeared last month.
When did Tom leave?
You're dangerous.
You're dangerous.
Did your cat die?
Tom sings off key.
Tom is very famous.
I wonder what Tom thought of it.
I wonder what Tom thought of it.
Tom opened the bag.
Why are you so poor if you're so smart?
Tom had no idea what had happened.
Tom had no idea what had happened.
Tom was a nice man.
That smells good.
Let's hold hands.
Let's get coffee.
Let's get coffee.
Let's talk later.
Let's start here.
I think Tom did that by mistake.
The box is heavy.
Could we have a table near the window?
I've lost my pen.
He took his time.
Tom is crying, too.
Leave that alone.
Leave that alone.
I left around 2:30.
I left around 2:30.
I don't consider myself a victim.
I have no idea how Tom did that.
We won't let that happen to you.
He is on this ship.
This really is a dangerous situation.
That's a good movie, too.
We must leave at once.
This is my teammate, Tom.
Tom always carries a gun.
I have to change.
Where's your bag?
Are you an idiot?
Have you got three children?
Have you got three children?
Give me the keys.
Tom is gravely ill.
Tom is calling you.
Tom is calling you.
Have some coffee.
Tom is a professor.
Read the article.
Tom won't admit it.
He was impressed.
She was impressed.
I was impressed.
I was impressed.
Write with a pen.
Can you call him?
Can you call him?
Can you call him?
Can you call him?
Can you call her?
Can you call her?
Can you call them?
Can you call them?
Can you call them?
Can you call them?
Could you call her?
Could you call her?
Could you call him?
Could you call him?
Could you call him?
Could you call him?
Could you call them?
Could you call them?
Could you call them?
Could you call them?
Should we call them?
Should we call them?
Should we call him?
Should we call him?
Should we call her?
Should we call her?
Can we call them now?
Can we call her now?
I want you to call them.
I want you to call them.
I want you to call them.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call her.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call him.
I want you to call him now.
I want you to call him now.
I want you to call her now.
I want you to call her now.
She is a local government officer.
I'm sure Tom regrets that now.
Tom is more than just a neighbor.
I didn't think it mattered to you.
I didn't think it mattered to you.
I didn't think it mattered to you.
I didn't think it mattered to you.
Tom is from a rich Boston family.
I wonder if that's even possible.
I feel like I'm thirty years old.
I expect you to be ready by 2:30.
I expect you to be ready by 2:30.
I don't have to answer to anyone.
Tom says he regrets doing that.
I regret doing that.
I don't regret doing that.
I wonder what Tom would do in a situation like this.
He seems healthy.
Tom was not pleased.
Please move back.
Please move back.
Do you cry often?
Call me tomorrow.
Don't disturb me.
It looks strange.
Tom stood silently.
Tom stopped eating.
Can we speak now?
You seem content.
You seem content.
You seem content.
Get on the horse.
Get on the horse.
Tom said goodnight.
He looks his age.
I don't watch TV.
His story is true.
I get up at 7:00.
You're very kind.
Nice to meet you.
Nice to meet you.
The dogs are wet.
I saw a house with a red roof.
A lot has changed in the past fifty years.
Let me show you how it's done.
There's a television in the corner of the room.
We should call Tom.
Stop talking and get back to work.
What if he fails?
Let go of my arm.
My daughter is still at work.
My daughter is still at work.
I found her kind.
Tom just showed up.
We heard her cry.
Tom sent me a note.
Give Tom all of it.
Give Tom all of it.
He can't read it.
He can't read it.
Should we call Tom?
No one helped me.
Cross the street.
Cross the street.
It's a sunny day.
We are always moving with the earth.
Tom is stark naked.
Get in the car.
Do your homework.
Tom was in a hurry.
I found him kind.
I found her kind.
I found him kind.
Tom was not famous.
Are you busy now?
Can you run fast?
Can you run fast?
Can you run fast?
Can you run fast?
Bring me the key.
I'd love to go, but I can't.
I'd love to go, but I can't.
Tom doesn't regret that decision.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think you'll like this one better.
I think that would be a big mistake.
I don't think Tom will change.
I can't believe it's summer already.
We don't know who invited everyone.
I'd like to watch this movie again.
Tom finished that job last month.
I should've tried to help Tom.
Maybe Tom is busy.
You helped Mommy?
You helped Mommy?
Go up the stairs.
Go up the stairs.
Go up the stairs.
Tom looked hungry.
Tom helped us all.
You're going to have to wait here.
Let's try these.
We're both rich.
We want freedom.
Who can be sure?
Why are we poor?
Why are we poor?
My brother helps me with my homework sometimes.
Some things you shouldn't even say jokingly.
Some things you shouldn't even say jokingly.
If that happens again, call me.
If that happens again, call me.
I drank too much again.
Everyone recognizes the problem, but no one talks about it.
How often does the train go to Stockholm?
No one listened.
I finished last.
That was a fact.
We have freedom.
I translated what Tom wrote.
I didn't know that Tom smoked.
Tom is happy here.
I'm paid enough.
Tom must be happy.
That smells bad.
Whose are these?
I'll call again.
Aren't you glad?
Aren't you glad?
Aren't you glad?
That bothers me.
Tom writes poetry.
Hold me tighter.
Hold me tighter.
I'll find a way.
Tom admitted that.
Tom liked it, too.
I'm not dressed.
Tom read the note.
Are you happy?
It was an honor.
Tom believed them.
Try it yourself.
I heard a sound.
Tom was very pale.
Tom is very short.
Let's drink to your health!
Let's drink to your health!
Let's drink to your health!
You can call me.
You can call me.
Wait inside the car.
Wait in the car.
Should I try it?
I was glad to see that he finally came to his senses.
To be on the safe side, she went to hospital.
Let me prove it.
Look what Tom got.
Look what Tom got.
Here, try these.
Here, try these.
Can we prove it?
Tom sold it to me.
Tom sold it to me.
Can you read it?
Can you read it?
Can you read it?
Can you read it?
Can you read it?
Find me a glass.
Find me a glass.
How tall is she?
How tall is this building?
How tall is this building?
How tall is that mountain?
How tall is that mountain?
How tall is your wife?
How tall do you think Tom is?
How tall do you think Tom is?
How tall is she?
Are we safe now?
Are we safe yet?
I must be drunk.
I must be drunk.
Tom heard a shout.
Let me show you.
Tom hates running.
Tom was very poor.
Tom made me smile.
I read his book.
We must go back.
Can you listen to me for a minute?
Can you listen to me for a minute?
I don't know what holiday it is today.
I thought that Tom was dead.
Tom didn't die in a car accident.
I've been doing this for thirty years.
I think our best days are ahead of us.
There's his bag.
Give Tom his keys.
Give Tom his keys.
That's for sure.
Tom looked guilty.
I'm sorry, could you repeat that?
I'm sorry, could you repeat that?
I'm fairly busy.
Go wait outside.
Go wait outside.
Call your brother.
Call your brother.
Call your brother.
Call your brother.
Call your wife.
Call your wife.
Don't call your father.
Don't call your father.
Is it that late?
Tom is still busy.
Tom arrived early.
You were a fool.
You were a fool.
I called my son.
I called my son.
Get in the boat.
Get in the boat.
Tom made mistakes.
I love the idea.
We aren't fools.
Are you sure, Tom?
Give Tom a dollar.
Give Tom a dollar.
I have two cats.
I meant to call.
I meant to call.
I've got a list.
I have your key.
I had no doubts.
I had no doubts.
This is our bag.
Tom is busy again.
You have to try.
You have to try.
I won't lose it.
Tom just got home.
He arrived late.
Listen a minute.
Listen a minute.
Tom isn't my type.
Tom likes to talk.
Tom never woke up.
Tom was very nice.
We've lost them.
Try some caviar.
Try some caviar.
The soldier ran.
I don't know when Tom will leave Japan.
The value of the dollar has fallen recently.
It's all very strange.
I was born and raised here.
I was born and raised here.
I was born and raised here.
A lot has changed in the past fifty years.
Give me the map.
Don't lie to us.
I thought I heard someone in the next room.
I have a daughter the same age as your son.
I hope Tom shows up today.
I don't think there's anything in the box.
Tom is smarter than most of you.
Tom was asleep when he was shot.
I sincerely hope that you don't do that.
I sincerely hope that you don't do that.
I know most of those people pretty well.
Tom was not happy.
I never learned to write.
Did you phone Tom?
Tom is the victim.
Tom is going east.
Tom is going east.
Don't open that.
Call the police.
Call the police.
Call the police.
Call the police.
Check your list.
Tom is crying now.
Tom is crying now.
They didn't run.
They ignored me.
They ignored me.
I didn't like Tom.
They can change.
I arrived at 2:30.
Call Tom immediately.
Call Tom immediately.
We'll just wait.
We run together.
We were invited.
I can run.
Let's call Tom.
Let's call Tom.
You're not helping me.
I was trying to talk to you.
I was trying to talk to you.
I'm happy you're here.
I'm happy you're here.
Don't use your real name.
I'm wearing sunglasses.
Dogs are faithful animals.
Are you listening to music?
Are you listening to music?
What is this? This is a shop.
Do you go by train or car?
Do you go by train or car?
I think your sister will like this book.
I think your sister will like this book.
Is he coming by train or by bus?
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too weak.
You're too busy.
You aren't rich.
You aren't rich.
You're an adult.
You're an adult.
You're an adult.
You're an adult.
Tom wouldn't talk.
Tom doesn't know much about his neighbors.
I met her again.
I've got to go to the bank.
I've got to go to the bank.
I brought you a present.
Did you sing?
I'm thirty-four.
I am a poor man.
Read this first.
Read this first.
Tom has decided to study abroad.
Tom has started making mistakes.
Is this data accurate?
Tom was last on the list.
Where is your daughter now?
I think it's going to take time.
I should've said I was busy.
You should let Tom help you.
What did you tell Tom about the job?
We need to finish this.
Bring a lunch.
I want a dollar.
Go to the store.
Go to the store.
What's your favorite upbeat song?
I'll keep on trying.
It's probably Tom.
Will you help me translate?
Will you help me translate?
Will you help me translate?
Tom started to take off his jacket.
Tom left thirty minutes ago.
To be honest, I really don't know.
Tom didn't even want to eat.
Do you want to know why I lied to Tom?
Do you want to know why I lied to Tom?
Do you think your money is safe in a bank?
Why did you run?
Why did you run?
Why did you run?
Why did you run?
Do you like modern music?
Don't let Tom sing.
Don't let Tom sing.
Don't let Tom sing.
Is Tom singing?
Wait.
The situation won't change.
I eat meat almost every day.
I'm not in a position to give you advice.
I'll have to confiscate your knife.
I'm not as busy as Tom.
Thanks for walking me home.
He's unlikely to want to go.
You could've called.
You could've called.
You could've called.
You can't sing here.
Tom is the only one in our family who doesn't like singing.
Tom likes to listen to music while he's doing his homework.
We closed the restaurant three hours early yesterday.
Nobody sang with me.
I saw the movie.
He must be dead.
There are many red flowers in the garden.
Call my husband.
Call my husband.
Call my husband.
I thought I heard you come in.
I thought I heard you come in.
Tom can't be dead.
She reads after lunch.
Just ignore her.
Just ignore her.
Just ignore him.
Just ignore him.
You can't ignore her.
You can't ignore her.
You can't ignore him.
You can't ignore him.
You can't ignore them.
You promised me.
You promised me.
Give me the gun.
I talked to her.
Life is strange.
Every fifth person has a car in this country.
The price of that book is five dollars.
What's the time? "It's 2:30."
Tell Tom I won't sing.
Tell Tom I won't sing.
Who did Tom sing with?
Tom drives slowly.
Maybe he's dead.
He raised his hand to stop the taxi.
Sorry, I forgot.
This pleases me.
Please call him.
I like this color as well.
Tom drives a Ford.
Tom had to stay in the hospital.
My suit is grey.
No, I didn't go.
Tom is thirty-one.
Don't ever give up hope.
Monday's not good.
Don't lie to me.
We met a writer.
I go every year.
The light is on.
He gave up hope.
We wish Tom well.
Tom ran for help.
Tom bought a gun.
Tom was the star.
Tom can't use it.
Tom can't use it.
Tom can't use that.
Tom can't use it.
Tom can't use it.
I told Tom to go.
I told Tom to go.
Call me anytime.
Call me anytime.
Look at the cat.
Look at the cat.
Don't lie to Tom.
Don't lie to Tom.
Tom's a nice boy.
Tom said he had a daughter.
At the time, music was everything to us.
I'm not going anywhere with you.
Tom was the one who discovered the body.
I sold my house in 2013.
That's up to you.
That's up to you.
Tom could refuse.
Tom cried softly.
No taxi stopped.
Now stop crying.
Now stop crying.
Now stop crying.
Tom laughed, too.
Is Tom that good?
Add more water.
Add more water.
Has Tom tried it?
Has Tom tried it?
Has Tom tried it?
You're invited.
You're invited.
It still hurts.
We calmed down.
What a big cat!
Do we have to talk about this here?
Tom has red hair.
Is Tom satisfied?
It didn't hurt.
You're so nice.
No one really knows what a UFO looks like.
That's up to Tom.
That's up to them.
That's up to him.
That's up to her.
That's up to them, not me.
That's up to him, not me.
That's up to her, not me.
Give Tom the gun.
Give Tom the gun.
Let's have tea.
Tom will like it.
Of course, we believe you.
If anything happens, I'll give you a call.
Tom was playing in the backyard.
It'd be murder.
It'd be murder.
Now I'm scared.
Those men died.
Did you use it?
Did you use it?
Did you use it?
Let me come in.
The rain was falling in my face.
The rain was falling in my face.
Here, try some.
Here, try some.
How did I look?
Here, try this.
Here, try this.
Our solar system is always in motion.
The Sun is in the center of the solar system.
It isn't Tom's fault.
I've got to get back to the meeting.
I've had this song stuck in my head for two days!
I was sure.
I was sure.
Is she having an affair?
Is he having an affair?
Are you having an affair?
Nothing but your love can save her now.
Is Tom still a teacher?
Tom decided to give it another try.
Tom said he enjoyed it.
Let Tom try it.
I wish you could've seen the stars last night.
I've never dated anyone taller than me.
I can reach the top shelf.
We walked along the river.
What did the note say?
What did the note say?
Do you know how to count to ten in French?
Did you happen to see where Tom went?
We're not done playing yet.
Give me thirty seconds.
We should be safe now.
I built my son a new house.
All prices have risen.
Tom can't believe what he's just heard.
I hope that you'll be my friends.
Don't forget that Tom still loves you.
Don't forget that Tom still loves you.
Don't forget that Tom still loves you.
Don't forget that Tom still loves you.
Tom told me I shouldn't talk to you.
We met last week.
We met last week.
It wasn't a pleasant job.
We have been dating for three months.
I'm so glad you could make it.
Tell Tom not to talk to anyone.
Tom always drinks his coffee strong.
A true friend would have acted differently.
It was very nice to hear that.
Tom didn't tell me who his French teacher was.
Tom was in pain.
She dyed her hair red.
He really wants to meet you.
He really wants to meet you.
He knows how to play trumpet.
I wish I had brought a map.
Tom thinks he has found Atlantis.
First of all, I will read this.
The boat passed under the bridge.
The boat passed under the bridge.
Tom started to behave strangely.
I'm glad I'm not the youngest person here.
Everybody is counting on you, Tom.
She was watching the dead leaves fall.
Their bodies were never found.
Does Tom still wrestle?
She lost her son in the war.
I'd love to, but I can't.
My daughter studies in that school.
Tom was my roommate last year.
In the summer, I wear cotton shirts.
Tom is a friend of my wife's younger brother.
I couldn't keep lying to Tom.
Just then, a bright idea occurred to me.
It sounds like a dream.
The women of France are beautiful.
When I work, I like to listen to the music.
We can be certain of that.
I thought Tom was in prison.
Who called 911?
We almost left.
A day without you is like a summer without the sun.
I went to Bali in the summer.
When I was a child, I used to go to the seashore every summer.
Tom spilled coffee all over my shirt.
Tom, too, was almost killed.
Tom was nearly killed himself.
She forgave him for killing her father.
Will you drink some tea?
Sound quality matters.
Sound quality matters.
Tom has found some interesting discrepancies.
This gift is from us.
This bed is too soft for me.
Milk is better than water.
His response was contrary to our expectations.
She decided to go abroad.
Who's your most interesting friend?
Are you two really dating? "Sort of."
I called the Jacksons.
Tom wasn't like most soldiers.
The soldiers left for the front.
Please don't bother me.
Please don't bother me.
We understand each other perfectly.
We can't let Tom do that.
I don't intend to keep talking to them.
Tom won't speak to me and I don't know why.
How quickly time flies.
The fly is on the ceiling.
There is a fly on the ceiling.
He is flying to Paris tomorrow.
Birds are flying above the trees.
What else do you want to talk about?
I got home late yesterday.
The stars are bright tonight.
The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is fear of the unknown.
Let's talk about Australia.
Prices are higher here than in Australia.
It's an inside joke.
It's an inside joke.
It's an inside joke.
She lost her money, her family, her friends.
Did Tom say he drank that?
Did Tom say he drank that?
Did Tom say he drank that?
What do you not like about my suggestion?
I'm afraid when I'm alone in the house.
I can't even walk, let alone run.
Is it OK to sing here?
Let's get up.
I've never heard Tom cry.
Don't forget the past.
Don't forget the past.
I guess we could.
I like the way Tom sings.
I'll be back in 30 minutes.
I have to go shopping. I'll be back in an hour.
Tom was too busy to notice what was happening.
Should I call 112?
Both men were rescued.
We closed the restaurant three years ago.
Where does Tom study?
People kill people.
Tom didn't call 911.
My brother uses it.
That's my favorite expression.
Are you sure there's nothing left to eat?
You can always talk to me.
I'm not saying it's Tom's fault.
I wasn't born rich.
I'm not saying it's Tom's fault.
What advice did Tom give you?
Tom immediately began talking.
Tom was the last person I expected to see here.
Call me immediately if anything happens.
Call me immediately if anything happens.
Call me immediately if anything happens.
Call me immediately if anything happens.
Don't ever come back.
I haven't forgiven you.
I haven't forgiven you.
I haven't forgiven you.
I haven't forgiven you.
Tom translated the book from French into English.
Tom used to take a walk every day.
Let's listen to that song again.
People are getting killed.
Tom is confident about his future.
I'm still not used to it yet.
They have gone to Europe.
What else is in that drawer?
Just sit down and listen to me.
I want to talk about something else.
Tom definitely wants to become a doctor.
Isn't it interesting?
I didn't want to help Tom.
I didn't want to help Tom.
Is someone calling me?
Let me try to explain.
That's one of my favorite expressions.
I just sold my car to Tom.
I just sold my car to Tom.
I think Tom wants to sell us something.
There was a large crowd in the park.
Don't leave me again.
It's easy to sing.
Tsunamis are very rare.
He felt perfectly content.
We both know whose fault this is.
We both know whose fault this is.
We both know whose fault this is.
We both know whose fault this is.
One person was killed.
My mom helps me a lot.
Much more can be done.
How long have you been watching us?
How long have you been watching us?
How long have you been watching him?
How long have you been watching him?
How long have you been watching her?
How long have you been watching her?
Call security.
Call security.
Tom called security.
Call security.
Call security.
He didn't believe them for a second.
He didn't believe her for a second.
He didn't believe him for a second.
Tom didn't believe her for a second.
She didn't believe him for a second.
Put it in the bag.
Put it in the bag.
Put it in the bag.
Put it in the bag.
Tom gave me a key.
Do you think he would forgive me?
Do you think she would forgive me?
Do you think she would forgive me?
Is she in a good mood?
Is she in a good mood?
Tom did all of his homework.
I went to bed early that night.
I talked to my friends about it.
Are you two really dating?
Are you two really dating again?
What else do you want to talk about?
Hurry up! The train is here!
We had so much fun together.
You look good in that dress.
You look good in that dress.
Don't you have some homework to do?
Don't you have some homework to do?
Why don't we talk about it now?
That's a good picture.
I won't do it anymore. I promise.
I'll call you on Monday.
Give me my bag.
Give me a sign.
Give me a sign.
Tom left his bag.
Tom left his bag.
We helped them.
Aid me. "No." "Help me." "No." "Save me!" "No."
Her mother was aghast.
Did we make it?
The next class starts in five minutes.
Humor me.
Pick me up at 2:30.
The game begins at 2:30.
I'm getting married on Monday.
I even tried writing a song about what happened.
I even tried writing a song about what happened.
She never lies.
Write Tom a note.
I want a glass.
Tom just woke up.
Tom just woke up.
I'm a grown-up.
I'm not that old.
Tom is using you.
I have to wait.
I hope you win.
I had fun here.
I've got a gun.
Did you all go?
I think you're stupid.
I loved the music.
You'll be safe.
You smell nice.
You smell nice.
You look older.
You may refuse.
You may refuse.
It's nearly 2:30.
We're never going to get there.
We aren't accustomed to waiting.
We didn't expect you to be here.
We didn't expect you to be here.
Tom has read a lot more books than I have.
Tom started packing his things up.
Tom started packing his things up.
We hope you come back home soon.
We hope you come back home soon.
I don't think Tom was happy.
I don't think Tom was happy.
His wife and his son were already sound asleep.
I'll be gone for the weekend.
We're always busy at this time of the year.
I bet Tom could help.
I bet Tom could help.
I can't wait to see your Halloween costume.
I'd love to do that, but I'm too busy right now.
Tom turned right.
I'll be gone for three days.
Don't you understand how important this is?
Tom is in the kitchen right now.
Tom came up with a new system.
This is very difficult work.
I said get up!
The waves are high.
I'll catch you.
I'll catch you.
I just guessed.
Tom just watched.
Hiromi is wearing a new dress.
I feel strange.
Drop the knife!
Drop the knife!
Check it again.
Check it again.
Check it again.
Check it again.
Check it again.
Check it again.
Mr. Ricardo is a very good teacher.
Give my back my bag.
Are you famous?
They were weak.
They caught me.
They helped me.
You have no idea what this is, do you?
They called me.
They called me.
Tom doesn't talk.
I enjoyed this book very much.
Who asked you to sing?
How many stars are there in the sky?
We won't have class next week.
Who asked you to sing?
Who asked you to sing?
Do you like the way Tom sings?
Tom seems to be much happier than I am.
Tom seems to be much happier than I am.
We didn't recognize each other.
The war has not ended.
We don't have a moment to lose.
I knew Tom would leave early.
We still have so much to learn.
That's very, very odd.
Tom has read a lot of books about that.
We hope many of you will come.
You know I won't sing.
You know I can't sing.
Tom said he's forgotten how to do that.
We must find a way to do that.
Tom doesn't like city life.
Tom called again.
Her lips were warm.
His lips were warm.
My chest hurts when I breathe.
Today is my friend's birthday.
Today is my friend's birthday.
Tom will sue you.
Tom will sue you.
You're awesome.
You're so mean.
You're so mean.
You're so mean.
You're so mean.
You're so mean.
Tom made a sand castle.
I must help my mother.
I don't like dirty jokes.
He did not seem sure of his answers.
We hope a solution is found.
We hope a solution is found.
You can't make me sing.
You can't make me sing.
I wonder what Tom wants to do.
I wonder what Tom wants to do.
Promise me you'll sing.
Promise me you'll sing.
I should've left him a note.
The world has become dangerous.
We can't allow Tom to leave.
She seemed perfectly calm.
He looks just like you when you were his age.
Where do you think you're going dressed like that?
Did everyone do their homework?
Tom was told that he was too short.
I hope Tom doesn't mind.
Why did I ever listen to you?
We sang around the campfire.
We're lucky it's not Monday.
You have to see this movie.
It was Tom's idea to come here.
Do you have a favorite song?
I didn't understand half of what Tom was saying.
Why should Tom sing that song?
Tom wanted to talk to his children.
We can't let you sing here.
Don't ask me not to sing.
Before we can make a decision, we must have all the facts.
Tom wanted to talk to his children.
I knew Tom would like it here.
Come on, give it a try.
You said it didn't hurt.
Is this milk still good?
Let's get together.
What we want is freedom.
I'm sorry about everything.
Do you like this music?
We already sang that song.
We already sang that song.
We meet every three weeks.
Tom is short.
I'm short.
Don't ask me not to sing.
Who knows what Tom looks like?
We hope to find a solution.
You sing better than I do.
You sing better than I do.
You sing better than me.
You sing better than me.
Let's not sing any more.
It's my duty to do that.
Tom is very busy.
Prove me wrong.
Prove me wrong.
You sing better than I do.
You sing better than I do.
We know you're very rich.
I forgot to bring my homework to school.
Tom slipped and fell in the shower.
He doesn't listen to his teachers.
Why didn't you try calling Tom?
Is Tom conscious?
Where did Tom go?
I can't use it.
I can't use it.
I see your pen.
Tom looks guilty.
Climb to the top.
You smell good.
Let's not talk.
Whose son is Tom?
She was very rich.
Did you call Tom?
Don't leave us.
Don't leave us.
I didn't know Tom was that old.
I didn't know Tom was that old.
How do you propose to help?
How do you propose to help?
Tom wrote a book about birds.
You're flogging a dead horse.
She is wearing the same dress that she had on yesterday.
Some people can't sing at all.
Why are there so many mistakes in this document?
We closed the restaurant.
I was hoping Tom would help us.
Tom hardly ever eats meat anymore.
Is Tom really a French teacher?
We haven't lost much.
I'm sure Tom doesn't want that.
I'm glad to meet you, too, Tom.
Many people make that mistake.
We hope it isn't true.
We met them yesterday.
I was hoping Tom would go home.
I was hoping Tom would go home.
Why should we sing that song?
Tom didn't want to go back to jail.
Let me explain the situation.
Do you really think I'd help?
Do you really think I'd help?
We must not allow this.
Didn't I ask you not to help?
Didn't I ask you not to help?
Why didn't you sing with us?
Why didn't you sing with us?
Why didn't you sing with us?
Why didn't you sing with us?
Tom is supposed to be home by 2:30.
I have no idea where Tom works.
We'll wait for you here.
We'll wait for you here.
Tom got here before everybody else.
Give me that magazine, please.
Give me that magazine, please.
Is Tom in a good mood?
Come back here.
Come back here.
Open your books to page 30.
Open your books to page 30.
We absolutely have to go.
We absolutely have to go.
I bought new sunglasses.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
It's in your bag.
Pass the meat please.
Pass the meat please.
Pass the meat please.
Pass the meat please.
That wasn't your first or last mistake.
I forgot the train tickets.
Tom is calling us a taxi.
Don't leave your socks under the couch.
Don't leave your socks under the couch.
Pick up your clothes.
Pick up your clothes.
I don't like this movie.
I don't like this movie.
Are these suitcases yours?
The language I'm learning is very difficult.
I'm sure they'll be very happy together.
I'm sure they'll be very happy together.
Did you get the flowers?
Didn't I tell you not to go there?
Didn't I tell you not to go there?
Tom has to go back to Australia.
Tom has to go back to Australia.
Did you really think I would help?
Did you really think I would help?
You'll find a solution, I'm sure.
You'll find a solution, I'm sure.
Let's never sing that song again.
I'm not sure if Tom will do that.
I didn't want to help.
I don't want to sing.
I don't believe Tom will help us.
Tom forgot his trumpet at school.
Tom has lost both of his parents.
I'm not sure if Tom can do that.
Tom often sings with his friends.
Let me try to explain it to you.
Let me try to explain it to you.
Let me try to explain it to you.
I like this store.
I didn't see Tom helping anyone.
We all felt happy.
Do you know who drank my coffee?
Do you know who drank my coffee?
We all felt happy.
We should call Tom immediately.
Do you want to know who helped?
Do you want to know who helped?
How exactly am I supposed to help?
Tom drives a BMW.
She drives a BMW.
Wait your turn.
They haven't spoken in twenty years.
They haven't spoken in two months.
Nobody was paying any attention to her.
Nobody was paying any attention to him.
Did you call the plumber?
Please wake up.
Tom offered me a piece of cake.
I certainly hope Tom doesn't leave.
I certainly hope Tom doesn't leave.
Did Tom really go there by himself?
Did Tom really go there by himself?
I can help if you let me.
I can help if you let me.
Tom is playing in the backyard.
Try to find it.
Try to find it.
Try to find it.
Tom looked fine.
Send Tom a note.
Send Tom a note.
I told you not to come back.
I told you not to come back.
I told you not to come back.
I told you not to come back.
I told you not to come back.
I told you not to come back.
I told them not to come back.
I told them not to come back.
I told him not to come back.
I told him not to come back.
I told her not to come back.
I told her not to come back.
I told you that I wasn't busy.
I told you that I wasn't busy.
I told her the bank was closed.
I told him the bank was closed.
I told her the bank was closed.
I told them the bank was closed.
I told them the bank was closed.
I told you the bank was closed.
I told you the bank was closed.
I told them the bank was closed.
I told him the bank was closed.
I told her the bank was closed.
I told her to do it.
I told him to do it.
I told them to do it.
I told her to give me a call.
I told her to give me a call.
I told him to give me a call.
I told him to give me a call.
I told you to give me a call.
I told you to give me a call.
I told you to give me a call.
I told you to give me a call.
I told her to leave me alone.
I told him to leave me alone.
I told them to leave me alone.
I've been here since 2:30.
Did Tom go, too?
I put some milk in my coffee.
Who did Tom hit?
Is Tom that bad?
Let me do that.
Tom was content.
Is that what you wanted to talk about?
Is that what you wanted to talk about?
My mother is very busy right now.
Your idea is good.
Tom's very nice.
Tom wanted a million dollars.
He went abroad.
You're a teacher, right?
Tom ran outside.
We can't find the cause.
Did Tom look OK?
I don't think Tom is dead.
Tom got up late.
Tom got up late.
Tom heard a noise in the next room.
It's important that you tell the truth.
It's important that you tell the truth.
It's important that you tell the truth.
It's important that you tell the truth.
I heard that Tom doesn't sing anymore.
I can't believe Tom did that to you.
I can't believe Tom did that to you.
It looks like everyone in town is here.
I didn't really want to help.
We should've done what Tom suggested.
We should've done what Tom suggested.
I'm sure Tom doesn't do that anymore.
I'm sure Tom doesn't do that anymore.
Sometimes it is pleasant to look back on one's childhood.
I'm sure Tom doesn't do that anymore.
I'm sure Tom doesn't do that anymore.
I studied French last night.
I hope you won't tell Tom about this.
I hope you won't tell Tom about this.
I didn't know Tom could sing so well.
I didn't know Tom was such a good singer.
I pulled as hard as I could.
Tom refused to take the money.
Wait for me here and don't go anywhere.
I still haven't found my keys.
I see the good student.
I go there three times a year.
Wait for me here and don't go anywhere.
Tom won't be able to say no.
This is my favorite place in this city.
I don't have time to help now.
If she knew your address, she would write to you.
I'd rather not sing that song.
I don't believe Tom would do something like that.
Sorry Tom, I don't believe you.
I don't think Tom can play the trumpet.
Are you sure that's enough?
I've invited all my friends.
I hate doing things like this.
I'll sue you.
I'll sue you.
Let's watch TV.
How high is it?
How high is it?
How high is it?
Tom forgave you.
Tom forgave you.
When did Tom go?
Tom made a list.
God bless you.
God bless you.
I don't study.
How did Tom act?
I don't believe Tom is capable of doing something like that.
You smell bad.
You smell bad.
Tom can't go in.
I cried today.
Here's a list of things I want you to do for me.
Here's a list of things I want you to do for me.
I never would've believed that.
I never would've believed that.
Tom must go back to Australia.
I wish I could sing as well as Tom can.
The whole town is here to see your show.
If man does not put an end to war, war will put an end to mankind.
Mankind must put an end to war before war puts an end to mankind.
You'd better not sing that song tonight.
Are you sure you don't know anybody here?
Are you sure you don't know anybody here?
How many times did you help Tom do that?
How many times did you help Tom do that?
Tom got in line.
Don't look up.
Don't look up.
How old was Tom when he started talking?
The boy is learning to read and write.
I've sung that song a few times.
I like reading American novels.
Tom constantly tries to be politically correct.
Does Tom really sing those kinds of songs?
How are we going to put this back together?
Did you really think I'd leave without you?
Did you really think I'd leave without you?
Is it true that Tom doesn't like to sing?
Is it true that Tom doesn't like to sing?
I don't know whose fault this is.
I don't know whose fault this is.
It's important that you tell me the truth.
It's important that you tell me the truth.
It's important that you tell me the truth.
It's important that you tell me the truth.
Do you always help Tom with his homework?
Do you always help Tom with his homework?
Do you always help Tom with his homework?
Do you always help Tom with his homework?
I'd like you to meet my daughter.
I'd like you to meet my daughter.
Many animals are nocturnal.
Tom was the only one not wearing a suit.
Tom was the only one not wearing a suit.
The price of this car is very high.
I like spending time with my friends.
I like spending time with my friends.
I don't like you. I'm sorry.
How about dinner?
Were you the one who cleaned the kitchen?
I'm not going to sing that song.
I'm not going to sing that song.
You don't have to sing if you don't want to.
Give me one reason why I shouldn't help Tom.
Crows are smart birds.
Tom had nothing more to say.
His brother can't sing.
Tom went to bed after supper.
I didn't expect her to ask me that question.
Call him tonight.
Tom is talking on the phone.
There are many possible answers to that question.
How do we get her out of jail?
Call me when you return.
Why is Tom wearing a name tag?
Call me when you return.
I'm the local authority here.
I fell down the steps.
Tom walked out of the meeting.
I can't understand why Tom refused to help us.
It's hard to figure out who's telling the truth.
Do you think Tom would be willing to help us?
It's been a long time since I've sung that song.
I have no opinion on that matter.
Don't bring sand into the bed.
Don't bring sand into the bed.
I wasn't the one who told Tom not to help.
I was hoping Tom would be able to help us.
I like to drink milk.
John has a pen.
Different people have different ideas.
I stopped smoking for the sake of my health.
The children didn't like the film.
Tom still doesn't have enough experience.
Tom is shaking.
It is hard to believe that actually happened.
I can't forget her smile.
Tom is going to the bank.
May I close the window?
I remember meeting them somewhere.
I have the map.
Have you already read this book?
I wonder if I can do it again.
Tom really impressed me.
Tom refused to shake my hand.
Tom is Mary's most famous son.
Tom lives a floor up from me.
I can't stand my roommate.
Tom was obviously impressed.
He was obviously impressed.
I have no idea what I should say.
I have no idea who that woman is.
I hope they find a solution soon.
I hope you can help me with this.
This is one of the most dangerous places on earth.
Tom turned around and smiled.
They're too dangerous.
What was Tom wearing?
I don't belong to the club.
Don't you think we should at least give Tom a call?
I did some shopping on my way home.
I think I'm happy with this.
There is so much trash here.
Tom is a teacher and so am I.
Tom is a very famous painter.
I won't ever sing that song again.
I knew it wasn't a very good idea.
Do you remember how much I loved you?
Be honest and straightforward.
In the future, everyone will drive an electric car.
I'll never lose hope.
Tom grew up in a military family.
I cried when my dog died.
I cried when my dog died.
How do you like my dress?
How do you like my dress?
Come here, child, and let me have a look at you.
Tom has been a faithful friend.
Take off your boots.
Tom is awfully sick.
Tom says you're bright.
Welcome to the first French class.
You can always ask for Tom's help.
Welcome, dear guests!
I talked to all three of them.
I talked to all three of them.
I'm pretty sure Tom's prepared for what's about to happen.
I talked to all three of them.
I'm useless at French.
Tom may not know French.
This sounds like French.
That's our French teacher.
Could you teach me French?
Why is this only in French?
We're both French teachers.
Who was your French teacher?
Speaking French is difficult.
I never speak French anymore.
I need to practice my French.
He can speak and write French.
Who did you learn French from?
Tom found me a French teacher.
My favorite subject is French.
I want to be a French teacher.
How often do you study French?
Is French your first language?
That is not how we do things here.
How long have you been in prison?
How long have you been in prison?
How long have you been in prison?
Tom said that I can't come in.
I was sent home.
Their eyes met.
It was a beautiful summer day.
Will you give me a hand?
They went to bed very late.
Tom didn't come over for my birthday.
Get out of here and never come back!
Tom made the soccer team.
Tom won't go even if he's invited.
They were wet.
This is my favorite color.
It is not allowed to smoke in the room.
It's a good idea, Tom.
I'm so afraid.
It's up to me.
It's up to me.
Tom added water.
Tom cried again.
I want a boat.
Tom was pleased.
I'll finish reading this novel soon.
I see my ship.
Tom was in jail.
It's up to us.
It's up to us.
Just be happy.
Just be happy.
Just be happy.
Tom probably didn't even know about it.
Maybe this wasn't such a good idea.
Maybe that's not such a good idea.
This wasn't such a good idea.
How long has your throat been hurting?
Do you still have a key to the house?
Do you still have a key to the house?
Do you still have a key?
Do you still have a key?
It'll take approximately three hours.
It'll take at least three hours.
Tom also was very hungry.
Tom entered the building.
I let him go.
I let him go.
What have you been doing for the last three hours?
I don't want to die in prison.
I think I should stop doing this.
Tom didn't like the place.
Let me call Tom.
Is Tom still up?
I ignored him.
I ignored her.
He ignored me.
You'd like it.
You'd like it.
Tom promised me that.
I don't eat fish.
I knew Tom was busy.
I have no neighbors.
She's in a good mood.
She's in a good mood.
He's in a good mood.
He's in a good mood.
They are losing blood.
We're only half way through.
I was the star.
You look well.
You got lucky.
You got lucky.
His secretary can speak three languages well.
I should discuss it with my father.
Now I feel sorry for her.
I feel sorry for them.
I feel very sorry for him.
I just feel sorry for them.
I just feel sorry for him.
I just feel sorry for her.
I feel sorry for the children.
I feel sorry for your kids.
I feel very sorry for your sister.
I feel very sorry for your sister.
I don't feel sorry for you.
I don't feel sorry for you.
I don't feel sorry for them.
I don't feel sorry for myself.
I feel sorry for you.
I feel sorry for you.
I was feeling very sorry for myself.
You'll like Tom.
You'll like Tom.
I expected Tom to call, but he didn't.
I didn't expect you to come today.
I didn't expect you to come today.
Do you expect us to believe that?
Do you expect us to believe that?
Do you really expect me to believe this?
Did you really expect me to believe that?
Did you really expect me to believe that?
Tom was serious.
Read it again.
Read it again.
Pick a number.
Pick a number.
Pick a number.
Pick a number.
Tom tried again.
Keep the keys.
Keep the keys.
It's very hot.
It's very hot.
Tom spoke first.
Tom nodded back.
Tom needed hope.
Tom needs hope.
Tom isn't naked.
I was very pleased.
I was pleased.
Tom is shopping.
Hold tight.
Hold tight.
Are you lying?
Are you lying?
Tom believed me.
They can wait.
They all died.
We tried that.
We both cried.
Tom will change.
You're my age.
You're my age.
You're my age.
You're my age.
Nobody called.
Tom is conscious.
They're fools.
This is my younger sister.
OK, try again.
OK, try again.
The earth moves around the sun.
Did you get up early?
I see a queen.
Tom seems happy.
Tom seems happy.
He smells bad.
She smells bad.
They liked Tom.
Tom died there.
Tom can change.
You seem busy.
You seem busy.
I finally made the connection.
This train is fully automated.
Tom hates cats.
Let's hope so.
They have studied here for six months.
Let's go away.
Let's go away.
I won't go in.
Tom isn't poor.
I lost my key.
Tom never lies.
Tom has braces.
My daughter has braces.
My daughter has braces.
Tom is an engineer.
Tom wanted to be an artist.
Origami is the art of folding paper.
Tom is an origami artist.
He made me go.
I can't smoke.
Wait till six.
Tom ignored me.
Tom ignored me.
Let me try it.
Let me try it.
It is very hot in the kitchen.
Drink it down.
Drink it down.
Drink it down.
Drink it down.
Try and do it.
Do you wear uniform?
Try and do it.
Do come again.
Do come again.
Do you want some advice?
I'm not sure that's possible.
Why'd Tom disappear? Where might he have gone?
He acts like a king.
Are you happy?
How about you?
I'll take him.
Why is Tom wet?
I saw Tom fall.
Our eyes met.
Our eyes met.
I was a fool.
Stop singing.
Stop singing.
Stop singing.
I'm so drunk.
I'm so drunk.
Are you rich?
Are you rich?
Are you rich?
Are you rich?
I called him.
She's stupid.
He's stupid.
You promised.
You look bad.
You look bad.
You saved us.
What an idea!
Wait a while.
Try that one.
Try that one.
Try that one.
Try that one.
Try that one.
Try this one.
Try this one.
Try this one.
Try this one.
Try that one.
Try that one.
Just call me.
Tom is talking.
I've lost it.
Tom is falling.
It won't take me a long time.
They lost it.
They lost it.
They shot me.
Tom will check.
We can check.
The food here is too expensive.
They laughed.
I'm badly wounded.
He was named after the king.
She is clearly over forty.
Can't you see that we're speaking?
The store is already closed.
He succeeded.
I'm to blame.
I don't waste time.
Do you even know who you're talking to?
Tom felt happy.
They help us.
Let me check.
We named my son after my grandfather.
Tom said it was a joke.
Tom didn't go.
Listen to me.
I went there.
Tom is abroad.
Fadil met a Muslim woman.
Tom is my age.
Tom was silly.
I think perhaps you should call Tom.
Tom caught me.
Tom let me go.
I do hope so.
I felt safe.
I felt safe.
I felt safe.
I felt safe.
I guess not.
Tom wore this.
Now you try.
Now you try.
Stay inside.
It cost $30.
It cost $30.
You used me.
It's never too late to start.
They're red.
Look at him.
Look at him.
Tom looks bad.
You shot me.
You shot me.
Tom looks old.
You can try.
One is blue.
One is blue.
One is blue.
Tom felt safe.
I'll try it.
I'll try it.
Just call Tom.
I was drunk.
I was drunk.
Has Tom left?
Can you try?
Go sit down.
He is not the teacher.
You're poor.
Tom's packing.
Was Tom happy?
Was Tom happy?
Please wait.
Tom called me.
Tom called me.
Tom called me.
Tom treats me very nice.
What does it matter anyhow?
Ken is waiting for the train to come.
Please pay attention to what I'm saying.
Please pay attention to what I'm saying.
Tom ran home.
We didn't reach the summit.
We didn't reach the summit.
It's important we find them.
It's important we find them.
It's important we find him.
It's important we find him.
It's important we find her.
It's important we find her.
Look at that!
Whose is it?
Whose is it?
Whose is it?
I feel fine.
If I wanted to, I could do that.
If I wanted to, I could do that.
Do you really think that if I could help you, I wouldn't?
Do you really think that if I could help you, I wouldn't?
Do you really think I wouldn't help you?
Do you really think I wouldn't help you?
Tom was rich.
Tom was safe.
Tom was dead.
Might I ask your address?
Might I ask your address?
He did not sell the house.
They eat fish.
They ate fish.
He walks in the park.
Tom shot him.
I've tried.
We hope so.
Let me out.
Is it blue?
Is it blue?
Is it blue?
I met them.
I met them.
I called Tom.
I like art.
Do come in.
Do come in.
We had fun.
We lost it.
We lost it.
Tom promised.
I'm inside.
We're rich.
We're poor.
I'm famous.
I'm famous.
Wear a blue dress.
How many beers did you drink?
We must keep moving forward.
I believe we're moving forward.
They were moving.
We were moving a little too fast.
Tom is moving quite fast.
Tom made one serious mistake.
How do you propose doing that?
How do you propose doing that?
It's close.
It's close.
It's close.
It's very close.
It's very close.
It's very close.
It's cold. Could you close the window?
It's cold. Could you close the window?
I'm thirty.
How tall are your parents?
I'll be done in an hour.
Forgive me.
I use this.
Tom lost it.
Tom lost it.
Tom had fun.
Tom was wet.
He made it.
Jesus wept.
Tom shot me.
I don't know whether he's happy or not.
I don't know whether she's happy or not.
I don't know whether you're happy or not.
I don't know whether you're happy or not.
I don't know whether you're happy or not.
I don't know whether you're happy or not.
Do come in!
Do come in!
I was wet.
I was wet.
I am weak.
I am weak.
I'll stop.
It's dead.
It's dead.
I'm early.
Let's try.
He is rich.
Wait here.
Wait here.
I can run.
Read this.
Do you think Tom is dangerous?
Do you think Tom is dangerous?
I think that I came too early.
I think that I came too early.
I was very surprised.
I was very surprised.
She tried.
See below.
I never would've guessed.
I never would've guessed that.
I never would've guessed that.
I never would've guessed that.
I never would've guessed that.
I'm rich.
He's wet.
She's wet.
Marry me.
Don't go.
Don't go.
She runs.
My husband is away for the weekend.
I use it.
I use it.
I use it.
I use it.
Yes. You're absolutely right.
It matters to us.
Call us.
Call us.
Call me.
Call me.
I'm wet.
Come here! I want to talk to you.
Come here! I want to talk to you.
Come in.
Come in.
Get up.
Get up.
This is a good song.
I'll show you how to properly use it.
I'll show you how to properly use it.
I'll show you how to properly use it.
I'll show you how to properly use it.
Do you want some advice?
Tom likes to write poetry.
Tom likes to write poetry.
Tom obviously likes hearing himself talk.
They won't take you away from me.
They won't take you away from me.
Could you please tell Tom that I need his help?
Could you please tell Tom that I need his help?
I wonder how many people believe that.
We met there yesterday.
Are you sure this is the right train?
Human relationships are complex.
I cried like a baby.
I got into the boat.
I got into the boat.
I got into the boat.
Tom said I looked very happy.
Tom said I looked very happy.
I collected stamps when I was a kid.
You have a nice voice.
You have a nice voice.
We want to meet them.
We want to meet him.
We want to meet her.
I want to meet them.
We want to meet them.
We want to meet him.
We want to meet her.
I want to meet them.
I want to meet him.
I want to meet her.
We want to meet you.
We want to meet you.
We want to meet you.
We want to meet you.
I gave Tom the wrong medicine by mistake.
She was wearing blue.
I got back at 2:30.
I've decided to leave.
I was here all afternoon.
I kept it a secret.
We're buddies.
I'll have to wait.
Tom is in jail now.
I'll come at 2:30.
I'll be safe here.
I'll be done soon.
Their new novel will come out next month.
Tom lies a lot.
I wanted to speak French every day.
Unfortunately, some people were offended.
London, where I live, used to be famous for its fog.
I'm in prison now.
I'm a bit scared.
You proved me wrong.
Don't you want to talk to me?
Tomorrow we will go to the theater.
Tomorrow we will go to the theater.
Maybe he's busy.
The doctor works in a hospital.
Did Tom enjoy it?
Did Tom ever hurt you?
Did Tom get any gifts?
Did Tom say he helped?
Did Tom look happy to go?
Did Tom ever ask about me?
Did Tom accept your offer?
Did Tom try to speak to you?
Did Tom call you last night?
Did Tom let you drive his car?
I heard a gunshot.
I heard a gunshot.
I was a reporter.
This is not my cat. Mine has white feet.
This is not my cat. Mine has white feet.
Do you know by chance her name?
I felt like a fool.
I got home at 2:30.
I got home at 2:30.
I was interested.
Tom didn't give it back to me.
I liked Australia.
I left work early.
I left right away.
I have a black cat.
I liked that idea.
To be at daggers drawn.
I may not make it.
I am your daughter.
We are your daughters.
I'm a bus driver.
The city lights are beautiful at night.
Tom said I looked very busy.
Tom said I looked very pale.
I promised to help.
I nodded and left.
I play the trumpet.
I began laughing.
I'm finally safe.
I ran out of food.
Tom could've called the police if he had wanted to.
I'm early again.
I'm full of hope.
I refused to talk.
That's a really good hospital.
I'm now in jail.
Tom won't stop doing that.
Despite everything she said to me, I can't stop thinking about her.
Did Tom borrow any money from you?
Did Tom really give you advice?
Did Tom write that song for you?
Did you deliver the note to Tom?
Did Tom really get into Harvard?
Did Tom sing any songs you knew?
Did Tom borrow any money from you?
Did Tom ever regain consciousness?
Did Tom give any other suggestions?
Did Tom ask you to come talk to me?
Did Tom let you do what you wanted?
I'm standing up.
I shut the window.
I closed the drawer.
I shut the blinds.
Tom says I drive too fast.
I started packing.
I started packing.
French isn't all that difficult.
I agreed to wait.
I have many regrets.
I'm very wealthy.
I started to run.
I want to sell this.
I bought flowers.
I bought a horse.
I'm not an adult yet.
You know what Tom is capable of, don't you?
Look what I found in the garden.
I chose the wine.
I decided to wait.
I can't use this.
I collect stamps.
I'm wearing a warm pair of socks.
I'm wearing a warm pair of socks.
I closed one eye.
I tasted the wine.
She accepted his offer.
I brought flowers.
I'm not one hundred percent convinced that's true.
The man they're talking about has been dead for a long time.
I called a friend.
The United Arab Emirates is called "Al-’Imārat Al-‘Arabiyyah Al-Muttaḥidah" in Arabic.
I called a friend.
I came home early.
I came home early.
I told Tom to wait.
I told Tom to wait.
I closed the book.
You know what Tom is capable of, don't you?
I was in the army.
He left for a month.
You seem very scared.
I'm turning thirty soon.
I only made one mistake.
I only made one mistake.
You're obviously lying.
You're a good neighbor.
I also have a daughter.
I also have a daughter.
Tom says he'll give it a try.
Judge for yourself and you won't be judged.
I was quite happy.
I was quite happy.
She's very good at it.
I did a cartwheel.
I gave Tom the key.
Look, you can't buy this anywhere else.
Did Tom say where we should meet him?
Did you explain the situation to Tom?
Did you really expect Tom to read it?
Did Tom say how he was able to do it?
Did you guys hear what Tom said on TV?
Did Tom say where he went last weekend?
Did Tom give you permission to do that?
Did Tom ever tell you why he never remarried?
Did you even know Tom could play the trumpet?
Did you ask Tom what he thought the problem was?
Did you know Tom is pretty good at speaking French?
I wonder what he will say.
You're on the wrong floor.
He tried to sleep on the floor.
This bag is too heavy.
If I were you, I'd start immediately.
He's a great scientist.
He said to me, "danger!"
How many people did you invite?
I can't come, sorry.
Will you go to the cinema?
I thought you were done with this.
I live on a boat.
I drank some beer.
I drank some beer.
I didn't go alone.
I woke up at 6:30.
I got out of jail yesterday.
I went home early.
I drank some milk.
I didn't help Tom.
I needed surgery.
He listened carefully.
Is this a present?
A present? For me? Thank you!
A present? For me? Thank you!
I don't know what this sentence means.
I don't know what this sentence means.
I have no idea what this sentence means.
I'm sure you understand that.
I sang at church.
I found your keys.
I wouldn't say no.
I sing at church.
Give that to Tom.
I nodded to Tom.
Give those to Tom.
I gave that to Tom.
Just give it to Tom.
Give it back to Tom.
I'm giving it to Tom.
I just gave it to Tom.
Give this book to Tom.
Tom is a lot younger than I am.
I have had it with Tom.
Yellow is my favorite color.
Tom lost an arm.
I'm not too happy.
I grew a mustache.
I grabbed a chair.
I wanted to talk to you about something important.
I wanted to talk to you about something important.
I'm the one who should be helping Tom.
I'm the one who came up with the idea.
I'm the one who always has to help Tom.
Don't repeat it!
Repeat it, please.
Can you repeat the question?
I gathered more information about it.
I gathered more information about it.
The regime has fallen.
I'm hit!
I'm mean.
I'm naked.
I'm lying.
I'm short.
I'm short.
I'm direct.
I'm bushed.
I'm bushed.
I'm a poet.
I'm stupid.
I'm stupid.
It was a pleasure working with you.
I had no idea why.
I'm badly wounded.
Your daughters have turned into women.
Sami knew how to talk to young women.
Sami knew how to talk to young women.
Both children and adults enjoy his books.
I wouldn't help Tom if I were you.
I refused to leave.
I left after lunch.
I told Tom not to call.
I told Tom not to call.
I wasn't very busy.
I want Tom to wait.
I used to eat meat.
I hate that picture.
I drank some water.
I brought everyone gifts.
I'm not helping Tom.
I drive very fast.
I could've refused to do that, but I didn't.
I'm taking a walk.
I left Tom a note.
This isn't good for Tom.
I wish the best for Tom.
You know something about it, right?
This is about cars.
Fadil wants to marry another woman.
Sami married Layla.
I hear he was released after five years in prison.
It's a serious matter.
She wrote a book about a bird.
Tom hopes to get the results by Thursday.
I hope you never forget me.
How many people did you invite?
I've decided to become an engineer.
Tom confessed he did that.
I was hoping you'd be here today.
I'll give these to Tom.
I've been lying to Tom.
This cap belongs to Tom.
You said give it to Tom.
You shouldn't lie to Tom.
How close are you to Tom?
I already gave it to Tom.
Will you give this to Tom?
Will you give this to Tom?
I can't keep lying to Tom.
The Sun is the brightest object in the sky.
Nobody understands why I'm so scared.
Nobody understands why I'm so scared.
I'm quite wealthy.
I was lying to you.
I was lying to you.
You have a horse.
The horse is in the forest.
The horse is in the forest.
I help the father.
I would like to buy this watch, but unfortunately it's just too expensive.
He asked her why she was crying.
When was the last time you read this magazine?
I'm about your size.
I'm about your size.
I'm about your size.
I'm about your size.
I want a unicycle for my birthday.
I did it for the money.
She's in the garden.
He's in the garden.
The same holds true for Tom.
It was hard for Tom to say no.
It is not important what my name is.
Do you know what her name means?
Do you know what her name means?
Do you know what his name means?
Do you know what his name means?
Do you know what my name means?
Do you know what my name means?
That's a very interesting name.
That's an interesting name.
I'm neither rich not famous.
I'm neither rich not famous.
I usually wear dark clothes.
I'm always very busy.
What happened down there?
I'm not as rich as Tom.
He has had surgery on his left leg.
Tom didn't want to help.
Tom didn't want to help.
I was mostly right.
I was pretty drunk.
I listened carefully.
Your method is different from mine.
I'm sorry. I thought you knew.
Does it look better like this?
I've never seen so many people in one place.
Tom jumped on his horse.
What makes people happy?
We need to go to the bank.
I love spicy food.
This is music to my ears.
Their behavior changed drastically.
How often do you use the camera on your smartphone?
Have you made any more progress?
It took longer than I thought it would.
I'm young, but I'm not stupid.
Tom disappeared three weeks ago.
Open up! I know you're in there!
Open up! I know you're in there!
You can't tell me what to do!
Come with me, Tom. I've got an idea.
But what if he says no?
But what if she says no?
I'll pick you up around seven.
I'll pick you up around seven.
I will pick you up around six.
I will pick you up around six.
I'll pick you up at 2:30.
I'll pick you up at 2:30.
I'll pick you up tomorrow evening at 6:30.
I'll pick you up tomorrow evening at 6:30.
You place me in a difficult position.
You place me in a difficult position.
I helped everybody.
It's important not what you say, but how you say it.
How do you usually spend your day?
How do you usually spend your day?
I'm not very happy.
I'm not very happy.
I'm not very happy here.
I'm a taxi driver.
I'm making a list.
I'm making a list.
I'm quite healthy.
I checked the list.
I'm drunk again.
I could not believe my own eyes.
Tom thinks I'm very stupid.
I'll be asleep by the time you get here.
I'll be asleep by the time you get here.
What did you think of the movie?
Why don't we go downstairs?
Why don't we take a look?
Why don't we give this another try?
Why don't we talk in your office?
Why don't you invite them here?
Why don't you invite them here?
Why don't you invite her here?
Why don't you invite her here?
Why don't you invite him here?
Why don't you invite him here?
Why don't you get married, Tom?
Why don't you try it? Maybe you'll like it.
Why don't you just go talk to him?
Why don't you just go talk to her?
Why don't you go to a bank?
Why don't you just call them?
Why don't you just call them?
Why don't you just call them?
Why don't you just call them?
Why don't you just call them?
Why don't you just call him?
Why don't you just call him?
Why don't you just call him?
Why don't you just call him?
Why don't you just call him?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you just call her?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call me?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call them?
Why don't you call me?
Why don't you call him?
Why don't you call him?
Why don't you call her?
Why don't you call her?
Why don't you let her go?
Why don't you let her go?
Where do you use Esperanto?
My room is on the fourth floor.
Where do you spend your free time?
I have no intention of getting married.
Prisons are overcrowded.
This could end very badly.
I hope you enjoy it.
Your opinion doesn't count.
Your opinion doesn't count.
Tom wanted to find a way to fix the problem.
Let's call her.
Let's call her.
Let's call him.
Let's call them.
Let's call them.
Let me call them.
Let me call them.
Let me call him.
Let me call him.
Let me call her.
Let me call her.
We'll call them.
We'll call him.
We'll call him.
We'll call her.
We'll call her.
I'll call them tomorrow.
I'll call him tomorrow.
I'll call her tomorrow.
I'll call them myself.
I'll call him myself.
I'll call her myself.
I'll call him myself.
I'll call them myself.
You shot him.
You shot him.
You shot her.
You shot her.
He shot her.
She shot her.
Have you ever killed anybody?
Have you ever killed anybody?
Tom looks just like you did when you were his age.
Tom has gone back to prison.
Tom ran to his room, crying.
Tom ran to his room, crying.
Tom didn't believe his eyes.
What time did you close the store?
What time did you close the store?
What time did you close the store?
Tom died of brain cancer.
Tom used to sing better than he does now.
It's not the first time Tom has done something like that.
Tom doesn't like to sing.
I smell bad.
They smell bad.
The room smelled bad.
This milk smells bad.
I'm sorry that I did that.
It's an interesting article.
What a fast horse that is!
Something is stuck in the pipe.
It seemed rather bad.
I'm jittery.
I'm jittery.
I'm blessed.
I'm blessed.
I'm busy now.
I'm not done.
I'm faithful.
I'm faithful.
I'm done for.
You don't need to help us if you don't want to.
You don't need to help us if you don't want to.
Tom is already making progress.
You're old enough to do that on your own.
I never regretted doing that.
I never would've allowed Tom to do that.
I never would've allowed Tom to do that.
I'm not rich, but not poor either.
I'm not rich, but not poor either.
Which is worse, killing one person or letting five people die?
I'm smoking.
I'm not poor, but not rich either.
I'm not poor, but not rich either.
It will be summer soon.
I hope Tom didn't see what you did.
I hope Tom didn't see what you did.
I'm glad Tom is on our team.
Wellington is the capital of New Zealand.
Tom often eats fish for dinner.
Probably not even Tom knows what to do.
Why are you ignoring me?
Why are you ignoring me?
Tom reminds me a lot of myself.
It will be fall soon.
How much money did Tom borrow from you?
How much money did Tom borrow from you?
How much money did Tom borrow from you?
How much money did Tom borrow from you?
Tom offered to walk me home.
Tom likes stories.
Get everybody downstairs.
Get everybody downstairs.
Dan received a call from the hospital.
Thank you for taking the time to talk to us.
Thank you for agreeing to meet with me.
I'm quite satisfied with my life.
Tom never follows my advice.
I don't think I should help you.
I don't think I should help you.
Tom said he wanted to leave.
How long do you think it'll take us to do this?
How long do you think it'll take us to do this?
Tom said he heard the gunshots.
We're not one hundred percent ready yet.
Not that shirt, the other one.
I was hoping you'd sing with us.
I was hoping you'd sing with us.
Tom told me where to put my suitcases.
Tom says he's in a lot of pain.
Tom wouldn't have sung if we hadn't asked him to.
Tom told me where to put his suitcase.
Tom should've kept that secret.
I'll show Tom how to do that.
I knew you wouldn't like it here.
I knew you wouldn't like it here.
This looks delicious.
It sounds good.
We have seen a good movie.
Does Tom intend to help us?
Tom sometimes helps his mother.
The flowers smell so good.
The flowers smell so good.
Be careful not to step in the mud.
I wish you happiness!
I'm in no mood to sing right now.
I'm in no mood to sing right now.
Tom sometimes says nice things.
Do we have time to watch another movie?
Do we have time to watch another movie?
Where are you calling from?
Where are you calling from?
You always lie to me.
You always lie to me.
I didn't like her at first, but now I do.
Why don't you go back to bed?
Why don't you go back to bed?
The church was crowded.
Where did you meet her?
I don't have that desire anymore.
It is much better to be healthy than wealthy.
Let's go into the garden.
Let's go into the garden.
Let's go into the garden.
Can I take a look at it?
Can I take a look at it?
How many of the words on this list do you not know?
How many of the words on this list do you not know?
Has it really been three years?
I thought that was impossible.
He sold his house for 50000 dollars.
I make a lot of mistakes.
I'm your age.
I'm hurt bad.
I'm hurt bad.
I'm watching.
I'm watching.
I'm too weak.
I'm too weak.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I'm easygoing.
I'm not drunk.
I'm done here.
I'm done here.
I'm down here.
I'm very rich.
I'm shivering.
Why did you invite me?
Why did you invite me?
Why did you invite me?
Why did you invite me?
Why did you invite me?
Why did you invite me?
I have a small gift for you.
I have a small gift for you.
Open your books to page one hundred.
I'd never met him before.
I'd never met him before.
I'd never met him before.
I'd never met him before.
I'd never met her before.
I'd never met her before.
I'd never met her before.
I'd never met her before.
I just came from there.
I just came from there.
I woke up at 6:30.
I think that would be a good idea.
I fell off the chair.
I fell off the chair.
All the good seats are already taken.
We're going to have to sell our house.
We're going to have to sell our house.
How did the three of you meet?
Tom was feeling pretty happy.
How am I going to explain this to Tom?
We're lucky that Tom helped us.
People on that island are very poor.
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
Did you show it to your parents?
I always thought it was weird.
How much is a train ticket?
I needed protection.
Can one of you call Tom?
I watched carefully.
I refused to answer.
I refused to answer.
I looked at the map.
I turned the handle.
I fell off the roof.
I'm still a student.
I'm not an engineer.
I hope you understand.
I hope you understand.
I was about to go out when he called on me.
You can't use this.
You can't use this.
You seem very nervous this morning.
You seem very nervous this morning.
You seem very nervous this morning.
My neighbors are very nice people.
You're not supposed to have this key.
You're not supposed to have this key.
Call them this evening.
Call them this evening.
If they find us, we're dead.
Why do you like horses?
Why do you like horses?
Where is your daughter now?
He's as tall as me.
He's as tall as me.
There must be a mistake.
There must be a mistake.
I need new pants.
Does he want to look at it?
Breathe through your nose, not your mouth.
You have no idea who that is, do you?
You have no idea who that is, do you?
We've got to be ready in thirty minutes.
I'm a chauffeur.
Tom said it was too early to go home.
How long have you been a member of this club?
Who was the man you were talking to?
Who was the man you were talking to?
They spent three years in prison.
Do you really want to marry me?
Do you really want to marry me?
Do you really want to marry her?
Do you really want to marry her?
Do you want to marry her?
Do you want to marry her?
Do you want to marry me?
Do you want to marry me?
Thanks for letting me stay with you.
Thanks for letting me stay with you.
If you tell anyone, I'm never speaking to you again.
If you tell anyone, I'm never speaking to you again.
I only eat meat.
I only eat meat.
There is snow on the roof.
Breathe through your nose, not your mouth.
When I was a child, I was always drinking milk.
I need new boots.
I need a new shirt.
I want to build an igloo.
I care what other people think of me.
I care what other people think of me.
I don't care what other people think of me.
I don't care what other people think of me.
It is a complicated process.
She had heart surgery.
He had heart surgery.
I had heart surgery.
I had heart surgery.
She had heart surgery.
He had heart surgery.
He had surgery.
She had surgery.
I had surgery.
My cat needs surgery.
My cat needs surgery.
My dog needs surgery.
My dog had surgery.
My cat had surgery.
My cat had surgery.
My cat had surgery.
My cat has cancer.
I see you're busy.
I see you're busy.
Welcome to the world of physics.
Welcome to the world of mathematics.
Welcome to the world of politics.
She's smoking.
He's smoking.
Please tell Tom that I came by.
She's smoking a cigarette.
He's smoking a cigarette.
I'm smoking a cigarette.
Why haven't you done your homework yet?
Exactly what kind of work do you do?
They came to us with a proposal.
That's one option.
Tom is a lot better today.
I would have died if you hadn't saved me.
I would have died if you hadn't saved me.
I would have died if you hadn't saved me.
Norway is the world's happiest country.
He can't make me do that.
He can't make me do that.
They can't make me do that.
They can't make me do that.
You can't make me do that.
You can't make me do that.
It's a book of poetry.
We both like nature.
We both like nature.
Would you rather be healthy or wealthy?
Would you rather be healthy or wealthy?
I would rather be healthy than wealthy.
I would rather be healthy than wealthy.
Where did you get this key?
The children are playing in the sand.
I forgot to take the key.
Look at that cat.
Look at that cat.
I sometimes help Tom in the garden.
You will never see Egypt again.
Tom uses Google Maps.
Tom still uses Windows XP.
I'll see you tonight.
This is a very difficult language.
It's a dead tree.
It's a dead tree.
The tree is dead.
The tree is dead.
Some people like his idea.
Some people like this idea.
Everybody hates this idea.
No one likes this idea.
Plant a tree.
Plant a tree.
Plant a tree over here.
Plant a tree over here.
Plant a tree there.
Plant a tree there.
I'm calling a cab.
English has many French words.
We lost sight of Jack in the crowd.
Be careful not to step in the mud.
She was very kind.
How many letters do you think this book has?
How many letters do you think this book has?
How many sentences do you think this book has?
How many sentences do you think this book has?
How many sentences does this book have?
You should read this book.
You should read this book.
You must read this book.
What is crime?
What is crime?
You've told me this story before tons of times.
You've told me this story before tons of times.
Be careful not to step in the mud.
It is a complicated language.
How many foreign languages do you speak?
How many foreign languages do you speak?
Who have you invited to your birthday party?
Who have you invited to your birthday party?
I know we have to hurry.
Do not drink the water in the dirty glass!
I thought that you didn't smoke.
I thought that you didn't smoke.
We're aware of the problem.
Tom is getting results.
Tom is waiting downstairs.
The process can take years.
The box is made of wood.
Should I wait for Tom to finish?
It's too heavy for Tom to carry.
I'm waiting for Tom to cool down.
I'm not opening the door for Tom.
You really should buy a gift for Tom.
She stared at the ceiling.
He stared at the ceiling.
It's a German name.
It's an English name.
It's a French name.
She should be in jail.
He should be in jail.
The man laughed.
She doesn't remember where she put her key.
I don't regret anything either.
This is made of wood.
What does this expression mean?
What does this expression mean?
Once you try it, you'll never stop.
Let me give you an example.
Let me give you an example.
Take this box.
Take this box.
We have to find out what's in the box.
What is your mother's surname?
What is your mother's surname?
How many people have you saved?
How many people have you saved?
We must help as many people as we can.
We'll help as many people as we can.
We called Tom.
The food looks very delicious.
Come back here immediately!
Come back here immediately!
Why were you talking to them?
Why were you talking to them?
Why are you talking to them?
Why are you talking to them?
Why are you talking to him?
Why are you talking to him?
Why are you talking to her?
The beer is pretty tasty. Try it!
The beer is pretty tasty. Try it!
I saw you talking to them.
I saw you talking to them.
I saw you talking to him.
I saw you talking to him.
I saw you talking to her.
I saw you talking to her.
I saw you talking to her.
I saw you talking to him.
I saw you talking to them.
Why are you talking to her?
Why are you talking to him?
Why are you talking to them?
Why were you talking to them?
I heard you talking to him.
I heard you talking to him.
I heard you talking to him.
I heard you talking to them.
I heard you talking to them.
I heard you talking to them.
I heard you talking to her.
I heard you talking to her.
I heard you talking to her.
Somebody was talking to them.
Somebody was talking to him.
Somebody was talking to her.
I was talking to him.
I'm talking to them right now.
I'm talking to him right now.
I'm talking to her right now.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
At first, I didn't believe you.
It is possible that I forgot my keys.
I never meant for Tom to get in trouble.
I need to borrow some money so I can buy some medicine for Tom.
I've always helped Tom.
I've always helped Tom.
Soon, the tea was ready.
He learned quickly.
She learned quickly.
He'll come to his senses sooner or later.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
You're still drunk.
She's always in a bad mood.
Maybe that's not such a bad idea.
That wasn't such a bad idea.
Maybe it's not such a bad idea after all.
Look how big my shadow is.
Look how big my shadow is.
I don't want to talk to you anymore. Go away.
I don't want to talk to you anymore. Go away.
I don't like fish.
You're being watched.
I don't like milk.
I don't like milk.
You smell like a dog.
I'm a poor student.
I'm a poor student.
I solved the problem easily.
I just want a clear answer.
Unfortunately, I already have plans for that day.
I met her three days ago.
Tom doesn't yet realize he's in trouble.
Tom will talk to us on Monday.
I'm sure things will work out.
I'm sure things will work out.
I must do it. My honor is at stake.
I must do it. My honor is at stake.
I want to shake his hand.
I think Tom is absolutely right.
How many movies have you made?
I'm pretty sure Tom can do that.
I'm pretty sure Tom can do that.
I can't stand people like Tom.
Let's not forget about what Tom said.
I don't feel like singing right now.
I was hoping Tom would forget.
We're not happy.
Tom didn't know which way to turn.
I don't like it when you cry.
Does she have a pet?
I remember meeting the queen.
Tom slowly walked up the stairs.
Regrettably, that didn't happen.
Can someone call security?
Can someone call security?
This horse is expensive.
Do you think I'm that stupid?
Do you think I'm that stupid?
You'd better read this.
You'd better read this.
Perhaps we've met before.
We've been planning this for months.
Listen, I'm really sorry.
I thought you were a teacher.
I thought you were a teacher.
I thought you were a teacher.
I thought you were a teacher.
Why did you tell Tom this was my idea?
These tips may save your life.
Beautiful evening, isn't it?
There's another option.
Tom isn't as rich as me.
I never was rich.
I'll call you in about an hour.
I'll call you in about an hour.
I'll call you in about an hour.
Tom is now in police custody.
Tom was killed in a traffic accident last winter.
Tom has finally forgiven me.
Poland is located in Central Europe.
I hear you're very rich.
I hear you're very rich.
I hear you're very rich.
I hear you're very rich.
How many days are there until your birthday?
One can always find someone who knows what to do.
Are you sure that Tom didn't see you?
Are you sure that Tom didn't see you?
May I speak to Pedro?
Are you sure that Tom didn't do that?
Are you sure that Tom didn't do that?
Please take your seat.
Please take your seat.
Are you still seeing the same girl?
This is my favorite song by this group.
They tried a third time.
I just want to know why you left so early.
I just want to know why you left so early.
I'm quite rich.
Tom should be in a hospital.
When will the next train arrive?
Step away from the car.
Step away from the car.
Where can I get tickets?
Tom told me how to get to the theater.
I have to start getting ready.
I can't believe we're all still here.
I should've tried to stop it.
Your name is still on the list.
Your name is still on the list.
Let the boy go.
Let the boy go.
Tom is in a hurry to catch the train.
We have to try something else.
I heard you are going to get married.
I heard you are going to get married.
Tom won't tell me who he's dating.
I thought something like this might happen.
Tom is just talking to himself.
I think you're going to make it.
I think you're going to make it.
Isn't today your birthday?
Isn't today your birthday?
I hope to see you next year.
I hope to see you next year.
I was going to leave you a note.
I was going to leave you a note.
I'm not even sure if Tom will come.
I'm not even sure if Tom will come.
Tom invited you to dinner.
Tom invited you to dinner.
I don't know when the prices will change.
I'm sure Tom will listen to you.
She ordered him to do it.
I thought we had a great relationship.
You're the driver.
Where can I put these boxes?
How exactly was Tom killed?
Has Tom changed much?
The money will turn up.
Why are you dressed like an old man?
My mother has never seen me drunk.
I didn't like you at first.
I didn't like you at first.
I didn't like them at first.
I didn't like him at first.
I didn't like her at first.
I didn't like them at all.
I didn't like him at all.
I didn't like her at all.
Tom was captured almost immediately.
He did not finish the job.
I've promised Tom that I won't do that anymore.
I've promised Tom that I won't do that anymore.
We're lucky to have Tom on our team.
Tom became a Canadian citizen.
I'll phone you as soon as I get home.
I'm pretty sure that Tom won't want to do that.
This is the hotel where we stayed last year.
This is the hotel where we stayed last year.
How are you preparing for that?
How are you preparing for that?
We're quite pleased with the result.
He is a teacher.
I didn't know you could sing so well.
I didn't know you could sing so well.
Tom won't be able to lift that box by himself.
There's a rumor going around that you two are dating.
The driver stopped the bus.
You already know my opinion.
Don't cry. You're a big boy now.
Are you sure you're not busy?
Are you sure you're not busy?
Are you sure you're not busy?
I have red hair.
Your story is boring.
My children like to sing in the car.
I sent Tom a present.
That's a pretty strong statement.
Do you know the bus driver?
Do you know the bus driver?
Most people don't like hospitals.
Tom seemed to be satisfied with the results.
Tom lies to me all the time.
Should I call the police?
You don't have a plan, do you?
I don't write poetry.
You have thirty minutes to decide.
Switzerland is in Central Europe.
Hungary is located in Central Europe.
Where there's smoke there's fire.
We never killed anyone.
I love helping people.
Why don't you ever help Tom?
They're going to have a problem, I think.
I suggest you come with me.
I think I'm in danger.
I'd rather go by subway than by train.
Tom should've been back by 2:30.
I'm going to send Tom some money.
I found the picture Tom was looking for.
I found the picture Tom was looking for.
I was expecting a lot more.
I was expecting a lot more.
I like winter better than summer.
I like winter better than summer.
Tom takes a walk every morning.
I promised not to tell anybody.
Let's climb to the top of this mountain.
How can you be so calm?
How can you be so calm?
I always wanted to be rich and famous.
I always wanted to be rich and famous.
We've decided not to get married.
We'll need to come up with another plan.
How often do you borrow money?
How often do you borrow money?
She is more clever than beautiful.
Juneau is the capital of Alaska.
Tom seems to be busy now.
Are you free this afternoon?
Are you free this afternoon?
Are you free this afternoon?
I don't know. Let me check.
I only made three mistakes.
I only made three mistakes.
I have to get up early, even on Sundays.
We're a very good team.
I didn't call Tom.
I didn't call Tom.
Who has the key to this lock?
How many teachers do you know?
How many teachers do you know?
I have a rare disease.
I've never written a letter in French before.
I'm aware you've already finished.
I'm aware you've already finished.
I'm aware you've already finished.
We haven't finished talking.
Tom made his children go to bed early.
You're a very good teacher.
Tell Tom that I'm not speaking with him.
Tell Tom that I'm not speaking with him.
Cyprus is an island.
Let me try!
I waved.
I waved.
Tom said he didn't want to sing.
Tom could stay here if he wanted to.
I think my dad would've been pleased.
Tom said he's not going to sing.
How did you know that today is my birthday?
How did you know that today is my birthday?
Do you really want me to drink that?
Do you really want me to drink that?
Let's not forget about what Tom did.
I didn't plan on singing here tonight.
Tom can't help us right now. He's really busy.
Tomorrow I am going shopping.
It might take a little while.
I had to lie to everyone.
Tom is only pretending he's not interested.
I'll get the work done by the time he gets back.
He returns tomorrow.
Tom was a student at that time.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
I would've come even if you hadn't invited me.
Tom is in the hospital right now.
We've stopped doing that.
Let's hope it still works.
The job is a lot of fun.
I asked him about his new book.
Look in your top drawer.
Do you want to talk to the children?
Do you want to talk to the children?
What fun!
Any suggestions?
I don't want to speak to anybody else.
I wouldn't allow Tom to do that if I were you.
Let's hope that Tom doesn't do that.
What other way is there to do this?
I'm sure Tom won't agree to do that.
How can you be so calm at a time like this?
I know why Tom doesn't want to sing.
How did Tom lose all his money?
We're very pleased with the result.
Why are leaves green?
He knew perfectly well what he was doing.
Tom knew perfectly well what he was doing.
I had no idea where I was.
Why didn't you call earlier?
Why didn't you call earlier?
Let's go to the kitchen.
I remember where we first met.
I'm a little busy here.
I'm a little busy here.
Stay away from the window.
We're really in danger.
Please don't use Facebook at work.
Please don't use Facebook at work.
She looks beautiful in that dress.
I'm assuming you have a plan.
I'm assuming you have a plan.
Are you going to call Tom?
Are you going to call Tom?
I want to see a movie.
I'm aware of the problem.
She knew perfectly well what he was doing.
She knew perfectly well what she was doing.
Why are you always so serious?
Why are you always so serious?
Why are you always so serious?
Tom, are you sure you're all right?
Why are you always so serious?
Why are you always so serious?
I was born and raised in Australia.
You never help Tom, do you?
I didn't know you were awake.
I didn't know you were awake.
I didn't know you were awake.
I didn't know you were awake.
Would you like to hear my new song?
Would you like to hear my new song?
Would you like to hear my new song?
This is my favorite part of the movie.
Tom is going to be an engineer.
I forget where I put my keys.
Do you know what Tom ate for lunch?
Do you know what Tom ate for lunch?
I finished work at six.
This is my favorite spot.
Tom seems to be much happier than me.
You have three minutes and thirty seconds left.
You have three minutes and thirty seconds left.
Lake Biwa is the largest lake in Japan.
I'm already over thirty.
Tom promised me he'd come.
I could get used to this.
I’ll call you before I leave.
I’ll call you before I leave.
It was all very sudden.
I think you better take a look at this.
I think you better take a look at this.
I hope we can be friends.
He asked me to marry him.
Why are you always so serious?
Why are you always so serious?
How did you get here so quickly?
How did you get here so quickly?
How do you know Tom won't want you to do that?
How do you know Tom won't want you to do that?
Is that fish?
There's nobody in the building now.
I really think you should stop smoking.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
I hope I can help you.
Don't call Tom at his home after 2:30.
Don't call Tom at his home after 2:30.
I figured out what the problem is.
Tom doesn't like our neighbors very much.
Let's hope Tom doesn't come.
Please give an example.
Please give an example.
Do you drink cow's milk?
Tom is a capable young man.
I stepped aside so he could pass.
I stepped aside so he could pass.
We've got some difficult days ahead of us.
This is my problem and I'll deal with it.
I'm sorry, but I can't talk to you now.
I can't decide which to choose.
We hardly even talk anymore.
The movie was actually much better than I expected.
His behavior is sometimes strange.
How long has it been since Tom left?
Everybody was crying, even Tom.
I didn't know you were busy.
I didn't know you were busy.
I didn't know you were busy.
I didn't know you were busy.
This is my favorite place in the world.
How can they condone this?
He is building a bridge.
Pay attention to what's going on.
Pay attention to what's going on.
Is it possible to die of laughter?
They took my children away from me.
Solar power is becoming increasingly cheaper.
You promised you wouldn't do that.
You promised you wouldn't do that.
This sentence has a typo.
What operating system do you use?
It doesn't sound too bad.
What was inside the box?
I usually get up late.
You'd rather call her!
I'm sure Tom will like his new job.
I'm sure Tom will like his new job.
You must not enter the room.
I got the information I needed.
I got the information I needed.
I added water.
I added water.
How did you get our address?
Is Tom actually in danger?
We have a cat and several dogs
I can't read it, because I can't read.
What are the neighbours doing?
Nobody laughs at my jokes.
His jokes are not funny.
How long has this box been here?
I heard you tell Tom not to sing.
I heard you tell Tom not to sing.
I heard you tell Tom not to sing.
I heard you tell Tom not to sing.
I am talking to my child.
You have to hurry.
You have to hurry.
I am talking to my child.
It really is a difficult situation.
I've been trying to remember where I put my keys.
It's impossible not to love him.
She stopped breathing.
You don't get up as early as your sister.
You don't get up as early as your sister.
This dress is too expensive.
I knew Tom wouldn't want to sing.
How many languages can you speak fluently?
How many languages can you speak fluently?
Let me give you some advice - don't pee into the wind!
We were listening to music.
Tom is a mediocre painter.
I'm not going to sing that song anymore.
I'm not going to sing that song anymore.
It was clear that Tom didn't want to help us.
It was obvious that Tom didn't want to leave.
What's your French teacher's name?
I can't believe you really want to leave.
I can't believe you really want to leave.
Why are you getting married again?
Why are you getting married again?
Why are you getting married again?
I didn't see a single person in the park.
You should let us help you.
He wears thick glasses.
I'm not used to doing this kind of thing.
I wanted to sell it.
I wanted to sell it.
I wanted to sell it.
I wanted to sell it.
Now, wait a minute.
This song makes me want to cry.
You can reach the village by bus.
You can reach the village by bus.
Why did you buy a Japanese car?
Why did you buy a Japanese car?
Why did you buy a Japanese car?
I don't even notice that noise anymore.
It's an offer they can't refuse.
I didn't like the price.
Tom usually eats fish two or three times a week.
What kind of music do they play?
A lot of villagers were killed by soldiers.
She told the children an interesting story.
We have a deadline.
Why are you wearing a suit?
I'm watching the game on TV.
It's warm for this time of year.
Why do children lie to their parents?
We aren't going to sing that song.
We aren't going to sing that song.
Tom thought that he had woken up from his dream, but in fact he was still dreaming.
I receive information from a variety of sources.
We had doubts.
Tom is rich.
The good son always returns home.
How much will this project cost?
I hope Tom didn't notice what you were doing.
I hope Tom didn't notice what you were doing.
I hope Tom didn't notice what you were doing.
I hope Tom didn't notice what you were doing.
How can you watch a movie without popcorn?
How can you watch a movie without popcorn?
Tom likes to sing in the bathtub.
We are going to leave tomorrow.
I was allowed to go with them.
Tom has changed a lot since the last time I saw him.
When did the movie start?
I'm always busy on Mondays.
I'm always busy on Mondays.
Ladies and gentlemen, please come this way.
I just got out of jail.
What's your favorite screen saver?
How did you get that information?
How did you get that information?
How many times has this problem occurred?
She is about your age.
I don't have time to explain everything.
I read it on Facebook.
I will only say it once, so listen carefully.
I will only say it once, so listen carefully.
I will only say it once, so listen carefully.
I will only say it once, so listen carefully.
I thought you were downstairs.
I thought you were downstairs.
Tom earns three times more than I do.
What's more important to you?
I was probably thirty years old at that time.
Stop singing this song.
I gave you an order.
I gave you an order.
It's always so nice to see you.
It's always so nice to see you.
It's gotta be a joke, right?
It's gotta be a joke.
We shouldn't have sung that song.
We shouldn't have sung that song.
We shouldn't have sung that song.
Take a card.
Take a card.
You should apologize to her.
It was obvious that Tom didn't want to sing.
It was clear that Tom didn't want to sing.
I wouldn't be here if Tom hadn't invited me.
I was the one who showed Tom how to do that.
A girl called me.
You sing a lot better than I do.
You sing a lot better than I do.
You sing a lot better than I do.
How much more money does Tom want to borrow?
How did Tom know who to give it to?
How did Tom know who to give it to?
How did Tom know who to give it to?
How could I know it would take this long?
I used to sing that song when I was a child.
I used to sing that song when I was a child.
Why do you allow Tom to treat you that way?
Why do you allow Tom to treat you that way?
He is much better than you.
We're going to church.
It works pretty well.
I just told them we're dating.
I just told them we're dating.
He was not at all satisfied with the result.
Esperanto is an interesting language.
He means it seriously.
How often do you stay at a hotel?
How often do you stay at a hotel?
Let's sing a song about animals.
Let's sing a song about animals.
How much should teachers be paid?
I think he will come, but I'm not entirely sure.
It is better to act than to wait.
Did you steal that dress?
I live in a house that was built in 2013.
Well I don't think it's at all odd.
Spring is coming.
We have the same opinion.
Didn't you see the sign?
Didn't you see the sign?
Don't you see the sign?
Don't you see the sign?
He could not stop laughing.
I thought Tom wouldn't like me.
I thought Tom wouldn't like me.
Friends always find a solution.
Tom didn't want to go back.
Don't blame others for your mistakes.
I want to go to North Korea.
He's afraid of his own shadow.
I may not be busy next Monday.
The phone stopped ringing.
